Never been this frustrated or disappointed before after picking up a take out order. Historically I have been given a complementary to go cup of ice tea when picking up my order. Today was told they stopped doing that. When I asked the bartender to tell management that I really enjoyed it and was one reason that I would recommend this place to others I was told that they could not afford to do it anymore. I said it was probably cheaper than advertising. This became a back and forth argument which was unnecessary. I said all I asked you to do was let management know I thought it as a great thing. Was then directed to the manager who did nothing to try to satisfy my complaint and insisted that the cost of a to go cup full of ice tea was unsustainable for the business instead of trying to understand where I was coming from. I said they would definitely be getting a negative review from me and still they did not care. So regardless of my past experiences or what I think of the food this experience was bad enough to make me want to tell others about it.
DO NOT GO HERE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! the doctors are horrible always in a hurry as if you are a waste of time. My boyfriend and I would come in and they would make us wait 30 minutes if not more to be seen from our appt. they had told me that I had blood clots in my placenta which was false they billed my insurance company so much money saying they did a 3D ultra sounds charging my insurance 628 dollars and myself 341 just to read the scans... never informing me that my insurance would not cover the ultra sound. when they even told me about my blood clots they were rude and just did not really care to make you feel better. I am now 36 weeks and at a completely different place my doc is amazingly nice and I regret not browsing around I would keep telling myself that I was almost over my pregnancy but having someone so sweet and understanding take care of me now makes me feel so comfortable not only that this doc will follow you your whole pregnancy and at mom doc they would hop around much more confusing to keep up with you and get to know you! do not go through the bill stress and rudeness start somewhere new!
We were excited to check out this local place we drove all the way from Charlotte to try it. After taking one bite out of the sample I felt sick it tasted super artificial nothing like cookie dough. I felt bad and bought a scoop anyways and threw it away when I got home...also it s way overpriced!
After repeating my order 4 times they were able to make out what I was saying. Lucky for me everything I had ordered was in my bag. I opened my side orders of gravy and found the bottom of one of my lids filthy with who knows what. I did not feel confident that the food I was eating would not cause me a stomach ache so I just threw it out. They also advertise Pepsi but when I ordered one I was advised by staff they only have coke products? That s confusing. Regardless I can guarantee I will never go to this location ever again
Regardless of the interior the forecourt parking spots and sidewalk are disgusting vile and repulsive. Every time I step out of my truck the ground looks like a murder had occurred. Last time I stopped to get gas the ground I would have had to step on was some collection of God knows what sticky mess. I never got out and will never return. This place has no pride and no regard for its customers. I will drive past to a further gas station.
Huge warehouse like bar and grill with strange Djs that play country along with hip hop and rap tracks to throw everyone off. The funny thing is that most people are dancing to the twerk songs rather than the 2 step! Its an average bar with average food and average girls.
Clerk 0772834 does not know what she is doing but has no problem being condescending to customers. Amazing how RUDE some people can be.
Food was great but experienced ruined by horrible service. Some of the worst I ve had. Host did not greet us for 5 10 minutes. Waiter was very unhelpful unorganized and rude. Hair in the gyoza. Had to ask to get the table cleared between courses. Poor knowledge of dishes and menu. We re not given water refills. When water was refilled it went into a cup of beer. Brought the bill in the middle of the meal without asking how everything was or if we would like dessert. When asked what the black sesame ice cream was like the waiter replied it s like black sesame. It took 3 hours to complete our meal. Luckily we enjoyed the food and the company.
So it s buy one get one free sandwich. Hidden scam you must buy a medium drink. So it s 6pm dinner hour. Even though they know the offer is going on they have no bread left except whole wheat and a few cheese bread. Duh! You should have had plenty made for this promo. The franchise owner is no where to be found. Maybe Mr Babcock needs to get behind the counter and do some work. The employees were overwhelmed. They had this deer in the headlights spaced out look on their faces. Many people like myself just walked out. Mr Babcock epic fail!
My wife and I came for lunch. Ordered a tamale and a quesadilla. The tamale was not good and the quesadilla was only passable. If we come again will try their specialty nachos but based on this experience we ll probably stay away. The atmosphere is nice though the seat in our booth was torn. The 2 star rating is mainly for the good friendly service.
Okay so this is my second time posting on Yelp. I did not know that they pick and choose which reviews they want to display. So this is my last one. Just know that this dealership will LIE to you with a straight face and STEAL your money. It s funny how yelp only posted the one good review.....
sept 5th 7pm in case the owner wants to know run!!! worst food ever put on a plate!! dried up old chicken or pork even the server could not tell smothered drowned in hp sauce. not jerk at all. nothing good to say at all!!!!!!!! i have to give a rating to post but i would not give a star at all.
As much as I love and go everyday to Dutch Bros this morning on May 24 2015 was ridiculous. 39minutes is the longest I have ever had to wait in line at the closet location I go to all the time. Shift change should not be chaos for this company nor have customers waiting that long. I hate Starbucks but I never had to wait that long in a line out in the streets some days. And because I go all the time and they know what I order by heart do not stamp the person ahead of us entire card and not mine when they ordered 1drink. I m very unhappy with day. Yes I ll be back but seriously get your act together. Thanks Kat
I just called this company to set up an appointment and get an estimate for my lawn landscaping and the line put me to a voicemail that was full so I could not leave a message. That to me it s an indicator of poor management the telephone line is the life line of your business.Does this company have too many clients? No need for new ones? If your current clients need to get in touch... I wonder how ... I guess I will be calling someone else.
My group and I experienced both pros and cons at the Marquee Dayclub. We were here over Labor Day weekend for Galantis. We loved the setup of the club however I felt disappointed and scammed because several of the girls in my group were charged for more than what they ordered. One girl was told her card was declined so she paid cash instead and it turned out her card was actually charged twice for the one drink she paid for in cash. Another girl was double charged for her drinks. Be prepared to have a lot of fun just know you or someone in your group may have to be filing claims with your bank the following day!
Worst service EVER! They bartenders would rather talk to each other all day then serve a single drink! I guess it s off to the next bar to quench the thirst. Uugggh!
Yes it s free but so are those cheesy Greek robot performers at Ceasar s. The show starts at 6 and runs every hour on the hour. To be honest I think the best part is that on a cold night you can feel the warmth from the fire but you can also stay warm inside the casino which is where I will stay next time.
The food was very good. The setting was amazing sitting on the rail overlooking the Bellagio fountain . But the service was pretty bad with the exception of a great bartender . Our table was not ready when we arrived we waiting for a long time in the bar and were forgotten until we went back to find out what was up once seated the server forgot several things that we ordered as well as a few other issues. For the price in Vegas at a spot like Bellagio I would expect much better service.
Worst restaurant in the Venetian do not waste your time and money eating here. I went there for dinner with family from out of state and it was terrible! We were sat at a table that was really small and had to keep moving things to allow room for the drinks then food... It was not worth the discomfort of the small table as the food was BAD...little flavor tough over cooked chicken in the Alfredo and a Chicken Parm that was so bad it could not be eaten...tough and chewy flavorless sauce and over cooked pasta. When we were asked if everything was OK they did not like being told our opinion the manageress said she tasted the food and it was OK I guess it s OK if that her usual stander of food! There s good restaurants in the Venetian so go somewhere else.
I m glad others have had positive experiences with this place. My husband and I unfortunately have not. We were thrilled when they moved into our neighborhood and initially had nothing but awesome things to say about this place. The pizza and wings were always good fresh the service was friendly and prompt. It became our go to place for Sunday football wings and pizza or for lazy Mondays when no one wanted to cook... In the last year however this has changed. We ve had nothing but negatives unfriendly service problems with calling ahead food was not ready wrong order having to wait forever for someone to come take our order despite the fact that no one else was in the store etc. Last Saturday afternoon was the final straw my husband went to get 1 dozen wings and 1 slice of pizza we did not call ahead granted but it still took him 30 minutes despite the fact that the place was empty the server was very disorganized and unfriendly and by time he got home with the food it was undercooked both items and so we tossed it. Tried calling and asking to speak to a manager none was around server said they had to go and hung up. Tried emailing owner no response. We ll take our business elsewhere there are plenty of other places in this area to get good pizza and wings.
OVERPRICED. Spent 20 for a sandwich a bag of chips and water. Usually not about that life but I had not eaten since 11am and it was 11pm when I bought this. But I have to say I was surprised on how fresh it was!
Hotel is OK. The focus of this review is for the check out process. Watch the mini bar charges!!! The Delano uses sensors to detect minibar usage. I did not use the minibar at all and on check out had multiple mini bar charges. Their support number consists of telling you that they use minibar sensors and for disputes they ask you to send email. I sent email as instructed and never got a response. Finally I had to call the front desk to resolve the charges but then the Delano failed to resolve the charges as we had agreed on the phone.
Good food. Served pretty quick. The food was served hot. Josie did a good job. Very attentive to senior citizens.
I wanted to cash check drawn on wells fargo. I got a ridiculous run around. The employees were 1 Rude 2. Condescending 3. Uncaring 4. Unprofessional 5. Zero service offered. I did not get the check cashed even though it was a business check drawn on wells fargo high check number. good and worst of all they did not care.
We have been going to this place since they have been open. However tonight was the smallest portions worst service we have experienced from the side services. Very sad!!!!!. The sushi bar service was still great!! DONT THINK WE WILL EVER GO BACK!!!!!
Stay away from this business they took my money and would not produce what I paid for. That s called stealing! ..check Better Business Bureau if in doubt!!! Once they get your money they wo not return calls or emails! This is a follow up from your response...your full of BS you have my emails and I left several voicemails...I can produce email copies if you like! Still no product what kind of lame excuse that you never received the product... no worries BofA already credited money back to my account! Even though you told them I received the merchandise! Pathetic liars! Go out of business please!
Went to Sugar Bowl for dinner and ice cream. We had a cheeseburger and milk shakes that DIDN T come with French Fries OR whipped Cream who does that! The burger was completely tasteless... Certainly NOT grilled watery. Toppings were fresh and delicious however. The decor is definitely vintage gone bad! Johnny Rockets does a better job with better tasting food and ENERGY! Overall Sugar Bowl is cute but needs a new Chef uniforms for their staff yoga pants are unprofessional music and life breathed back into this tired restaurant that s seen better days.
Super rude customer service. Tried to sell me coils that were loose from the bottom and said its normal...yeah i wont go there anymore.
Chemicals open in the open dog area!!! Okay first off... I ve taken my dog here about 8 time or so and he always comes back looking good!! Never a bad experience in my life here until today when I brought my dog back to have them redo his ears because they were not trimmed per usual. So they took him back and I waited. He was TERRIFIED when they took him back which is a BAD sign because they may have hurt him yesterday. Instantly my stomach was in a knot because they take dogs into rooms and customers cannot see what s going on. And I did not think about that until then. I walked around and observed the store and I noticed nasty hair balls everywhere and dust. Like they have not cleaned this place once. Then I saw one of the workers grab a mop from a bucket and start mopping. Now I would not have a problem with that but the bucket and mop was in the PLAY AREA WHERE THE DOGS ARE. I immediately asked the receptionist who was holding her newborn baby... kinda odd if there was chemicals in that bucket. She has YES !!!!! but said the owner is all about going green so it s a green product. Okay??? So?? I then asked what would happen if the dogs got into it since it is 100 accessible to the dogs. And said it will just give them an upset stomach. ARE YOU KIDDING ME?! Is that ALL??? Just get my dog sick from whatever the heck is in the bucket. My dog was dog immediately after that and my poor dog looked petrified. So I took my dog and left immediately. If anyone knows a place I can report them to for chemical hazard PLEASE let me know ASAP.
To me This place is worth 3 stars simply based on the atmosphere. It felt romantic and hip to sit underneath the cloudy painted ceiling and string lights. Loved the lady pushing the cart of dim sum around. The best thing I ate here were the eggrolls and the soup dumplings. After trying those I just knew the entrees would be great. However they were flavorless! Plain noodles rice and chopped meat. I had to pour some of my dumpling dipping sauce on my noodles just to finish. The meat did not have any flavor. I wo not be back no matter how good the ambiance and dumplings are. There are endless other options in Vegas where you can blow 70 on two people.
Update 9 2018 I love gyros and I have always liked Old Village Grill ! Today was a disappointment Gyro meat was cold nothing worse than cold meat. They keep it in a chafing dish with a cover lid after shaving from the cone. There was a miss communication with the clerk and the cook we asked that they separate the meat and the sauce for a gyro to go we received they gyro built with gyro sauce on the meat . We are taking this restaurant off the rotation list for a bit !!
if they would let us sample the juices it would be soooo much better. i felt really targeted ! dont come here a regular customer. this is a one time buy store they treat you like your a theif !!!!!!!!! i hate it!!! i was there one time looking for coals and the guy that works there went straight to me and had a gun on his pants visible right next to me like a body guard!!! he did not even say anything!!!!!!! but watch me constantly wacthingyou like your going to steal something ! the absolutley worst store to go too sorry but if you guys treated your customers with respect especially if they go there all the time. it would be better.... never going there again!!!!!!!!!!! the shop a mile down is wayyyyy better customer service and they actually treat you like a human being and not like your going to rob from them every single time you go there i rate this store 0 stars. ok customer service its loke they wanna help you and get you put of there asap!!!! i hateeeeeee it ughhhhhh its so frustrating becausr thats the closet store in my location it sucks
We were so excited for this new place open nearby our office we want to give a try however after we picked up our lunch we literally FOUND a big black hair in it completely ruined it!!! It s disgusting!!!
I was very excited to see something nice move into this location. Fresh and Easy is relatively inexpensive but I m always reminded that they do not accept coupons they only accept their own coupons or award a bag credit like most of the other grocery stores. I do like that they have a hybrid parking space right up front for me. Pros This store attracts some really nice people to this rundown strip mall area. Cons Most of the produce here is neither Fresh nor Easy. In fact I ve seen many items pass their expiration date while they re still on the shelf.
My family has visited Rawhide on previous occasions and always had a good time. We were celebrating my son s birthday and we decided to go to Rawhide since my great granddaughters aged 1 and 3 were going also. We thought they would have fun at the attractions there with the petting zoo etc. We were there at 5 30 and not many people there. We went to see what was in the petting zoo. All we could see was a Turkey a chicken and a bird. It cost 5 for an adult and kids three and under free. We decided it was not worth it so we walked back towards the restaurant hoping there would be something for the kids to see on the way. Nothing was open. We finally decided we were just going to have dinner. The dining room was near empty. They told us the wait was two hours!!! There was hardly anyone there and maybe two couples behind us. They said the had people with reservations but the place was empty. Will never go back to Rawhide. It was a waste of time. We ended up going to Outback and had a great meal and a great time.
Ordered for delivery bill was 10 more than what I ordered. When I asked the driver why it was 24 when I ordered 2 6 lunch specials? The driver told me because of gas ! Ummm no! You go now I buy your food no more! Then the owner called and wanted to yell at me. Great customer service!
This is the first time I have left a review after using Yelp many times but this restaurant warrants it. This was one one of the worst Chinese meals I have had...Panda Express is better and I wo not eat that! I should have been clued in when I saw the splash marks not cleaned off the walls or the hard water stained glasses but sadly I was craving Chinese food so I overlooked the ambiance . The soup was bland the egg roll was greasy and served with sweet sauce that had the consistency of jelly the moo shu was rolled in the kitchen as opposed to table side so I had to open it to apply the overly salty sauce and the beef with vegetables was just gross. AVOID AVOID AVOID this restaurant.
My nephew the budding chef invited us for his birthday dinner. He had made reservations 3 days in advance. The party was a large party of about 20 people. I ve been to enough restaurants to know that a party this size is usually tag teamed by 2 or more of the wait staff. And that appeared to be what was happening when we first sat down. Then there was some confusion and they asked for our orders again. Then one of the waitresses never appeared again. My husband received his cola and some of the folks at the other end of the table received their drinks but our drinks did not come for quite some time. Our water was empty still no drinks and they had not taken our dinner order yet. Waiting waiting waiting. Finally our drinks come and then she disappears and more waiting and then she takes our orders. While we did have poor service I do not believe it was solely the waitress fault. There seemed to be kitchen issues as well. Our dishes came out one or two at a time. It was really odd. Eventually out came ONE of 3 order of calamari. You would think everything else was on it s way no more waiting. Finally another couple of plates came out people were trying to figure out if they should be polite and wait or eat because by then it was past 10pm. It went on like this for another 3 hours....yes 3...we were the only table left in the restaurant and we had not been served completely. Finally the poor waitress is trying to close people out on the tab while still trying to serve people. I asked her if there was not anyone that could help her as she could not very well be expected to be in two places. She said there really was not and that was what happened. People were still trying to pay one couple and ourselves still did not have part of our meal or our dessert. There were two gentlemen that appeared to be waitstaff. I asked one of them if someone could possibly help our by now frazzled waitress. He said there was not . I gave him an incredulous look and said ca not you see she ca not possibly do this by herself and needs help . He begrudgingly agreed to help by getting the remaining portions of our meals sat them down with a plunk and a look that said he was not happy about helping. The 1 star is for operational process and service. The food was really quite good but I was in so much pain from sitting for so long that I could not enjoy it. I do not think I have ever seen a restaurant where one person was left on their own with a huge party and other staff just walking around watching them.
Now I understand why there are so many reviews. Restaurant virtually demands you write a review ... preferably 5 stars. Far from the rating I would give. First and last visit to this place. Must accept some of the blame myself as it was my first experience at hot pot. Spent 60 for myself only. Interesting concept but due somewhat to my inexperience it just did not work. I overcooked the meat making it virtually inedible. Tough and tasteless beef tongue and premium lamb . Shrimp were good but I do not like peel your own. They were fresh as were the scallops which were quite small. Best dish was the kobe fried rice which was quite good but not great. Pass on the watermelon juice which was watery and served at room temperature. Blah! Based on all of the Yelp reviews I decided to give it a try and did but wished I did not .
As much as I would like to give the store a good review on this store that s not gong to be and easy task! There are some very nice items in this furniture store. Some a bit pricey and others ok! But the customer service is the real issue.... There was a salesman who greeted us when we come into the store. He pointed us in the right direction for the items we were looking for lamps and living room furniture. As we walked through the desolate store heading towards the back of the store there were three sales Cleark s behind a long desk two men and a woman who all pretend like they do not see us! It seems as if they are hoping we would not ask any questions to make them leave their area of comfort! Let s see what happens on the next visit!
Ok I m about to sound like a big time snob here but I think the existence of this place is bringing the Venetian down. I consider the Venetian to be one of the elite hotels in Vegas. There obviously are much cheaper hotel options in Vegas so when I pay their unnecessarily high rates to stay at the Venetian it probably means I m trying to avoid the Circus Circus crowd. We came here Sunday morning because there did not seem to be any standout breakfast options at the Venetian and we wanted to get to the pool area as quickly as possible. I noticed this place served breakfast and even though it did not appear to be their specialty I thought Well it s the Venetian. They must hold Enzo to some kind of standard right? Wrong. I ordered a cheese omelet along with a sausage link that could have been mistaken for a dog turd except cold. It came with Italian toast which was just a thick slice of bread also served cold. Not too good. I ended up ordering a slice of cheese pizza to go which at least turned out to be edible. Meanwhile I have not even had my coffee yet and while waiting to pay there s a lady holding up the line for 5 minutes because she ca not get over that a slice of pizza costs 4.00. I aint payin four freakin dollars for one slice of freakin pizza!! Are you crazy?? Uggghhh. Then get the fuck out of the line dummy! The entire food court was a fucking zoo of hungover frat boys gang bangers and lowest common denominator riff raff. They should do live broadcasts of the Jerry Springer show there. I m not saying the Venetian needs to be like the Wynn by not including any reasonably priced food in the entire hotel but they can and should step it up a notch if they want to be able to continue justify their room rates. I would have gladly paid a few more bucks to eat some quality breakfast food and be surrounded by people with a tiny bit more class. This place should go. They should honestly just tear that entire food court down and build a new restaurant there. Half the fucking people that wrote reviews for this place apparently ate breakfast there. How about an actual breakfast place?
Worst customer service ever. If you ever plan on getting a refund expect a battle. Sent a refund to me but in not the email address I paid with but another. And I have no access to the funds which makes it useless
First and last time we will ever eat here. The staff acts as if it is painful to be working have zero customer service skills and no personality. They are robots going through the motions. I ordered a quesadilla with grilled chicken. I saw the guacamole that the menu stated I received with my order. When she asked me if i wanted the sour cream pico and guac I replied yes please. The guac she gave me was from another bin behind the counter that was brown and watery. I asked for the guac in the other bin that she had just told my husband was fresh. She replied that she had to give me this one and slapped a scoop of the nastiness on my food. The quesadilla was not cut which made it really hard to eat all folded up. Also we had the chips and queso. They give you a ton of chips which is a bonus but the queso was less to be desired. My husband had grilled steak tacos and he said they were very bland. The meal cost us about 30. Sadly we can get more flavorable food for less the cost at Zabas next door.
It s a shame that this place went under new management. Ever since the new owners have bought it it s been horrible service. We ve been in there several times and each time it s like we re putting them out for whatever order we have. They are not happy they do not smile. We asked for certain blizzard when they gave it to us it was the wrong one when we advise them it was the wrong one we got nothing but attitude back. As a local I guess I will just buy my stuff is in town driving through Henderson
Almost did not come eat here when I read the reviews. When we walked in the place was pretty crowded . The service was good other then the waitress not knowing it was happy hour. If you eaten at any other Out backs the menu is pretty much the same. Their Tortilla Soup was better then most. AARP discounts are not available here on weekends so fit that they get two stars.
Super disappointed in my breakfast this am . I ordered the eggs Benedict. I admit I m really picky about how my eggs are cooked. I especially do not enjoy when they are overcooked and this is exactly what happened. I basically was served hard boiled eggs covered in hollandaise sauce the sauce was delicious . There is just no excuse for this. Yes I could have sent them back but my boyfriend already had his food so I did not want to wait. He loved his food by the way. He had the pork chops. We also shared a side of biscuits and gravy and a pancake all tasty. Not sure if I d go back though. Service was just ok. Coffee was lukewarm at best and I did not get a water refill.
They one get one star as they are delivering me 350Mbps service. However I had to do a lot of work to get that done for the low price of 80 month. Feedback Lived up to your commitment for the service that I was sold. I upgraded my internet service package based on two features faster speed and 150GB of cloud storage. When I call in to activate my cloud storage I was told that on April 6th of 2017 you discontinued that service. I purchased my service in mid April and I was still being sold this service. Not very impressive customer service again. Cox also failed to send me the new modem at 10days from the date that I purchased the new service so I had to go to a store in person to pick one up. Why is customer service not a priority at COX?
First experience was awful. The guy we asked help us was so rude! We waited 30mins at pick up. Bought 3 things and nothing was not broken. Lamp was missing the turn on switch. Dresser drawers do not slide right. Chaise chair has a broken board in it and WE have to bring it back up exchange because if they deliver they expect you to be home ALL day waiting. We spent a lot of money. We drove fairly far as well. This was awful.
3rd and last time here. Service is horrible and slow. By the time they finally get to ringing me up my food is cold. Not going back. Saw the cashier touching chips with no gloves on.
I really wanted to think this place was an ok option for a quick bite during a work day. I ordered a California roll and a spicy tuna roll thinking Hey it ca not be thattt bad. Meh. Both of the rolls were only 6 pieces each and not big enough to not have included two more pieces each. But the real kicker was that the rice was semi uncooked. Every bite that I forced myself to eat took more chewing and dare I say crunch than should be required for basic rolls. You could actually see on the rice that it had not been completely cooked with the whiter centers of each grain. I am someone who loves pretty much all things sushi and even I had a hard time finishing them. For what was just about 11 for the complete order...do yourself a favor and go to the Sheraton s The District for one of their 9 lunches and leave feeling satisfied and not full of regret.
Let me start by saying that my wife and I have been in the service industry for 10 years and this was a complete disapointment for a show or evening drink. Seems as if no one Celia especially is happy or even comfortable with having you as a customer. Our bartender Celia seemed upset with everyone s presence in the establishment and continued to go out side for repeated cigarette breaks and to take phone calls. Customers were waiting to be attended to and several came to the bar to order a beverage and left with no drink before she came back. Multiple would be patrons left because there was no one to serve them. She seemed bothered every time myself or anyone else asked to order anything however she was all smiles when we asked to close out. The D.J. Was great. Service was not. I hate leaving reviews like this because I have been in the industry a very long time and I know how it can be...but this was unacceptable.
Cool idea.. food was cold and uncooked though. Not sure if that s how it s supposed to be but I m not a huge fan of raw onion and spinach. I ll have to pass!
I will never come to this establishment again! Bringing my family here was supposed to be fun for us but instead it ended up being such a huge embarrassment. We walked in today the restaurant was busy which I did not mind I mean it s peter piper so who does not want to come here right? We ordered our food and while we were waiting I decided to go to the restroom. The restroom was filthy toilet paper on the floor 2 of the stalls were over flowing there was no toilet paper in any of them and there was soap spread on the counters. Now while I realize that some of these things are out of their control we do have to realize that it is their responsibility to keep everything clean in their restrooms. Back to my experience we waited patiently for our food when the buzzard thing went off I went to go pick up the pizza and instead of someone handing the pizza to me which was sitting at the edge of the table the gentleman close by simply gave me an attitude and said that s you.. no common courtesy to hand me anything just simply that s you and walked away. I figured no big deal right? So our second buzzard went off for us to go pick up the wings that we had ordered as we go up the lady ignores my son who was trying to grab the wings. The manager was not paying any attention to who was grabbing what and so some idiot grabbed our food instead. The manager looked at us confused as though it was us who took the wings and were trying to accuse us of trying to get more than what we paid for which was ridiculous.... we walked them over to our table to prove to them that we did not steal anything and to have them make a new order for us.... RIDICULOUS!!! We finally had gotten our food and the evening went fine after that but with my experience I will NEVER return! I am disgusted by this place!
ZERO STARS! Tried to take an international flight. Bought all tickets from Copa America and they gave us tickets to fly domestically and then internationally. Stated we can check 2 bags in for free. Go in to the airport and United will not let us check 2 bags free. If you re going to have connecting flights get your baggage checks correctly. One airline cannot be saying 2 bag and the other 1 bag. And why is it that my grandmother who is flying the same airlines same flight she can check 2 bags no extra fees through United? Terrible! Now we re late for our flights. I will also be posting this review on Copa America since we bought all tickets through them but have to fly through united first. Also united never gave us the option to pay for our second bag. We would have gladly paid for the bag but the lady did not give us an option. Instead she was rude and gave up and left us. She just walked away with no directions whatsoever. Stephanie O. Was her name. You could have at least held your cool. You could have said just one moment while I get help. Instead you just left then 7mins later came back and angrily stated I cannot check you in. And just stood there doing nothing. Then angrily stated you will get us a lead to help us. Then disappear again!
I went here yesterday to eat with my wife. It was restaurant week but I did not come to try out their food. They did not have a regular menu so it was only restaurant week menu. Everything we order was out. The restaurant did not seem really busy at all. My wife had the ribeye steak and it was okay. You ca not really mess that up. I had the lamb pave which was really disappointing. The meat was very chewy and the cut of the meat was more of like prime ribs but tasted like lamb. The rice or grains that came with it was hard and the sauce was bland. The dessert was okay but once again what we wanted was out. The chocolate dessert I felt like it was old and tasted like it came from sams club. I thought a 4 star restaurant would be better than this but really was disappointed. Maybe we went on the wrong day because yelp has always been right. When I go to a 4 star restaurant I would expect the food to be more tasteful. Our bill was about 120 which included a bottle of wine. Even the wine we ordered it was 2012 on the menu but they brought a 2013. The only good experience I had was at the end of dinner the chef came out and greet us. He s from France and my wife spoke French being from Montreal they had a quick conversation. I love good service but I wish the food was better. The service was ok. I would not recommend this restaurant to my friends and would not come back myself but if you want to try it yourself I would recommend not getting the lamb.
Very disappointed. Had a party of 5 went in when they were 3 4 full in the restaurant. Put in our orders one by one 4 of us got spaghetti and 1 got the burger. 10 15min gone by 3 of the 4 spaghetti and the burger came out. The spaghetti portion sizes were different. The fries that came with the burger were cold. The last spaghetti took quite a bit of time so it turns out 2 servers got the order wrong. After realizing their mistake still waited another 15 20min before the last spaghetti came to the table while all others finished their meals. The communication between staff is very poor the food is nothing special. Most redeeming quality is the water replenishing service is great. Price does not match their food quality. Very very disappointed. Would not visit again.
Yuk O. I work just down the street and read the reviews so thought it would be great. Wrong! They gyro was ok but the salad that came with it was nasty wilted lettuce with a brown slice of tomato and a blob of dressing. Their prices are too expensive for lunch and to top it off the girl working take out was totally snotty and rude when I asked some questions about the menu. This one is a pass for me.
Well what I can tell your first hand. I was not there long enough to even order I stood inside for exactly 10 mins . no one said anything to me not the cook or the woman in the back I notice a gentleman sitting down inside and he apparently ordered. I could even understand if someone told me to wait one moment but not even that. I will not be coming back here.EVER!!!!!!!
I heard about the Prism service too and had difficulty with COX internet so decided to give CenturyLink a try. All I can say is that I never got my system installed because their promotional package price was a moving target. I got lured into an all in one price of just under 100. My many calls to get a written confirmation met with various reps giving me prices as high as 180. I even went into their local store to find out what my service was going to cost and still could not come up with a written confirmation. At the store the sales rep hand wrote what my monthly cost was going to be from a computer screen!! When I asked her why she could not give me a printout of what my service was going to cost the reply was that this is company confidential information and we cannot give you a printout!! I could never get any written confirmation or email giving me the assurance that they would not send me some crazy high bill and try to ruin my credit if i did not pay it. Needless to say they never confirmed the prices and gave me all sorts of stories including it is our corporate policy to not put anything in writing. I never got to experience the service. So I do not know. I guess I am going to live with COX s shortcomings. At Least COX honors their package prices and I know what I am going to get charged at the end of the month. This phone ordeal with CenturyLink took hours and hours of my time. If you have free time and do not have anything better to do give CenturyLink a try.
What a total waste of money! There is absolutely nothing great about his performance at all. The illusions all suck. He does nothing like his tv show. Would NOT recommend this show to anyone UNLESS you are having trouble going to sleep. This show will help you do that!!
Would not even call a speakeasy as other reviewers called it. Speakeasies are usually known for good cocktails. Speakeasy or not its not a good place at all. Ordered a pitcher of mojito which tasted like tap water. I did not taste any sugar lime or alcohol. I could physically see mint in it but did not taste much of that either. Of course bartender could not care less. Shared with one other person feeling more sober than walking in. Great decor and has the potential to be a fun place but the customer service is terrible.
In short bartender steph selectively provides very terrible customer service to some customers but the managers are understanding if you have an issue. Here s why... I go to this bar very infrequently and generally have an okay experience but the above rating is due to very terrible customer service we received from two of the bartenders Steph specifically on the same night. Started with ordering a shandy. The drink tasted nothing like shandy but my friend drank it anyway just to not cause any trouble only to find out later from another employee steph that they actually do not have shandys. Rather than simply saying they do not have the it they proceeded to give us something that tastes like it without even letting us know. Bartender s response when I confronted him was it s the closest we got while rolling his eyes. Since when is this acceptable? Long story short I calmly requested a refund for that drink since they clearly knowingly gave us the wrong drink... In return I get zero apologies an angry bartender steph starting to scream asking me if I wanted a shot and telling me to bring the drink back if I wanted a refund. I tried to deescalate her incivility and she immediately started to not acknowledge that I was even there or that there was an issue. At this point I asked her name which she lied about and told me was samantha . I spoke to the manager who seemed understanding of the ridiculousness of the situation and terrible customer service provided by his employees and refunded my drinks. Otherwise the atmosphere is just ok. Lots of smoking etc. I probably will not be going back for a while.
First let me say the food was great. I had a large group from out of town that wanted to eat downtown and I suggested hash hash a go go. When we went to settle up instead if asking for separate checks pain in the ! I asked the waiter to apply cash a a specific amount on my credit card. He made a mistake and charged my card three times the amount. He fixed it and we left giving him a 20 cash tip. To my surprise the initial charge was taken held from my bank and when calling the manager Leilani she was not pleasant. I am very patient and she interrupted me and basically said call your bank on Monday and they will release the hold. She gave the obligatory I m sorry but was rude and said we hold 20 on top of the total regardless.. we left our server cash. If you are going to hire people in a management role hash hash make sure they receive empathy training because this manager was void of it! What if I really needed that money over the weekend? Not returning to this location.
I probably go here twice a month and have always had a good experience. For once in my life I did not have a coupon in hand so I found one online. The cashier said if you find one online and show it to me then I can apply it. I pulled it up and showed it to her just like she asked and then she told me I had to order it online. Being that she s probably 16 years old she likely has not realized the importance of customer service so I hope that someone educates her at some point. It s common knowledge that Papa Murphy s has endless coupons so it s not that I was trying to capitalize on some exclusive offer so I m perplexed why she was not able to apply the offer especially when she specifically asked to see it on my phone. What a disappointing experience at least Babbo is next door so I can divert my business there when I want Italian.
Great view here but the service was a bit of a mess. I tried to come here for a birthday gathering with friends last night. Turned out there was a reservation glitch and the hostess gave us a hard time despite other staff trying to be accommodating. We then offered to sit at the bar facing the windows and waited 20 minutes and were never served. The hostess clearly saw us trying to flag her or other wait staff down but chose to ignore us. We were really disappointed and likely wo not be back. We were completely fine with not getting a table but would have appreciated friendlier service.
This place should change their name to Pho MSG and shut down for good! They can not cook Pho. Even the soy bean drink is gross! Taste like vanilla egg nog...
Ribs were fatty and underportioned. Waitstaff only visited during order and check time. Look elsewhere.
Great owners nice decor swing and a miss on the food. Steak Burger was bland and cold fries soggy pickled sides too soapy tasting. I d give it a second chance but ca not recommend it sorry to say.
Stick to the lobster! That was our conclusion after we ordered in from this place yesterday. My cousin and I were both craving fish and chips therefore we looked at our very few options. We thought that with seafood in the name they must do fish well...we were mistaken. Our order started off with garlic bread with cheese. That was not bad nothing special. Four pieces of roll with seasoning and melted cheese. Ca not complain! The portion sizes seemed off a massive piece of fish with a few fries. Some of the fries were soggy but still tasted pretty good. The fish was the miss it was a huge portion slightly over cooked but hot and crispy. My cousin found bones and veins in her fillet and we both had difficulty cutting it. Delivery was within an hour and the guy delivering it was friendly. Price point was higher than expected but everything was still hot when it was delivered. Obviously despite the fact that I m not a seafood fan we should have stuck with what they are known for... the lobster! In the end the happiest diners were my two dogs who enjoyed some of the melted cheese from the garlic bread.
As a former baristas hired by the manager from this store we were APPALLED at the service we were provided with today. At the register we apologized for having a large drink order and we re given attitude because of this and when we got our drink order 3 of the 4 drinks were not made at as requested standard. I am not one to complain about bad service but knowing what the drinks are supposed to come out as has made me frustrated.
Personally the only reason to go to the forum shops is for some of the restaurants e.g. the Palm. I ve not found the shopping there to be worthwhile. You can do much better at other malls. Overall the Fashion Show mall a little bit north on the strip across from the Wynn is a much much better bet. It s much larger and has a much better mix of stores from my point of view.
This was the worst Cheesecake Factory experience of all time mind you have visited many Cheesecake Factory locations across the country. Waiter could not be less interested asked if I was ready to order just after I sat down no bread was offered or provided all other tables had bread no drink refill was offered either until check was brought to table. When I quizzed the waiter about the service he said he did not know why no bread was offered even though I saw him deliver bread to other tales.
Food is very bland. Ordered the chicken pad Thai. All I got was noodle and chicken..... Nothing else. Seriously the most boring meal I have ever had.
Check out my burger delivered today. I did not even have to tell them I was a vampire! So raw yet so burnt on the edges. I screams of safety.
Takoyaki balls were supposed to come in 4 small order or 8 large order . We ordered a small one and 5 half balls came. Not exactly the four full ones we had in mind. My friends ramens were way too spicy and garlicky kind of tasted like bad Kim chi. My vegetarian one was bland and over cooked. Our server was full of attitude and inattentive. Me no come back
I went to this restaurant last year when it was called 31Kitchen and I must say the new renovations look great definitely makes the place look more modernized! I came here for dessert at around 10pm and it was filled largely with young adults. I ordered the sweet sesame soup and my friend got the sweet 5 assorted dumplings with coconut milk as well as black milk tea with tapioca. The food came out quite slowly. Her dessert came out 10 minutes after mine did having waited so that we could eat together mine inevitably became cold. About the black sesame soup I could barely taste the sesame flavour seeing as it was so watered down and liquid y not nearly as viscous as it should be . So disappointing! The 5 dumpling flavours were green tea custard taro chocolate sesame and mango. They had a lot of filling in them and were full of flavour! My favourite was the chocolate one. And just when you think you ca not go wrong with original milk black tea the drink was very bland and diluted. Unfortunately the tapioca was also quite mushy. Dessert here is definitely not up to par and I m unlikely to return.
Before you leave check your order. My order was missing a couple of things. I bought a 16 piece family meal and my kids wanted a lot of mashed potatoes. It was missing one large mashed potato and ended up making one at home. I called that night and spoke to the manager. She apologized and said they will write my name down so when ii cone back they will give me one. When I came back a few days later they would not give me one without a receipt. So why even ask my name and write it down? Just double check all your order before going home.
We came here on a weekend night and were shocked at how much traffic there was in the shopping center. The brewery fortunately was not incredibly busy and it was nice out so they let us seat ourselves outside near the bar. It was empty before that and so they turned the heat lamps on for us. We could not find a server so we went in to find one. She was very nice and informative. I ordered the mushroom swiss burger special but it had very little flavor and the mashed potatoes tasted instant. I also tried a bite of the gorgonzola butter steak and it was pretty flavorless and ended up making my friend ill. Beer was better than the food for sure so I would recommend checking it out mainly for the bar.
Do not order online from them...I ordered at midnight and they delivered at 1 44am. It should not take that long. We called them at 1am to ask where the food was and they said that they were delivering it. At 1 30 we called again and they said that the delivery person hurt her foot...Our food arrived spilled all over the bag and the person demanded a cash tip... The food is good but do not get delivery.
So we re forced to check in using the kiosk which was annoying. For starters the scanner had a hard time recognizing our drivers license. Eventually it worked but then we got to the last screen and it tells us that our room is not ready and to check out the city while we wait. 6pm and our rooms are not ready? After hanging out in the lobby for 30 minutes we finally got word that our room is ready. Then we had problems getting the QR reader to scan our code. We used the Help button to summon assistance and waited for 5 minutes but finally just asked the nearest front desk staff member. They were quite busy as we were not the only ones struggling with this self check in system. After 45 minutes we were finally on our way to our room. The room was nice and the internet signal was good. Walls are thin as we were woken up at 3am by our drunk neighbors. We could also hear the neighbors phone alarm go off when they coughed and when they pulled their curtains. That s how thin the walls are. In summary the biggest frustration is the whole check in process. I m on vacation I should not have to do their job. Not coming back.
I had not been to this Panda in probably 9 mos. Every time I went the dish I order was never ready. There have even been times when the white rice was not ready. Is not this a staple of Chinese Cuisine? I am an early lunch eater and today I arrived shortly after 11am. Once again the mushroom chicken was not ready. It s never ready. You just opened how do you not have a full supply of everything? So I waited but only because there were 2 cars ahead of me and no way out of the drive thru. The cashier apologized for the wait. No offer of a free eggroll or drink which would have gone a long way. When I got back to my office I found that half the rice was not cooked long enough. So now I m having light chicken and hard rice after a routine unpleasant experience. Never again Panda. Unlike the rice I am done. I ve given you way too many chances. Shame on me.
They still own me money from april the 27th Chelsey and Jess are awesome but Kelli from reporting dept is a total mess after sending her hundreds of reports over and over she gets confused and she ask you to send the same report over and over because she even opens attachments to see it clear it s a total waiste of time and fedex printing. They should find another person in the reporting department honestly the rest of them are great nice people and professional specially Chesey is a total sweetheart
THEFT! Do yourselves a favor and stay away form this hotel. I recently stayed at this hotel for a short 1 day trip in Phoenix. To my own fault I left my Samsung Gear watch on the nightstand and did not bring it with me upon checkout which I am 100 certain that it was left there since I had it the night before and traveled straight home from the hotel. On top of that the watch is equipped with tracking capabilities. I called within hours of checking out and again the next day to see if the housekeeper whom I left a tip for had returned it to lost and found and was told that none was found. I do not make accusations lightly but after being certain that my watch was left in the room I am thoroughly disappointed at the lack of integrity shown by the cleaning staff at this hotel. As a long time SPG member I ve always had high confidence in the safety of my belongings but this experience erased any trust I had. My suggestion to fellow travelers STAY AWAY from this location! If you re here lock up everything and triple check for belongings because if you forget something valuable it will not turn up!
For some reason Kitchen Table closed an hour early yesterday so we found ourselves at The Stove. My date got the country benny and I got the crabby patty along with bottomless mimosas of course . The food itself was delicious but the mimosas were made with warm champagne. The service was the absolute worst. Basically we never saw our server again after we gave our drink order and my date had questions about the menu. Many servers walked by us and could not even glance in our direction or let us know they d find our server or anything. Luckily I was able to flag someone down who identified himself as the owners son and he answered our questions and even took our breakfast order. After awhile someone came over assuming he s the owner and said the kitchen lost our ticket and he would personally make our food and comp the check. At this point we re both irritated but we re happy that they re rectifying the situation. Miraculously our food is out 5 minutes later. I may or may not be back. The food was great but it seems like servers need to be retrained.
I love Macy s. It usually has so many great designs at fairly decent prices. Not a lot of great deals at this Macy s. Nothing looked good and everything was fairly pricey from what I normally see. I walked around the entire men s section one of the smallest I have ever seen and was surprised to find that absolutely nothing caught my eye. Usually I can find something even if it is a little pricey. Maybe a different aesthetic for a different client or climate? Oh well...
Horrible horrible horrible...!!!! If I could give you one good advice it would be NOT TO GO THERE..! Service is fake. Pricess are very negotiable .because they only try to make a sale Bad bad quality of furniture. I was there two weeks ago we agreed on a price for a 2 piece sofa and yesterday he said a different price giving the excuse that it s lower then his cost price...
Food was way too greasy. Pictures posted on yelp were very deceiving. They re definitely a fake version of Chipotle. Definitely will not come here again. If you re looking for something healthy this is not the place for you.
Tried the veggie dog and got an order of cheese fries. This is probably good for drunk people who just want throw crumpled up money on a table point at a wall and then ingest whatever they were thrown. This place is all about the name and nothing else. Everyone in line was using a Groupon and wish I knew that ahead of time. For two veg dogs two orders of fries with cheese it was around 20 from what I recall. You can sub a veg dog into any of their menu items. But we opted to make our own with toppings. The fries are salty and limp and when you add the taco bell style face nacho cheese on top its just a gastrointestinal mess. The dogs are large in portion but were not hot temp wise as I d expect for something that was just made . If your desperate for food this might be an option but by all means its not the only option in this area.
DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY!!!! Just had my truck washed their and it was ABSOLUTELY the worst job I have EVER SEEN. Just got done rewashing my windshield and noticed they never even put the wipers up to wash under those. Their were streaks all over the body of the truck like they used a wet rag to dry it half assed off. Just absolutely a horrible job.
They wanted 5k down for a 10000 dollar car. Made me wait a good 2 hours before wasting my time with the absurd deal they managed to get me. Dont bother coming here unless you have a have 900 fico or you have 75 of the cars worth cash in hand. They have a slurpee machine though
Went to Shady Grove this afternoon and sat at the bar for a quick lunch. It was anything but! I originally went to order one of their taters a loaded baked potato and the server told me sorry we do not have them and that we are in the process of changing the menu. Thanks...then I waited 25 minutes for her to bring my second choice. The BBQ chicken wrap was okay as far as nourishment is concerned. I would not go back. It looks like a cute cafe from the outside but its clear this place is a bar serving bar food with bar service and bar atmosphere.
I ve been taking my dog to this Vet since 2001. Pretty much I ve been ripped off since taking my dog here. I do not advise this practice. They relocated to Creditview Rd. Another vet who is money hungry and will use the most expensive methods to treat your pet or prescribe anything that will contain the problem not cure it. With the amounts of money I ve spent here I ve kindly asked them 3 times within 8 hours to fax my pets health documents over to my new Vet Mississauga Animal Hospital and while they said they would they have not. Luckily I was self sufficient and kept records which I bought with me knowing that I could not rely on Heartland Pet Hospital. Stay away from this place!
Went to Farmer Boys todays to try the double cheese burger with bacon and avocado. It was okay. I only had a dap of avocado on the burger and the combo was 12 bucks!! My fries were cold and no salt. Most likely wo not be going back.
Update. I did speak with Mandi and she was incredibly helpful. She did confirm that I was right and they had made the mistake. So yes I did get my money back. However her apologizing in behalf of the rudeness and incompetence of their staff just does not cut it. I did not receive a call from the Glendale branch apologizing for their treatment of me. Their staffs behavior have numerous complaints for this type of customer service. I have heard nothing in regards to staff being retrained or fired. As an institution that is supposed to be member owned it does not seem that their members are being considered. I deserve more than a correction on paper over the phone.
Lousy dirty restrooms and empty papers and everything even every time we came here to eat and found poor service and dirty restrooms both female male too where is owner or manager? They are all young.
I have the same dish everytime we come because it is so good chicken picatta and I enjoy a martini with dinner Bombay Sapphire and Titos. Yes gin AND vodka I order this everywhere I go and never have had the problems I have here....I have tried on more than 5 different visits and all 5 times I was charges differently. The first time I came was 9 fine...the 2nd time was 25 !!!....the 3rd time was 18 then 16 and finally 12 ... Each visit I asked for a manager to get my bill straight the 25 excuse was the put it in as 2 called drinks.. WHAT???? The 18 was input wrong and the last time when I was charged 12 I was told 12 is the right price because they charge 1 per Bleu Cheese olive!!! OMG!!! I have been ordering this drink for pretty much my entire adult life with 3 bleu cheese olives and have NEVER been charged extra and they are not even hand stuffed!!! I have had the bartenders offer to make them for me in places that do not normally have them and they receive a great reward in the terms of their tip...I do not get charged extra!!! The time when the manager told me the drink was 12 due to the olives I said I was very upset and would not be back all he said was sorry to hear that and walked away.... really made us feel wanted!! The food and service is almost always on point and that s why we love it here but they need to be all on the same page when it comes to the charges!!! Maybe appreciate the customers a little more as well...we are spending a small fortune for the short time we spend in your establishment!
The hotel looked clean and well maintained. But looks can be deceiving. The warm cookie was their way of welcoming you but in my opinion a hotel s worth and quality is from maintenance and regular inspection not by empty gestures like a welcome cookie.
This Chili s definitely needs a completely new manager staff and chef. Bad Bad Bad!!! Food was awful and the service was even worst. I will not go to this Chili s for a long time. Come on get it together and do your job.
My wife and I wanted to go see the Pompeii exhibit before it leaves in May. We were hoping that they would have it set up so you could just see the Pompeii exhibit for a fee and not have to buy a general admission as well. Do not get me wrong I love museums but I had my doubts that this place would provide any sort of entertainment value for two adults that do not have kids. On that point I ended up being 100 correct as there was literally nothing of value for adults with kids over the age of probably around 12 or so to really do in the center. The Pompeii exhibit was nice but not at a cost of what amounted to 30 a person 35 a person if you factor in parking costs because they require you to buy a general admission. My wife and I did walk the entire science center just to make sure we were not missing something and it was entirely geared towards young children tweens. We wo not ever come back because there is just nothing for adults outside of the special exhibit which took us about an hour to get through. Shame shame shame on them for gouging people for their money.
Doctors of Death. I took my happy healthy 7 year old dog to Parma Animal Hospital because she slipped on tile and sprained her leg. They told me she would have to stay for xrays and she never came home. When I went to get her after the xrays she could not use either back leg they could not explain why. I found out after the fact that they sedate the animals to xray them totally unnecessary. My dog would not have need sedation she was very cooperative. Called 3 other animal hospitals and none sedate unless vicious and even then obtain written permission from the owner which I did not and would not have done. They dragged her away saying she could not go home with me and I was left holding her leash and empty collar. As I walked out they said We will take good care of her those words will haunt me for the rest of my life. A couple of days later they called and told me she had died. They did not would not give any reason for her death I just know she died in their care. I am just horrified thinking about what they did to my baby how much did she suffer at their hands? The day before she hurt her leg she was chasing a bunny in the back yard no problems. Whatever happened was caused by the cruel staff at Parma Animal Hospital. They should not be allowed to continue to operate as their incompetence negligence took the life of my dear family member. I would not want to see anyone else suffer the way I am suffering and will spread the word. Her heart has stopped and mine is broken. There is a special place in Hell for people cruel to animals and I believe the staff at Parma Animal Hospital will go there. I rescued my dog from an animal shelter but I could not rescue her from her own vet.
I had an appt. scheduled with this company twice. Both times I asked for time off work so they could come fix my roof. The first appt. they blew me off no call or message. The second time they told me they were coming out on a Monday when I confirmed with the girl Angie for a Wednesday and asked for more time off right after I booked the appt. They told me I was wrong! Do not use this company they suck!!!
I have eaten here twice wanted to like it but after a more than fair chance I m writing it off. Today I paid 40 before tip for a steak and cheese sandwich and a chicken noodle soup. The sandwich probably had less than an ounce of dry seriously over cooked steak. The mushrooms cheese and green salsa on top of the steak were fine but there was so little substance to the whole sandwich I needed to order something else. It was accompanied by wilted spinach probably the best thing I ve eaten here but a small side dish. So I ordered the chicken soup. First and foremost it was outrageously salty almost inedibly so I left most of the broth . The noodles were incredibly thin which I do not mind but oddly they were very very dry. I do not know how that s even possible. There were nice sized strips of chicken breast meat but also incredibly dry. The bits of bok Choy and the mushrooms were nice but could not save the soup. I had a very nice waitress which sad to say was the only really good thing about my meal. There are other choices in the airport all better than this restaurant. I would avoid it all costs.
My experience with this place... they have good customer service. However my advice is do not use them for anything complicated... just simple stuff like oil changes. I used them for brake repair but they did not do a good job. I had to take my car to another place and they said it looked like my car never had a brake job. Their customer service gets them 2 stars. Nah wo not be back.
I ve been to this shop twice the first time was just browsing and I found the staff very friendly and helpful. Today s visit was the exact opposite. I went to purchase some road cycling shoes. Since I ve never owned any before I thought I d go here and probably pay a little more but make sure I ve got a good fit and a good shoe. I m training for my first triathlon and told the guy that I was not sure if I wanted road shoes or tri shoes to go with my existing SPD pedals and cleats. He told me I d have to swap my peddles if I wanted tri shoes so I looked at some road shoes. I was trying to decide between two pairs when I thought I should at least look at learn a bit about tri shoes. I picked up a pair and the tag said SPD Compatible . I asked the guy about this and he said that they did not have my size. So he had lied to me about having to change pedals just because he would not be able to sell me the shoes!!! What a jerk. I do not think I could shop there again. Albeit I m a newb to cycling but had they done a nice job they d have won a customer for life.
This is on par with most of Madison pizza which is to say meh. Not bad not good....just pizza. I m not sure what it is with Madison delivery or maybe it s where we live but we ve received mostly cold pizza from a lot of places. Is not there a better way to transport?! It s the worst when you take a bite and the whole cheese toppings come off because it s cold and glued together. Anyway not bad in a pinch but would not recommend it with any enthusiasm.
Mediocre taste and horrible service. Always one person working and takes forever to make the boba.
Very poor customer service. Booking agents made an error and manager did little to rectify situation. Was spoken to condescendingly and in no way appeased.
First time here. Sadly not too impressed! Only one table occupied upon arrival. Service was slow and dessert were just ordinary and overpriced! Old menu from previous shop?! differs from shop name. Would I come back for seconds?! Most likely not!
This is the third farm this fall season and it was not impressive. 10 for hayride that was super bumpy and trees might hit you on your head. Pumpkins were overpriced. 25 for the largest one I paid 12 for the largest size pumpkin at a different pumpkin patch. Farm animals 2 goats some horses pig baby quails.
Food was unremarkable. Not bad but nothing to right home about either. I was one of five in our party and two hours after four of us had been sick. Do not reccommend.
Do not move here unless you do not mind disappointment with lack of service do not expect to have to ask the management for anything and are prepared to move after one year. Currently the hot tub on one side of the complex has been out for an entire year no exaggeration . The owners have gone through 4 management companies since I ve been a tenant. My neighbors moved out after multiple rat issues which were not being controlled including a rat in their kitchen. There was a very slow response with the rat problem it took several months and complaints. Unless you re getting a huge break I would strongly recommend paying more and going somewhere else. If you are getting any kind of break in the rent be prepared for it to go up to at least full rate when you renew. I am so glad to be leaving. Each of the 4 management companies has tried their best but the frequent turnover in management is probably a reflection of poor ownership. More recently the office has been locking their doors before close and they have not been answering the phone even while the associate is still in the office. I suspect the management is over worked and spread thin POOR OWNERSHIP.
This location is horrible! Went there today through drive thru. Had to repeat our orders again and again. Towards the end our order was not even correct. Had big Mac with no cheese but it came with it. Ordered one double quarter pounder and one melted crispy chicken sandwich but came home with one quarter and one double quarter pounder. No buttermilk crispy chicken. Too tired to go back nor call to complain. Sounds like they do not even care so not going to waste my energy. This is my last time at this location. This place needs better management.
WORST EXPERIENCE I HAVE EVER HAD for a 1 night stay. No microwaves in the building and no refrigerators. While trying to place a to go order from the bar it took me 3 phone calls for someone to pick up the phone to answer. Then they gave me the wrong order upon pickup. Tried to call the front desk to ask for a wake up call in the morning. It took 4 phone calls for someone to answer the call. The hotel needs to hire better customer service personnel. I left in the morning and booked another hotel for the next night.
I went there to have a new battery installed on my Macbook. The new battery is no stronger and has no longer life than the old one. I called them and they had me click on some tabs until I got to a certain point. They then asked me to read them the number there which I did. They said that that number tells them that the new battery is good and fully charged. I m really not satisfied with this answer. No matter what that number says...this battery is no better than the old one. I wo not be going back to this store.
I normally do not give a bad rating to a business but I just received my print out from my bank that shows Hungry Howies on Lemon Street charged my credit card 3 times 18.33. I will be going in to see the Manager to see if he or she will remedy the transactions. If they take care of the 2 extra charges I will reflect it on my review.
So unfortunate this is our local Jack In The Box. We live less than a mile away from this location and barley eat at Jack In The Box anymore because the service here is awful. We always come in the drive thru and it s always a rude passive aggressive male. They do not say hi or anything just rudely blurt out the total and never said bye thank you or anything. We used to love Jack In The Box when we lived in Cali but not anymore
Terrible experience. I showed up at 7 45 am for service but no one was there. The hours posted say they open at 7 00 am but that is obviously inaccurate. Do not use this location if you need urgent service.
Below is my first review I was so excited. But the next time I went back I got diarrhea and nausea eating the same meal I am a creature of food fixation habit . Stubborn and still in love I ate it all again a third time a couple weeks later...maybe it had just been a stomach bug? ALAS NO I am sorry to say. Another 30 another night on the john. Something is wrong. Ceviche? IDK but it pretty much breaks my heart.
I wanted to love this place as I ve been wanting to go for quite some time. I went as I was passing through one day. It was a nice day but I wanted to sit inside as it was a bit windy outside. I asked to be seated away from the open side door but it was still very windy no big deal though it is Arizona ... I sat at the bar and the waitress bartender was very friendly and helpful. I decided to go with the grilled fish tacos and kale salad. I was disappointed as the fish was very dry! I probably should have sent them back but I was running late for an appointment and did not have time. I would give them another try as the place has a fun atmosphere and I loved the salsa which to me is a food group! Just a little disappointing..
They are purposely making the public wait in line too long so people stop disputing their tickets innocent plead guilty so they do not have to wait.
Oh Draught...I WANT to like you. I really do. But each time I give you another try I wonder why I went back...a place so confused by its identity that even the serving staff wears shirts with the phonetic spelling displayed across the front so patrons can get it right. This place has the making of what would be a cool place to brunch or grab drinks to watch the game but each time I m left disappointed and feeling shortchanged. A few weeks ago some girlfriends and I decided to try this place for Sunday brunch. I was the first to arrive and walked into an empty bar with a group of female servers surrounding the hostess stand likely meeting before the shift began. Not knowing they had not opened for business yet I walk in expecting to be sat. Instead they all stared at me whispering to each other when finally perhaps the hostess asked me what I was doing there. I said I came for brunch and she then told me they were not open and to wait outside. I obliged and went outside. Being a nice day we asked to sit on the patio once we were allowed to be sat. We were guided to a soaking wet table chairs so asked for a cloth to wipe them dry. The server got a cloth from the bar and let us do it for ourselves. Once we were finally sitting the server brought us their limited gameday menu I m assuming this is their menu every Sunday in the fall and it consisted of Nachos Chicken Wings and a few other items that do not sound too appetizing for brunch. Based on the experience at that point we ended up apologizing and leaving to go somewhere else. I decided to try this place again this weekend to watch the Clemson Game. The setup for the game was awesome TVs and screens everywhere! The service and food however was not. Our server was very unfamiliar with what was behind the bar and on tap. We ordered the wings how can you mess up wings? Personally I m a fan of crispy wings. These were exactly the opposite. The only way I can thing to describe them is they seemed like they were boiled and sauce was put on them still wet. Not good. Our table even joked that the sauce tasted better off our fingers than it did on the wings themselves. The plus side the blue cheese was really good.
My husband and I decided to give this restaurant a try because of the good reviews. but I do not think that this restaurant even deserves one star to me it s a zero. we went there for lunch on a Sat. we noticed right away that there s no customers red flag and the price was very expensive the lowest price in the menu for the main dish was 12.00 the highest was 24.00 we ordered the Pescado a la macho 15.00 per plate. the description of the dish was so fancy and good but then when the waitress put the plate of food in front of me i got so disgusted the presentation was terrible food was not even warm serving was very small. there was no shrimp there s only two small pieces of mussels about 5 6 tiny slices of rubber squid 1 2 cup of rice old about 1 2 an inch or a tiny piece of a crab leg it was just the shell of the crab leg. did not even have the meat itself the fish taste old sauce tasted like it came out from a jar sweet and sour tangy . we are into adventure eating but the meal we had was definitely not home made ! very very poor quality Mall food is even better. I e mailed the owner but did not get a reply.
I wish I could give this place a zero because of how bad they treat their customers now! I used to love this place but it turned out to be more about the money than about caring for its customers. They do not even do a good job with acrylics anymore they try to finish as fast they can and move on to the next person. They do not even communicate with you. Customer service is so important and this place lacks it completely. So disappointed you just lost a loyal customer.
If you think this place is cheap and you can afford it you are being mislead. They come up w a million different fees that they keep adding every other month. And this place is NOT AT ALL worth the money u end up paying.
If I could give it zero stars I would The only reason I stayed at this hotel is because my friend told me she had free rooms What a joke Our FREE room after the upgrade to the renovated tower and the 39 a day Resort Fee our FREE room ended up costing more than 100 a day! And what exactly is the purpose of the Resort Fee We could not even use the pool because it was closed for the season Also do not waste your time with their Rewards program I lost 2 grand in their crappy casino and I could not even get them to buff me out a free buffet So after spending 21 on the buffet the only thing it gave me was diarrhea They could not pay me to stay at Harrahs Do not waste your money Go stay at a quality high class hotel like Mandalay Bay
The food is great but customer service is the worst especially when you call to order they put you on hold for a long time then a woman answers and sounds rude.
In Las Vegas this is the worst Title company ever. No sense of Customer Service lack of communications and a non willing to help out previous clients. I had a P.O.A. in place and when a file cancelled the original document was destroyed without letting the client know. Thinking it was still in place and when needed again only to find out many fees and costly time issues later we needed to perform another POA in order to close a real estate deal at the end of the month. Kathy Stevens Heather Kerry Kissane although not all equally at fault the Chicago Administrator was very unsympathetic.The clients needs and expenses to get this transacation completed fell on deaf ears and with very little compassion or resolutions to make this bad situation better. PLEASE DON T USE THIS TITLE COMPANY.....YOU WILL BE VERY DISSATISFIED AND SORRY....I know I am.
It is what it is but this time it was not that good. Chicken Bistro Sandwich was very dry. Should of stuck with classic items.
The worst place I have ever lived. Terrible neighborhood appliances never fixed. On leaving management screwed me with extra fees. do not rent here
Came in before I had to go to work it was around 4 45 4 50 PM. I walk in and they were still preparing drinks for multiple customers but just out of courtesy knowing they closed in 15 I asked may I still order? and the first response I get back is just do not order iced coffee. I proceeded to tell the barista that I only came in for one drink as I worked next door and I had a coworker working an 11 hour shift. The other barista responded by telling me there s a starbucks down the road I can go to and to have a nice day. I informed him that I work right next door and I did not have time to walk across Mill Avenue for a drink and left. I understand what it is like having customers walk in shortly before close as I work at a restaurant but a drink? Really? Extremely disappointed with how I was treated.
I can only speak to the location on Indian School Rd in Scottsdale east of Scottsdale Rd. There were coupons in the mail promoting what I gather is a new location. There was no cashier inside just the guy you meet when you drop off your car. No merchandise to speak of inside which while that is not what I go to the car wash for it felt like a failing company. Sat outside waiting for my car and witnessed what seemed to be a heated spat between two employees but most importantly they did a truly crappy job. The back of my SUV was not vacuumed well at all and no one had gone over the other surfaces to wipe them down. I asked for a cloth to go over them myself which seemed to spur the guy to do a half hearted wipedown. Mind you I did not go for the 5 wash I upgraded to the 15 wash and certainly did not get my money s worth. None of the surfaces in the front of the car including the dash the console and the steering wheel had been touched by any kind of cleaning cloth. They cleaned maybe an 18 area of my driver s window but the rest of the windshield was not touched. I had to go over the interior and windshield myself when I got home. I paid money for the guys at the car wash to save me a little time and they did not . Wo not return.
Wayyyy over priced! Terrible drinks! Terrible music! Everyone waiting in line to get on the boat and practically ran off of the boat when it stopped. I will never do it again.
Store 9297 Fact no shopping carts in the store from Oct 25th 2013 to this present day of Dec 7th 2013. I have complained and complained. No positive results. The store manager and his staff are very sweet people. They have asked the corporate suits for shopping carts to be allocated for this store since the old set was stolen. The corporate executives are dragging their heels on this. Corporate greed at its finest. 45 days and no shopping carts! So here I am yelping about it. I will call their 800 customer care line and pledge not to shop at CVS with my rewards membership until this problem is rectified.
Dear Cox why must I call every year and threaten to stop service before you offer any discount? Tired of the fight after being a loyal customer for 8 years you re fired! Find other people to screw over I m done with your outrageous rates when new customers get better pricing than customers you ve had for years your internet and cable is most definitely not worth what you think it is very Undependable service.
I was burned by the lasers they used 7 months ago pretty badly I had scabs on my bikini area and I have pictures. The staff here is very nice and friendly the office is nice and clean they tried to help. Of course they are nice they want your money! And for about a 2 thousand dollars a treatment they should be nice! I moved to California recently and started getting laser hair removal here by a place called blue cocoon and not only is the place I go to now amazing they re lasers are newer and a lot more advanced and gentler their staff is just as nice if not nicer. Not to mention a FRACTION of the cost of ideal image. The lasers at the new salon I go to have a cooling air laser and is not painful at all compared to the lasers that burned me at ideal image. That being said IDEAL IMAGE is a RIP OFF! Beware of these so called sales discounts these are lies. I now pay a SIGNIFICANT amount less than I did at ideal image and there are no discounts at my new place. Ideal image lasers are not the newest technology and burned my skin which was extremely embarrassing! Please do your research when getting laser hair removal. I had asked the girl doing my hair removal how long she had been doing it she said 6 months!
They came to my work parking lot. I was very excited. I do not mind paying for good food truck items. I got the Fajita Quesdilla and it was over 9.00. It was basically a tortilla shell with a tiny bit of steak in center no melted cheese detected and I had to pay extra for the onions and peppers. No special bold taste. I tiny dallop of sour cream. I mean like tiny as if it is liquid gold. I will never get it again for the price. All profit margin for them.
I have not visited Bethel Bakery and would normally not submit a review without visiting a place but given that most of the raving is about the cakes I felt a review of their cake is appropriate. The decoration was beautiful. My birthday is in winter so a standard candy cane design that they offer was ordered for me. It really was decorated well and looked very close to how it was advertised. The decoration for this design included a hefty amount of glitter so if you prefer to avoid eating glitter you may want to request to leave it off. The cake itself was fine. It was the standard white chocolate marble. It was moist and not too sweet which sounds like the start of a great cake but it was severely lacking flavor. Of any type. Perhaps some of the other cake flavors actually have flavor but the marble did not. Now the real reason I felt compelled to post a review is that the frosting was NOT good. Many people seem to love this frosting but to me it tasted like lightly sweetened fluffed crisco. I applaud the fact that its not over sweetened as frosting at other establishments typically is. But the flavor and texture imbued by the shortening overshadows the appropriate sweetness level. I know shortening is often found in frosting but given that the cakes here are priced at a premium I would expect them to look good AND taste good.
Horrible horrible horrible. I m still dealing with them and nobody will call me back. They promised to be complete by the 3rd and here we are. They were supposed to be here at 6am and here it is 2pm and nobody. The so called manager Chuck has several messages from me. The job is horrible. Do not use them.
I stopped at Demetrios this morning around 7 15 a.m. for breakfast. There was no one in sight so I sat in a booth. No one come to the booth to offer coffee or take my order. After 8 minutes of waiting for a server I left. Horrible customer service. If you are open that early in the morning you need to make sure you watch who is coming into your restaurant. This is totally unacceptable. All of the low prices in the world ca not make up for bad customer service. I will never go there again.
We thought we recognised some of the pastries from a shop in Chinatown that we liked and decided to pick some up. The buns were much greasier than what we had and lacked any flavour. We tossed every single one of them they were all inedible.
Having read all of these reviews I have decided to not even give Burgh s the business of take out any longer which is what I have resorted to after the several visits with horrible service. I have come to the conclusion that if the service is this terrible outside of the kitchen just think about what is going on that we ca not see! I have been a server not for just a short time and I ve served in a great place and I ve served in a terrible place. Needless to say I left the terrible place because...well...if you ve ever seen Waiting then you catch my drift. Burgh s really should be out of business and taken over by a proprietor who would really do that corner store front some justice. Our little town could potentially be suffering descent revenue with the assistance of Burgh s terrible business. Why are they still in business? Please make 2014 a better year for your business if you know what s good for ya !!
Look as you can see from other reviews I have written I m try not to be a negative person but hopefully someone will see this and things will get better. I m not a regular at McDonalds but while killing time for an airport pickup I thought I d swing by as I had just downloaded the app and they had a deal with a McFlurry. I also grabbed another item off the menu which I did not want sauce on. I tried the touch screen displays to order but as I was new to it and did not really want to spend a bunch of time trying to familiarize myself with them right there I went to the cashier to place my order. I explained that McFlurry deal on the app no worries and placed my other item without sauce. I even restated it before I paid. I m sure you can see where this is going. As I got it to go I did not realize that it still had the sauce on it until I had got into my car. I did not have time to go back in so I drove away. My suggestion is that with special orders maybe repeat it when you pick it up at the counter. I m not sure where the miscommunication was but I can say I wo not be back anytime soon.
This is the adorable looking patisserie shop in the Paris Casino on the strip. They offer amazing looking pastries sandwiches coffee and more. I walked by this shop a million times and finally decided to try out one treat the chocolate mousse pistachio dessert because it looked terrific. My first bite was offensive in my mouth. The slick looking chocolate glaze is really loose brown colored gelatin that I had to scrape off. Then I took a bite of the almost dry mousse that was dense and too sweet without a good chocolate flavor. My last attempt at tasting something yummy was to try the pistachio ribbon. Sadly it seemed to be just green cream. I do think it s possible that this dessert was a few days old and might have been better when it was fresh. Three small bites and this went in the trash. Based on trying only one dessert I d say the quality is equivalent to buffet desserts.
Decoration of this place is not reflective to the quality of the food and service. Food was awful. We order couple of items from the menu and they did not even have the food so we had to reorder. When the food came it looked and tasted like Burger King quality. Not coming back again. I was really hoping for a good experience and wanted to try the place for long time.
The vehicle that I was issued would barely go 50 mph up an incline putting my family and I in dangerous situations. Seeing that I was visiting Arizona where you have to travel up steep inclines all vehicles need to be equipped with the appropriate horsepower to handle the terrain. Budget needs to reevaluate the cars so that they are appropriate for the areas terrain.
5 stars for the amazing view and getting to skip the ridiculous line to ride the elevator to the top of the CN Tower. 0 stars for service. 0 stars for food. In my opinion this is the type of thing you might do once and definitely never again. While the view is as amazing as everyone says it is and that line to get to the top of the CN Tower is hellish the experience you have to endure to get these perks is pretty awful. First let s start with the service. I ca not possibly imagine it being more rude. We ordered two steaks and several cocktails. None of it was enough for our waiter. He looked like we had just slapped him in the face when a we did not EACH want to order an appetizer and he was horrified when he realized we would not even be sharing one b we opted to share a side they recommend 2 per person 1 was more than enough for us to share . c we did not want dessert. Mind you the bill was still around 180 for 2 people. On top of the weird upsell pressure and general snotty attitude he also was not very attentive and brought us bread at some point maybe a half hour into our meal? It was so awkward. Now the food. You would think with the way he was pushing us to order more food from the menu its at least something tasty he d expect us to be satisfied with. This food was almost inedible save for the mashed potatoes which were very good . I ve never had a filet that tasted so bland and tough. I ve had better food at McDonalds and did not have to spend 50 to get it. My boyfriend who does not eat red meat very often also ordered a steak which he thought was OK. When I bit into it I gave him a sad look it was abysmal. I do not know how they have the gall to charge the prices they do and serve such terrible food. It s truly shocking. Bottom line for first timers and people dining on someone else s dime only. Savor the view the one time and then never come back.
If I could give it zero stars I would do that. I had my daughter s car towed here because it broke down in the middle of a street. I chose Wilhelm because i had my car serviced there previously. I first had to pay a diagnostic fee of 58.00 and this does not go towards the maintenance. Anyway they said it was a bad alternator AND battery. The total for this was 750.00. Well my daughter said no thanks and had the car towed to another service center. They diagnosed it for FREE and discovered it was only the alternator that was defective. The battery only needed to be charged! Total savings about 300.00 That s my story. Needless to say we wo not be giving Wilhelm our business.
Terrible service. No clear communication between employees rendering service you did not ask for and specifications you requested are ignored. Even communication with manager does not help. Stay clear of this unless you done care about your property. Poor service rendered my trees diseased.
A review of the new Cheese Filled Soffatelli.... Olive Garden is my grandpa s favorite place because we can take the whole family even my vegetarian niece and everyone can find SOMETHING to eat. to eat not to love but to eat . Yesterday I tried their new Cheese Filled Soffatelli with Chicken. I had two bites and was done. It may have been the breadsticks or the fried cheese and ravioli cheese good ravioli dry but I could not stomach that much lead. I thought there would be on a bed of spinach and diced tomatoes...nope. Its a fried piece of greasy chicken smothered in white cheeze wiz sauce with tiny bits of spinach. It was so greasy and heavy it made me sick to my stomach before it even made it there. The stuffed pastries were even worse with an overly flavored cheese stuffing that hung in your stomach like lead. I strongly suggest something anything else. May I recommend the Apricot chicken or mixed grill?
This place was good and awesome for the price the only thing is my wife got sick her sister got sick and her mom got sick. Our cousin went there just yesterday 6 days after we did and got food poisoning as well. I got sick but not as bad as them. I ate everything they did except the shrimp tempura and the uni. Idk other than that id give em 3 stars. Is anyone else getting sick? Maybe its the 115 weather and the fish is going bad? Be safe everyone.
This man who claims to hold a PHD is one sexist arrogant jerk! He fully supports men and is totally against women. He s not at all neutral and he twists the truth as he sees fit. He is terribly egotistical and lies incessantly. Yet he s recommended by the family court. How? Women BEWARE! Stay as far away from this man as possible. He will ruin your life. When the final report was finished he had changed nearly everything I had shared with him and none of it was true. I also found out that he never contacted the references I gave him but he contacted all of the references my ex gave him. The majority of the information within his report he had made up himself! It was his personal thoughts and opinions not factual information. He met with my children and he refused to listen to their perspective of what life was honestly like for them. Instead he took their words and turned them over and over. After meeting with him my children were very upset scared beyond belief and crying. They really believed this man was there to help them but instead he did so much harm by not listening to them calling them liars and eventually tearing apart our family. He should be reported to the state of Wisconsin licensing board by anyone who has had any problems with his service or lack there of. He should also have his license pulled. No one that intentionally does this kind of harm should be allowed to engage in life altering family decisions. Last I heard he has severe mental issues which explains a lot. I am very angry and highly disappointed that he chose do this to both myself and my children. The worst part is once he s appointed to your case he holds all the cards. The court will take his word over yours because he s considered a professional. STAY AWAY FROM THIS MAN! He s unconditionally deceitful!
If I can give this place less stars i would My Name Is Martin Eduardo Barrera The Reason Of This Letter is to Share the Following events that took place at Allanza at the lakes 8600 Starboard Drive 89117. The Day I Left these apartment was the best day of my life. I was a Tendent at Allanza at the lakes for less then 6 Months. I Lived in Unit number 2012A and documented everything that happened when i was living here. Let me Start off by saying i had a super high deposit ! I have a 702 Credit Score I do not know exactly what you guys are pulling here. I am 23 years old and will not let you guys take Advantage of that. The lack of respect from the office manager Crista . If You do not Clean there s going to be mold Really? Multiple times has this lady shown signs of disrespect from rolling her eyes at me to saying something offensive. I know All These phone calls are Recorded. Everything is old in these apartments The Tub The Shower the Bathroom Sinks and My Kitchen Faucet Broke like the First Week I was There. The Rust Around The sink is Disgusting all you guys do at these apartments is paint over the Bathroom sinks and showers. I know that My Unit Was Not Fully Renovated Which is why the Vinyl was never replaced in the master bathroom after the floor caved in. You Guys Have a New Color You Guys Use ! You guys always gave me the run around when it came to something maintenance related. I Do not think my upstairs patio door has ever been able to lock and what did your maintenance do? Bend the door hinge... it was not catching because the door track is loose and the door is not secure. That was not Fixing the Problem same thing with the bathroom fan you guys would just pop it into place and the next day it would fall out . I do not Know Exactly What The Problem is here at Allanza at the lakes but there s no way that amount of mold could have built up in the little time i had lived there I have pictures of everything and a video of the guy that came and fixed it also the maintenance guy was trying to hide the mold with the garbage bag! This was absolutely disgusting the smell was so strong! Me and my wife would always open the windows because the smell was so strong . i looked it up on google and i thought maybe they were fixing the pluming at the apartment and it might of been a chemical they were using But it was not it was black mold! The Plumbing at this place was horrible i would flush the master bathroom at least 3 times before anything would go down. The Bottom of the kitchen cabinets are stained from the previous tenants which shows how you guys clean ... i do not even want to get started on when you guys pulled out the dish washer there s so much trash back there. The dish washer that was never fixed by the way and only reason i claimed that my kitchen stove had roaches inside is because there was! I do not even know where to start honestly the light bulb from the fridge kept coming out of its place the fridge would self suck so every time i opened it everything that was on the door would fall out. I never got the The closet doors for one of the guest bedrooms put in You guys said it would take Up to a Month or more. The other situation with the closet doors you guys can charge me if you wish for 1 door ... not 2 i got pictures of the maintenance guys throwing one away and taking the other one to storage and i confronted him about it. The doors were sitting at the down stairs patio because it was vacant for almost a week if you guys are charging me for anything it should just be 1 and one only because only 1 was thrown away. The previous tenants of 1012A stated something about mold before the situation in my bathroom if i have to get in contact with them i will. This is wrong everything that went on here was wrong ! I had a toilet sitting in my bathtub for 3 days ! I had to submit a work order for re installation like i said I really do not know where to start or finish there s endless amounts of problems here at this place even up till today. only sharing the picture i want with you guys !
This place was recommended by some friends and despite wanting to like it I just was not impressed. I went with some friends and everyone agreed that the pizza tasted undercooked. Those that got the pasta dishes said the flavors were a bit flat. The wine was pretty good a standard Pinot noir but nothing spectacular. The service was good and the people were very nice which makes me feel worse that I could not get myself to like the food! I d skip this place there are definitely better pizza places in Cleveland.
It s a sad day! This was one of my favorite restaurants in Champaign. Bo was clean the food was fresh and the service was fast. All new owners not a familiar face. Slow service and mediocre food to say the least. Wo not be back.
We bought a Groupon for 6 all day passes. The maze is so simple and small you can find your way through it in 5 10 minutes. There is no need for an expensive all day pass. With the Groupon we still had to pay sales tax and it did not include the laser maze. It was a long way to drive and out in the middle of no where.
My nephew was attending the daycare for a few months and although the hours worked for the family. It was a horrible experience. My sister picked him up late one night and all appeared fine. It was not until the next morning when she was getting him ready for the day and noticed bruises ALL over his body. He just turned 3 and is not verbal enough to tell you what happened. They also allowed a few kids with head lice to stay at daycare instead of sending them home until the issue was cleared up. Once a wallet was accidently left in my nephews bag when he was dropped off. Once he was picked up we found that someone took the wallet out the bag and the kids threw the money and debit cards all over the daycare. So needless to say a few bank cards were missing. There is no proper supervision despite the large staff.
I believe that I chose a poor time to visit this restaurant for the first time. I went with a friend at 8 00 p.m. on a Friday evening. We were the last two patrons to visit the salad bar which did not have many choices at all other than the salad greens onions tomatoes cheese and some peppers. I ordered wings which were one of the specials. They were very good. My friend ordered a hamburger steak with cooked onions on top which she enjoyed but her green beans left a little to be desired according to her. The waitress had suggested we order the BBQ but neither of us were hungry for that. Perhaps that is their specialty. The atmosphere was pleasant and our service was outstanding.
Very bad customer service. We went in at lunch time and the service was horrible and the food was even worse. I will not be back pita jungle.
Waited for quite a while to be waited on. Probably 10 15 minutes. She took a drink order and had to ask to please take entire order as I did not want to wait again. Ordered a 9.99 buffalo chicken sandwich. Says it comes with fries and cheese on it. I asked for no cheese but instead of cheese substitute out a little lettuce instead. After a wait the sandwich comes out and is handed to me and the person leaves immediately. Never asked if there was anything else I needed. Typically when the runner delivers the food they ask that. It would have been helpful as the sandwich did not have any lettuce like I asked. I waited 10 minutes and my server never came back. It seemed obvious that something was not right because I sat with food and did not eat any. I finally asked the server working with the folks beside me to please get lettuce for me. Seems like a petty thing perhaps but it s how I ordered the food. Then when I get my bill the sandwich rang up at 11.38?? Not sure what that s about. I removed cheese and asked for lettuce. So if you up charge that s fine but it seems an odd amount 1.39??? Did not notice this until my card had already been swiped. I m not sure I ll return which is too bad. Perhaps the other location is better. I went primarily for the beer selection. The sandwich was not bad once I finally got what I wanted too bad it took so long for service and waiting for someone else to correct the error.
I took my iPhone here when I was visiting Vegas to have a broken screen repaired. The glass was shattered. The price was 115 which is much higher than the other iphone repair shop that I ve used locally in Arizona and the customer service was very poor. After just a couple of weeks I took my phone out of the case and saw that the screen was coming off of the phone so now I ll need to take it in again somewhere to have it properly fixed. I came here based on the yelp reviews but I would not recommend this place to anyone.
This is one of the WORST wings I have ever eaten. Way too salty. I should have known better when we went in to try it for the first time and no one was there at lunchtime. Never going back!
The food is quite good especially the cornbread and burger. If this review was solely based on that it would be a solid 4 stars. Unfortunately I have to downgrade because they served my husband the lobster whipped potatoes with his salmon even though we informed our waiter that he is allergic to shellfish. Our waiter write down regular mashed potatoes but the kitchen apparently did not read the order carefully. My husband broke out in a rash as soon as we got home. Thankfully my husband s allergic reaction is limited to rashes only but that is not the case for many people with food allergies. Perhaps it s because they just opened and are still ironing out the wrinkles but that is really no excuse for serving people food they are allergic to after being informed of those allergies.
Slow service the branch manger who is an older blonde lady with glasses is very rude. If it was not for member rep Keri I would have given this place a zero. The branch manager could learn how to treat customer from her member reps. There were about 7 people in line and 2 tellers. HAd to wait forever to get service in lobby from a banker though
Do not Buy Appliances If You Need Delivery The delivery company Barlows did not show up for a morning delivery appointment. I was home for an automated call 30 minutes prior to them showing up you have to punch in a code to confirm . They never showed up when I called after an hour to inquire I was told they could not find my house had tried to call numerous times they did not I was home I have caller id and an answering machine . Then I was told the driver and had left the area and could not return that day I would have to reschedule later in the week. I complained to Barlow s manager and to my local Home Depot and was not able to get them delivered the same day. Sorry Home Depot you need to dump Barlows that lack of customer service is totally unacceptable. I value my time. I immediately cancelled the order and went to Lowe s for next day delivery BTW Lowe s does outsource their delivery it is done by Lowe s employees.
Nice clean room once I was finally inside. Upon entering my first room after check in I found an unexpected guest lounging on the bed. I used the courtesy phone to call the front desk and they sent me to another room. After dropping off my luggage I went to eat but when I returned to my room the key that worked previously no longer worked. This time around I had to wait in the hallway for over half an hour and did not even receive an apology. At that point I had spent more time in the hallways than I had planned and ran out of time to get ready for an event. When I called downstairs to let a manager know how my stay was going since nobody seemed to care he offered me spa access with NO services. Ummm thanks? I was pretty annoyed and plan to avoid the Aria going forward. I had such high hopes but the customer service continued to disappoint me through the rest of my stay.
I m a Filipino and I love Jollibee! The problem is the manager itself! She does not know how to help a paying customer! Its not my fault that they dont have any Soda. So they told me tht I will get a pineapple juice instead so I requested if I can make it a large and I m even willing pay extra just to get what I want! But she insisted that I can only get one size. Where is customer service?!
Worst place ever!! I went to go get a pedicure and full set of nails...not sure who the lady who did my nails was but while doing my foot massage she put some kind of oil on me and massaged my feet for a little and then stopped to put some on her arm and massage her arm....did not make a fuss about it because I m sure she was tired....so I let it go.....then I switch over for my full set of nails. I wanted an ombr look on them...so I ask the other lady if she can do that....she gives me a dirty look and then says no!! In such a snappy tone! So I thought fine I ll just get the same color as my pedicure.... I should of walked out the moment she gave me attitude she proceeds to do my full set and with the little drill sanding thing she cuts my cuticles and as she starts to put the actual fake nail and powder I notice that she s rushing and trying to get me out of the chair....but again I let it slide thinking she s going to fix it once she starts filing the nail....then comes the filing....my ring finger and thumb on my left hand looked crooked....my index and middle finger on my right were slanted and crooked. So I let her finish and before she starts buffing it out I tell her that I do not like how those look...so she gives me the dirtiest look ever and rolls her eyes at me and fixes them...of course she starts speaking in her language to the guy there and she sounds very bothered! And to top it all off she demanded I pay before she painted my nails...which by the way was terrible too!! Be ware of this place!!! It sucks!! Terrible customer service! It s my fault for staying after the first incident but I will never go back here again!!!
Typically I love the food here at Capriotti s but I cannot recommend it currently. The management here needs to seriously step up their game. The soda machine was broken for about two months last week they were out of CO2 and for the last few weeks the place smells like sewage. It s strong enough to hit you as soon as you open the door and pungent enough to be gag inducing when near the soda machine or cash register. Makes me not want to eat here anymore...
Only takes 2 minutes because it should not take any longer. Asked about using a coupon online and his response was no it has to be printed and it s only 4 more anyway. Uhh okay. Well I m obviously trying to get the best price here there are smog stations on every corner. Even checked in and he said no. I d say go somewhere else where they do not make you feel bad about asking to use a coupon you found online on their website. 22 cash or 23 if you use a card.
Eh this place is ok. Good margaritas. Both times I ve come super long wait for seafood. I finally got the shrimp tacos and the shrimp was not cooked. Slimy. I also tasted the chicken and the meat was bad. Turned me off so I got a veggie quesadilla was ok. 1 star for food 4 for service. They need to come up with a better plan here and the fact you have to buy a while box of chips when I only want one serving. Like 5 bucks. Come on ridiculous and the fact they charged me after I was not even going to eat was a little annoying for the chips i mean come on i came for dinner right after The gym. I needed protein. The bartender was rude but the lady handling the register was super nice. Thanks probably wo not be back. 3rd time trying them out. Hey I gave it a chance
Never coming back to this location again! We stopped here to get a few things and used two carts my infant in one and my 3 year old in the other. When we left we had left my 3 year old s sippy cup in the basket. When we realized this we returned to the store 25 minutes later and my husband asked the clerk if someone had turned it in. She calls the manager who says nobody turned anything in. He comes back out to the car and see the cup in the bushes! He takes a pic and goes back in to tell the manager. The clerk calls the manager to the front and she could ve cared less. He showed her the picture and she just shrugged and said said she d talk to the clerk. I know it s just a cup to you but it s my sons special sippy cup and the least the courtesy clerk could ve done is turned it in not littered their own property with it. Shame on management for condoning that behavior as well.
Do not go to this location!!!!!! It smells really bad. Homeless people were sitting along the wall outside and took up most of the tables inside!!! An employee was arguing with a homeless woman telling her to let the paying customer get ice first. I could not take it anymore and just walked out.
Food is definitely mediocre. The service or disservice is even worse. The young waitress delivered the wrong food to our table. I kindly told another waitress about it. The young waitress rushed to our table and loudly accused me of wrongfully ordering the wrong food. When she brought out the ordering slip to accuse me of my mistake it showed I was right. She quickly whisked away the wrong dish without a hint of apology.
So disappointed with this pharmacy. My cat had been put on medication he will be on for life and my vet highly recommend this pharmacy. My first order came in promptly. When was time to refill super easy order arrived in 4 days spoke with an actual rep who at the end of my call told me for my next refill just use the automated refill line. So when it came to reorder again I used the automated refill line. Seemed easy enough. However it s day 9 and no meds in fact I called and they said it would arrive this coming Monday so 11 days later. No explanation why it took so long to ship all I got was my supervisor will call you. answers. I still had 2 refills on the prescription so it was not that they needed to get my vet to authorize a refill. Now my cat is without his medications and having to be monitored 24 7. Really unhappy. I m taking my prescription to another pharmacy.
Traveled Texas to PA for two reasons one of which was a dish here. I have eaten here many times but it has been a while it will be mich longer before the next time They sold out before 7of one of their signature dishes. The staff said well we cooked 11 Really? on a Friday? Very poor planning. VERY POOR!
COCKAROACHES!!!!! Do not go here if you do not want to eat with COCKAROACHES at your table. I ve been here twice on two different occasions... After the first time I saw a cockaroach I stopped coming here to this location for more than a year. Mom wanted to check it out again so we went two weeks ago. There were two COCKAROACHES on the table with us!!! I was horrified. I tried killing them with a plate so mom would not notice but she did. Unfortunately we were all done eating our dinners and there was nothing we could do. The server was nice enough although he could have brought us refills without us asking as you could see our glasses were almost empty. Very grossed out about COCKAROACHES I hope everyone avoids this place. If it s this gross on the dining tables WHO KNOWS how many bugs are in the kitchen.... I do not want to know.
Oh Pedro s palace of mediocrity. I ve been to Pedro s a handful of times over the years but last night was a nightmare. I will not go back. We sat in the bar area as there was a 15 minute wait for a table in the dining area. That was fine but the bar was a clusterfrak of odd people. But whatever we were there for margaritas and mediocre tacos. We knew what we were getting ourselves into. There was a sign on the wall that said Moon Man only 2.00 and I was super excited. New Glarus Moon Man is my favorite beer and this was a bargain price! Sadly the beer I was served was not Moon Man. I asked the bartender lady Is this Moon Man or Blue Moon and she promised it was Moon Man. She smiled and said I tried it last night it s kinda lemony is not it? Moon Man is hoppy and delicious but not overly lemony. This mystery beer Pedro s is claiming to be Moon Man tastes weirdly of margarita syrup and I was really disappointed. Also the behind the bar area is nasty and needs a good cleaning gut job. The food was worse than I remember it ever being and my friend s sampler platter featured a god awful steak quesadilla. As I was eating my chicken taco I kept thinking how it was so much worse than a shredded chicken taco I had a Taco Bell recently. The problem with that is the fact that the TB taco was 5 cheaper. At one point the bartender went from merely okay to completely unprofessional. I understand that she was the only bartender working on a very busy Thursday but still. She pretty much yelled at some customers for asking her to ring up their bill. When they said their waitress had not checked back on them for a very long time the bartender still insisted they find their waitress and deal with it. Terrible customer service. If you want decent Mexican food go elsewhere. If you are craving a margarita go elsewhere. After several very underwhelming visits and one horrendous one I m convinced that this is not a place I want to support. With the closure of the Westside location and the poor reviews of this East location I m surprised this place is still open. Avoid.
Well it was a good place until it changed hands. They used to cater to the over 50 s crowd but now do not want older employees or clientele and we were treated like a nuisance and even got an eye roll from one of the bar maids when all we did was ask for more ice in our drinks. Who needs the attitude? So we are done. We could have dealt with the food going downhill and the prices going up. But not the horrible treatment.
If you are wanting a company to do the work and when done never hear from them when there are issues this is the company for you. They are great while doing the work but good luck after. Poor customer service once their paid.
I ve been to this place twice now and each time it s left me dissapointed. The service is slow even when it s empty. The food is crap. The drinks are meh. Last time we were here we just wanted to have a few drinks before biking around...mostly because we didnt want to look too shady drinking from a bottle..in an lcbo bag...but thats besides the point. The bar rail shots were like 7 dollars. They had a list of flavoured daquiris and margaritas. They were 95 ice with a bit of syrup and a touch of alc. I ll probably come here again based solely on the fact that its one of the only few places on Centre Island.
I got a manicure and a deluxe pedicure. My nails started chipping the very next day!! I was so mad after paying 50. All the polishes looked old and they used a Butterfinger candy dish to soak my nails and in. I will NEVER go back here again.
while i am not a seasoned crafter i do like to dabble in different things from time to time. i just joined a sewing group and i needed to get a pattern and some fabric from hancock fabrics especially since it happens to be one of the few fabric stores around. i was gravely disappointed with the state of the store. living within reasonable distance to south i have had some interesting experiences with some of the stores on south blvd. some are gems some are typical and then some are just so devoid of customer service and cleanliness it s like being in another country almost. i walked in and i could not figure out where to walk first. the store just seemed so overly cluttered and every aisle had open boxes and trash strewn about. while they may very well have been doing inventory or stocking it seemed a little ridiculous that they would haphazardly do the whole store all at once making it totally chaotic and messy. can we say not ada compliant? selection was okay but nothing greater than a joann s or even walmart. i m not sure if i will go back here unless i have a really good coupon and know that this is the only place i can get something specific.
My boyfriend has been many times on prior Vegas trips and always had a good experience but that did not happen for us this time. He ordered a burger medium rare and it came out very well done and dry. It took ages to get anyone to acknowledge the issue and by then I was basically done eating my BLT which was admittedly good . They comped the burger but our lunch was ruined. Between spotty service the incorrect order and really high prices I ca not recommend this place. There are loads of good places to eat in Vegas skip this one.
Our stay was horrible from the moment we walked through your doors. What an uncomfortable place to be. Let me say how false your advertisement is first off how you are trying to screw hard working people over. NICE JOB. Also your rooms were DIRTY. Dust everywhere filthy rooms. No housekeeping came by in the four days I was there. The staff made me feel poor stupid and used my age against me. This was the worst stay I have ever had. You made my trip stressful from how much cash you guys take FALSE ADVERTISEMENT. I was stressed all weekend because of you when I was down there to visit someone. At checkout you guys were rude did not have a I can help you attitude and you guys were trying to steal money from me. I CAN NOT WAIT TO GO TO YELP AND tell the world what a shitty hotel you are running. Or maybe call the show Hotel Impossible. It is funny to me being in the Hospitality Industry as you I would never treat someone the way your WHOLE company treated me. WORST place ever. Room was not clean staff was rude reservation was FALSE ADVERTISEMENT your tax and what you charge is pathetic for the service you are giving. Maybe if that was a nicer resort with clean rooms nice staff and a better price YOU WOULD have a full resort. This was pathetic. They say it is 89 on the website but REALLY charge you 130 PLUS all the resort taxes which ARE BULLSHIT. Upon checkout I asked about my free third night they had promised me when I made the reservation. The room was not free and they charged another 18 a day on top of the taxes. FALSE ADVERTISEMENT!!!! THEY WILL TRY TO TAKE YOUR MONEY AND SAY IT IS A FREE NIGHT STAY IF YOU BUY TWO NIGHTS!!! FALSE INFORMATION!!!! I was expecting a 230 STAY and LEFT WITH a 350 bill. LIARS. DO NOT STAY HERE!!!!!!! DIRTY AND RUDE PEOPLE.
Ready for bad service? I am currently sitting in the restaurant right now and have never experienced such horrible service before. This will be the first time i ever leave without tipping and we are now no longer regulars here. 1 our lettuce wraps came significantly later than our other dishes. 2 the Peking duck carrots had dirt spots on them. 3 our appetizer soup came after the first course. 4 we ordered our dessert before another table dessert soup and pastries . The table behind us ordered their dessert about 5 10 minutes after us and they got their dessert and the last of the pastries. My guest inquired with a server and the server actually WAVED her off and said it s coming. Another 10 minutes later and it clearly was not coming so again we again called over the same server and told her that the table behind us ordered after us and got dessert before us. The stubborn and rude server said it s not dessert it s the soup. Until we insisted its dessert and only then did she say ok you re right. Of course at that point they did not have any more pastries.
Service at bar was nice and friendly. Food is so so at best. One person had short ribs which random bar waitress recommended and that was great. Steak Tartare was maybe worst thing I have ever eaten in Las Vegas. Strip that another guest had was fair at best. Food is definitely not their strong suit. Left YardBird where we d eaten the night before to try this place and was really disappointed to spend money on food here when we were at a perfectly good place. Have a drink here but save the money on food and go somewhere else...food terrible.
note if i could give 2.5 stars i would. alas. pros great ambiance lovely outdoor patio good service relatively inexpensive free valet cons the food. bleh. my sister and i ordered the chicken skewers spicy beef salad summer veggies and patatas bravas. everything was bland and flavorless except the potatoes which were so spicy they were practically inedible. the spicy beef salad supposedly contained filet mignon but the beef was grey dry and chewy. it was also topped with a dumptruck full of crunchy wonton crisps that were all stuck in the thick gloopy dressing so i could not just push them aside. i was pretty annoyed bc these were not listed anywhere in the description on the menu. i have special dietary requirements and if i had known they were on the dish i would have made sure to order it without. i wound up sending this dish back. our waiter did take it off the bill without me specifically having to ask though which is always appreciated. service 5 5 ambiance 4 5 it was just a skooch too dark and i needed my phone flashlight to read the menu like an old lady. food 1 5 if you re looking for delicious tapas in Vegas i d recommend Jaleo over Firefly. yes it s significantly more expensive but the food is light years better in quality.
On the whole I was disappointed with this company. When I first spoke to All of My Sons it was not made clear to me that even the smallest of moves cost a minimum of 252. It was only during the move that one of the movers told me this. I would not have gone with this company if I had know this. 252 is too much for a move that took only one hour. Also I was charged 35 for packing although the company did not do any packing or packaging for me. When I informed All of Sons of this charge I was told they would credit my credit card. I am still waiting for that credit. In summary poor communication overcharging and slow in addressing errors.
Two words Sodium. Bombs. And I love salt more than most people. I ordered shrimp with broccoli which really could have been anything heavily salted. The fried rice? Salty. Hot and sour soup was fair to middling and the dumplings were sadly inedible. It seemed like the filling was heavy on star anise and also very overcooked the dough was limp and sad. A friend says they re really good so maybe I ordered the wrong thing. I ll give them another shot sometime but it might be a while prices are decent anyway.
Egh. I guess i am biased. I was in love with the old location and old menu. I will accept the new location which is nestled in a neighborhood and must drive the residents crazy as there is virtually no parking. I will not accept the new menu unfortunately. My husband was in love with the torta flaca. They now have a new version which is just a torta and missing some of the key elements. I ordered the breakfast sampler which is a standard 2 eggs flapjack and bacon situation. Nothing to write home about. Our order was slow and no refills from waiter on our water. We had to chase him down to even get the check. All in all not worth the extra drive.
Wow! 4 waxy limp pale french fries were thrown haphazardly on a pile of gravied rice and cut up pieces of of chicken. It was presented in such an unappealing manner the food became hard to enjoy. There was no care or pride of workmanship in the presentation of the food. What could have been a great experience was greatly diminished. The food was frugally given but what we had tasted fine. I have had better for much less expense.
Unfortunately the quality of the staff has really gone downhill. The Willows used to be one of my favorite businesses I ve purchased quite a few items and have brought many of my friends into the store. The staff used to be so friendly and welcoming...sometimes I think I purchased an item just because I enjoyed talking to the gal helping me. I had not been by for awhile so decided to stop by. There were four staff members and none said hello or asked if I needed assistance. I left and will never return. I like to support local businesses but only if I feel welcomed. When will the owner get a clue.
I debated about posting this review but after reading all the others I see that I cannot hurt this place any further. I have received good service from them during the lunch hours. Good food also. So I ordered at night. Mistake on my part. I wo not go into all the details of missing food cold food and late food. What I will tell you is that their service and staff at night is the worst I have ever run across. Rude dismissive and verging on nasty because I had the nerve to try to hold them to a bare standard of customer service. After that failed I took my complaint to the management during the day. She was apologetic and appalled offering me a bigger refund than I asked for I only wanted the crappy cold uneatable food refunded . I did not take it but I did appreciate her caring. Patty the manager saved me from totally slamming this place in the worst way. She could not convince me to order there again after the damage the night staff had done but I wo not bash the entire experience. I have eaten their wings and love them but the way I was treated loses them my business. Other reviews show that it is a serious issue for them and possibly they need to clean house with the staff if they ever hope to get good reviews.
Stay elsewhere. If you do stay at Paris check room type before you book along with hidden surprise fees. Recently stayed and was very disappointed. Physical changes needed customer service improvements and more amenities to be offered to guests. Booked a classic room. This room type is the original room used when they first opened the hotel. You can smell every bachelorette party drunken night vomit on carpet and overnight pet stay in a classic room . Carpet stained in room drapes stained and bathroom exhausted not working clogged with lint. Furniture busted and filled with scratches nicks and dings. Hotel corridor carpets are also stained and very worn torn. Upon check in at 11 30 inquired about available room and agent with first initial E stated It s 20 for early check in cant waive that we get fired around here for doing that with attitude on top as a welcome during entire check in process. Room view was nice to strip but beware of club noise on Saturday nights I will credit staff for previously notifying me of noise . Pool area is nice however service is non existent. Never was approached by a service member and had to walk over to the bar and stand in line and get one 20.00 mai tai myself along with a 12.00 pre packaged soggy turkey sandwich. Was not interested in dining onsite for dinner because of the chaotic atmosphere and the previous pool food. Too much happening in the casino between the dark gaudy area which is noise filled with all the yelling drunk party goers and tired vacationers trying to make their way to reception for check in. Parking is 12.00 for 24 hours. Hidden surprise fees Rooms with a view come with upgrade fees early check in fee remodelled non classic room fee. There is also a resort fee which adds up to 40.00 per night which basically makes up for the inexpensive room rate you get online or elsewhere. Regarding lack of basic amenities classic rooms do not come with a bottle or water or even a basic coffee tea maker that you ll find at every motel 6 room. Had to exit the casino to buy water at the CVS next door and cross the street to Bellagio to get Starbucks. Buyer beware of Paris Las Vegas!
We went in last night take out food Very similar to Chipotle with some better seats colorful tables and a decent patio overlooking the parking lot. I did not see any dogs on the patio so I am not sure of that status. you stand in line to order your food and it is prepared in front of you as you move down the assembly line does this sound familiar? I immediately noticed the employees were very negative and several customers in front of us were openly rolling their eyes at the lack of caring We ordered a simply order of 2 chicken tacos and a steak burrito. the tacos are prepared on a flat top behind the line our order was clearly lost or forgotten but at the end of the process they quickly made new tacos.. how hard is it to make 2 tacos? the thing that will turn me off forever of CAFE RIO was the cross contamination of food in the assembly process chicken openly floating in the beans the same spoon was used for Steak then dipped into the salsa and then into the pork I assume it was pork then it happened... the young man preparing the tacos turned around with a wet rag and gloved hands.. now he cared enough to clear but as he wiped the prep area down the towel he was using was dripping into the chicken broth and then into several of the beans etc... that part alone was gross but then he turns back to his taco flat top did not change gloves or wash his hands grabbed someone s tacos for prep talk about germs spread everywhere. The burrito was much bigger than chipotle big enough for 2 to eat. I will not return due to the gross factor of Caf RIO
Food was mediocre. We had breakfast waffles eggs bacon. Nothing outstanding about the meal. Coffee was cold had to wait for a place setting. The service was horrible staff could not care less. Absolutely NOT worth a repeat visit.
Thank goodness someone told the truth about Fillaseat. All they have posted on the site for Las Vegas is comedy shows. I do not think they are even trying to get good shows sporting events and or concerts to attend. I m kind of irritated and feel like I wasted my money. What a disappointment. Heard other competitors is the better deal if you are shopping around. Unless you like tons of local comedians Fillaseat may not be for you.
I really have no idea how this company even exists. Horribly dishonest. I had many bids on this job but figured I would give this company a shot at the job. Frustrating mistake. He used the whole lien line on me. Before we even started taking numbers. He saw I was driving a new Lexus suv and gave me a price about 35 higher than the highest bid I received from 5 other contractors. Then when I said thank you for your time he started the let s make a deal speech. I entertained it just to see how far he would go. Needless to say he went let then all the other contractors by about 10 and demanded cash in full up front. I said I would contact him. He called me every day for about a month. I blocked his and he showed up at my office trying to charge me for the estimate. I laughed and told him he had about 1 minute to vacate my office. Had security cameras put up the following day. That was my experience. Good luck folks. By the way the guys name was Randy. It might just be an employee but I did not care to research it further.
if you dont mind terrible customer service then look no further! I work nearby so its conveniently located. The few times i have been in are awful. they let the lines build up incredibly and dont bother opening more then 4 registers at a time and when you are walking the store no one ever offers help. it once took me 15 minutes to buy floss. seriously? the customer service is so pathetic. the only reason i even bothered giving more then a one star rating is because of the people who work in electronics. the guys back there are the only friendly peple in the store. they never hesitate to offer help ask if you are finding everything okay and even offer to ring you up right in that department. if it werent for them i would hardly rate them one star. so terrible.
Chicken Pesto Calzone. Bread was doughy and some portions were uncooked no signs of pesto at all just oil pouring out. My friend got the steak. Steak had no flavor. He was not happy. We were not happy.
went to metro pizza on sky point dr. last night ordered a large triple play pizza. over 24.00 for a large pizza!!!! it was a thin crust ridiculous! one of the most expensive pizzas we ever ordered! it was ok but 24.00 was not worth it. if that was not bad enough my brand new car got keyed on the whole passenger side!!! car s 4 months old has not even had first oil change yet. I know it was not metro s fault but we were parked in their handicap parking we re both handicapped and hung our sign up trouble with this metro their parking lot is way off to the side and far from the restaurants entrance so yeah makes easy target to vandalize patrons cars.called police filed complaint and talked to metro s manager on duty.advised him to maybe put camera out in parking lot and for him to call police so they can watch parking lot when cruising the area. told me he will have owner give me a call. of course that never happened! yesterday evening ended up making this the most expensive pizza we ever had.typical owner could give a damn about trouble we had outside his restaurant!!! we will never set foot in metro pizza ever again.just a warning to all the public be wary of eating in this establishment cause your vehicles will be at risk when you park in metro s parking lot.
Like others I saw the sign outside about the best burgers in Charlotte . But when I saw the house smoked brisket sandwich I could only imagine how much better that would be. In reality it was the worst brisket I have ever had. It was as tough as beef jerky. I did not want to complain in front of my guest so I just called and asked to speak to a manager and explained the situation. I got a simple apology and no offer for a refund. After I had to ask about it she took my info so someone could call back. Note to owners Matt and Tom. If there is not anyone working the joint with that kind of authority or customer service then how in the world would you expect consistent quality food or service.
Where to begin? I was with a group of people on a business trip in Cleveland and we wanted to celebrate the successful completion with a nice steak dinner. Boy did we pick the wrong restaurant. Service Inept. There was no one to great us when we came in and no one felt responsible for about 5 min. This is while the restaurant was at 20 capacity. After we were seated the server was trying to take our orders but was inept. We ordered some wine and the server broke the cork and was trying for several minutes at our table to get the remainder of the cork out the bottle. Real high end service. I am being sarcastic here in case that is not clear. Food I ordered raw oysters as an appetizer and they almost dry. It felt like the oysters were ordered and stored open and not just opened to order. One of the worst oysters I had in my life and I eat a lot of oysters. I ordered a porterhouse medium rare. It came medium well done and was not aged as advertised. In a nutshell the only thing high end about this place is the price. Avoid!
I do not know who trains these a holes by they sure as hell are doing a lousy job at it. The a hole who served me at this location was particularly rude and extremely lacking in customer skills. I was basically treated as someone to just take money from. No warm friendly service with a smile. Starbucks is just another greedy corporate monster disguised as the coffee place that caters to your every tastes. Zero stars. Bucks sucks.
It s a Saturday night at 8pm and they have only 2 ticket sales windows opened up! It in the middle of January and I have to stand outside for 20 minutes to get my tickets!! Not a good way to start off my first experience.
For twenty years my husband and I have enjoyed dining at the Salt Cellar unfortunately the last few visits left us wondering what happened to this once excellent restaurant.Last night was no exception. We planned on having appetizers at the bar but the bartender Daniel was so rude we moved to a table so we could be served by someone who would actually take our order. We typically start with the San Remo . Unfortunately the chef must have quit and taken the recipe with him because this was not the San Remo I used to dream about. It tasted like it was swimming in Tabasco sauce the shrimp were tiny and overcooked. The shrimp cocktail was so bad we had to send it back. Even the server said she was not sure what the stringy things were hanging off the shrimp??? We should have run for the door at this point but we were starving and could not imagine that every item we ordered would be so lackluster and void of flavor. The Salt Cellar is expensive and with all the new restaurants opening that actually care about the quality of food they prepare and offer excellent service we intend to spend our hard earned money elsewhere. Goodbye Salt Cellar it was a good run while it lasted.
This branch is the reason I closed my account with Scotia and will never return. Lineups are always long and service is impeccably rude. Things that BMO does instantly and for free like direct deposit letters Scotia wanted to charge me for and make me wait 2 weeks! This was explained with lots of rude attitude with choice phrases such as this is not BMO and go bank with BMO then. Shocking. Initially I had wanted to bank primarily with Scotia and went to BMO at Manulife to close my account only to be convinced into staying through kind customer service that made me feel valued. They improved my services have lower required balance to waive fees better cash available after a deposit and overall much better and personal service from BMO at every location I ve visited . So I went back to Scotia to close my bank account and they were really snappy with so lets do it right now saying things like they would gladly close my account. What?! Seriously Scotia you re awful at customer retention. Not sure why they re so rude at this location but it made me swear off Scotia altogether. BMO is where you get treated like an actual human. I occasionally email one of the managers because he invited me to and I get results ASAP. This Scotia is a joke and an embarrassment to the banking world in Canada. Sometimes if you re lucky there will be a homeless person sleeping in the vestibule.
Way way way over priced. Seventeen dollars for 1 2 sandwich and soup. Corned beef is good but soup has no flavor. The other sandwich ordered was incorrect. Service is mediocre at best. Most likely wo not return.
We went here for a friend s birthday there were 8 of us. When I called to set up the reservation the person who I spoke with was very nice and accomodating. When we got to the restaurant our table was ready and that part was positive and that s about where that ends as far as positivity.. There were only 3 available menus that we had to share and the place was not even that busy. It s kind of weird to not have menus for each chair. We ordered one app for the whole table and the waitress only brought 3 plates there were 8 of us sharing. The bar drinks that we ordered were unpalatable and we had to send every one back.. The mojito was not at all sweet and we had to add our own simple syrup. The waitress gave us a little squirt bottle of it and we put it in ourselves.. The fish bowl tasted like rubbing alcohol it was sooo strong. The beer was good but they did not make the beer. The birthday girl ordered the olive burger and the waitress did not bring ketchup after asking her 3 times I finally walked back to the bar and got it for her so she could eat her meal. Of course it was cold by then. The fish tacos had the skimpiest amount of tuna ever. They were bland cold and the side items mashed pots which I did not even order were cold the plantains were very good. The salads that the other people at my table ordered looked great except for the chincey and skimpy amound of dressing that came with them. I had to get up to ask for dressing becuase no one ever checked on us again. The waitress was aweful but was at least nice. She gave the birthday girl dessert on the house but only brought one fork when there were 8 of us.. So overall I would not at all go back.. Which is a shame becuase it has potential but poor management and service and aweful food.
I do not see what the hype is this place about. Everything was ok until I started ordering food and they kept saying they did not have this on the menu. Once ordering our food been waiting here more than 20 minutes and still nothing. More people come by and still nothing the only thing that s coming out is the slush and drinks. The food is taking for ever. So do not come here for the food just come here for the slush and boba. Plus they need more staff in this place for food to come out.
So difficult to book appointments with. They request that you come early but then make you wait without offering coffee or water. I bought a package of facials and booked months in advance but they would constantly call and cancel right before and then I would have to wait weeks for my next one. I would not recommend if you have a busy life.
I would not recommend this place to a student. While the complex is clean and cozy Timberlake s problem is the management. If you ask the front office of anything more than a miniscule task they require an insane amount of micromanagement. As a student I really do not care to be calling them daily showing up in their front office etc. when I have so little personal time already. There are plenty of other great fairly priced apartments in this area whose front offices are run professionally.
This past Thursday we as in myself my brother and my 2 daughters were in the mood for breakfast food for dinner. We went to the IHOP on Woodlawn but they were super busy and there was a line. So we decided to head over to Denny s. I have only eaten at this Denny s once before and I was mildly disappointed. However that was a year ago and I figured I would give them another chance. We arrived around 9 30pm. At the time they were not very busy...only a few tables had customers. We placed our order and waited. Our order consisted of pancakes a turkey sandwich and an egg and sausage skillet. Thirty minutes had gone by and we did not hear anything. At this point the restaurant had gotten busier. We asked our waitress who was also the restaurant s manager why it was taking so long. She explained that they were not prepared for the rush and they had to prep the food because nothing was prepared yet. I said that was fine and we waited. While we are waiting my daughters are noticing that other people who arrived after us were getting their meals first. So I spoke with the manager again. She said that they were still preparing our food. I asked the manager if considering the inconvenience if she could discount the meal. She said that the best she could do was 10 . So I say that is fine and we wait some more. It was now 10 35pm! Over an hour had past and we still have not received our food. At this point we told the manager that we had to go because I had to get my daughters to bed for school the next day. She said that was fine and we left. To be clear our waitress manager was not rude in anyway. She just did not seem to care whether we were there or not. She never checked on us nor did she offer an explanation regarding the delay. Not to mention our order was pretty simple to make. This was some of the worst customer service I have ever received and we will never go back there again. Thank God there was a Chili s next door. We got some hamburgers which were REALLY good and our waitress was a life saver. We told the waitress about our ordeal at the Denny s and she could tell that we were all exhausted. So even though the kitchen was closing it was almost 11 00pm at this point she gave us time to figure out what we wanted and got our food to us within 15 minutes. That s how you run a restaurant. But Denny s?...Never again.
Dim sum was below average. The special is only Monday to Friday before 11am and the price is over 3. The servers were so rude seating people at our table before we left.
My husband and I went there for dinner. We had the calamari appetizer for the price of 18 . We were expecting something really good for that price. It was just the typical fried calamari with what tasted like plain old ketchup as the dipping sauce. We had to wait an hour for our main course. The main course was just ok. The waitress tried really hard to make up for it taking so long and is the only reason I gave it 2 stars.
I hate to do it but it s true. I ve been here three times and each time there is a resounding feeling of lack luster service. It ranges from not knowing what s on tap what the specials are and no real desire to serve. I m no elitist but these are sorta important. The food is the best part of the experience and even that has been flat lately. I like the atmosphere in general as it is cozy and a nice place to unwind. Parking is on street and sometimes a bit of a hardship to find a space.
The worst food my family has ever eaten! Tasted like hospital food very bland. Had the hot beef sandwich fish. We did not even take home leftovers. Also the choc cream pie was like jiggle jello not even creamy! Save ur money.
I do NOT recommend! I have been to this location before and was not super pleased with the result of a wax that I had done on my 2006 Corolla and did not return. Recently this location appears to remodeled and I thought I would give it another chance. I brought my brand new 2017 Corolla iM for a Works wash and there are now 2 scratches in the passenger side door. I spoke with the manager Jason on location and got nowhere. He looked at the damage even commenting that there were grease streaks on my car reminder this is after my car was returned to me clean. He basically told me it was poor luck because I could not prove it happened there and maybe the scratches were there when I brought it in. Again I ve had this car for 1 month and this was my first time getting it washed. He ll give me a bottle of touch up paint but that s all he ll do. Did not even offer to repay for the poor wash job. I will not be returning! Jaime
This is a review of the meeting facilities and NOT the rooms. I have no experience of the guest rooms at this location. I attended a two day training here and was largely disappointed by the meeting facilities lack of power outlets in the space we were using. The training was a computer related course and all of the attendees were forced to fight over probably five power outlets. Additionally the first day of our training there was some sort of awful plumbing problem occurring in the building that caused the entire place to smell of sewer gas and sewage. The property was not able to combat the smell and we all just had to endure it until the cause was resolved. Gross.
Ice cream is good but not many options for vegan and ppl with nut allergies. Was told the soft serve Vegan ice cream on the menu was runny stated by the staff we could t even try it... maybe the recipe is pre mature? Also I found the staff had poor attitude hence bringing the ice cream experience down to two stars....
Thank you for wasting our time. After rescheduling and your sales rep finally keeping the second appointment we never heard back. No plans no quotes. Guess you do not need the business. That s fine because you wo not get ours.
I did not actually stay at this hotel but walked thru after I ate at STK. This is one big party hotel. Now for me thats a little much. Plus Im too old for that shit now. Also saw one huge hooker fight here. I guess they were tramping on anothers territory. This scene is not for me. Too loud too jersey shore. I guess if you are freshly 21 this would appeal to you. But for an old timer like me I like to go to the party not stay in the party I like the look of the lobby and casino. Very hip and modern.
I just recently discovered Filipino food and fell totally in love. We actually live in the North Las Vegas area and there are not any Filipino restaurants.That day we were heading out that way with family and thought we could try this place out since it had a lot of good reviews. I must say we all were not impressed at all. The location is very big and bright but its very old and did not look very clean. The food was very very greasy more than other Filipino places I have tried so far. The pork adobo was super dry and did not have so much flavor. My brother in law ate just a little bit of his food and then did not touch it. He said it tasted like it had been sitting out there for 3 days. It was a sad time and we all left very unsatisfied. I finished my sour soup and had some of the adobo but overall did not have an enjoyable experience.
My son and I were on the lot looking at another car when we saw an escape we wanted. We were told it was just brought in on trade and they needed to look it over and then would get back to us. We clearly expressed our interest. We waited an entire week for the car to be available and when we were finally called we made plans to go to the dealership. Friday night I completed an application for finance and was approved. We were getting ready to head up to purchase and contacted the sales agent we d been dealing with all week at 3pm on Saturday to say we d be there at 5 with the funds to purchase the vehicle. We did not attempt to haggle on price and we did not have a trade in to negotiate over. We were told they did not have our information that we had entered on their website and that the finance person had an appt Saturday at 5 and there was nothing they could do and we would have to come Monday to purchase the vehicle. I expressed concern that they said they did not have the information I submitted via their website and surprise that I could not purchase the vehicle and I was told the person who handles the finance has an appointment at 5pm. Does that make sense? I ignored the condescension and said that while it did make sense to me I had never had a car dealership not have the time during business hours to make a sale and that they better go tell anyone walking on their lot that they did not have any time to sell cars today. As my son really wanted the car we agreed to go Monday. After rearranging work schedules to go up on Monday we called again to confirm they could fit us in this time and was told that the car had been sold Saturday morning. This dealership clearly has no interest in customer service or selling vehicles.
Last week for the first time to either location I went to Borgata for a cut and Chandler for the worst color job ever see my review under the Chandler location . My cut was fine nothing really spectacular but also not particularly bad. BTW she was a level 3 which I think is probably not that different from a typical stylist at any other salon. However the attitude and service at the front desk made me never want to return. The girls up front talked down to me and were super pushy on products and tipping I m a good tipper . When I booked the appointment the reservationist told me about a facebook special for 40 off. Because of the special I decided to come in immediately. But when I was rung up the girl up front did not include the discount. I asked about the discount the reason I came in and the girl seemed annoyed and then asked me for a printout of my facebook page. When I told her this was never mentioned she told me I would have to get it. I live way out near Apache Junction a good cut is worth a drive so it s impossible! Then she actually told me to go to a library to print it! She also suggested that I should download the app to my iphone which she saw in my hand and show that to her. Do not they have the internet ca not they simply look it up? Finally she agreed to do the 40 but then she refused to tell me the price of the hair cut after the discount I also bought a product that they said worked great it did not . I asked when I was deciding on tip and she actually told me that I had to give tip on the original price not the 40 off but tempered it by conceding that I did not need to give tip for the product! Are you kidding of course you do not tip the stylist on a product! Not to mention it was a foot product that I had been somewhat interested in myself until they told me how great it worked . I go to salons spas nail salons luxury hotels etc all the time and know how to tip and usually give generous ones. But I do not need some RUDE PUSHY front desk girl telling me how to give tips! Her pushy ways worked though because I left more than I attended. Even though I liked the feel of the place I chose to drive to Chandler for my color which ultimately turned out to be a huge mistake! . I must add that the one person who was supersweet and professional was the girl who worked behind the mineral makeup counter and genuinely answered my questions without ever forcing a sale unlike the the front desk girls. My advice is to save money and time and go somewhere that they actually care to do an excellent job and do not see you as a dollar sign.
They have a very small menu. The selection was horrible. The service was even worse. The restaurant was not very busy. However it took over 10 minutes to get our drink order taken. Our waiter was not very knowledgeable about the menu and was very very slow in his service. He forgot to bring my cup of soup out. I had to ask for it after our entrees arrived. The soup was cold when I finally got it. The food made me and my friend sick. The only reason that I did not give a one star rating is because the manager was very quick to respond when we asked for one. Then he took my friend s entree and my soup off of the check. The server and manager were very nice people and very apologetic especially about us getting sick . I doubt that we will be visiting this location again.
1st visit my advice is not to order the antipasto plate frozen ham and not worth the price. We waited for water but you were busy so I ll kind of overlook that The food was excellent and we will be back Friendly despite being busy great ambiance clean I can improve the review but for now this stands as it is
The corner lot has a couple of doomsday vehicles parked out front one or both are used for transport to the Adventure Combat Ops zombie hunt. There s even a makeshift sculpture with red water blood running through a few barrels which makes for a decent photo op. They sell a bunch of touristy type stuff and nothing really for the hard core prepper. They sell bumper stickers t shirts glassware some over priced weapons and other zombie related items. There s also a knife throwing area. You can even have your picture taken with prop weapons against a green screen and they ll lay in a backdrop. And now for the reason I give this place only 2 stars... Why two stars? In a word Anthony. This clown runs the place calls himself a manager. We booked tickets through him for the Adventure Combat Ops zombie hunt which is VERY cool by the way and he gave me a confirmation number over the phone. He also told me that the Adventure Ops guys would call me within 24 48 hours to give me the up sell and answer questions. After a week of waiting for their call or email I heard nothing from them. So I called Anthony. Two days later he had not called so I called again. I left a message with a girl and i never heard a peep from Anthony. I called a third time left another message and still nothing. Funny before we booked tickets Anthony was so quick to call or have a phone call with my GF and I. But as soon as he got our money he devoted ZERO TIME to us. Why is this an issue? When we got to the Adventure Combat Ops at our 10 AM time slot the Ops guys told us there was no 10 AM slot and that they never heard of us. That s when I got even more angry at this brain dead Anthony. This messed up our day since we had things planned and now we had to go back to the ops place by 1pm our actual time slot. I had to drive all the way back to our hotel to pick up my service animal because I did not want to leave her in the room alone for that long. Kao over at Combat Adventure Ops allowed me to keep my dog in his air conditioned office while we did our thing. Very cool of Kao. So we had a little time to kill and we decided to visit the ZA store. We get there and Anthony is the only employee there. After a while I guess he could decipher the utter disgust on my face and asked how I was doing. I replied Is there a manager around? He returned volley with I am the manager. Is there a problem? I said Yeah... you. Is there someone above you? He responded with I m not going to tell you until I know the nature of the problem. That s when I let this chain wearing Vegas urchin have it. I told him that he dropped the ball and ignored three of my phone calls. He told me he called back he never did and that it had to be the Ops guy s fault since he told them about us. LIES! I ca not stand people who point the finger at everyone but themselves. When I told the Ops guys that this clown was blaming them they laughed and just shook their heads. Apparently this moron has done this and or other things a number of times. That s Anthony one Ops guy quipped. He never admitted to any wrong doing yet when I went out to my air conditioned car with my dog my girl confronted Anthony who told her that once he sells the tickets it s out of his hands. Ohhhhhhhh so now he s singing a different tune. Hey moron how about return my phone calls and give me the number to the Ops place so I can handle business? Oh and Anthony? Dressing like a gang banger with the chains is probably not what a manager should be dressed like or are you that much of a Vegas cheese ball? I hope Mike the owner of this place gets a clue and fires your dim witted a . You SUCK at your job. Oh and when someone you just dropped the ball on confronts you.. admit you re wrong instead of your have a nice day bull crap. At one point this clown actually suggested that I write a review on Facebook. No thanks I ll just Yelp it. Take it from me if you re going on the Adventure Combat Ops course book it directly or through Groupon and bypass this low IQ clown.
PAY ATTENTION TO ALL THE BAD REVIEWS!! They are right. I am currently on hold with COX 5 minutes later listening to really bad music on a loop so I decided to share my experience here. I had COX years ago and never had a problem so I decided to go with them when I moved back to the valley. I had several months of hidden charges on my bill and was sick of it so I decided to switch. I got a call from Patty in Outbound Retention who asked how I would stay. the fact that that department exists should be a red flag right there I told her and she got me a lower rate better service and whole home DVR service...so I stayed. 3 months later. I have had billing problems EVERY month and I am currently on hold trying to keep them from turning my service off because they say I am past due when I am not. Unbelievable. I would switch tomorrow but was told they have to rewire some things in the attic and my walk in closet is the entrance...a lot of hassle. So here I am...on hold. He is getting the job done but I have already spent so much of my own time trying to fix their mistakes. If you are stuck with COX do not hesitate to tell them how unhappy you are ask for a supervisor threaten to switch....those things all have seemed to work. but do it nicely it seems to have more clout I am basically going to threaten them if I have ONE more problem with billing I will switch. They really do not want you to go so this seems to be the only way to get your way at this company.
This was in the valley so I went here and have been a few times. The store did not have a great selection of clothes and was not that clean. It was mostly dirty and did not have good products the store was kind of random and had a lot of things scattered some food looked like it was sitting out for a long time. It is in a weird area near a big lots and across from the old JB s and at night dead.
Completley overrated. Server was a complete asshat took himself waaay too seriously and while he attempted to be a snob missed the mark a bit. LOTD snobby server Do not correct people ordering in Italian when you do not speak Italian yourself! He was surprised at the grammar lesson I gave him at the table after speaking down to my cohorts. Further when someone asks you for your favorite dish and a back up dish you do not repeat the first one you suggested in a condescending tone. He was obviously compensating for lack of something in other areas. Moving on... The food was disappointing much too rich and not in that OMG this is sooo deliciously rich I want to bathe in it and lick it off kind of way. Much better choices in Vegas. Skip this one. Your time would be better spent in an establishment that teaches its staff to appreciate your patronage. Rao s in Caesars Palace does a better job and their staff actually has personalities. Go there instead.
Very nice setting very plain sushi. I had heard so much about this place. I gave it a shot and ordered some of their best stuff. Very very boring very plain. The fish quality is superb but at these prices it better be. But in terms of being creative having a vast list of fish etc not there. The jalapeno white tuna roll sounded interesting and it turned out plain awful. After the waiter saw I was not enjoying it one bit he asked if it was ok and I said I dont like it at all and he started explaining why it is a creative fusion dish. A high class place would have taken it away and brought me a miso soup at the least to cleanse my palate. Poor service nice ambiance ridiculous prices. If that is what you like check it out.
I got coffee croissants and some Nutella crepes. The coffee and croissants were decent. The crepes had unripe bananas just stuck in there whole not sliced. The crepes were below what I would expect for more than 12 a pop. The service and ambience were pretty good. Not sure may be it was a bad day for crepes here.
FIRST OF ALL do not fall for the menu. not only is it false advertising but it is SUPER deceiving as well. when my boyfriend and i came here for our vacation we quickly scanned the menu and agreed on that everything sounded good and affordable especially since it was located in the heart of vegas. HOWEVER when we were seated and have ordered everything came out to be.... quite disgusting ! their food selection looked decent but the food itself was the oppposite. we ordered what we usually tend to get elsewhere me steak eggs the whole breakfast ordeal while my boyfriend got potato skins and chili cheese fries . when everything came out ICK! my steak was basically thin ground beef shaped together BURNT and so was everything else. the water had little participles floating around which was not the business. after asking for different glasses of water we ended up getting the same results in all glasses. not only was that bad enough but our server had no patience! he snapped at us and pushed us to order before we could even get a word out ourselves. WHAT KIND OF SERVICE IS THAT? anyways they need to find a new round of servers update their menus and make sure that their food quality is serve worthy.... what a dissapointing experience.
The purchasing of the furniture was the easiest part. The quality was horrible. And absolutely do not let them scam you into buying the additional insurance warranty!! A total and complete scam! I bought it and specifically asked if it covered pet odors and accidents and i was told yes. Flat out lied to. False representation at it s finest. Do not even try to work with their corporate offices. Took me so many phone calls and so many issues to get no where. When asked why they were not covering the urine smell on my couch they said the insurance only covers a quarter size stain and nothing else. SERIOUSLY??? IF that was the case I never would have bought it. This was my last fight with them and when you ask to talk to a supervisor they flat out tell you NO there are no supervisors. REALLY?? A company without supervisors now wonder they are messed up. This was not only a fight for the additional warranty. When my couch was 3 months old the bottom started to completely fall apart. Repair person came out and said wood was warped and needed the couch to be replaced. It took 2 more service calls at expense of my time off to be there to get them to replace. Honestly do not waste your time or money!! It s not worth the credit. You can get better quality from goodwill!!! I work in corporate world and I have never seen a company care any less about there customers and the quality they are selling then Conns. If they are able to stay afloat for 5 more years I would be shocked! Do everyone a favor and make sure no one ever purchases anything from them.
An insulting experience. This restaurant s strong suits are its decor and location. The live jazz music was too loud to conduct a conversation politely indoors. I was seated at a table by an elderly man. When I got the attention of a male staff member with black stubble to ask about service after waiting for about 10 minutes. He sarcastically asked me if I saw him running around with a tray. He walked away ending the conversation that way. I ended up ordering a soup after another employee took my order. Ironically the same guy as before delivered it to my table and dipped his thumb in my bowl as he placed it on the table. Long wait times terrible service I ca not recommend Rex s Bar under any circumstances.
Came here on a quiet Sunday evening. The ambience and lighting were pleasant enough. The combinations of ingredients on the pizza were interesting to say the least. I ca not say I m ever really pleased to have just roughly chopped raw romaine lettuce sprinkled on top of my speck pizza which as I was reminded by my gracious server was smoked prosciutto. My partner and I were also perplexed by the giant chunks of jalapeno and green onion ? on the mild Italian sausage pizza if it s meant to be mild then why spice it up anyway? I suppose I should commend them on cooking their pizza all the way through here s looking at you neighbouring competitor who sha not be named but I would ve liked a denser more burnt crust. Both pizzas could have definitely used more of their actual namesake toppings on top of them but that s just me. Also it is kind of a turn off when the waiter reminds you that the tip is not included in your bill at the end of your meal... Overall I ve had better for the price range gratuity or no once again looking at you unnamed neighbouring competitor .
Just waited a half hour in the drive through from the time we ordered to paying!!! Ridiculous!!! And it s not like it was busy....there were only a few cars ahead of us.....Very frustrating experience and definitely not going to go back there! At least the young man handing us the food at 2nd window apologized for the wait.
The food here was not bad but the dining experience left a bad taste in my mouth. We came as a group of 8 without reservations and were lucky to be seated right away. After spending some time looking through the menu we ordered the following to share Pork belly bbq The best item we ordered. The pork belly was delicious and portion was generous. Thin sliced beef bbq Got ripped off here for sure... this was expensive 53.99 w soup combo and I do not think the cut of beef given to us was even close to being worth it. Fermented soybean soup combo w bbq I never had fermented soybean soup before and I really enjoyed it. The fermented taste was really interesting and the soup was very tasty. I do not know if it s because we ordered it in a combo but the amount they gave us was miserly. Spicy kimchi soup combo w bbq Tasty but nothing special. Again portion was tiny. Spicy rice cake Spicy so watch out! This was good but not memorable. Black bean noodles Lack of black bean taste definitely had better elsewhere. Overall food was okay. Some items are more expensive than they should be this is definitely the case for the beef which was just a frozen pile of cheap beef slices . BBQ portions are for two and if you order the combo with the soup it s more than enough food for two. On the other hand service was frustrating and that s an understatement . In the beginning we were catered to by a man who I think is the owner and he is certainly special because i have NEVER had a dinner where I was micromanaged like this. He started off telling us what we should and should not order from the menu how the hell do you know what we like and do not like? and when we pointed to certain items we wanted to order he had the gall to say we would not like them because we wo not be used to the taste. Again how the hell would you know what we like and do not like? It was like he was belittling us as if non Koreans ca not handle authentic Korean food. It got to a point where we were so fed up we just agreed to whatever he told us to order so he could shut up. Of course it did not end there. When the meats came for the BBQ he just HAD to show us how to cook the meat. If he saw us doing something he does not like he literally took the tongs out of our hands and did it himself. Excuse me? Seriously? He basically hovered over our table for half the meal and he would not stop saying how we re doing things wrong. He treated it as if it was our first time eating Korean food ever and his condescending attitude ruined everyone s moods to eat. He eventually disappeared towards the end of our meal and it went from over service to completely lack of service. We could not even flag down a waitress to refill our tea and when we managed to get someone s attention we were told they did not have enough tea for us... while she was carrying a pot of tea. If you would like to be treated like an idiot who ca not cook for yourself or if you want a complete stranger to decide what you should eat and should not eat by all means come here.
Not so impressive by Las Vegas standards! Location at far end of the strip is a little out of the way of everything making for many expensive cab rides to get anywhere else. Confusing trying to get into the hotel for starters. Front desk staff are great and very accomodating. Dislike the dark area leading to elevators a LOT! Rooms are huge and spacious just like many other decent Vegas hotels but mine did not feel too clean. While I was there I found the noise outside my room very disturbing I was in Vegas for business not to party! I would say there are far better options for the price in LV.
I bought window tinting for my husband several years ago and it was fine so we bought a bed cover from them last year they installed it and it started falling apart we asked them before the year warranty was up and they told us it was our issue to go to the company who sold it to them. We called the company they said no quality bumper is responsible for the install we called QB again they still wo not help us so now we have a truck bed cover that is falling apart cant protect our tools etc...this was almost 2000k this company does not back their work
I love target just not this location. Every time I come here there are only 3 or 4 registers open with long lines and stocking carts all over the store abandon.
This is more to serve as a reminder to myself never to expect anything even remotely decent after 4 00 AM at a 24 hour restaurant. After a standard Saturday night out in Vegas we ended up at Mr. Lucky s to demolish an early morning bite. As to be expected for Vegas the food here is both mediocre at best and severely overpriced. I do not think any of the items were under 15. Granted the portions were fine and large but they re slightly delusional charging an arm and a leg for the worst chicken fingers I ve ever had. I asked for teriyaki because it sounded better than plain and the chicken fingers were so over sauced I might ve been drinking them. The teriyaki concoction was mostly a sugary additive laden disaster. Even worse and why I m writing this their lazy waitstaff. I gave my order to a disgruntled employee who had just received a bad tip from another party and he was stomping around the kitchen pouting. NOTE This was a grown older gentleman. It took roughly 20 minutes for someone to take my order and then another four years to get it. In fact another customer came in sat down next to me ordered the EXACT. SAME. THING AND GOT HER ORDER FIRST. Needless to say when I finally received my food 45 minutes to an hour later I got up and walked out.
Food was ok but waiter tricked us. If you use yelp to check in it states free blue moon beer. The waiter said it was buy one get one free........after we got our check. But it doesnt state that. Horrible service.
The manger with glasses very rude and and unfriendly The food was terrible the turkey had no taste and dry The roast beef for my kids was of no taste not edible And my son could not drink milk shake in the area to watch our twin girls even though their are seats to eat and drink Ask for a refund and he said no you deal with the waitress Who was by the way sweet Since he took over the place has gone downhill It was a nice place but my friends and family wo not be returning ever again.
My first experience was going into the store looking for my wedding gown. I went in excited to finally start looking for my gown but when I met my bride specialist she sucked the joy of my experience. She was getting irritated because I would not buy the first dress I tried on. It even came to her telling me I did not know what I wanted. That might have been true but there was no reason for her to act the way she did. I being newly engaged wanted to see what style fit me best. My second experience was going into the store to look for bridesmaid dresses. I only came to this store because I was on that side of town and I was hoping my first experience was just a bad day for someone. Well I was wrong! The person helping me made my sister feel horrible! She pulled out a dress and told her that is not something she should be wearing. Everything my sister wanted to try on was criticized by the lady. We walked out of there feeling totally discouraged.
This is the worst HOA ive ever encountered. I work in hospitality industry and understand that sometimes people have a bad day and the service is lack luster. HOWEVER every time i go into the clubhouse for any reason at all they are the rudest individuals. Can anyone explain to me why both my husband and myself both have to present two seperate swipe cards while trying to go to the gym together? We own the home and have both names listed in their system. They also have photos of us. They treat the home owners horrendously and i hope that it doesnt take me petitioning with other home owners to have this changed.
I ve been to Hosu many times in the past and it was great! But they have become so stingy on everything now including refilling water and tea! . Before you would get the free Korean side dishes but you do not get any of that anymore. Not only that but the portion size in my bento was sad... I literally only got 8 pieces of korean chicken. Also my glass noodles were definitely old as they were chewy and the noodles were sticking together. Not fresh at all. The service was mediocre too. The server never came to refill our tea and water and did not ask how the food was. I will never go back there again. If you want better quality asian food go to the restaurants on Dundas St. Queen St. restaurants have become so depressing...
Disclaimer this review applies ONLY to the Steak n Shake in Tempe AZ. The reason I want to make that clear is I grew up on Steak n Shake in the Midwest in my college days and this is certainly much more gol dang fancier than what they have in the Midwest. Take into account that this is in the high rent district of Tempe ... no free parking lot so be prepared to add 2 to your meal if this is the only place you re going that day. The place is kinda urban chic upscale with a nice but small outdoor dining area and a very tiny indoor seating area. They serve beer and wine but they underplay it so much I did not know it until I was waiting for my food. And waiting. And waiting. I also counted 3 736 holes in the ceiling tile and watched 196 Volkswagen Beetles pass by the restaurant before FINALLY getting my burger and fries. There is no way I would ever call this a fast food restaurant. And this mind you was about 3 PM on a Monday afternoon with only about 20 people in the entire restaurant. Was it worth the wait? Remember I practically grew up on real Steak n Shake drive ins in the Midwest. Well ... their standard burger some fries and their only sized drink came to just under 6.00 and the fries were awesome. Me who is not the biggest fan of fries ate most of them before even digging in to the burger. The soft drink was per usual with the exception that I had no way of figuring out how to use their fancy dancy soda dispensers so I drank the whole thing without any ice in it. Come on get with the program and at least put some sort of label on the machine huh? Now to the critical moment the burger. I am SUCH a reverse burger snob. To me the best burgers I have had in my lifetime are in one location greasy dives in bum frick nowhere where it is burger meets bun with maybe some mustard and real cheese in between and no rabbit food anywhere in sight. You know where you can actually taste the meat? Apparently you can NOT have it your way at this burger joint you get it with a bunch of toppings they think is the way you want it. Sadly I never felt I was sinking my teeth into a meat patty. I tasted bun. I tasted lettuce too much . I tasted pickle. I tasted tomato. I tasted onion. But I tasted no meat nor cheese. And I did taste something oddly weird and chemically and unsettling. I have no idea what it was but it just did not taste good . It distracted so much from the wonderful taste of a great good adequate hamburger I just had to take away two full stars from this Steak n Shake just for that reason. I SO wanted to report that I fell in love with their Tempe location and that I ll be back 1 000 times in the future but after today I must review them more as an old familiar friend that I revisited and saw how they ve changed and realized I really do not have much in common with them anymore. NOTABLES ONE freakin counter person and a long line? Um has this franchisee ever been to any fast food restaurant anywhere ever? Never in my life have I seen only one cashier in a burger joint. Trash cans that are impossible to dump the contents of the super deep trays in to? So people do not and the trash cans are smeared with mustard and ketchup and the super deep trays are just left unemptied. A strategically placed 5 diameter steel railing placed you guessed it exactly at eye level around the outdoor dining area so it is impossible to view the surrounding street life. WHO came up with that? S he is SOOOOO fired. Employees with the fire and enthusiasm of mortuary workers. WTF this is a college town and you ca not find even one worker who knows how to smile?
Food was not worth the price. The waiter recommended things for us to get and they were all awful. Everything from the guacamole to the 10 individual tacos. My wife and I would have much rather have gone to Chipotle across the street and not paid 100.
Poor service and dirty glasses. Asked server for a wine recommendation of the biggest wine they have. She said They are all the same size. !!! Ordered a bottle of wine and server gave us the bottle with the cork still in it. Waited another 10 minutes for them to come back to uncork it. Glasses have lips smudges on them even after they were clearly washed because they gave us them soaking wet. The. Worst.
Do not believe the hype the food is not good! Ordered for three people and we were each thoroughly disappointed with the food quality. Stay away from the fried lobster balls Unless you like imitation crab and the chicken Katsu was disappointingly dry. Short ribs were chewy over cooked nothing appetizing.Ive had much better from L and L and Aloha kitchen. I hate leaving bad reviews guys but this was BAD!
I m sure that some of the patrons of this restaurant are not going to agree with me but I can not for the life of me see any difference in the Good Egg from any of the other chain breakfast joints Denny s I hop Waffle House and do not forget Perkins except for the fact that at these prices you could go to Scramble or Matt s or a few of the other great joints around the city.......... Til next time
Well. I will say they did the job of fixing my screen on phone. But I was very uneasy with the fact the guy in there asked me for my passcode to use while I was away. It caught me off guard and I wish I d have thought to tell the guy no. Especially because when I got my phone back my BANK APP was moved. Which means he was in my phone to one degree or another. I ca not imagine for people who have ALL their personal info credit cards and pics in phone.... my gut reaction was NOT to trust this place. So with that being said. Yes. Screen fixed well. But I do not trust the employees I dealt with. I also heard the guy say a screen protector on a BARELY cracked screen would not work.... ehhh.... well my experience I used a screen protector for 2 months with NO issue!! So hearing the lie to client.... made me think I prob WONT go back to this place. Verizon should rethink their partnership
The ambiance was OK at best. Dimly lit and quite boring. Our server was hardly ever seen and never gave us her name. Our food took forever to come out including the salads. I ordered the grilled trio which came with a 4oz fillet salmon and shrimp. It was delicious but would ve been more enjoyed if it did not take forever and if we could ve seen our waitress more than two times. Once the food was on our table we finished eating and we were never asked if it was ok or needed anything additional.
Considering the fact that I am a regular customer my experience here was by far the worst. Rating does not even deserve one star. The wait time was ridiculous. I came here on a very busy day for myself and was given 3 different times that my car would be ready just to change out tires but apparently bc of the fact that I have rims on my vehicle maybe they were not prepared for the work. So next time ill know to spend my money at a Rim shop instead of firestone bc they proved there not fully experienced. So I was offered a courtesy alignment but turned it down and was given an oil change courtesy offer. Well when I called to get the courtesy for the original offer I was told something different by Irwin. Just what I expected. So not only was I late for my kids birthday party due to waiting 3 1 2 hours to have new tires installed but I was also lied to. Even if there was a miscommunication issue when I called to follow up everything twisted and was explained completely the opposite. I have worked in Customer Service over 10 years so I listen very well. All I can say is this will be the last time I visit this location. One thing about any interaction with a person is that you will always remember how you felt. And the way you treat a person makes a big difference when it comes to Customer service. One person can ruin a bunch so ill take my business elsewhere and I advise for others to do the same.
I was a new patient there and saw Dr. Klauschie. I came with test results from my pcp which indicated I have a uti. She told me without looking at my test results that my urine that day was clear. I said that I had been less than a week ago and had a culture that showed uti. She told me well you do not have one. I also told her I have chronic issues and she acted as if that was no big deal. Her attitude was horrible. She mentioned having a ct scan yet when I checked out nothing was said about making an appointment at a facility for a ct. I will be canceling my next appointment and finding another doctor.
I got a gel manicure and it started to chip within a few days by the end of the first week they looked horrible. I would never go back. By far the worst gel manicure I have gotten. They should have lasted longer than this. Very disappointed.
My cousin and I went to BJ s for lunch yesterday. It WAS one of my favorite restaurants. I have to emphasize was because I was disappointed in the usually stellar food and response to an issue. We both ordered the baby back ribs. They were a little tough. The flavor was still good but the meat was tough. Also my roasted brussels sprouts were dry and my cousin s asparagus was a little too al dente. We paid our bill thanked the server and asked to speak with the manager. Our server informed us that the manager was making a run but she would get the Kitchen Manager. I believe the person that came to our table was the manager not the Kitchen manager. The woman that came to our table seemed to believe that we wanted something for nothing. I remind you we had already paid. I told the manager that BJ s was one of my favorite restaurants to let her know that I have eaten here many times but the ribs just were not up to par I did not mention the vegetables . She told me it must be the meat. They may have gotten a bad batch. HUH?!. She then proceeded to explain that they have been very busy because of Valentine s Day and that she hates the Hallmark holidays. Her parting words were I hope you return another day . I simply smiled. I am not going to go back and forth with an employee or a manager. I simply let my feet and wallet do the talking. I hate this happened. I can accept an off day. I ca not accept disinterest lack of ownership and aloofness. I will spend my money were I feel a modicum of welcome and appreciation.
This negative review is driven by Chanel corporate lack of transparency in its return policy and could have happened in any one of it US stores the review is linked to the actual store were the purchase was made. My wife owns a number of Chanel luxury items as well as products from other similar high end brands. In this instance she was interested in a watch and with the help of the sales agent who was friendly and accommodating selected the product that she thought she wanted. Immediately on leaving the store she had second thoughts and the following day she went back to the store to try to do a return. The product had not been worn or even removed from its packaging in the intervening 12 hr period. On returning to the shop she was told that a return of the money that was paid for the watch was not possible and the only option was to do an exchange for other items in the store as this was the corporate policy. We challenged that we believed this is not normal in the US and we had not been told this by the sales agent. The Manger of the store was summoned and was very firm on the issue and pointed us to the sales receipt where it does indeed say that Jewelry and Watches can only be exchanged not refunded. This felt very much like a Corporate Gotya as of course we only get sales receipt after we have already paid for the product. A subsequent search on the Chanel website as of this review date confirms that nothing is mentioned about a no return policy on Chanel jewelry or watches. So the message to other potential buyers of Chanel jewelry or watches is be very aware that once you have paid there is a enforced non return policy your commission based sales agent is unlikely to tell you this up front and you will not find it on Chanel s website.
What happened to this place? We tried it a few monthes ago and the food was good. We ate dim sum again today and it was really really bad. Stuff was missing food was oily and recooked or undercooked. Beef ribs were just bone fat and grisle. Even found paper towels in our food?! Service was non existent.
My husband and I have lived here for two years well almost two years but anyway we have never been late on rent and we keep to ourselves and keep quiet but ever since some management has been changed they let anyone and anything move in here and God forbid if u compliance or need anything fixed!!!!!!! I used to love it here but now not so much it s like the people in the office are affriad to say anything to certain people and then others they think they can walk all over! For example the last few days we ve had a problem with someone on the complete opposite side of the building play there music so loud that the place was literally shaking and my picture on the wall were vibrating!!!!!!!!we called the office and they said it s only 4we ca not say anything about it! Only 4 my ass what about the people who work all damn night it s not the music that bothers me it s the fact that my apartment was shaking to the base when just days earlier a manager was talking about oh I m all for keeping it quite around here!!!! then u have people who hang out all hours of the night in front of your apartment and when you come out in the morning there s trash everywhere!!!! Wake up management!!!! Oh yeah we were not even here two weeks when my hubby s scooter was stolen and it was locked up and from the looks of the lock they were working on it for a while and we re was do called security at when they were out there sawing through a thick Brink s lock
Food was ok. Felt full at the end of the meal and price was reasonable for the amount food you get. But service was very slow. Servers did not seem to know what order people came in. We were not the only people to complain about this. Meal was very good but very disappointed by the slow service.
How did they get 5 stars? Did they bribe someone?? I first called the housekeeping around 2pm for room cleaning. They said they will do it. But when i came back three hours later it was not done. I called them again for the 2nd time and waited about an hour they did not come. They finally came after calling three times. I never saw a 5 star hotel with this kind of service. Also Wifi is so slow and signal is weak. I have been most of five stars in las vegas and I think this was the worst experience among them. If you are looking for real 5 star hotel service go somewhere else like Cosmopolitan. At least I am not coming back here
I do not know much about getting an oil change but I paid 77 for the usual 5000 miles 6 month routine. I found out later an oil change should cost around 30 50 unless you get synthetic oil which can be a more expensive. However I have a vehicle that is 15 years old and did not need the more expensive synthetic brand. I feel like I was penalized for my ignorance. I Googled what an average oil change should cost and here is what I found According to Angie s List pricing data based on recent member reviews the national average for a basic oil change using conventional oil is 46. The minimum price was 25 with 50 being the most expensive. According to Cost Helper an oil change typically costs 20 to 55. Using synthetic oil bumps the price to 45 to 70 on average. I will make sure I check the Yelp reviews before I do business again. I could have avoided this whole situation if I took the usual precautions.
Tastes like disappointment. I ve given this place a try a couple of times for their desserts and gelato. Pastries were ok. Flan was ugly yes appearance does factor in!! and had a weird texture. The opera and Nutella cake were too sweet. The gelato however was a tragedy. Texture was very hard. I had Oreo which was not mixed well enough divided nearly in perfect half with one side being vanilla and the other Oreo mixture. Creme brle and rocky road were better though still not nearly creamy enough to be considered a good gelato. Perhaps I should stick to eating French Italian desserts only in Europe. Unfortunately for Vegas this is the only decent French sweets shop around.
Not sure I trust this place as being trustworthy in recommending what your car needs. I brought my GS300 in for an oil change. The service advisor came into the waiting room and said I HAD to come in and see this . He sounded as if there was a huge problem so he freaked me out. He took me into the shop to look at my car and stated that it needed a whole new front cover seal as it was leaking downwards from the front of the engine which would seem like a very huge expense on repairs. Upon MY inspection it was the valve cover gaskets seeping downward from up top. They basically tried to upsell me a huge repair that my car didnt need. As a former Acura technician I know what my car needs. And when I got the paperwork back they did not even quote me for that repair of the leak but rather other regular maintenance items. smh! Best of luck to all that go there.
I stayed here this weekend and am so not the demographic that this hotel is geared for 38 yrs old but it had the best price so we booked it. Good Multiple overpriced stores where you could get snacks and beverages Very soft and nice beds and pillows Concert venue very nice got free Don Henley tics Was able to get an early check in Bad Dark rooms screwy lights Shower fixture fell off in my hand Cheap with towels had to ask to get more as they only left 2 big ones and some pathetic small ones LOUD Paradise tower may have well been in eqypt If I was going to a concert here again I d stay but if not THE HOTEL at Mandalay is my hotel of choice.
Hardly any flavor in everything we tried. Salt and Pepper and hot sauce can only work so much magic. The eggs on the Benedict had rubbery whites and cold yolks. And the hollandaise was much too runny. Not the velvety thicker sauce it should be. Service was excellent. Nice peo0le just really super boring food. You re better off going to Denny s or IHOP if you are looking for a national chain. Eggworks Cracked Egg or BabyStacks are much better local chains to go to.
I found this company to be inconsiderate and ineffective at managing their business. I was scheduled to have my carpets cleaned two weeks out and provided the necessary information regarding my apartment complex. After waiting the scheduled two hours for someone to arrive at the job I called to see where they were. They said they were 15 mins late but on their way. However they then asked where I was located which is confusing for someone who is on their way. I reminded the employee I lived in an apartment complex and required a portable device. The employee informed me he did not have the necessary equipment and had intended to call me earlier but had forgotten. Then he asked if I could wait for him to come by later assuming the device was fixed. The man did not offer a time or any method of compensation. He did not apologize for the inconvenience. As someone who works and who had already rearranged my schedule to allow them to come I was extremely displeased by the lack of organization consideration and respect for my time displayed throughout this conversation. I will not be scheduling with them again.
Company kept my deposit never gave me my product I won a small claims court judgement and they still will not pay. Do not use. They are crooks. In 2009 I ordered an Iron Door and metal inserts for my home. The Iron door was installed fine. Not great but fine. The metal inserts never came. I was told over and over they were built but waiting shipment in China. After 1yr their contract says they will refund the cash depost. They stopped returning my calls. I filed in Small Claims Court in 2010 and won a judgement. They still refuse my calls and have not paid.
I hate giving 1 star reviews but my golly does this place deserve it! I echo everything else other dissatisfied Yelpers have said this is a very very unfriendly place. I understand all of the upcharges for packing and shipping but now PostNet wants to charge you for dropping off your pre stamped packages! I went in last week with one Priority Mail package that had a prepaid label. I just wanted to drop it off while I was in PostNet to buy more shipping supplies for my small business by the way and the super rude and condescending guy behind the counter told me there would be a 5.00 charge just to drop of my package. I do not think this is true because they ve never charged me before but a 5 charge was almost as much as the postage on the package cost! Of course I was ready to walk out but the guy TOOK MY PACKAGE and basically held it hostage! I had to beg for him to give it back to me and finally he did. He was one of the rudest and most unfriendly people I have ever dealt with anywhere period. Needless to say I went down the street to the UPS store to buy my 100 worth of packing and shipping supplies. I m a small business owner and I m not in the business of getting ripped off. Avoid this place.
Came in for a drug screening for my new job I have been here now 45 minutes to just piss in a cup lady up front has gotten me four times to add more things to the worksheet that needed to be filled out every time highlighting more lines to fill... I should be in and out for a piss test this is not FASTMED this is SLOWMED.
The food is just OK. Portions are very small and very over priced. I thought we were ordering dinner but these are appetizer portions. Bottle beer is 7. Margarita s are 9 and watered down. Guac. was good. 90 for 3 people. Place was quite full on a Saturday evening. I guess people were trying it out. Do not think I will be back.
My mother decided to go here with coworkers for their lunch break because the food is diverse and can suit all their dietary needs such as gluten free corn free and vegetarian. This used to be a place they went to often to eat a good meal. Too bad for the owners they have lost the business of a large department of regular customers. Why is this do you ask? Well the story is a very dramatic one that does not reflect kindly on the owners of this little joint. Looking at the other reviews on this page I would say that many other customers have received the same kind of treatment. The owner was atrocious. I m sorry but if you re going to be in an industry where you serve food and you have earned a reputation chances are you re going to get a lot of customers. If you cannot handle that you should probably close shop or hire staff to help out in the establishment. Today the owner decided to tell my mother that they were not able to serve a party of 6 or more and if they ever wanted that it was required that they call 24 hours in advance. No where not on the web page or in person is this policy displayed. It is entirely new to our knowledge. Not to mention they were not a party instead they were a group of coworkers who happened to go to the same place at the same time. Coincidence? Not particularly when your place of work is close by. Two of her coworkers were taken aback by how the owner nastily told them about this policy and decided immediately to eat elsewhere. My mother and the last three coworkers were hungry and wanted to eat immediately. Upon seeing that they were staying the owner decided to tell them that since it was only her husband in the kitchen the food was going to be served very slowly. It was almost as if she did not want them as customers and was trying to get them to leave. They decided to order anyway there was not much time to go elsewhere after the nice long discussion with the owner. My mom was the last to order and upon receiving the change back from her purchase the owner decided to rip into her. She explained once more nastily their policy of parties. My mom explained once again they were not a party. They were coworkers that were coming in for lunch. After this while they were sitting at the table the food for my mom was served first. She had to get a to go box because the service was so slow. She followed the owner back to the front to get a box to which the owner decided she was hiring my mom without pay and asked her to take the orders back to her coworkers. Strange thing to do when you re supposed to be the server. Could not even do her own job. I do not recommend this place to anyone. My own personal experience was not good there when it was like the world was over when I did not want cashews on my sandwich and preferred peanuts instead. They really need to work on their hospitality skills.
Ok I m really upset with this place. I had made reservations for 7 30pm when our group arrived it was7 20 and they say they could not seat us until 8pm! Seriously I had made these rsvp several days ago they did not even have the courtesy to call and let us know about the delay which they knew about because they were short a chef! I was very disappointed but my group was not going to wait 50mins to eat because of their mistake! The sad part was this was a wed and they were not even that busy they should have made the call and then we just would have showed up later. Oh and to make matters worst they did not even seat us at an empty hibachi which I saw at least two that was empty! Really really bad customer service training! They had parking but it was very limited with all the other stores in the shopping center.
Pizza was adequate but if I could I would give a ZERO rating for customer service. We were visiting from Southern California and my friend s family took us here for lunch. My friend ordered a pizza with goat cheese because it s the only cheese she can have. When it came out with regular mozzarella she tried to bring it back to the counter and GENO was so aggressively rude and disrespectful that he had made my friend cry. How he could have the audacity to yell gesture snatch the pizza away and slam it into the garbage like he did was unacceptable and offensive. Only after noticing that he had made her cry did he come out to our table to apologize and offer a gift card. Even if we lived there he is enough reason to never give Pure Pizza our business again. Thanks but NO thanks. Also if you re going to act like that please stop telling people you are from New Jersey. You are giving all of us a bad name.
After reading all the reviews I decided to try this place because I was in Brampton. I for sure thought it was going to be really good but I was disappointed. The crust seemed like there was too much dough and there was not enough sauce or cheese to cover a whole pizza. Do not know what happened but I ve never seen pizza like that. I thought it was just me but my fianc agreed with me. I was actually looking forward to eating it.....the people that work there however to be really nice though.
Bread pudding is delicious. I stopped by with a group for the first time in a long time and I was wondering why it was so empty at lunch time. Nice place for big parties and they are ok with separate checks. I am not sure what changed but it is not as popular as is used to be. Today I had the baby back rib lunch special and it was good not outstanding. The menus were falling apart and the table was pretty dirty which is a bit gross. I would not go out of my way to go back. The service was good but the wait was long for a lunch period and when it was not that busy.
Slow slow slow service. On website time listed next to restaurant was 45 60 minute. When I ordered it gave me a time longer than that and then took over a half hour for them to process the order. They then told me it would be an extra 15 minutes and were rude and tried to first blame the restaurant and then just said they always get backed up and besides they had to find a driver and acted like it was nothing that the order I placed would take one and a half hours instead of 45 60 minutes. Find a driver??? Seriously??? I cancelled and wrote to the customer service. They never even responded. DO NOT USE them!
I just moved here in vegas and my friend and my boyfriend decided to go for a dimsum and we found this place here on yelp the seats are empty maybe like 10 15 people or less so i ordered pork shumai and i also ordered beef ball the shumai is actually good it was very tasty so when i tried the beef ball it tastes nasty like its been out for more than an hour the taste i really couldnt explain it in details but it taste like wood mold its like mix taste i ate the whole thing and just keep dipping it to the soy sauce but unfortunately didnt work. So i leave the two pieces in the mini steamer bowl. I asked the lady she has like a dora hair cut if she can take it back she said sorry but u order it i cant do anything. I was super disappointed it was really really gross so i told my boyfriend this will be the first and last and i didnt left any tip coz i was so disgusted and she was very rude to us from the very beginning.
Only two employees with over 15 people waiting in line. So needless to say service was slow. I understand the concept of a captive audience and much higher prices but I expect management to use a little bit of those higher prices to provide adequate staff and therefore adequate service.
Waited 30 min for slightly warm food while my mother s food came out piping hot. This is the second time I ve been and had to wait half an hour to get my food. Scrambled eggs came out brown sent them back and they came out brown again. The table next to us also had food sent back. Where s Gordan Ramsy when you need him because this kitchen is a nightmare.
I ordered from this place for the first time last night I must say I never ate my Food and got a refund! The customer service was Lousy! I had a Menu that I picked up from there a week ago and decided last night I would try it I ordered the Wet Carne Asada Burrito over the phone I asked the young lady what all comes on and in it she told me but never mentioned it came with Sour Cream or Guacamole and I do not eat Either of the 2. My wife picked it up and brought it home I quickly brought it back and said you never mentioned over the phone it was topped with Sour Cream and Guacamole she said YOU DIDNT READ THE MENU!? I said No I chose to ask you! Instead!....then she says WHY IS IT SAUCE WAISTED IN THE BAG!? I said Mamm its a WET! burrito your the one that put to much WET! On it not me!.....at that point I decided to get my 9.50 back. As the customer I should just be given my food the way I want it I did not ask for the 3rd Degree! I paid and I deserve to be treated better I feel they had a problem with my Race when I came in as a Brother with a problem cause my wife said they had an attitude when she went to pick it up.... Ill never! Go to this place again ill just go to Robertos across the street from them where a Black man like myself can feel respected you ve lost a Customer and I never got a chance to taste your food that s really Sad
Do not give this place or their racetrack business. They are very selective of what trucks can run even during practice. The employees have no personality and are in general rude.
It s ridiculous how much this place went into the dumps when the new owners took over.. completely different environment staff customer service and recipes. Very disappointment to see my fav pizza joint end up like this. Do not waste your time just try somewhere else instead.
I went to this location to get a dark chocolate banana smoothie WITH peanut butter 1 extra for the peanut butter totaling 6 7 . customers that ordered after me were served before me when i could clearly see my drink was done and sitting on the counter. i was given a peanut power smoothie which is completely different and has milk in it. i went back to get my order corrected and was given a regular dark chocolate banana smoothie with no peanut butter that i paid 1 extra for. i said the words dark chocolate banana WITH peanut butter about 3 times very clearly and they still could not get it right. i was not rude and did not have an attitude but that was not reciprocated. no wonder they always have a we re hiring sign up. wo not be returning to this location
They strangle the internet to less than half of what we pay for during peak times. It s not our router or our modem just shady business practices. You re better off paying more with any other provider at least that way you might actually get what you re paying for.
Zero supplies e.g. Flat rate envelopes in the self service area. Now have to make another trip. Also there was a handwritten sign made out to the attention of costumers .
The chicken was overdone pretty tough. The flavour was nice but they charged me 16 dollars for a wrap and a little cup of salad i felt pretty ripped off
be wary when you get your change back from the comb over bald headed guy that little brown comb over ca not count.
We have been going to Vegas for 20 years and have stayed at most of the major hotels on the strip Bellagio Venetian Caesar s Paris Mandalay etc While the rooms were nice at The Wynn the service was horrible. Reserved a seat at the sports book and it took over 90 minutes to get a drink. The cost is 50 per session and we were lucky to get the waitress to come by twice. Same thing for the casino floor. Gambled for 3 days 3000 and at the tables or machines you will be lucky to see a server. At one point I asked for a water and the server asked me where I was playing ... umm here at your casino for the last 3 days. Final insult was at SW steakhouse 5 star restaurant where we witnessed a women sitting alone FLOSSING HER TEETH at the table!! But wait that was not dental floss. SHE WAS USING HER HAIR TO FLOSS HER TEETH !! Multiple customers complained but the management did nothing to remedy the situation. We mentioned this to our waiter who replied she had a 5 course meal with drinks and is probably intoxicated So I guess our 3 course meal with a bottle of wine for 560 was insufficient for the staff to provide us with a dining experience that was not frankly nauseating. Never going o the Wynn again
Valentine s Day... Everything can go perfect for the day but for the evening is the Highlight of that day. Not the case this evening was actually disappointed with what I m use to. I can understand it is a huge day and it has been busy all day but I truly believe most restaurants prepare for this day. Did not seem like it today. From the service that seemed as it were there because it had to be and from the delay in meats to find out they were all SUPER salty leaving me typing this review and drinking water as I type. It s unfortunate the experience left me hanging... Just like our waiter did the whole night as well. Had to ask for everything including the check. It s sad how this fell to the bottom of my list for recommendations to my Hotel Guest and it s unfortunate how Salty this has left me feeling...
We came here for a concert which was actually great. Leaving the hotel was a nightmare. 300 people came outside and we proceeded to wait 2 hours for a cab that was not going to come out in the middle of nowhere. The hotel did not help make it better by communicating to us where we needed to stand what was happening and how we were going to get home. They just let us wait out there calling our own cabs and when approached the staff kept blaming each other for not anticipating that people might need cabs after a huge show. Sadly waiting outside was better than doing anything inside as the clientele was very sketchy and the tables and casino was honestly filthy. Avoid at all costs and if you must go there prepare to have your own transportation service pick you up at a certain time or you will be stuck there for a very very very long time!!
Eduardo responded and came out next day. Seemed great and promised a quote the next day. After three days I emailed to follow up they said give him another day or two. It has now been nearly a month. Needless to say we wo not be going with KO.
Went here about a week ago. I decided to get take out and ordered a chicken parm with a side salad and spaghetti. When I called in the order they told me about 40 minutes minimum. I went around and did some errands and then came back about 20 25 minutes after ordering. I went in and the lady behind the counter was nice and was friendly. The system for take out is not good at all. I walked in and the lady behind the counter had to get another person then that person came out and took my credit card. They took credit card and disappeared into back and then came out with food and receipt. The process from the time I walked in to the time I walked out was at least 10 minutes. The food was already ready when I came in so it sat there getting cold while they where getting the payment thru. They told me at least 40 minutes it was less than 25 if I would of come at the 40 minute mark it would of sat for 15 minutes getting ice cold and then the 10 minute ride home as well. Now for the food I have too say the only good part of the meal was the salad. The chicken part was not good and I did not like the taste of it also it was ice cold besides. The spaghetti was cold and the sauce was not that good as well. I do not think I would ever go there for take out again as the system for take out needs a lot to be desired as well as they do not know how to estimate food prep time. I also noticed many negative reviews so I probably would not go back ever again. I do not recommend Bravo for take out at all.
Fish was over cooked both times. Service was slow. Food was truly mehhhhhh. Tuna tartare was great!!! But that was the only saving grace. Waiter with mustaches are the worst. side note go to the steakhouse instead.
Showed up after the football game it s 6 00pm and they took forever to serve us drinks actually never came before we decided to leave wanted a salad with no onions but that was a modification they would not allow during a post game rush and the kicker... OUT OF BAKED POTATOES at a steak house! Nothing about this place justifies the pricing except having the steak house aspect cornered in this Westgate Entertainment area. My advice if you re here during the NFL season skip this place and go elsewhere since there is so much to choose from!
A really cool place to get a bite. Charbar gets creative reasonable price lunch crowd pleasing lunches right 4 5 star . But it simply repeats the formula for dinner at twice the price and executes it less well in my experience burnt overcooked poor flavours pretentious portions . Little pride and quality control. The Arctic char was the worst offender a terrible dish of miniature proportions for 35 ! The sausage dish two normal sized and tasty sausages for 20! Nothing to accompany them. 20! The pizza had completely charred through meat. The only hit the sundae. For 1 2 the price you ll eat twice as well at Earls. Stick to lunch at Charbar their forte.
We came her for dinner the hostess was super nice and friendly. But then we got to the table and our waitress we las less than stellar. She was cutting us off when we talked and correcting us when we talked. She kept trying to walk away from us when we were trying to order. The food took FOREVER to get to us. We were starving by the time it got here. We 35 for a steak that was tiny as heck and 6 just to add some asparagus. She then talked down to us about our split check because the hostess did not tell us that with a 5 person party it should have been in one check?! Why? And again she took forever with the check with an explanation that the card with chips take more than a few minutes to process. Really. Sounds like user error. I gave them a second star because the chicken pot pie was bomb. But that s all. Might be worth it for some. But not for most.
We went here for brunch on Thanksgiving Day during the parade in Uptown. The staff were all checked out talking about partying going out etc. very loudly across the restaurant. Some of the staff were complaining about having to be there. On top of all their yelling the music in the restaurant was incredibly loud to the point where we had to ask the manager to turn it down. The food was okay. Nothing special even with all of the many options on the menu. You ca not really mess up breakfast. I can imagine this is a good place for all the drunk people out on the weekends.
If I could give this company negative stars I would It is the worst. I have no idea why apple or any company would hire this company. Do not use them they lie about trying to deliver your package and just waist your time. If you see any company trying to use them call them up right away and ask for another company to be used. STAY AWAY !! THEY ARE THE WORST DELIVERY COMPANY EVER!!!
Food is decent but nothing special. Service is quick but they are not friendly. They mumbled their questions and got irritated when you did not answer right away. I had to keep asking them to repeat what they said. The majority of customers sitting in their dining room were actually customers from the chicken place next door... wished I had gone there it looked so good.
Worst experience ever. We have been coming to this restaurant for years. Never been treated so poorly. It is Valentine s Day we had reservations at 7 30 and now we have not been seated and it is 8 00. We stood in line just to speak to the hostess and she rudely told us that everyone there has reservations. I guess greed got the best of them and they overbooked with no concern of what it would do to people s Valentines plans. It is getting later and later we have been forced to leave and wait over an hour at another restaurant. We will never be going back after 20 years of going to this restaurant.
This review pertains only to the food and service as we did not drink. As stated on other reviews the setup is poor and seems to neither serve the dining nor bar crowd well. My wife ordered the bratwurst only to find out about 15 minutes after ordering it they were out. She settled on the mac n cheese which after an exceeding long wait could only be described as mac n milk. A hostess asked us about our experience and the manager did comp her meal. I had the East Vally burger which was fine but nothing special. It sounded better on paper than in reality. The servers while nice did not seem to be very good though I will complement the hostesses for being outstanding. As a dining experience I would not recommend the Sleepy Dog though we may not be the clientele they re looking for.
I have been a customer at a variety of different Nandos restaurants now for the past ten years across Toronto Richmond Hill and Mississauga. So I was obviously excited to learn that there would now be an option in the city. I was totally disappointed last night when I finally had a chance to visit. We always order the full pack which comprises of a whole chicken two large sides and a order of garlic bread. For the two of us this is just enough to fill us for dinner and have a lot left over. We rather have more food than still be hungry after dinner . The food took very long to arrive at our table. The kitchen staff was so disorganized that they had to come to our table and ask me what I ordered because they misplaced their copy receipt. When the food finally arrived I immediately had to ask a couple questions as the food quantity was totally different from what I was used to. Firstly the large rice came in a very small bowel which could not have been holding more than to tablespoons of rice the chicken which was supposed to be a whole chicken cut in eight pieces look like it was four regular sized pieces of chicken two legs a breast and a thigh and four mini pieces of chicken I m talking like bite size as if they took two pieces of chicken and cut it into four I could not believe what they were serving us in comparison to what we normally get at the other locations. We visit Nandos once a month The location on Laird has never done this to us. Lastly but certainly not least the salad came to our table LAST ok so at every other normal location you can get the Mediterranean salad as a side not at this location!! You can only get the Csar salad or a house salad I chose the house salad. When they finally realized that they had forgotten our salad it arrived at or table. The greens were all wilted and old. The salad was made of stale ingredients I could not believe they would serve customers this quality of food. Needless to say this was a very very bad Nandos experience that will not be taking place again. I would rather wait and go to a different location. Never again.
It s convenient but the service is absolutely horrible. The cashiers act like they are doing you a favor by ringing you up and you are lucky if they even acknowledge that you re there in front of them except at the end to say yousaved55centstodaythankyouforshoppingatHarriTeeter insert monotone super fast voice before they go back to complaining to their co workers talking gossip or whatever they happened to be doing before you interrupted their conversation. Worth the extra mile drive to the other Harris Teeter..
Online shows the service center is open. Arrived to get an oil change and the service center rep said they were not taking any more cars. Extremely rude... They sell car care packages so you return to the dealership but they are a waste if money cause they always try to up sell me on something I do not need or they are not open! I wish there was a closer Toyota dealership to me... I have never been impressed the service here.
So my family and i came here for my sisters birthday. Walking in the atmosphere is pretty cool and the first thing you see is the bar. Pretty well stocked. I might come back for a drink only. We were seated quickly. Especially for a party of 10 Total. Once we were seated it did take about 10 mins for a waiter to become available. I ordered the 6 dinner combo of 2 cheese enchiladas with rice and beans and a coffee. The food took quite some time to come out but it was tasty and was a large serving of food. The price matched the dish which was a plus. For desert we brought a cake that the restaurant was nice enough to place in their refrigerator. However once the cake was brought out we were not provided plates or silverware since our main course was through we no longer had silverware . We had to get up and ask for plates forks etc. Overall it s a nice place but the service can really use some work.
Worst service I can recall ever receiving while dining out. Additionally the manager Jose was combative when I tried to let him know. Sadly the interaction with him escalated quickly when I called into question the fact that he was eating in bar area oblivious to the costumers being ignored. The table next to us was literally waving their arms trying to be noticed to no avail . I have NEVER written a negative review before I have worked in the food industry myself and know that anyone can have an off day however the combination of bad service from MULTIPLE staff members and poor management have compelled me to do so now. Stay away until new management is in place.
It s way overpriced seems like only stinky nerds go in there. I would rather travel to LA to get Japanese stuff then go here. Aisle are too close too each other.
This Freshco has everything. Meat counter Halal seafood counter and ethnic groceries. I used to love going to this location but my last visit was real sour! The cashier was extremely rude to the senior citizen ahead of me and when I stood up for her she got even louder making it seem like the customer was wrong. She called her supervisor while the senior citizen left I stayed back to have a chat with her supervisor. The supervisor just nodded and started cutting me off as I tried to explain her cashier s behaviour. It was pointless talking to her so I left and I wo not be going back to this location again! Horrible customer service.
Lured in by the large sign off the I 15 offering steak and lobster for 9.99 I took my wife daughter and mother for a meal. My mother and me ordered the steak and lobster. I was of the opinion that the taste and value was on par I basically got what I paid for . My mother said that the steak was so filled with grissle that it was like paying 9.99 for the lobster tail. The meal also had a small baked potato and green beans. The wife had a Ribeye for 6.99. She commented that It was fine but it was not like a Ribeye meaning that it was a skinny cut and a strange complaint it did not have enough fat. A brief comment about the ambiance of this restaurant...depending on the situation it may leave something to be desired. Being a man I rather enjoyed the silhouette of nude women the decorations of the Las Vegas scene on the wall. They had several plasma TV s and a big screen TV with sports going that was good too. Unfortunately the restaurant was also a bar. The bar consisted of real loud homies that were either off work for the day or taking a long lunch break. Anyway they were talking as if they were still on a construction site as if they had to talk over a jack hammer. 50 feet away and I could hear everything they shouted to each other with some of the language on the salty side. I did not notice staff discouraging the shouting discussion. I paint this picture for the sake of other s who may decide to take family here. The environment may be a factor. I do not know if this is a typical problem at this casino restaurant but my mother paid her own bill using a credit card and tipped with cash. Coincidentally when she returned home she had some work to do on her checking account and noticed on her internet account that the staff went ahead and added an additional tip to the money she left. She called about the discrepancy and was told this type of thing happens all the time and it would be self corrected by Monday. Hmmmm. To be continued.
Decent work but the WORST customer service EVER! I had an appointment but still had to wait 30 minutes as they d taken walk ins. When I was called for my pedicure the lady put me in a chair to soak my feet but the water was ice cold! I told her it was cold and she walked away and continued working on another customer. She did not put anything in the water she did not start the spa chair and she never said one single word to me. I was not sure she understood English so I brought it to problem to the manager s attention. He was working on another client and did not say anything or do anything to address the problem. I waited another 10 minutes before leaving knowing I would not be back. I have to say I m grateful to Expect Nails because I ve found a great new shop!
BAD. Recommended by insurance and took my van there for body work after an accident. Got my van back it was raining that day no one checked off the repairs with me before I left. Next day I noticed they missed a spot. I took it back and they reviewed pictures they took and said they missed it. I was told they d call me once they contacted the insurance . That was about 3 weeks ago every time I call Travis wo not take my calls. Actually they gave the estimate to the insurance and probably was already paid for all of the repairs. They should complete my repairs. Why am I waiting for them to call?
Chicken seemed quail sized next to a typical costco bird fewer hormones probably a better tasting bird... but while that should actually thrill me it was not juicy nor could I taste the marinated for 24 hours flavor... I do not do mac and cheese from a box and while this was prepared from scratch let s just say they seriously need a better recipe...it was awful. veg were just ok. herbs would have been a nice touch... not sure what the garlic sauce is it s a cross between a really strong aioli and sour cream... super shiny.... for 16 for a whole chicken and 2 small sides I was seriously underwhelmed. Counter girl needs a LOT more training. So does the cook.
I suppose I ll deliver the good news first the food at this establishment was delicious and I would recommend the food to anyone. However this was honestly the worst dining experience I ve ever had I do not even know where to begin. For starters we were not greeted at our table. Instead the waitress slung water at us in a hurry and ran off. I get it. Both my dining partner and I are part of the service industry and can understand what its like to be busy however in any establishment you expect at least a hello or welcome. Fine we decide to choose our breakfast quickly so we can give our busy waitress the order. She comes back to our table 10 minutes later and we tell her we re ready to order to which she responds she ll come back when SHE is ready because she has other tables to tend to. K den. We wait as she takes two other tables orders and puts them into the computer another 10 15 minutes. Finally we order an omelet and a waffle to share wahoo we were super hungry. 20 minutes...30 minutes... 45 minutes... People who sat 10 15 minutes after us are getting their food and we re waiting. The waitress was nowhere in site tables around us sat dirty while people lined up at the host stand. This did not directly affect us but again as people in the industry we take notice of such. No wonder it takes them so long to seat their wait list . Finally after waiting for 45 minutes for our food our waitress returned to the table and said Wait what did you guys order? Cause the printer jammed and we lost the ticket. Such a sad story apparently said printer only jammed for our order as everyone around us enjoyed their meals. At this point we were ready to leave but instead repeated our order. No apology from our server a manager anybody. This experience could ve been handled SO much more professionally. Blaming the kitchen and the printer for crappy slow service is just completely unprofessional. Another 20 minutes go by and we get our food but have no silverware to enjoy it with also something we noticed at every table around us everyone had to flag down their server to ask for cutlery this is a restaurant!! . The food was good but at this point we would ve eaten anything after waiting close to 90 minutes from host stand to meal. What really frustrated both of us was not the experience in total but that nobody offered us an apology an opportunity to speak to a manager nothing. This was a one hit failure for both of us and we will never go back. 10 10 would never recommend unless you eat a full size Thanksgiving meal to hold you over for 90 minutes while the service staff runs around jamming printers.
My sister and I took our two nieces and nephew tonight. We have not been in awhile and now I remember why. Everything we ate two appetizers and our dinners were loaded with salt. It was awful. I had ordered the fried cod terribly salty. When I peeled the coating away the fish itself was delicious. The server was friendly and efficient which was great.
If I can give this zero star I would. The bouncers were d cks. I was with 6 guys three girls. Our girls paid 30 to get in while others pay 20. Three guys paid 80 to get in while the other 3 guys paid 100. Which is fine if it goes to the club because of the boys to girls ratio. I get it. But I asked who should I give the 20 to and the bouncers said to me. he pocketed 60 to his pocket. A minute later. 3 guys by themselves walked in behind us and paid 80 each to get in and they had no girls with them. Wtf!!!!!!! I asked to speak to their managers and they told me I do not have to get in. F that shit. These ppl are not professionals. If I would ve have paid for pre sale tickets. I would not be treated this way
Don the owner is friendly but his shop is pricey and the bicycle mechanic that worked on my bike is rude. Worked on it twice the idiot could not get it right so had to take to another shop and I will never return.
Very disappointed. Really liked dr Rosenberg but he told us we were cured and we felt it was just to get rid of us. 50 cp pay ans still suffering
Donuts look good but to me it was not that great . The lady at counter was nice and friendly . I got a bit of everything and the cronut was just not that great
Before everyone attacks me for giving this place a one star I ll have to mention that I ordered a salad b c i was full from drinking my yard dog from fat tuesdays . Food I ordered the caesar salad but it came with these weird croutons that had gunk all over them. I m sure it was edible but it just looked incredibly gross. Other than that the salad was a salad and satisfied my cravings for vegetables after an entire weekend of being starved from them. Appetizers BAD. We ordered nachos fried pickles and buffalo wings. The spicy buffalo wings were by far the worse. They were not so much spicy but just incredibly tangy. Trying to finish my one wing was like torture because everytime I tasted the sauce my face would have no control but to make a face from having eaten something very tangy sour. Fried Pickles were probably how they were supposed to be but just not my cup of tea. To describe them for you readers though it was warm and kind of mushy. I prefer my pickles crunchy and cold and I think that s how most people do too. On the bright side the fat fries which were basically potato wedges that my boyfriend ordered were crispy and actually really good. But he told me the burgers were just meh so I do not think I ll ever be back to give their burgers a chance.
If I could give this place 1 star I would. Some of the staff there are not comfortable with diversity who regularly frequent the bar. We decided to go here for wing night which if you know this place the service is extremely slow. We told our waitress we were going for a smoke to save our drinks and booth. The waitress decide to believe that we skip out on her after we told her this. She cleaned up our unfinished drinks and gave our booth away. After finishing our smoke we proceeded to return to our seat with was no longer available and the waitress loudly saying I thought you guys walked out. Well surprised we did not . As we watched many other customers leaving their seats to smoke without incident.The most uncalled thing she made up in her mind. Will not be returning unless this place gets rid of unprofessional staff!
Overhyped by yelpers. The pork tenderlion that was higly recommended by yelpers relied too much on the sauce which was too sweet once the sauce was gone I had no motive to finish the rest. And the spicy red sauce they used in most of their dishes tasted like Sriracha sauce straight from the supermarket. Service was decent and seating was cramped. Not recommended if you are bringing a date.
I remember loving their ramen the first time I tried it! But as I returned I realized that it was too thick and heavy to fully enjoy the whole bowl. The pork belly is very tender and delicious but I m all about the broth. The ramen is served with thin noodles which makes sense because with thick noodles it would be too much but its what Im looking for . Unfortunately Yokato Yokabai s ramen is not for me. Their pork on rice is to die for though! Overall if you like hearty ramens then this is the place for you. If you like a lighter clearer broth then you might want to try some other ramen restaurants.
I was a little disappointed with the decline in quality since the last time I visited this buffet about 7 yrs ago . I went solely for the king crab legs which were still partly frozen! The pasta dishes were pretty good as was the salmon poke. The Kobe sirloin roast was tough. The sushi was disgusting. I did not even try the Chinese food. The salad bar was decent. The desserts were a disappointment as I know it is one of their strengths yet the chef was not able to tell me which ones contained nuts since my wife is deathly allergic.
I am writing this review on behalf of my dog Momo. Both me and him cannot stand Milliken Park!! Why?? The small pond that loonies love to hang out attract all these birds and with that bring tons of poo!! Any small dogs with short legs and long hair are not good to walk in a park where almost everywhere covered in duck poo... When I got home I have to wash my runners since it is hard to avoid not to step on any!! I went there once and I never go back again!
The customer service in this place is awful. We waited for an hour and a half only to be told that they gave our table away. The manager did not offer an apology for the mistake and informed us that he could put us back on the list for another half an hour. He did not make any attempts to remedy for issue instead did not care if we were going to write a bad review about the restaurant. The place is extremely loud for any kind of outing with friends and expect an extremely long wait that you may not be able to get in.
STAY AWAY! Over priced products terrible customer service and an overall shady experience. A simple purchase turned into a nightmare! These guys WILL attempt to rip you off! 180 JOKE!
On July 4th I checked in to the Las Vegas Hilton garden Inn aourh Las Vegas boulevard after a10 hour drive. Upon check in I received two waters from the agent I was appreciative of his efforts and said thank you. I went up to my room to relax I went to the restroom and at the appropriate time noticed that the toilet paper was extremely low it had been used by the previous guest. Immediately I called the front desk to ask for two new rolls to be brought up. Five minutes went by ten minutes went by fifteen minutes went by and still toilet paper has not been delivered finally I walked down the hall to the maid to get the rolls myself. Which was very uncomfortable but I had no other choice. As a Hilton honors member and frequent guest for 40years of staying dining and traveling under the Hilton family of properties I was offended by not being provided a basic necessity for cleanliness. A guest should be provided with a fresh roll of toilet paper especially give the quality of a Hilton hotel. Remind you I still never received a call to apologize for the delay or received any rolls brought up to my room so my request completely ignored by your staff. That is unacceptable especially when I am spending nearly 200 night. Upon check out the agent ask me if I was satisfied with my stay I told her no and explained the circumstances of when I got to my room she offered me 50 off my stay which is coercion I told her that no that does not satisfy me I expect a full refund based on their satisfaction guarantee that they advertise throughout the property. She said okay and that she would take care of it. The next day I contacted the manager upon a salty greeting he said did you get my email ? I told him no I had been traveling but was calling to confirm if my refund had been processed correctly. He told me that he did it feel that used toilet paper warranted a refund and that the room was at standard. I could not believe what I was hearing. I replied sir that is unsanitary and for having hotel rooms especially in the Las Vegas area stocked with used toilet paper is unhealthy and in violation of heath codes. ordinance 1.54. . He basically did not care and said we will take care of your refund but never come back to this hotel we are not able to ever satisfy you! Totally inappropriate! AND RETALIATION ON HIS PART. I hung up the phone and checked my email to find the rudest letter I have ever received from a professional in the hospitality industry. The GM basically told me not to ever come back due to my previous stay 2years ago where they locked me out of my room on 3 different occasions same stay no excuse for poor service. I ve sent a letter to the CEO of Hilton and will be attending the annual stock holders meeting and will have 2minutes to say whatever I want.
Our last visit was unsavoury. Kumo s quality and service is on the decline. I am hopeful that they ll again climb back to the excellence I experienced in 2012 but until I see the reviews improve I wo not be back.
I love chicken.....I love chicken wingssss... In Southern California which is where I am from I usually have my top places to go for chicken and or wings so I never ended up going to Hooters. So while I was in town for the Arizona Ironman me and my buddies decided to try out the hooters in arizona. Yeah...you can see I was concerned about my protein intake before the race LOL...This is not the usual type of food people eat before an endurance event such as the Ironman but hey you only live once right? So we go up the stairs and get seated and we order our drinks and wings. The wings were kinda big and fatty. They were not very good...and all this time I heard that their wings are good...blah! This is the first place I saw the Miller Lime Beer though! Whats up with that.... I m sure it gets busy with college kids though since it s right by ASU. But the food was not so hot and umm the girls were average as well.
VIP wait to get in for a table is ridiculous go somewhere else this is a wast of time and the staff do not care no bottles of water or even conversations. Lame. Too much money for this stupid wait.
Been to this place numerous times last night would have to change my thoughts on this place. I used to really like this place because it has two of my favorite meals Korean BBQ and sushi. Their selection of sushi was never the greatest but it was enough to satisfy me along with Korean BBQ. I ordered 2 salmon hand rolls last night it was mainly rice like 90 and very small piece of salmon I am going to post a picture . If you re going advertise yourself as a place that has both at least put effort into making it a decent quality. If you do not then take sushi off your menu. Korean BBQ wise typical things. Please also needs to be more ventilated.
Poor service. Took 30 minutes to have our order taken and it was not crowded. When order came salad came after the entree. Took another 30 minutes to flag server down so we could leave.
It does not deliver the authentic taste of good crawfish..I spend 33.00 on two pounds. They were super tiny and it s crawfish season. I ordered the spiciest with two potatoes three corn and four sausage. The crawfish were drrrrry and had no flavor with no spice at all. The corn were decent. The potatoes were biilg gigantic rustic potatoes cut in half. I am use to the small red potatoes the seasoning soaks into those easily. The sausage were literally four cut small sausages that you had to search in the rubble for instead of whole sausage links. I will never return. I just got back from Houston so the taste is no comparison. I just wasted my money and time. Or go to Vegas. They do not serve liquor either..
What a joke. I just want to get a burger and a shake and because I have a service animal MARIA the hostess hassles me and has to call security on my 6lb Short Yorkshyre terrier service to have security come and inspect and have a wristband placed on my bag. I had to wait 10 minutes for a security guard to come was not a problem for earlier when I went to the movie theater when I walked around the casino but apparently at this restaurant they have some sort of issue I do not know. Surprisingly I stayed to try this place out. PERLA my server was friendly. One of the best shakes I ve had in my life and The food was decent but guess what I WILL NEVER EVER COME BACK ......
I purchased a transmission for a 2013 Ford Flex thru salesman Mike Spiller in May 2014. I had the transmission installed and it failed....come to find out they sent me the wrong transmission! I spent 450 in labor to have it installed and another 200 for programming for absolutely nothing! After speaking with the manager Veronica Draper She informed me that there was nothing they could do except replace the transmission and I PAY THE DIFFERENCE because the replacement transmission was 500 more dollars and that they would refund me HALF of my labor! After realizing I would get no where with Veronica Draper I agreed to pay the difference and accept a refund for half of the labor....well three weeks later I still have NO REFUND and NO TRANSMISSION!!!! the difference for which I have already payed been charged for for!!!! LKQ Phoenix VERONICA DRAPER MIKE SPILLLER and the whole operation seems to be a joke and complete ripoff...treating individuals as a joke because they make no profit of the individual! Stay away from LKQ....unless you want your car to sit for 6 months and be out thousands of dollars due to THEIR ERRORS! Considering filing suit for the damages transmission etc. feel free to contact me for info 928 242 9263
January 29th of this year I lost my full time part time job with Amazon working from home due to poor service. Not enough speed. Over charged for upgrade that was not applied until a week before I lost my job...1600.00 income a month gone. Called every month at least 3 to 4 times to resolve it from the time I signed up in April of last year and was lied to that everything was ok. From June 2017 to January 29th 2018 every day ISP issues. This is ridiculous. I am looking for a lawyer to sue Century Link for false advertisement and price gouging not to mention loss of employment. This sorry company could not allow the Employers data to stay uploaded long enough to take care of customers in a full 10 hour day without ISP issues...I am not going to stop until I get compensated for my losses. A one star rating is too much.
It is like visiting your friend who is aspiring to become a youtube foodie star but getting that aspiration side alone. Severely disappointing considering some of the previous reviews were out of this world 5 stars. Please enable a negative point systems to encourage a more authentic review. 1 star is quite considerate for this trying fast food joint. Our orders included the vegetarian biryani and butter chicken with saag aloo and rice The overall taste was beyond bland we wondered if they overworked the whole Canadianize bit. Would never return. Would never recommend. Giving it a 3 10 feels too generous.
So I have had it with the lousy software updates with each new rendition of iOS from 5 to 7 getting worse and worse as well as introducing new bugs that are not resolved. In total I have replaced my iPhone 4 once and my iPhone 4S TWICE all within a year of purchase. Usually its some sort of battery charging issue it goes like this the phone gets REALLY HOT the day before the battery fails and very soon after that it no longer holds a charge. It may stay at one percent maybe it drops from 100 down to 0 in two hours or less. All THREE of the 4 Series iPhones did this to me. And it usually happens right after a hotfix patch. In particular I have had a bad experience with THIS Apple Store. In my final iPhone 4S fiasco I went back to the Apple Store to get it replaced because its still within the range of one year since purchase. Everything went smoothly supposedly. Then on my way out with my refurbished replacement model I was immediately stopped by two of the male Mac geniuses that sort of look alike they refer each other as Clark Kents as some sort of inside joke . They told me to follow them back to the Genius Bar only for me to realize that apparently I am accused as a thief as they sternly questioned me about Where was the old iPhone? . Only then did the stocky blonde girl the Concierge managed to show them that she had it AFTER I started YELLING at the staff that the blonde girl has it . She FUCKING LOST THE OLD IPHONE that I gave to her in exchange for the replacement! If I had not made the Geniuses drag her ass back out of the break room in the back I probably would have been arrested for a false felony grand larceny charge. And then it got worse on my embittered way out of the store NEW replacement phone in hand the Geniuses actually followed my ass out profusely saying fake apologies. I no longer am one of those Apple fans. There is no amount of empty Sorry s and fake smiles that can draw me back. Here is another story of a different Las Vegas Apple Store experience. My MacBook Pro which I bought 3 years ago is in need of a battery replacement according to the diagnostic tools that its been warning me with. But given how I was treated at this store and the Town Square Location they aided a thief who stole this very MacBook in reformatting and deleting the Undercover Mac software before selling it to a pawn shop and I had to call Metro s Property Crimes Division to use the personal information I acquired through screenshots by Undercover to get it back I refuse to purchase or request services or support from any Apple Retailer. In fact I even wrote a negative Yelp review of the Town Square location upon discovery of my stolen MacBook through Wifi Router GPS screenshots a few years ago. I was complimented by many other Yelpers for my slick detective work before it was mysteriously deleted months later by Yelp. I included screenshots of a thin caucasian male Apple employee that was reformatting my formerly stolen Mac this evidence was also taken by my Undercover Mac software. I am considerable getting some sort of Android device as replacement. I realized I should have snapped much earlier but my older brother is some sort of die hard Apple fan that really does not want to let Steve Job s dream go. I however am very willing to burn bridges. Especially built by those who turn on not just me but their crazed consumers. You can Google it there was a lawyer who sued a Apple Store search for Michael Deverett from Toronto over a plethora of stolen Apple products. He won surprisingly. Right now I am digging around my laptop to see if I can find those old screenshot photos I have that implicated the Town Square location. But instead of submitting THAT along with photos on Yelp which would surely be deleted I am going to put it up on Google Maps. Update Found some of the implicating evidence for the stolen laptop incident years ago at Town Square. However I remembered that it was not all the screenshots. It may be in my external HDD back at home i ll check again when I get back. Note If these reviews get deleted I am merely going to repost backups onto Google Maps instead.
DANGER! DO NOT MOVE IN HERE! GUNSHOTS PEOPLE CASING OUR HOME TO ROB IT DRUG DEALERS AND CORRUPT MANAGEMENT SECURITY! I have heard gunshots here over 5 times and personally saw someone point a pistol out the window of their car and fire a round off at a building 20 feet from me. We saw a bunch of small children ganging up on another kid and having a fight club while adults WATCHED. We had roaches for months and had to pull teeth to get them to fix all of the many problems with our apartment that were supposed to be fixed before move in. This place is absolute DUNG HEAP and very dangerous. You and your family will regret moving here so do not even bother looking. There are plenty nice second chance places right down the street. Or better yet you could go stay at a budget suites in the heart of the ghetto and get the same quality and safety problems.
So I drove my Volvo to vegas last May and when I got there my battery died at the restaurant. So I saw this shop by it at first they were helpful to jump start my car but the battery needed to be replaced since it wo not charge. My car is 11 years old but only has 30k miles and was pampered and maintained by volvo dealers only. Now these guys were saying oh it s my alternator that it needs to be replaced and something was wrong with my starter. In our heads we were thinking no f ing way that could happen and we know how to work on cars too. We told them just to change the battery. Now all of a sudden they said they do not sell batteries and bullshit saying good luck making it way back to LA. Anyway to make this story short we got a battery and 3 months later my car is still running. Locals and visitors beware if you need your car serviced do not listen to this shops bullshit. To try and make you spend hundreds of dollars on things that is not even broken in your car.
The car was nice but reeked of cigarette smoke. Was nauseating. I tried to call customer service but their hours were only certain hours central time and not on the weekends. When I returned the car I asked to speak to a manager to let them know and if they would see fit to give me a discount. I was super nice about it which I believe was my downfall. The manager thanked me for letting her know then disappeared never to be seen again. I went on to Sarasota to have an equally bad experience...dirty car. Very dirty. Needless to say we are done with Hertz.
I m 48 and it was not until I went to Sunstone that I suddenly found out I needed braces. And I needed them right then and there. In fact if I did not get braces my skull was going to cave in and I d wind up looking like Roger Ebert. Luckily the braces would only cost me 5 000. Oh and then there was another procedure that had to be done that was just 2 000. What good fortune brought me in to see the Doctors Welch just in the nick of time? It had been three months since my last cleaning at my old dentist. Despite the pressure from the front desk to sign the forms approving the 7 000 in purchases ... excuse me I mean medical treatments I said no. When I got home I looked up their website and saw a nice big Invisalign braces logo.
I bought a Groupon for here a year or so ago on two separate occasions for the same apartment. The first time I took off work early to meet them and after waiting an hour after my appointment window I called and was told I was not on the schedule but they would get out the next day and they did. A guy came out the next day said they would do their standard cleaning for the Groupon price but had a couple suggestions for upsells one being a deep cleaning for an additional charge. I agreed to the deep cleaning for a certain area and also asked about cleaning my ultrasuede three seater couch. He quoted me around 200 and stated I would have to pay cash since the ticket was already filled out which seemed fishy to me. I declined that service. I was relatively happy with this visit though surprised how quick they finished less than 30 min and had spent an extra 40 over the Groupon which was fine by me. The second time everything with the scheduling was fine no issues there. The tech though used a different machine than the previous. He used a machine that appeared to be what you would use to clean buff tile. There did not seem to be any vacuuming or suction of any kind. He did spray the carpeting down first but it was left more damp than the previous visit and while it looked clean any dark spots came back within a couple days. I had also asked about deep cleaning and was told a much different price over the phone than I was in person. They just seemed shady all around and I would not use this company again.
I ll give them credit for reaching out after the review and offering a second chance on them. So here is the second chance review They changed their advertising on the Giant salad bar which I did not expect and a nice gesture to those who are vegetarian. This time it was a Sunday brunch the omelet bar was nice but items for the omelet could have been displayed as the cook seemed a bit bothered to tell them to me since I could not see them all behind the glass. Food taste was better and deserts were good. Table service was also better. Restaurant was still a bit dark and obviously they are not going to update the interior anytime soon. Janitor used way too many chemicals in the bathroom that you could smell down the hall. In all it s not my top choice I may revisit but probably not.
My brother just bought a cheese pizza right before closing time and our pizza was terrible hardly any cheese on the pizza! We called to complain and Ryan the lead manager did not care at all!! What poor management and food!! Little Caesars would of done a better job!!! You have lost my business and family and friends.
As a bar Monkey Pants seems to want it both ways. They have a 1 00am shirtless shot routine that makes the place feel like an annoying college bar. At the same time the atmosphere is decidedly low key especially considering the wacky and outrageous name. I ve been there on a few Friday nights and each time could count on one hand the number of patrons. If nobody is going there it must not just be me. Maybe it s better during lunchtime... Time Out Lounge is in the same strip mall. I d recommend drinking there instead.
I would highly advise staying away from this facility. We came here for a demo day to try the new M1 driver and left extremely disappointed. The employees that were working the club station were extremely rude and were not willing to help unless you were planning on making a purchase. Asking them questions seemed like it was to much of a hassle for them to give you an answer. Customer service is no where to be found here. All I can say is I will never return to this place strictly because of the employees and the awful attitudes they have here. This experience here makes my choice to switch to Titleist an even easier one.
To whom it may concern Stopped in to South Hills Lincoln at 10 o clock on a rainy Monday morning. I walked in with my checkbook in hand ready to buy a Lincoln Continental. As I walked in the door the salesman met me with an extremely poor attitude. I was asking various questions about the continental the difference in the packages. I was trying to explain that the website did not explain much of a difference in packages and could he explain it to me once again no avail. He kept saying the cars range from 40 grand to 80 grand what do you want ?At one point I told him I wanted to test drive the continental to compare it to the MKZ. When I aasked him what the difference in the ride was or if there was a difference he just looked at me and told me they are totally different and never gave me an explanation. We got to the point where I told him I felt like I was pulling teeth and he looked at me and said I feel like I m pulling teeth with you. At that point I walked out. Too bad I will just buy the car elsewhere. I am a local business man who owns operates and started a business 17 years ago it is a multi million dollar company and is still growing through quality and great service at a double digit rate. I walked in unassuming and was treated that way. Good luck if you go to South Hills Lincoln.
Backtracking a bit because this was a memorable visit. I was here to watch the NBA finals. We like to frequent this Jack Astors because of their TVs a swell view by the bar see picture . Unfortunately on this particular night the service was very slow. It was very difficult to waive down a server and then it took over 45 minutes to receive our orders. When we finally received our drinks they were flat and warm. My friend even said hers tasted watered down.
I have no problem paying extra money for a new condition if you provide a great service so we ended up buying two ac units. First they cam out and left the entire attic a disaster and left a bunch of empty bottle and sparkle containers. Then they destroyed my pigeon net and told me nothing about it. I call the net guy just to come by and check it out see said it was destroyed and the poles became bent. after that we had to do a warranty call on them in the first month and they told be a override switch was burnt out and they had to order it. After me waiting 2 weeks for a part to arrive no one called me back. I then called them back about it and no one had any idea about it and never had a part on order and told me they would call me back after they figured it all out no response. Then i called back a week later and still no one has any idea about the whole situation now they are going to send another tech out to see what the deal is. I am so glad i spent all this money on two acs and once they got the installed them they are the worst customer service and only want money. I would never recommend them to any one and it is a complete disgrace how this company works. There are a lot more issues i can add onto this review but those are the main ones. if you are in the market for an ac go somewhere else they are not worth the price they are getting and the customer service is crap.
Ghetto...Ghetto... Staff is ok...The place is clean but the guests and the area are Friggin GHETTO!!!! DO NOT RISK BEING A VICTIM!!!
Dirty. I went to the restroom prior to ordering and there was a giant cock roach. After which I lost my appetite. This establishment is a hard pass for me.
I have stayed at this hotel multiple times and enjoyed it before but this time around I was very disappointed. We got there the room was clean but it did not have a blanket on the bed I called a total of 3 times to get one and finally I received one the next day in the afternoon. There was a cup on the patio with cigarette butts and liquid in it they did not pick up until next day. The air conditioning unit worked half of the time. There wAs not any conditioner in the room and we called room service and Addiction was closed for the day because of a special event which I was bummed about because their food is good. So overall experience was not good this time around but in the past I was very happy there.
How did this place get 4 star rating? I believe it s the local family and friends. True Yelpers will rate this between a 1 2 at the max. Went there on a instinct while I was driving through Markham and saw some good reviews and hey it s chicken right? Anyhow the chicken ended being below quality the grilling I liked... but no flavour at all. Nothing. So added more sauce and meh.the potatoes were a joke I tossed it. And rice was ok . Definitely not going here for Portuguese chicken...
The rudest experience ever!!! First n last time coming here nothing special at all 7 bucks for a slice of pizza that s so thin and bland!!! Take your money else where the cashier with braids needs to go she is so rude and clearly does not know what customer service is if your having personal issues leave that home she was the most bitter cashier I ve ever encountered very very unfriendly rude and rushed me and my bf never again
Disappointing meal and service. Came here for dinner last night for dinner with my husband. We ve been here previously and were extremely satisfied. My husband had calamari fritti for appetizer wine the squid ink spaghetti with seafood and I had the pappardelle lamb ragu which to my shock and amazement came with a little extra. As I bit into the first forkful I cut my tongue on a piece of hard plastic. Upon discovering the foreign object in my meal my husband called the waiter over who offered to refire the dish. At this point I had already lost my appetite. To add further insult to injury the manager came over to apologize and let us know they would not be charging us for my dish...I most certainly hope not. Needless to say we were extremely disappointed. The least they could have done was offer a complimentary dessert for their negligence or another dish in its place.
I ordered a pizza fries gyro and soda for delivery. It was over an hour later than anticipated. I had confirmed with the restaurant to meet the drive at main valet at the Aria. When the driver finally text I went to main valet immediately. The driver was nearly incomprehensible. He was making snorting sounds and was very confused. He said he got 7 11 cookies to make up for the delay. He also joked that it was cheaper to deliver food than drugs because he could not go to jail. When he finally found main valet he appeared to be high out of his mind. His car was dirty and littered with other orders. My food was lukewarm at best and covered in condensation.
Lunch menu is tasteless and borderline plastic specifically the salad with char and orecchiette with chorizo. Having travelled the world and a foodie myself I have high standards and always love trying out new places. Sorry folks at Racines but the lunch menu needs work.
Ok Pizza but not on my top list. I like that it s not a chain and privately owned. I ll never go back strictly because they do not take credit cards. This is 2016 how can you not take credit or debit cards? I have not carried cash in my wallet for 10 years. They re missing so much business for being a cash only place.
I m giving this a 2.5 star as it averaged out my two experiences. 4 stars for their crepes. I especially love savoury crepes and their chicken crepe with mushrooms and cheese hit the spot. However the cakes I had yesterday coffee flavoured and crme brle was awful. Okay the coffee one was decent when comparing it to crme brle. It was a mousse with a cake centre and the coffee flavour was there. The crme brle however was like a 1 5. That one point was for it looking pretty. Let me tell you what was wrong crme brle is called brle because your supposed to torch the top sugar layer which does not appear to be done. There was no burnt sugar layer or even a hard layer indicating that sugar was even melted. And the crme part tasted exactly like those egg tarts from Asian bakeries. It was so eggy I had a hard time swallowing it. Crme brle is my favourite dessert and this one missed it by a long shot.
Very gross apartments. Many cockroaches EVERYWHERE. I have reported to the management team for MONTHS about a cockroach problem abd NOTHING was ever done! NOTHING. Broken glass from an apartment window was left on the walkway to the pool not cleaned I cut my foot on it one day. When I went to report it they said they would get to cleaning but then they never did! For weeks! Just clean the glass up it is dangerous. Kids live here! It seems this management team does not care about the safety or cleanliness of their complex and could care less about their residents.
I have traded at this store often and here are my observations first off I m a carnivore and the meat quality at Safeway is not great they supposedly have upgraded from select to choice cut of meat but I m not buying it just had a ribeye and its was tough and chewy Safeway is not the place to buy steak try whole foods AJ s or hobie meats yes it s more money but it is WORTH IT. beer selection here Sucks if u want coors light ur good otherwise move on. Grab and go selection of foods are typical. You will always wait to check out and brands are very limited. Safeway is a monster size company and they have a one size fits all philosophy. This specific store is not manage well and falls below even other Safeway I have shopped at. It s too bad but it is what it is.
Disappointing small Margarita dirty glass and hair on the chicken enchilada plate. Small portions for the price. I ve been to other Z Tejas and it s been fine. Not sure what s up with this location. The manager did come over and replace both entrees on the table. Gave a 10.00 discount on a 54.00 bill. Do not know if we will come back to this location.
As far as BJJ goes you will only get your moneys worth if you are already very advanced as the beginner class lessons are delegated to being taught by a blue belt while the head coach lays on the couch not engaged in any way. If you are looking for a BJJ gym look elsewhere ESPECIALLY if you are a beginner this one is a money grab.
Overall decent hotel but marred but the problems on the first day hence the rating. 2nd time I ve stayed at the Hotel stayed once at Mandalay Bay both a couple years ago guess quality has slipped since then. Stayed at various hotels in Vegas approx 50 different stays. I would recommend instead the Venetian or the Palms Place Suites if you still want the larger room but much much better service. Wo not be getting my money anymore. First we booked online with an all day buffet included. Find out when we try to check in around 3 00 the buffet package was not in there system. Best they could do after arguing was a 40 credit for the buffet which I learned later was only for one day. This took about 1 2 hour since the line was long and the issue with the buffet. Later I had to visit the front about the buffet and after more arguing best they could do now was one more day of a 40 credit. Not happy with having to deal with that mess especially since they going to make it up on all the money we lose gambling to them. Guess they want us to go eat somewhere else and gamble somewhere else too. So back to check in. Told room was not ready and we would get a call when the room was ready. Past 4 00 and we still had not heard. Did not want to get into the registration line which was now about 50 people deep so called the front. Put on hold for 20 minutes and finally our room ready. Got up to our room keys did not work. Yet another call and told security would let us in. Yet another long wait 10 15 mins before security finally got up there and let us in. BTW noticed will in the hallway it smelled of marijuana coming from one of the nearby rooms. Security just shrugged his shoulder and moved on. Smelled on and off like marijuana for 2 days. Room itself was nice. Noticed immediately one bathroom smelled of cigarettes. Saw the vent was plugged with toliet paper. Ca not see how housekeeping could miss that which brings up questions of how well they clean the room. Saw more signs of dirtiness when I dropped some change underneath the couch. A small forest of debris of food and other junk underneath there. Ate at the buffet twice once for breakfast and lunch. Kind of glad only got credit for 2 meals. The buffet is mediocre at best. The food quality is poor the prime rib was stringy and chewy and how can you not have sourdough bread for breakfast. Ate at the Burger Bar which is excellent. Otherwise we went off property to eat and sometimes gamble. Pool was great. Staff there was good whistled some morons who were dropping their ashes in the water they were on the ball. Annoying to see chairs with towels on them for hours on end with nobody coming out to sit on them. Went to the Shark Reef about 30 minutes of stuff to see. A bit over priced but they do have some decent exhibits. Final review going stay at the Venetian next time. Instead of trying to keep us as customers The Hotel tried to nickel and dime us. If we d booked near or on that day we would of gotten a cheaper rate 200 less with a better buffet package. Instead the staff screwed us over and would not cut us a break even though it would of cost them next to nothing. Poor decision.
The idea behind this venue is fantastic. An opportunity for local bands and even some outsiders to play music to a small crowd is a great thing to have. I went to see Breckenwood and Time and Distance along with a couple other bands. Everyone was great and the show was a blast. The issue came right at what I thought was the end of the night. The headliners just finished so we were heading to the front door when we were stopped by a guy who was clearly intoxicated and had been causing issues earlier. He told us we could not leave because there was another band playing. He proceeded to insult us in some very creative ways but after a couple minutes eventually let us out. Thanks buddy. He ended with a passionate farewell reminder to eat a d ick. All of this happened at the front door where I m assuming an employee of some sort would have been standing. It was really hard to tell if anyone was actually working there beside the sound guy. All that was the long way of saying that the kind of crowd they re cool with having in there and lack of concern for the enjoyment of customers really can make this place an unpleasant experience. Unless they change I probably wo not go back.
I had high hopes for this place but what I got was pretty subpar barely Mexican fare. Most of the food tasted like it had come out of a can the black beans in particular and the rice was completely overcooked and mushy was it microwaved? It would not surprise me . C mon guys start with decent ingredients and make some good food. Your location and decor are nice and you have a great tequila selection but you are competing with some honest to god good Mexican joints in town Maize and El Charro in particular who have better food fresher ingredients!!! at a fraction of the price.
I decided to give a new nail place a chance since it s closer to my job and I decided to go to pinky nails and spa since it s new everything was so beautiful and nicely organized but the job was bad I was so disappointed not only did it take the guy almost 2 hrs but my nails were left so thick I had to tell the guy working on my nails at least twice to make them thinner I got short acrylic nails and when he brought my bill it was 50 dollars I do not mind paying that much but I could not believe it not worth it for the job i got I loved the staff and the place so much I wish my experience could of been better.
Rude staff! Never going back I contacted the CEO waiting for a call back!!!!!!!!!!!!!! But never again. They really need to check the bartender and hostess. They are classless on how they choose to articulate themselves to paying customers.
Staff name is Blanca. Very bad customer service. I used to stop by that place couple times already. This is the last time to go that place. I asked for ten pieces of chicken drumsticks. Just say how much is that.Staff act like shit. Management need to talk with that staff. Very bad customer service. If she still working there I will not go again.
They say they change the part the changing with old part and wrong part please save your car save your money and do not come to this place thanks
Came for lunch the other day and food and service were great....today...totally opposite. Server was slow seemed like she was irritated. Food took forever even though we told her we only had an hour. Experience was awful.
My experience at Ace was not great. The associate that helped me kept trying to upgrade the vehicle after I told him multiple times no thank you I would like to stick with the original car I reserved . I m assuming that bothered him because at that point he started throwing in all these fees I had to pay. The email I received said I would pay 84.67 at the counter according to him that was not correct and I had to pay 284.67! I was not the only one in there that had the same issue. I walked out! Do not rent from this company! The shuttle drive was awesome though!
Horrible food. Cream was sour. Fried plantains were soaked in wells of oil. Forks and spoons were available only upon request. Tables were never cleaned. Spicy sauce tasted like fire. Hot chocolate tasted like sugar syrup. Arepas were so hard that my mouth hurt. Overall disappointed .
Our family rented jet ski s from Full Throttle Powersports. They required a 300 deposit per jet ski...2 jet skis 600. Not a problem. When we picked up the jet skis they were completely unorganized. The office is a mess ca not find reservations wrong contracts printed. As they pulled the equipment around for us we noticed the equipment was very old. One unit had 475 hours and they other had over 600 hours. Maybe 2008 models. They were beat up dented and scratched everywhere. At that point they pulled out their video camera and took a recording of the jet skis. In the shape they were in.....really? They treated you like you were going to steal the piece of crap. At the lake we luckily had no problem. We returned them on time and we were good to go. We were told our 600 deposit would be returned within 48 hours. After a week went by we began to call. They would promise our deposit would be returned. Always within 48 hours. Finally after calling several times and unanswered calls our deposit was returned 2 1 2 weeks later. They need be more organized new equipment and keep track of their returns of deposits. We will not return.
I just cannot like this place. Or maybe I should just say Pho in general. I have tried. Honestly I have. And if I have tried at any place it is certainly this location. The decor is plain. Some carpeting and a standard counter with plenty of table space for groups. The menu photos are bleak. And the soup is basically water and noodles with vegetables and whatever else you tell them to throw in there for the price. I have had friend after friend drag me in to this place and tell me that Pho would change my life. Sadly however it did not. It was simply Pho. And I was unsatisfied. The location is convenient for UNLV students being located right by campus. The prices were reasonable for water soup in a bowl. But try as I might and no matter how many spices I tried to throw in it to flare it it was still just runny watery soup. If you like Pho and you do not mind simple decor and okay service you will probably enjoy this place. But if you re never ventured towards the land of Vietnamese soups and you re wondering you can probably pass.
Very friendly totally incompetent staff. Imagine getting your dog spayed and being given the wrong medications to take home scheduling an appointment to see the doctor only to have the front desk tell you that you and your vet set up the wrong kind of appointment front desk trying to force you to schedule appointments to Meet and Greet doctors before they actually see your pet calling from the groomer to validate the date of the second rabies vaccination and being told that your dog has never had the shots even though you are holding the signed paperwork. I could go on and on. It may be cheaper but is simply not safe.
Huge store and only 4 small racks of men s clothes most of which are for 10 15 year olds . I like TJ Maxx but this store is a waste of time if your looking for men s clothing.
It s over priced for what you get I agree with the other reviews for sure. I did like the second floor area to sit though
Zero stars! Absolutely horrendous food. My husband and I got in early for a business event and our room was not ready so we thought to try the Buffet. We paid 73 for the Sunday Brunch and we were only able to eat some of the pastries and fruits. Rest of the food either just looked undesirable to eat had a strange smell or just did not taste good. I do not expect the highest quality but I do expect good quality especially at the BELLAGIO! Also the pictures on Yelp DO NOT match this place. It s a joke! Coffee cups smelled and had stains Asked for a small latte was an extra charge...ARE YOU KIDDING ME. I just paid 36 and you ca not offer a small latte?! Omelette station safe option but long lines to order. You can get an omelette at the holiday inn too. French Toast dry and too eggy. No flavor Beef Ribs outside burned inside raw. It was also chewy instead of soft. Mussels the moment I put it in my mouth I knew if I swallow this I m gonna get sick for the next two days that s how bad the fish smells was. I ve never spit out food this was the first! The place is just overrated! But if you want large quantity of food then by all means go and waste your money. Otherwise if you love your body and your tastebuds you can get amazing food and service at a lot of different places in Vegas for the same price.
B O R I N G full of people trying way too hard to be hip. Not my scene at all. Seriously overrated. Wedding we attended was fun the distillery district itself did nothing for me. I am not sure what kind of vibe if any exists in this dull location.
I mean it s fast food so I do not expect perfection. The wait time is ridiculous. From the time I pulled in to place my order until I pulled out with food was 20 minutes. The guy did not punch my order in when I placed it and had to enter it when I reached the window to pay. This meant I had to wait while they prepared it after waiting an eternity already. The food itself was mediocre but it is not gourmet ever so that s not such a big deal. Even so 10 seems steep for two tacos a quesadilla and a drink with a huge side of spending your life waiting. I wo not be back to this location. Life is too short.
Took 50 minutes for 3 street style tacos. Nuff said. Does not matter what things taste like when my mouth is bitter from impatience. Maybe warn gringos that their food will take a lot longer?
I stay at a lot of motels and the plaza casino is a rundown stinky crappy place to stay for the money you pay you can stay at South Point or other casinos. I would highly recommend doing some shopping around before I stayed at the plaza.
I will not be back I have way better than this at hole in the wall places closer go home. Save yourself and go elsewhere.
This place is always a mess for as busy as this location is I typically only see 2 people working. It s probably faster to go to a sit down place. The people are friendly though.
We went there for the Sunday brunch. We got there at about 1230. And there was already no desserts available that are supposed to come with the brunch. There were cold pancakes cold eggs and over cooked sausage. Our waitress checked on us one time. Worst brunch ever. I do not suggest going here
Let me start by saying I m a big fan of Sammy Hagar. But just like Jimmy Buffet he needs to leave the restaurant business up to the food experts. The burger sounded good bacon guacamole cheese fried onions. But it literally had no taste. And the fries were probably the worst I ve ever had. They were very hard and crunchy with no taste. To top it off it cost 14. Do yourself a favor go there for drinks but do not waste your money time or calories on the food. Come on Red Rocker you should have better standards. I had High Hopes but was let down.
Based on my recent experience Warning..... Do not do not do kitchen granite counter tops through Home Depot. They did incorrect measurements wrong cuts and installed defective cracked granite. They do not stand behind their product or installations as they claim. They were unethical and deceptive to me. I am in shock over the poor customer service levels. I will never do business with them on any level ever again. Very disappointed as one would think Home Depot would be a go to place.
Based on later dining experiences I have to rate this place a 1 Star. This is the only restaurant I ve been to that gives your food to the others at the table without asking
We came here for a quick bite and the especially feminine male cashier forgot our curly fries like three times. He was like Omigawwwd I totally forgoooot. Then five minutes later he screamed and jumped away from the frier Omigawwwd I m like so scared it s gonna burn me! It took literally fifteen minutes from when we ordered our food to get our stupid plastic trays full of crap. I thought this joint was supposed to have fast food. We sat in the dining room which might have been our first mistake. Oh well. Also our tacos had way too much lettuce and not enough meat. Boo Jack in the Box.
Seriously. I have been on hold trying to schedule an appt. for over 33 minutes now. I ve simultaneously been trying to book online and their system is so un user friendly that I ca not get a confirmed appointment. I ve now tried 3 different location phone s only to be sent to voicemail on hold each time for over 30 minutes. I finally called a billing number to confirm that my insurance will pay for my procedure and guess where they transferred me to . . . you guessed it scheduling. I m right back where I started. Come on. This is ridiculous.
After 2 years you d think that a place might improve a bit...alas it did not. The service on our recent visit was S L O W. And by slow I mean that I suspect that the kitchen was still plucking the feathers off the chicken when I ordered by kebabs. Our server had suggested that the schwarma would take at least 30 minutes to prepare and in retrospect I should have ordered it anyway based on the length of time it took for our order to arrive. And it was NOT busy. Drinks again were left bone dry. I tried the yogurt soda which was DISGUSTING. Skip it. The food was just meh and the service was yet again lackluster at best. I will not be back to Haji Baba. 2 chances and between the meh food and the lackluster service I just ca not see giving more of my time or effort to a place that does not seem to want to put in time or effort.
if i could give 5 stars i would. these people must really fucking hate doing business as they are consistently closed during their own business hours. this has happened many many many times. either update your hours or stay open as advertised.
Absolute WORST service of any medical provider in Charlotte. Had an appointment and ended up not even seeing the so called doctor after waiting almost 2 hours!!! Nobody even came in to check on me or tell me what was going on...I had to keep wandering out of the exam room to find people to ask what was going on. Office manager is useless and the could care less about any patient at all. Stay away!!!
Too expensive. Do not ever get on their call list because they ll call you about once a week trying to sell you something expensive like always. Good stuff but not worth the price.
I ate here a few months ago and watched it on the food newtwork.I just want to say that for me it was not all that.the portions were big yet had no flavors ..very generic. I prefer bagel cafe .I have no clue why they made a big deal out if it o. The food network. I do not think I ll be coming back here again
I have had the worst hair experience in my life at this salon. I had a wedding to attend the day after my hair appointment. My goal was to receive a deep condition and a blow dry and curl. The stylist suggested that I should get a trim. I agreed. But as I sat in the chair I noticed that she began to cut and cut and cut. I asked her what she was doing and she stated that she was cutting for volume. Before I knew it five inches of my hair was gone. My hair looked horrible for the wedding. At one point I had to find chopsticks in an attempt to try to pull my hair up. I was so embarrassed. I spoke to the manager who was unwilling to provide a suitable remedy. The receptionist and the stylist were extremely rude. I have always had bra strap length hair and it will take at least a year and a half to grow back.
In Calgary as in Montreal the pizza joints are run by Greeks not Italians. Ottawa fares better despite a shortage of actual paesanos they are served by the Lebanese still not as good as real Italian style but a bit closer.. Howie s is typical heavy dense crusts over sweet oddly spiced sauce edible but far less than excellent. And as is typical in Calgary expensive. Why do take out joints here think they can charge as much as sit down service restaurants?
It was my first time here. I ordered two cheese enchiladas and soft chicken taco it was too salty and greasy. Lemonade was delicious but personally would not be ordering enchiladas again. Overall nice interior and they do play nice music and staff is friendly.
When Jamie pharmacy manager went on maternity leave last fall I had a bad feeling things were gonna go wrong here. And they did....to the point Jamie ended up quitting shortly after returning from leave and the pharmacy techs quit also!! Mona. Mona Mona Mona. How I loathe thee. From September to January you screwed up my prescriptions AND screwed with my insurance by NOT paying attention to written prescriptions I gave to you. Personally. My schedule 3s....you IGNORED and did not fill leaving yourself to scramble on a Saturday to fill them when you had a week to verify it. During that week you ignored my script my health plan reset meaning instead of paying 00 for my scripts I had to pay full price bc my deductible had not been met. All you said was Sorry. I had foot surgery in September. I stood at the window with my foot in a boot and crutches and you had the nerve to ask my doctor why she wrote me for 2 schedule 3s and then asked which foot did I have surgery on. Not only are you a blind idiot....you re stupid thinking YOU can violate HIPAA and then get bitchy with my doc when they refuse to violate HIPAA. You re a pharmacist not my doctor. It s none of your business why I am written for a schedule 3 or for any other drug. Now that Jamie is gone and Mona is in charge....I fired this location and transferred my stuff to Vons. I got 75 in Vons gift cards to do it too. Update 5 2017 Well....nice to see Mark back. Unfortunately this pharmacy is no longer the top notch place it once was. The turn over here is unbelievable. Sorry pharmacy peeps...my script should be filled immediately if I am waiting not put at the bottom of the stack behind those who are not expecting to pick up for several hours. These people have no common sense and little if any service abilities.
They say they close at 10 00 pm. We a group of 4 went there at 9 23 pm yesterday and we were told the kitchen is already closed even for take out too. Went to a nearby Indian restaurant and had an awesome food there.
Flavor was ok. There was not a wide selection of food to choose from. As we were walking out we noticed that tables closer to the exit had more variety of food on their tables. Maybe the food offerings depend on where you sit. Trip advisory has 4 out of 5 stars if that s the best they have then it s not very good.
I have never been so appalled walking into a high end store. Walking into Burberry I expected to be greeted or at least acknowledged by one of the sales representatives. However I did not get one hello or even a head nod. Mind you there were plenty of workers just standing around especially behind the register just chatting with one another. I continued to walk around the store and noticed that the employees that were actually on the floor were only helping out customers who were of Asian decent. Unfortunately I am not of Asian decent. I finally chose a purse that I wanted to purchase and proceeded to wait in line. I was the only one in line at the time and two employees were checking out two customers who of course were Asian. Mind you there were still a few employees that were standing behind the register chatting and not even bothering to ring me up. Once one employee finished up with their transaction they looked at me and turned their back and decided to join the other employees in their conversation. Then once the final employee finished up their transaction they too turned around and joined in on the conversation. Standing there dumbfounded with this item in my hand wanting to purchase it my blood was already boiling. Thankfully Keith Gonzales saw that I had been standing there for a while a little irritated and asked if anyone had helped me. He then rang me up and continuously apologized for the inconvenience. It seems to me that the only type of customer this Burberry location bends backwards for is those customers who are of Asian decent. I noticed anytime a family walked in they were politely approached and greeted whereas the minute i walked in no one looked my way. Being a manager at a retail store I can tell when an employee truly cares about the customer versus an employee who only wants to make the commission. Keith Gonzales truly cares about the customer and I thank him for being the only employee to have made my experience less tragic at least towards the end. A brand with this stature should not have employees who fail to present proper customer service. I expected a lot more from Burberry.
So disappointed with this place after seeing it was a 4.5 star joint and I seldom make it out to the beautiful section of Northeast Vegas cough . We walked in and 90 of the customers were Mexican...usually a good sign and that s when it all went downhill... We ordered Corundas Tarascas 13.99 and Bracerito a La Meseta Tarasca For Two 38.99 and here s what went wrong THE WAIT Waited almost 90 minutes for our food. Even the waiter said You guys have not gotten your food yet??!! When he saw our drowning looks after an hour and fifteen minutes...and we were close to just leaving. DISH UNO The corundas tarascas was supposed to have pieces of pork I counted 4 small pieces in the sauce. 14 for some corn bread in a red sauce...no bueno. DISH DOS The Meseta Tarasca for two...I ve had these type of mixed paradilla or whatever each restaurant likes to name them plates before many times and I m familiar with how they re grilled and how they come out...it s like fajitas for two with a shitload more meat hence 40 tag . The entire dish was completely burned and overcooked embarrassing to even bring to a table. The steak was beyond well done..gray and tough destroyed. The chorizo was black and dried out inedible. The pounded chicken breast was so overcooked and tough I could not cut through it with a regular table knife. The beef ribs were both burnt to black...and the sauce that comes out on top of the dish that many yelpers took photos of and is on their website was non existent. ACCOUNTABILITY The waiter saw we were not too happy and apologized and said he d bring the manager over. I guess he knew he served up a plate of embarrassment because I did not even ask to speak to anyone would not want them to replace the burnt food anyway because who knows how that really goes but an older woman comes over and I said We waited an hour and a half for our meal and look it s completely burnt. Her response Yes ok. with a smile...and that was that. THE SERVICE Had a guy and a girl serving us...very friendly but totally incompetent. We were asked if we wanted corn or flour tortillas. We said flour...we got neither...20 minutes after the food arrived I had to ask for them. Also the mixed meat dish was supposed to come with a skillet of melted Mexican cheese as is shown on the menu on their website and is on all the yelp pics. When I asked for the cheese the waitress said it does not come with cheese. I then had to point it out to her on the menu that it does in fact come with the melted cheese ... oh ok I ll get that for you. This was 30 minutes after the food had already arrived and I was just wanting to bounce...maybe she did not want the extra work of grabbing what I paid for or it was her first day of work...I ll go with the first.
Normally I like this place but today it was not as good. Numerous items had acumalated water in the buttom of their containers which left you with watered down salad dressing and leaving your plate with water at the bottom.
Extremely disappointed this morning. Asked for two steak and egg burritos had been 2 3 . They originally charged 3.38. I asked if the special was still good and she came back and said yes. So drive to window given my order and drive off. Get to my destination in lakewood and open the bag. The two burittos are literally half the size they usually are! What a joke. And they had obviously made them while i waited at the window for the girl to check the price there was no timestamp sticker. A bit unethical if you ask me.
ADDITION TO FIRST STAY AWAY! BEYOND BRUTAL. After having a more detailed look around the garden and having time to check more things out I decided I had to come back and add to my previous review. It turns out my first one was not strong enough. I found out two days ago that they cut through my watering system in the front garden. My wife just took inventory of the perennials and they destroyed about ten two year olds...about 250 worth. They destroyed the cherry tree...he claimed he had experience and knew how to prune it...He was VERY wrong. I had written on three separate emails NOT to cut the grass...so sure enough they cut the grass...way too short. Just to round out the whole deal this guy there is no company here gets all pissy when he does not get paid in less than 24 hours.
one star because of having a rude unprofessional Manager I never buy anything from sally and this was my first experience at this location . Amanda Yasmine and Destiny helped me so much and because of these 3 girls I decided to go back today . Unfortunately I was so surprise of how rude and unprofessional the manager Miriam was !!! I just wanted to get out of this place and never look back ! I think the owner needs to think twice before putting this lady out there as a role model to his employees ! We work in customer service and beauty industry so we need to be professional friendly and well dressed and maybe looking a bit more professional so when we make suggestion to the customer they can trust us not feeling unwelcome or feel like you have no clue what the hell you are talking about . If you need help ask any of these 3 girls and they will do their best to help you but the manager ..Good luck ! I honestly though Amanda is the manager she is so professional with great customer service and such a great attitude ! Never going back there when the manager is working !
Very unprofessional front staff had a confirmed reservation in my email made by the company s Secretary which clearly stated that the card used to hold the room would not be charged that my card would be charged when I checked in they charged the secretary s card refused to check me in under my card would not even book a room for me in the lobby because it s against their policy to do lobby reservations I will urge the company owner to never use this hotel ever again not being allowed to check in to a hotel with a reservation in your name 1st time in all of my travels something like this has ever happened not to mention the lobby staff was curt and abrupt with everyone in the lobby for employees in the hospitality industry these ladies are definitely the bottom of the barrel
They do not even acknowledge you unless you have an appointment. Waited 30 minutes and was not even checked in.
I do not usually go here to so my eyebrows but I needed to come here for an emergency threading. The lady completely messed up my eyebrows and did not honor my requests. They are closing the southpark mall location soon so it s not too hard to avoid this idolize bar. My specialist seemed to be in a rush and when I asked her to modify what she did very politely she was annoyed and hesitant. Next time I will stick to the eyebrow places I am comfortable with. Long story short I asked to keep my thickness with an arch and she completely thinned them out. Never again.
This place is a rip off. I was assured my account was held frozen in July because I was not going. I find out they ve been charging me the entire time and when I tried to get even a partial refund they refused even though it was their fault and I have not been in to tan at all. They are thieves.
So incredibly disappointing! Save your money and find fondue elsewhere. Had heard great things from people in the past. Went for an xmas dinner with 8 other gals from work. We were there for 3 hours!! We waited 45 minutes for our main courses. Hardly ever saw our waitress. Probably because she was getting her auto gratuity due to our large party so she did not give 2 sh ts about us. Asked if dessert would take as long as the main course and we were assured it would be quicker. Wrong half hour wait for chocolate fondue and when it finally came out the chocolate was COLD and the consistency of water. There was also no way it was actually Callebaut chocolate based on how it tasted. We got it removed from our bill and did not even eat it. While getting our coats I ran into the manager and very nicely let him know that our experience was very subpar. He spoke to me like I was just being a big b . Told me that he they can only serve the chocolate fondue warm which would have been nice but ours was COLD. And then proceeded to tell me that HE tasted our fondue and it was exactly how they always are. UNBELIEVABLE!!! Will NOT be returning huge waste of money so a said classy establishment.
I walked into this store today and was not greeted or even acknowledged at all. I circled the entire store looked at a couple of tags and just decided to leave without even a glance from the salesperson. There were two persons in the store one of which was the salesperson and I m not even sure the second person was actually a customer. What poor customer service! Will never go there again which is probably fine with them.
Where do I start?!?!? Used to love this place been here a million times. Times are changing I guess. Bartenders screaming at the top of their lungs over the blaring music....screming about their personal lives and swearing like old men they were girls . Took forever to get a drink. Food not even slightly what it used to be It was soggy sludge. Things that were supposed to be hot were cold and vice versa. Our empty glasses sat in front of us for way too long. Poor service the food just sucked and the temperature was not under control in there very windy and cold with blasting ceiling fans and air conditioner vents it s not warm outside . Bye bye. I think im done here. Pretty sad to watch a once awesome place go to crap. I m really disappointed.
My husband and I have eaten here several times at the bar for brunch and lunch. We had good service and enjoyed our meals so decided to take out of state visitors on Sunday for a late lunch. Terrible decision! Seated promptly in the dining room server brought water and took drink orders two cokes one iced tea and one Bloody Mary. When three of the drinks were delivered we placed our food order. The place was not crowded and it did not appear they were short of staff. Nevertheless our food one omelette one chicken sandwich one tuna tartare and one chicken enchilada took nearly 45 minutes to be delivered. Still no Bloody Mary. And the server never appeared again until we looked for her to bring our check. Finally a manager type person asked how our food was which was when we mentioned the Bloody Mary. It was promptly delivered. The food was fine but the tuna tartare with guacamole was just not a good combination. We will return eat at the bar and enjoy their brunch menu but will likely visit other places first.
UPON my many visits when you look around this place is tired as is their breakfast featuring home fries prepared in rancid drippings. the coffee is still good as is their pastries but the breakfast offerings need a update in a big way
Terrible service here my son is no longer a patient here the service is terrible the only good thing I can say is the male receptionist is nice but for as the doctor and her assistance 4 thumbs down. The office gave me and my husband the biggest run around. My son were getting some test done results came in but they could not determine the results then they sent us to a lab got results back again they could not read them then for the 3rd time they ask us to come back. What made it worst is that they would not communicate with us on the phone they needed us to come in to the office. So far my husband missed 2 days of work and additional they wanted us come in again twice basically 4 days missed from work because of they bull crap! They will never see us again.
Disastrous disorganized and under staffed! You do not want to use Bradley s at The Cedars unless you want this. He ruined my daughter s wedding reception. Dinner at 7 00 no STARTED BUFFET AT 8 10 AND STILL NOT DONE UNTIL AFTER 9 00!!! Food was over cooked. Prime rib? was so well done it was like chuck roast. We had to go to the kitchen door asking for hot hors d oeuvres angel wing cookies we brought and please turn down the air conditioning. It was so cold my daughter finally asked to have the heat turned on The floor was wet and slippery because of condensation. What a mess!!!
Have never liked this restaurant... I dislike it even more now that I have food restrictions I m basically vegan . After reviewing the allergen guide I sent a message to the company a few days before my visit asking for some assistance with suggestions for what I could eat and they never replied. I do not see their salad dressings and a few menu items listed on the allergen guide They need to update it. I would have never come here if it was not my friend s birthday. The service was not good either... We waited a long time for our food.. They also appear to be under staffed. The waiter was obviously rushing around trying to do his best. I do not know how this restaurant is popular... It s overpriced very mediocre Italian food.
Check this out!!!! This was previously T and S Express Auto now closed!! Look at the same type of reviews that I m leaving below. You ca not make this stuff up! OMGosh!!! How do I find such shady businesses? I m a very busy person and business owner in the East Valley. I thought well shoot if it saves me my deductible why not? If I take time to write a review especially a negative review its necessary to warn others. Chris Miller the owner of Lambs is a VERY fast talker and talks in circles. Calling me the customer Honey and Sweetie makes me VERY uncomfortable. He makes it seem like he s doing you a favor by waiving your deductible. I came in with several repairs to be done. He assured me they would be done according to the estimate that was written up by the insurance. He assured my husband the REPAIRS WERE DONE as the estimate was written up. He has you write down permission to repair and fix your vehicle. Yes to work on it but not different from how the insurance writes up on what needs to be done. HE DOES NOT DO ANY OF THE WORK AT HIS SHOP. Chris takes the vehicles to OTHER auto body shops and tells them to fix it as least expensive as possible cutting corners or not doing repairs at all. I needed a front and rear bumper replaced and he instead patched up the front one. It looks like it was done in a high school auto repair class. It s far from symmetrical. He glued the bumper in place to the quarter panel. Now my headlight does not sit right and its like having only one headlight. He was suppose to replace rear bumper and instead painted it flat black. It was not painted before. He stood directly in front of me and said it was armor all as I was scratching the flat black paint off my bumper. None of the safety items were replaced in both bumpers. The paint job he did on my hood is bumpy and if left will end up chipping off. The BIG issue I had was when I was to pick up my car I asked for an invoice of the work he did so if I had any issues I had record of it. He refused and said he does not provide invoices. We went round and round about providing a list of the work he performed. He will not do it......correction......he does not know how to do it. Chris even admitted that IN PERSON to the insurance claims adjuster. He wants cash payment for the work he claims he does. I refused and offered to pay by debit credit card. Chris stated he does not take cards either. Chris called me asking if I will just let him drive me to the bank and cash the insurance check and give it to him so I could help him out to bring his bank balance back UP to where it needs to be! Unbelievable!!!! He had my car for 3 weeks and drove it for personal use during that time. I about lost my mind when my husband and I went to meet him to pick up the car AT THE SHOP and he drove up in it. Chris showed me that his wife s car was locked up in his garage. He said his wife liked my car because her car was too small and was interested in buying it. I do not play around when it comes to protocol. The insurance adjuster inspected my car after Chris Miller did his so called work. It s too bad. This is insurance fraud. He did not do any of the internal repairs to my car. Only what is seen on the exterior and poorly at that and will need to be correctly repaired. THIS IS NOT A REPAIR SHOP. CHRIS MILLER LAMBS AUTO BODY IS SHADY and JUST TRIES TO GET A SLICE OF THE PIE BY SUBCONTRACTING THE WORK OUT CUTTING CORNERS DOING IT AS INEXPENSIVE AS POSSIBLE THEN POCKETING THE MONEY. He is currently being investigated for insurance fraud. He has even gone so far as to send someone to my home knock on my door and ask if the car was for sale that they were interested in buying it. I do not have this car listed for sale online or have a sign on the car showing it is for sale. This dirtbag is desperate now. He screwed the wrong pooch and it s out of my hands. If I could only turn back the clock and have made a different body shop choice I could have avoided his shady dirtbag schemes. At least I can share my experience and hopefully make someone think twice about going here for car repairs.
Solamente porque ellos dijeron que queran limpiar el saln grande donde haba aire acondicionado nos tuvimos que sentar en el saln pequeo donde hace tremendo calor en este clima y la comida tomo una eternidad para llegar a pesar que la atencin de la camarera fue atenta no se sinti en ningn momento que el cliente tena prioridad niera importante... yo no regreso ni recomiendo ese restaurante a nadie ms
THIS IS THE WORST EXPERIENCE I VE EVER HAD WITH A TITLE COMPANY. I have been in the mortgage biz here in AZ for 30 years and the staff is awful. Everyone from the front desk person to the Escrow Officer to the Branch Manager are awful. I worked with the office at 2400 N Central Avenue and the E.O. was Sharlene Hodgkins. If you get into a transaction with this title company involved expect horrific attitudes and service and you will close late due to their lack of desire to provide any sort of customer service. Too many other good title companies out there to work with this sort of poor service.
Had the gyro and the meat was just awful. Super dry tough and lacked flavor. The sauce was mediocre. Would not get it again.
We have been calling texting and emailing for A MONTH without a single response!!! Calls do not get answered voicemail emails and texts get ignored... do not know how they stay in business!!! Really REALLY disappointing!
I have not even been treated at this facility and my experience has been terrible!!! The administration staff is confused unorganized and incompetent! I do not understand how they run a business. They might have a better chance of running a three legged race against Siamese twins. I am trying to get an MRI in which my physical therapist referred me and sent a fax to AZ tech for treatment. Az tech was supposed to call me back the same day to set up an appointment. Did not get a call that day. Fine. Called them the next day and asked them about the fax from my doctor and setting an appointment. The receptionist was confused and kept trying to look up my information. I told her I was a new patient and there was a fax and she kept asking for my name and date of birth. She was obviously confused because asked at least 4 times in a row. For Christ s sake and all that is Holy!! Write it down if you cant remember! She then told me she could not find the fax and would call me back. She said The best number to reach you at is 602..what is your number? Why did she start telling ME what the best number to reach me at? Nevertheless I did not get a call back that day. I called the next morning and told them I need to set an appointment and I was supposed to get a call back the last 2 days. I was given their standard 4 repeated questions about my name and date of birth and then put on hold. She said they never received a fax. I asked why did not get a call the past 2 days. The woman told me in a defensive tone that they called me yesterday and left a message. I had never received a call let alone a message!!!! So my call history in my phone and voice mails must be deleting themselves? I got off the phone with them and called my physical therapist. I told them AZ tech never received a fax to which they replied they sent the fax twice. I was livid at this point because I had to schedule an appointment with the therapists but appointment to do the MRI and kept pushing it back. I then called AZ tech back and told them that a fax was sent twice. They were confused about receiving a fax no surprise and they put me on hold. They finally found it and set up an appointment. I tried to let them know that they need to get it together over there . And the receptionist was bewildered and asked We need to get what? I called my therapist back to then set an appointment following the MRI. I expressed my displeasure toward the Gilbert office so she set me up with the Tempe office at a different time. Today due to traffic and crazy construction I was running late to the appointment. I called the Tempe AZ tech location to notify my tardiness. They told me that their MRI machine was down and they tried to call me the day before. They said they would set up an appointment at 10 00 at the Gilbert location a little later in the day. I was dreading it with my recent interaction. With their reputation I decided it would be a good idea to call that office beforehand. When I called I told them my name and that the Tempe office had set up an appointment for me at that location today because their MRI machine was down. Literally the lady then asked So you want to set up an appointment for tomorrow? I had no patience left and replied Did you hear what I just said? So I repeated my name and everything very slowly. Of course she asked me my name again and then told me the appointment was set for 9 30. I told her that the other office told me 10 00. DONE. Needless to say I did not show up to the appointment. This company is all out of whack. If you feel like being frustrated have them take care of you. And if you are desperate enough to go there give them a good slap in the face.
Bad experience at this nail salon. I got my nails done today both the dipping powder manicure similar to acrylic nails pedicure and waxing. Not coming back here or recommending anyone to come here. The nail tech who did the work never smiled and never asked if I liked the jobs done. She apparently did not want to be there and treated me like she was doing me a favor. She was rude unprofessional and rough when she did my nails. I accidentally knocked over a chair when I picked up my purse to go get the waxing done and she and the employees there looked at me and then looked at each other talked among themselves and started laughing. I did not appreciate that because they were obviously making fun of me. I did not bother to tip her for the horrendous service. When I tip good service I give AT LEAST 20 or more. She was there to do a job but did not provide the service that would make me want to come back . I ve been to bad nail salons but this is the worst I ve been to.
Would have loved to try the food and beers. Hostess seemed dumbfounded when we asked to be seated. Waited for a minute for her to decide where to seat us. I pulled the plug on staying as the initial vibe was not good. Maybe some other time.
I paid for a website 3 years ago. The plan was to have them do the design and host with my current provider. All they did was send me generic files from the stupid promo website attorneys at law via email. That s it. They are total jerks. That they cannot see that this review is more costly than the price of a refund makes me worry that they are not terribly smart. By the way I am a lawyer. So I am suing them for breach of contract which is going to cost them a fortune.
Ordered pizza at 6 15 PM. Got an email estimating 6 50 delivery. Got a text at 6 34 my pizza was out for delivery. At 7 29 I called and was assured my pizza was in a delivery drivers car. At 7 47 I called and asked for the manager. After a brief hold she came back and said my pizza had never even left the store. She offered me a coupon for a future pizza but come on who wants to wait an hour and a half for a pizza?
Expensive for really shitty work. I would rather to the strip and pay for the same price range than get ripped off... Went here to get a full set and originally got regular polish and had to come back a few hours later because one of my acrylic nails tore in half. Plus the polish looked really crappy after a few hours so i went back the same day to get it fixed and switched to gel instead. 2 days later the gel started chipping off as well! I like this place because the staff is friendly plus the place itself is really clean and has a nice vibe but honestly wish i got more of my moneys worth
The only good thing I experienced at this restaurant was the gluten free crust pizza. Everything else was subpar including the service. The Caesar salad was the dregs of the lettuce for the week and the waiter basically ignored us so that I had to get up and go ask for more water. I will not go back.
Omg 20 mins in a drive though with zero apology is not cool!!! I even mention how LONG the wait is and the girl says ya our system is not working right Start off with sorry for your wait!! Skip this location they are unpredictable and need to get their crap together. I always see employees just chatting instead of getting orders done.
Horrible. Terriyaki chicken was inedible...pad thai and mussaman curry was fair. Service was good though....Very disappointed!
I went to this man 1 year ago. He first yelled to me in the waiting room if you have stiff man syndrome I cannot help you ... What that is I had no idea...That should have been my first clue but I was so desperate to know what was wrong with me after months of Drs specialist painful diagnostic test medical bills that were racking up and no answers. I had symptoms for 6 months when I went to him I was at the height of my condition...he should have known. I ended up at UCLA and was diagnosed and treated. Again he should have known. He did no blood test and did not even touch me...remember I was at the height of this condition all the symptoms were there. One of three things were ultimately going to happen to me have a stroke becoming blind or death. This disease is managed by a rheumatologist! Need I say more. Finally what he did do for me is say if I were you I would go to UCLA . What a blessing! They saved my life Listen to these reviews really...I know.
I really do not know what it is about pie that I do not enjoy that much but everything is just alright for me. My friend recommend me try the salty balls which is deep fried pie dough with garlic butter and bacon. There was nothing special about them. I ve also had their pie salad before which is a pretty standard green salad with a red wine vinaigrette. It was okay. Of course I d have to try one of their pizzas before I had a final opinion about them. I went with Fun Guy pie. Basically a cheese pizza with mushrooms and spinach. It was a good at first but then it was a struggle for me to finish it because I just did not enjoy it much anymore. Perhaps it was too cheesy for my liking ? I do not know. I guess I should ve went with a more classic pizza choice. Nothing memorable about the place itself really.
I saw this new location which was previously Noodle Mi. I m giving this place a 2 because I m very disappointed with their service. The girl asked me to enter my info with their snappy system to add myself to their waiting list which is dumb because why did I have to serve myself? The screen said there were few tables ahead of us and they ll send me a text so I walked around to kill some time. By the time I got back another girl asked how many ppl so I said I already checked into their system. She had no clue what I was talking about and said oh there s a free table but I didnt get a text! The table was inbetween two other tables so we had no way to get in and the waitress just walked away. Customers ended up moving the table for us. The food was A ok. I still prefer Noodle Mi. The Value combo seems pricey esp since it s almost double the price just to get a drink pudding and slice of watermelon. I rather go to Chef Papa to get a Presotea for 2.50. They should get rid of their crappy I mean snappy system.
With a pool table and TV screens on every wall the Regal Beagle is one part sports bar two parts dive bar. Even overlooking the awkward seating arrangement though I was not particularly impressed. The limes we were brought were desiccated and repulsive... aaaand the server was on autopilot the whole time we were there. But if drink specials on game day are what you re looking for this is the bar for you!
stopped in here yesterday and no one was in the store....I finally saw a man sitting back at a desk and figured he would come talk to me since I was the only customer. I walked around and was a little shocked at how high the mattresses were priced? I had seen their ad on craigslist and it seemed like I would have some options but everything seemed really high. I ll ask the man when he acknowledges I am here......walk around store AGAIN......man still does not even lift his head to acknowledge I m in the building so I left. Maybe they had some deals he could have told me about but customer service was TERRIBLE!
You people are insane. The fish tacos are edible at best. There s such an insane amount of glop on top you ca not even taste the fish. Which is a good thing because when you taste the fish by itself it tastes fishy. That s not good. The employees are super nice though.
The service was almost non existent when we came at dinner time. I tried their soup noodles tomatoes with egg with Korean crystal noodles and like many other reviews it s incredibly full of msg. It s a noodle bar style where you pick your own noodle soup and food that comes with it. The price to food ratio is not very fair I would not suggest eating here try lucky noodle or deer garden.
Amazing property but I would never stay here again. Booked three weeks ago on business and paid in full just to get here and be told they have no rooms for us. The manager we dealt with was unhelpful and recited lines out of the company handbook like a robot. His name was Brian Askins in case you ever have to deal with him. Overbooking and putting people out like the airlines is no way to run a business. What a joke.
I must be spoiled by Vegas and Indian casinos in California cause this place was really disappointing. Hearing BIGGEST CASINO in Canada already had me hyped up. 5 floors of games? I could not wait and immediately signed up for the loyalty program. I hit the buffet before gambling but riding escalator after escalator seeing each floor had my inner gambler waiting to throw some money. On a full stomach I hit the casino...disappointed. Yes there s your typical blackjack slots roulette poker. BUT where are the free drinks? I guess Canadians are so nice they do not want their visitors losing their common sense being drunk and gambling RESPONSIBLY EH?!? Not to mention no video blackjack my go to get drunk bet 1 a hand game Where s my liquid courage? Am I supposed to gamble sober knowing I could lose a dinner on one bet? Am I supposed to hit on the girl at the table or slot machine sober? NO FUN. 19 year old gambling age 18 year old drinking age? Canada should be the place to party! This place is full of old people. Old sober old people. Nothing wrong with that but there really was not a vibe to this place. Along with there ONLY being a casino..I was done after I lost my money. Oh well thank the exchange rate for me not losing as much! I mean unless you have the biggest gambling itch to scratch I ll go somewhere better.
I do like H and Ms clothing but I ca not deal with this store. NO A C. It s 110 degrees out! Pretty ridiculous. Also there is always only one person ringing people up no matter how long the line is. No A C longggg lines not coming back. I ll go to Fashion Square Ugh if I want to shop at H and M I guess!
This place does not even deserve a star. I requested a bio gel to be done. It was my very first time there when the nail professional made my cuticles bleed in two spots trying to stop the bleeding by stabbing her nails with a paper towel onto my fingers. Secondly I had my nail broken off when the gel was already on so the lady tried to glue it by inserting glue between my finger and a nail which caused my skin to stick together. She tried to peel it off with tweezers and scrub It off with the machine which hurt really bad !!! I have not said anything until the point when the lady grabbed the airbrush machine and spray painted my entire hand and just laughed about it. When she saw me not being impressed she started apologizing. I told her right there that I m unsatisfied with her service. When it came to the payment I got asked to pay the full price! When I told the professional she did an awful job she told be she said sorry and that its my fault because my cuticles are dry!! I m addition she said she had a bad day so she can take it off for me and I can come back tomorrow?!?!? After I just spent an hour and a half in pain??? At the very end I got told not to ever come back there again. And I wo not ! Please do not ever go there! Save yourself time hands money and nerves.
I ve been to Benihana a couple times before but never to this location. I received my 30 off birthday coupon so we came in on a Thursday night. I actually have to use my birthday coupon early because it expires before my actual birthday! What a riot.. Service was slow but our server was very nice our chef was really disappointing to be completely honest. You could barely understand him he really was not a showman at all and could not cook the food well! The scallops were torched meats were overcooked. The best thing I ate that night was the Rainbow Roll which was very fresh! The white peach saki sangria was also tasty! We decided to leave before dessert take it to go because I ended up not feeling well half way through the night. Oh and on top of a 30 off coupon we still did not get out of there without spending close to 100. Medicore food for a very expensive price tag. I think I m done with Benihana.
I usually love this location because it s so close to home... Ordered a drink and the straw was not working and I opened it... There was a plastic bag in it... wtf.
The casino is nice the only problem is you have to go thru an army of very aggressive sales people to get in. Not worth it. One of the worst spots on the strip. I yelled at one of them to leave me alone and they surrounded me and my wife. You have been warned
DREARY Dark rooms chipped paint peeling laminates uncomfortable beds... Just pass on this sad hotel. To enter the business center a manager had to use a screwdriver to jimmy the door open revealing a computer 14 years old that would not even print a boarding pass.
I went there for lunch and had the Apollo club. The breadworks bread was really good but they put only 2 slices of turkey and 2 slices of ham along with lettuce and tomato. It also came with a handful of store bought potato chips. The only reason I gave it 2 stars instead of 1 was the bread was fresh and really good. Do not waste your money on this place.
When I got here the line to order was long and the people at the register seemed to be working very slow. Ordered the Philli Cheese Steak sandwich with fries combo to go it cost like 16 or 17 bucks. Once I got my food I took it upstairs and it was beyong greasy and the meat tasted burnt. Did not have the time to go back down and complaint and just sucked it up. Will definitely not be coming here again or be recommending it to anyone.
Honestly the girl in the front was very nice and that s the only reason why this place is getting a one star. My hot chocolate was luke warm and my waffles were old and hard probably heated up in the toaster oven when I said that the gave me the back the exact same ones just a lil more toasted and browner. Dont be fooled by how it looks it does not taste good at all and the waitress just confirmed to me that they receive frozen waffles.
After reading some of the other reviews I wonder if I was in a different bar. We went to Whiskey Dicks for lunch and surprisingly this small bar had a lunch crowd of about 12 people. We were seated immediately by the waitress who was dressed like she had just had the time of her life on the back of a Harley and then ran into work without checking a mirror. Despite the uniform costume she was very friendly and we can leave it at that. Orders for our group were a two Swiss cheeseburgers nachos and a chicken sandwich. Bar order was a Coke and two light beers. The food took about 20 minutes and was disappointing. My chicken sandwich was made correctly but did not have much taste. The cheese on the nachos was basically non existent. The people that got burgers said they were cooked well but also lacked seasoning. Prices were about average bar food price and no music was playing. Mediocre lunch mediocre bar.
Oh this place is classic! South Indian people trying to cook North Indian food. Okay for the nonIndian people who are confused let me explain. Ya know how they have southern Italian food and northern Italian food? Southern Italian food uses a lot of red sauce pasta olives red wine while northern Italian food incorporates a lot of white sauces grilled items and butter? Yes it s an entirely different cuisine. Likewise south Indian food is very different than north Indian food but north Indian food is popular and it s what constitutes Indian food much like southern Italian food is what primarily constitutes Italian food So what ends up happening is you have South Indian people trying to cook North Indian food because the food from the North is what is popular. Dosa not withstanding And this lack of expertise was imminent among the cooks and owners. Chicken tikka masala is boneless pieces of chicke tikka that is supposed to grilled first and then served in a sauce. They had some pieces of dark bone meat chicken makhani in their buffet. I asked to see a menu because I wanted to try their chicken tikka masla. The owner argued with me saying that chicken makhani and chicken tikka masala are the same thing with the exception of cream. WRONG! A true punjabi restaurant would never make that claim. Anyway so I tried the buffer because I could tell they were too lazy to cook anything similar to what was in their buffet that afternoon. The buffet was tasteless the saag was watery the chicken makhani tasted as if they dumped some chicken into Campbel s tomatoe soup and added butter. We ordered their Indo Chinese ...again I have had real Indian Chinese and this place tried to make Indian manchurian... Bottomline If you are a clueless white dude who wants to just try Indian food for the first time I recommend this place. You wo not know any better and its good enough to send you home happy. Unlike most Indian restaurants you will like the ambience here. It s fairly large has vaulted ceilings is clean and the service was good. If you are Indian or a white dude that knows him some good Indian food skip this place
Just wanted something a little different for brunch so we tried this place. Looked busy and the dishes we saw as we sat looked good. However things went downhill from there. A good 10 minutes just to get the waitress over to take our coffee order. We ordered the blueberry scone with our coffee and the chicken club and eggs Benedict with smoked salmon. The scone came within a few minutes but it has obviously been microwaved and was dry. It did come with a large dollop of canned whip cream and off the shelf jam. Then our mains came. The Eggs Benedict was poached to perfection but that did not help with the blandest hollandaise sauce I ever tasted and defrosted smoked salmon. The home fries with the dish came out of the frozen section of the nearby supermarket The club sandwich was strangely cold and our suspicion that it had been made hours previously and stored in the fridge before arriving at our table was confirmed when the toasted bread was soaked with juice from the tomato. So disappointed. Too bad because similar things have been noticed by previous yelpers.
Skimpy on the beef and they add requirements to coupons. Do NOT go there if you want free cookie with ANY full price purchase like coupon says the young shift leader directs staff to require SANDWICH purchase at full price. MA AM PLEASE READ THE COUPON!
Went yesterday an wasnt impressed salad was barely green bread was beyond salty and noodles felt a little undercooked. The food tasted like it had been microwaved and if I wanted that I could just paid for a frozen meal at Walmart which would have been cheaper. Needless to say i wont be returning anytime soon to this or any olive garden chain.
Has really gone downhill in the last few years. Jason s use to be awesome. Food quality and service here has declined dramatically. Still has a great salad bar. Sad to see the decline of a once really good deli.
Have been here a few times but this last visit was not up to what I had experienced before. Came with my daughter who was visiting from Texas. Seat yourself sign was up so we sat outside. Sat at least 10 minutes before anyone came to remove previous customers payment and wipe off table. The waitress who seemed to be handling our section completely ignored us not once was there eye contact and spent a lot of her time chatting with the customers in the booth right behind us. A nice guy Luis stopped and took our drink and food order though I do not think he was in charge of our section. Our drinks came out and they were fine. Food came out a while later but we did t have any silverware or napkins. I had to go up to the bar to ask for silverware and napkins. The food was good but nothing spectacular. I was surprised to discover that they charge you for their salsa that they bring with your chips! The only time the section waitress came to our booth was to bring us the check. I made sure Luis got the tip. I guess all I can say I probably wo not return as we both felt ignored and forgotten among all the other customers.
Walked in at 11 01 AM A minute after they unlocked the door... No one in front of house...fine... Cook behind looks at me like ....where did you come from.... He looks at the clock on the wall looks back at me Still did not say anything ...I stood by the counter asking him you are open right!! Looks at clock again.... He said yeah! Lunch salad and yogurt plus water.... 18.90 total!! Really !! Ok thx...
Important please read from an educated consumer. This company broke 3 separate valuable items on 2 short distance medium sized moves. Dishes a picture and also a 1500 table was broken. The table was broken due to the movers jumping out of the side of the van with it in their hands presumably to save a few seconds rather than use the ramp to walk it down. Dishes were replaced they were extremely well packed so the driving must have been herrendous on their part . Table was fixed although still had a noticable crack and several other chips they had made while attempting to fix it. Compensation of 60 will be given on the picture because we did not purchase the all inclusive plan. So it is pretty clear that if you want a crappy job then pay normal price and take your chances. If you want to have your stuff broken but be reimbursed then you pay a lot more so they buy you new stuff. It took long times to reach the right people and get feedback from this company. If you are moving valuables or things of sentimental value then take my advice and go with someone else....or if you prefer not to have people smoking while handling your things.
My experience here was awful and I should have known to go somewhere else from all of the other bad reviews. This was my first ultrasound to find out how far along I was in my pregnancy. I explained to the ultrasound tech that this is my first baby and I was very excited and nervous about the ultrasound and did not know what to expect. The tech was extremely cold and robotic. She did not say anything to me quickly took the pictures and rushed me out. Once she printed the picture she pointed to a small area where the baby was and sent me on my way. It was a 3pm appointment so I do not know if she was rushing to get out of there and go home but it was an extremely unpleasant experience. I understand she does this all day everyday but it would be nice if she had some compassion for a first time mom. Even a smile would have been nice and put me more at ease. I just wanted to know that the baby was ok and viable. Kinda sad this is the memory I have of my ultrasound and for the first time seeing my baby. I wish I would have gotten her name so I could have escalated it further. She was an old lady blonde with short hair and glasses. Anyways. I will be driving way out of my way to another location to ensure I get a better experience. I would encourage other people to avoid this location as well.
So Akahana what s up? Do you hate me that much that you always pair me up with the very inattentive waiter that messes up my order every time? Leanne C. s review pretty much sums up our experience there. I got told I could have cake then the cake was a lie then there was cake again. Quit playing with my heart! I would ve ordered some food to go with the cake if you had not taken almost an hour to bring it out of the freezer. My love of dessert for dinner is unrivaled but this was really crappy cake that I ended up giving away because I could not stomach it s frozen sickly sweetness. I suggest that you inform people next time you re serving them cold chocolate cake because I kind of envisioned a warm fluffy moist piece of chocolate yumminess. Service was awful bad below mediocre crap pick any negative adjective you like. Sake was ordered at the start of the meal and came out near the end after we had said we did not want it anymore since it was so late at least our server realized how big of a mess that was and comped us for it. I hate the stupid BOGO deal just price your stuff reasonably because I do not want to always eat 2 rolls when I come here. I think I ll have to end my relationship with you here for a while Akahana.
Came here only because Kabuki had a 30 min. wait and we were super hungry so we came here. First of all the environment was plain and uncomfortable setting. I understand this is a rotating sushi bar but this was just so weird! Second the food was tasteless and to be honest the worst sushi I ever had I would rather pay extra and grab sushi from AJ s. Third the waitress was so terrible! She did not ask us how we were doing and got my drink wrong. I tipped her the amount I would do to a pick up order it was that bad. Advice to the owners change the setting teach your staff good customer service and work on the taste of the food. Wo not be coming back here ever.
One of the worst restaurants i have been to. Walk in and there is a very pungent smell in the first room. I didnt write this review when i smelt that... But read on... I called and placed specific items in my order. The bhendi masala one of the simplest dishes was messed up.... The chef must really put in effort to screw up bhindi masala. Next... I ordered for tomato dal check their menu..they have this dish and whats in my box? Channa masala!! I drove 40 miles one way for this... Totally disappointed. I called them to explain this n the lady asks if i want to come back again n take a new order!!!! No way baby... Thank you
Do not quite trust this dealership because of personal experience but it seems to be a busy one. Car looked at was not exactly what was advertised so not happy to have wasted the time and any deal would have been tainted. Oh well...
I have visited this place 3 times. The parking is horrible but I try to come later in the evening when there is a few spaces. The place it pretty pricey for sandwiches and salads I think. I had a gift card so I didnt have spend any money out of pocket. It seems like every time I come here the girl or whoever is on the register always has a little attitude it like the register girl is upset that I am using a gift card or something I dont know. Maybe cause it the almost the end of the day or hell maybe she is on her period or something. The last time i visited this location which was last week I ordered a some kind of turkey panini of which I ordered the last two times I visited this place with the person who makes the sandwiches then I went down to where the soups where and order mac and cheese. The stupid girl that makes the sandwiches said I was suppose to order the mac and cheese with the person who makes the sandwiches and to remember that for next time. I almost went off on this bitch but no reason to do that again I think these heifers are on their period all the time. Next time put the damn mac and cheese in the section where the damn sandwiches are located and not on the menu where fuckin soups are if you want me to order it with the sandwich maker or just make one ordering spot where I can tell my order to one person instead of having to go to 3 fuckin people to make my order. The people here suck the food is cool.
Not impressed at all. Egg drop soup was plain no veggies tofu etc. Ordered the Mongolian Chicken way too salty and oily. Cashew chicken same thing. Our food had a strange taste to it we notified the waitress and she said there was nothing she could do about it. I ll also add that we were the only ones in the restaurant so who knows how long the food had been sitting. Soda comes in a can no soda fountain. Our family enjoys oriental food but this is one place we wo not come back to.
I do like the studio it s got all the amenities you need and it s a great location. The staff is friendly and helpful and the teachers seem great. I like the class variety and the schedule they offer works well with mine...so why such a low rating?? Bro there is absolutely no reason to do a high impact workout in 95 degrees and 80 humidity. I do not need to pay hundreds of dollars to replicate the environment outside in Phoenix. Hot yoga is fine for yoga flow but when you start to introduce weights cardio plyometrics it s time to turn on the AC!! I ve been doing yoga and fitness classes for well over 15 years and have never experienced the benefits of hot rooms for high impact workouts. Furthermore the class was over booked so we were forced to workout on top of each other. The guy next to me was sweating all over my mat! GROSS! The room stunk and I doubt they mop between classes so the floor was likely unsanitary. Nope nope nope I m not down with hot rooms for these types of workouts I ll pass.
Horrible venue. Single bathroom for the entire place smells awful unprofessional staff and HORRIBLY tuned sound. One of the worst I ve ever heard ever.
A turn and burn car wash!! They do not even deserve a single start after paying 160 for both of my cars to be detailed I had to physical show them that there were multiple smudge marks and the entire back seat was not vacuumed. If you do decide to go here thoroughly check your car!!
I was in Scottsdale for the first time and was excited to try out the restaurant bar club scene. After a good dinner at Lupe something or other and a great after dinner drink at Bungalow we went to Cream to see what is was all about. Let me start by saying you may want to write my review off as I am already not a fan of Vegas style clubs in very non Vegas style cities so already the shot for five stars was blown. We get there and it is way too crowded. Drinks were decently priced but I was not blown away by the friendly bar staff. As I turn around to face my friends I feel a heavy drunk arm around my shoulder and hear so do you go to ASU? from a drunk man that was seriously invading my personal space. This is all fine as it is a club and I am just beginning while others may need to be switching to water....so I wo not let that spoil my evening but rather add to the humor. The music was really good if you could get over the fact that right at the second stanza of every song began the DJ mixed in something else and so I never got to hear a full song. As my buzz was allowing me to not care about the lame people and crowded room to the point of wanting to dance a massive wave of vomit smell filled the room and I had to escape immediately. As I sit on the curb and wait with a few friends who also wanted to leave for my other friends who wanted another drink the people watching got really entertaining. Drunk girls screaming obnoxiously at anyone who glances in their direction and a drunk man sitting on the curb telling all these women that they are whores really sewed up the night. As I tried to stay invisible so I could enjoy myself the whore yeller stumbles over and says did you go to college? yes then does not it bother you that the people in that club are incredibly stupid . No I came to get a drink not judge the IQ of the guy next to me. And I wo not be coming back. The reason this palce gets 2 stars is because the people who frequent this establishment made for an amazing night of people watching!
Food was ok for an American franchise attempt at Mexican food. The lobby is really cool
I ordered online...twice and both orders were screwed up! Do not go this Subway! There are stores close by with much better ratings! Here is the score card ordered mayo and deli mustard...got NONE! ordered a 20oz bottle of Coke...he handed me a cup! Asked that each half be wrapped separately...halves wrapped together... I ordered a meal yet he handed me the sandwich and said have a nice day...NO meal! it is on the order...clearly printed! How do you screw that up? but they did...TWICE!
Been going here for years about once a year. The food tastes sooo good. However we all get sick after eating here every time. They have almost doubled their prices too. It used to be 11 for chicken entree but today they charge 18! Come on how about you clean up your bathrooms if you are going to charge that much. The toilet in the women s restroom has no back lid a screw has been the flush handle for at least 8 years and it is dark and dirty. There are Curtains you walk through to go to the bathrooms and they are covered in what looks to be sauce and food. That s been that way for years too. I used to eat there anyway because of the prices and it tastes good. But I will never go there as long as they charge as much as they do now.
This place makes me angry even days after leaving it and thinking back on the experience hence the bad review. We put our names down for 6 with our number and was told they d call us when our table was ready about 45 minutes. We thought it was a reasonable wait time since it seemed busy. 1.5 hours later and no call so we go back to the restaurant and checked to see if it was still super busy and it was NOT. In fact it was half empty. The hostess looked and said they called us total bs but we never received it. But its ok we were hungry we waited so we were going to give it a shot. I mean the hostess and her two other hostess friends had to look around and make sure there was actually a table open or a seat available even then they were debating on a whether to open a table for us. I mean i guess a party of 6 does not fit in your 50 empty tables with no customers after everyone ate and left your restaurant is dead empty and you completely forgot about us. Who does that!? Like hey you do not have a reservation and our restaurant is empty so we do not know whether we can serve you but we want to keep our jobs so we ll try and fit you somewhere in between the 50 empty tables. Thanks a lot ! We sat down and looked at the menu and decided to order 3 sandwiches and a salad. 30 minutes later our sandwiches come out and my friends salad had an interesting interpretation of what a salad was. In my mind salads usually have lettuce as the base but this one was more avocado. Probably about 3 5 shredded pieces of lettuce and a giant avocado and filled with chicken and bacon. I guess lettuces are expensive in the humid dry desert. I mean if it were me i d be happy with all the meat but i d also like lettuce in my salads. The salad also came without dressing which was even more depressing. No balsamic vinaigrette so they replaced it with a red wine vinaigrette that was apparently disgusting. Sandwiches were ok but the plates were filled with some decent fries. If I had to guess the restaurant ran out of ingredient but not potatoes or fries. The service was lackluster and we were left very disappointed. I must also point out that when we entered the oyster bar mussel bar was also very depressing looking with not so fresh oysters and mussels that looked like they sat there for a decade. Anyways I m not going back ever again. I ll just eat at the food court if I want crappy food at least i ll get good service and a well balanced portion of food. Maybe they ll even serve me lettuce in my salad? Food for thought. Tips DON T ORDER A SALAD!!!
Food is great so are staff. Big concerns are limited seats and long lines. I have been going to this location for a long time now and you always have non paying clients in store taking up space. Lots of students from school down the street swearing and talking on their phones. No drive thru so good luck getting a coffee in under 15 min in morning rush. Lots of time you can find people sitting in limited store seats just waiting for the 57 Midland bus and management does nothing??. Great location but get rid of the loitering and students.
This restaurant reminds me of the recent Reddit AMA with with Gordon Ramsey. When asked what kind of food he does not eat he snarkily replied I eat everything from tarantulas to beating cobra hearts but I draw the line at overcooked food.. It s disgusting. Well let me put it to you the food at this restaurant is not just overcooked though it is over seasoned artificial as plastic and vomit inducing. It is a bastardized version of dim sum crossbred with frozen food from your local Metro. This restaurant is a place you would go once return with a stomachache and swear to god you will never go again. The restaurant is dirty and oddly reminds me of an abandoned Soviet building. Even if paid to eat at this restaurant I would never dine here again. Utterly and thoroughly disgusting. This literally is where you draw the line. Too harsh?
NOT A FAN OF COMMERCIAL Food. I came here for their 2 for 20 deal where you get 2 main entrees and an appetizer.. The service was slow and it was not like the joint was crazy packed. Came here for lunch at around 1pm.. and no one was there.. we did not get refilled on our drinks until we were about done eating.. mind you we were the ONLY one there it seemed like.. I had the skillet chicken entree with lots of cheese.. it was good but because the service was terrible I had to give 2 stars!!
This is my second time ordering and I was hoping for better... guess not. I get a call that the delivery guy is at my apartment and no one is answering and the phone number was incorrect. So I confirmed info with the lady at the store and she said everything is correct and she would call the driver. 20 minutes go by and the driver still is not here... so I call again. The lady on the phone said he was in the apartment complex and should be there soon. 10 more minutes go by. He finally walks up and says he dialed a number that was a digit off.... so I m assuming the address was wrong too. The driver acted like it was my fault that he went to the wrong address and had the wrong number. I called the store to complain and because I ordered off Eat24 they could not do ANYTHING. I have sent an email to Eat24 but good luck if you have horrible service. My fries were soggy jalapeo poppers and Mac and cheese bites were cold. Hopefully the delivery guy gets better but we wo not know since we wo not order here again.
This place has false advertising labels. I bought an envelope marked 1.99 and was charged over 4. I told the guy working there and he said they do not have time to change it. No good reviews for this place.
wow what a disaster .. ordered off of yelp grub hub online. got a confirmation. it says order will be ready in 45 55 mins. about 30 mins later i get a phone call from a strange number and usually i never answer it lucky i did it was yelp grub hub calling to tell me they have to cancel my order they said they kept calling hacienda and no answer to confirm it on there end. So my wife calls and they answer. they had the order. what a mess. ordered a chimachinga that was ok it was morel like a burrito then a chimachanga .
This is for the Dayclub and nightclub Dayclub Friday as hotel guests were told we get in free when I showed up they wanted to charge 20 each there was no line at all and the place looked dead I only stopped by because a friend was working and was going to say hi. I never went in and just left. Saturday we were walked in and after being ID d and going up the elevators we had to wait in yet another line to be searched and let in it just seemed disorganized. everyone was looking around the with WTF looks on their faces When we get up to the pool deck there is almost Nowhere to sit stand.....there were so many daybeds and loungers empty for rent you could barely walk around. I m all for selling out your daybeds and such but when your guests are almost falling in the pool to more from point a to point b there is a problem. At WET you have room by the pool to sit on the edge lay out a towel in some areas etc...here the daybeds go all the way to the pool edge all around the pool you can lay a towel behind a daybed but in the walkway by the bar....I d recommend taking out a few loungers so your guests can move. We stayed about 10 minutes and went down to the boulevard pool in the hotel this would be a MUCH better set up for a pool party Nightclub We went on a Saturday night around 11 30 12 30 with a big name DJ playing....the line wrapped all the way around the club into the hotel walk way over by the tall shoe installations must have been a few thousand in line...we had a about 8 girls and 3 guys and were able to walk right in as hotel guests. When we get up the club is SUPER dark more so than usual the place is like a maze with all the different rooms and unless you have a table you really can lose your friends. It was also packed to the point it was hard to walk around. Our plan was to get early and get our stamps so we could come back in later through the readmission door. some girls had to finish getting ready and we wanted to go back to the room for a few drinks To our surprise the exit and readmission is down these crazy back utility stairs almost 5 flights down! So all the girls in 5 heels and mini dresses were walking up and down the stairs just to leave return....really ruins the ambiance of the club when you have to leave out of a back fire escape. Again I think this is due to the disorganization of management....club seemed like it would be ok with a comped table with friends but if I have to walk down the stairs again to leave...no thanks!
Came here for lunch on a Thursday and one of my favorite spots. Today the service was lacking. Whoever the male hostess was was not only rude but impersonal. Did not greet us and walked us to the table and dropped off menus and walked away before we even sat. He did that with several tables around us. Did not let us know who our server was... it took ten minutes for a server to get to us. I m fine with that when it s busy but they were not busy because it was later in the afternoon. Usually really love the service and food and today was not a good day for them.
We waited for over an hour from when we sat down to when the first plate of food was put on the table! We had to ask three times for silverware. It took them 20 minutes to bring me the check so we could leave!! We approached the manager and told her about our discontent and asked her why this had happened. She gave us excuse after excuse about what was not going right at the restaurant. She never once asked how she could rectify our situation. We told her we would not be back and she watched us walk out the door!
Went there for dinner 7 3 16. Absolutely the worst buffet experience in years. Total waste of time and money! 2 hours in line. Had to pay 86 upgrade fee for my wife and I on top of the Buffet of Buffets Pass. For what??? Yes the shrimps were large and good. Crepes were not bad. NOTHING ELSE! Clam chowder was nothing more than a salty water. The beef had more fat than meat. Basically there was no food to choose from. Not even a regular salad bar that you can get everywhere else. No sushi no nothing. My last time going there.
Unfriendly and unprofessional and unpleasant. The cashiers are exceedingly rude. They lie and change rules from person to person. I wo not give them another penny of my money.
We absolutely love Del Taco but after moving close to this location and trying them several times we have sworn them off unless we are close to the one on Val Vista and Warner. The tortillas are consistently dried out and crunchy on the edges they are assembled half hazard and make a mess and the service at this location absolutely sucks. Avoid this location at all costs!
This Michael s location is so inconsistent...Not to mention that it s located in one of the worst shopping centers in Phoenix. Just trying to park and get into the store can be a headache if you hit it at the wrong time of day. Shelves always seem to be empty...displays are a mess and aisles are difficult to shop. Good luck finding an employee to help you and if you do do not bank on them being friendly. In all fairness I ca not say that all employees are miserable I did have a friendly cashier once but the majority of the time customer service is not a priority at this location. Chances are I wo not be returning after my last visit. I can just as easily go to the Michael s up the street from my house or venture over to Paradise Valley where I have the choice between Michael s and Hobby Lobby.
I have been a Sam s member for many years. On 10 20 18 I had the worst experience at the customer service desk. I would rate this experience 10. I was ignored and pushed aside because I asked for a promotion to renew my membership. Can you believe I was told to sit at the picnic table while so they could wait on other people!!!!! It was a very unpleasant experience. I did email the manager and called the corporate office and yet to get a response!!!! I went back on 10 26 18. At this time Jacklyn waited on me. She very professional and all around a very nice person. I would rate this experience a 5 . I have considered staying a member because this was the only time I had a bad experience as Jacklyn more than made up for it BUT i ca not forget about the event on 10 20 18 and the fact I have received a response from management.
I usually like Wendy s. I think that have some great burgers and who does not like a chocolate frosty. I really think it is just this location. Somehow the service is never that great and the food just is not up to par with other locations. The last time I was here which will probably be the last time I am there I had to wait quite awhile for my food. They managed to finally get half of it ready but were still having trouble getting the burger I ordered together. They finally got it together and I left to go back to work to eat where I discovered after all of that they gave me the wrong sandwich. Make me wait and still get it wrong. Boooooo. At some point I will go back to Wendy s but never to this location. I will gladly drive the 2 extra miles to go to the one on Baseline.
I m very disappointed with this place. The first time I got my eyelashes done which was the CLEOPATRA paid 200 they were good for the only first 2 days than by the 7th day I had less than Half of the lashes on me. I follow every instruction they gave you for the after care even bought the gel concealer and NOTHING. I called by the 8th day to let them know and spoke to Taylor all she said was that I could get a complementary 30 min session fill so they could replace the lashes that had fallen but that I had to go that same day which was on Father s Day so I ended booking the app at 11 30am. got there late cause i had to drive 30 mins to get there. when I called it was only 10 45am and the lady that was in front charging tells me that they cant take me cause I was late and they had more apps so I had to come back some few hours later 4 30pm . WTF!!! Hello its fathers day! I live across the fuckin city from that place like yeah I m gonna come back again. Wasting gas and money Asked her if I could come back tomorrow and she says yes but I would have to pay 29.99 for the 30 min session and thats including the discount they were giving me. Asked why I could not get the 30 min session for free the next day and she says cause i had spoken to Taylor and that she was not the manager there and it would one more day from when I got my eyelashes done! Seriously for one day of a difference. HORRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE!!!! So since I had really liked the way they looked the first day I said yes I did not mind paying so I GO THE NEXT DAY the girl that helped me did a fantastic job she actually gave me an extra half hour but what happens next? They fall off the 4th day of having them. Once again following every step of the after care. I see so much reviews on here talking some wonderful stuff really makes me think if they re even real customers. I do not know if they re product is cheap and thats s why lashes fall off so fast. Not only this happen but the first day I went i booked my app with a certain person and they ended up putting me with a different one. Asked why and they said because they had scheduling problems. Did i had another option? NO!!! So Everything was so uncomfortable. the whole time the person that was doing my eyelashes seemed like she was being nice not because she wanted to more because she had too. No conversation was made. Even felt asleep. I had booked my app with the person I requested cause I had seen her work and also knew her. Later ended talking to her about what had happen and she did not know about none of this. Im just waiting for all this lashes to fall off by them selves. This is HORRIBLE. I pretty much ended spending 255 for lashes that did not even lasted a whole week. Not including gas since i live 30 mins from there and MY TIME which is more valuable than anything else. Since Day 1 everything started wrong and I m mad cause i was really expecting a good job done since the first time. And knowing that I could not spoke to the actual manager is even worst. Not to forget that same day I went there was another customer complaining about her lashes falling the next day she got them done! Too bad it was too late. So anybody that goes here please think twice before spending any dollar. I work hard for my money and to waste over 200 for lashes that did not lasted even a week is very disappointing. Someone has to have more control over this location. Because this is HORRIBLE. and i would definitely not recommend this place to none of my friends. Btw the girl who did my lashes the first time was Alex white girl with red hair horrible experience with her. The second one which was the one who I had requested from the beginning was Natalie lash artist she was Amazing. Oh And i know about all this names they have for there employees based on experience. Even tho I got my apps with lash artists there should not had been a reason why my lashes lasted less than a week.!!!
Well Ambiance was great service terrible entrees terrible. The server never brought our appetizer. We had to ask another server to get drinks. We order a shepherds pie and a chicken pot pie. The shepherds was at least edible. The chicken pot pie was not.
Called to ask about there product and all I got is an attitude on the phone lost my big dollar spending I gave two stars because they picked up the phone
It use to be good... Unfortunately whoever took the reservation did not put it in the system. Upon arrival we were told they were on a walk in status only and should not have taken a reservation regardless... With so many choices in Vegas you ca not afford to have poor customer service..
Could not tell ya how the food is because I never got that far..... After calling 4 times and waiting on hold a total of 15 min I hung up yet again for call number 5! I told the person on the phone this is the 5th time calling and I d like to place an order for delivery I was told were not delivering tonight... mind you it says they deliver and it was 730 pm on a Friday night tonight actually so disgusted with having wasted all that time I hung up. I will NEVER be going to this place...ever!
For anyone that wants to experience a more friendlier service of the Giant Eagle Team members from the service friendly atmosphere well clean store u name it Go to the Giant Eagle in Medina on North Court street. Giant Eagle Medina has one of the most friendliest team members from Lot attendants front end staff cashiers u name it. Need help finding something or need help or an escort to your car etc a Team member will be available to assit you. Be sure to stop by the Medina Giant Eagle for all your friendliest needs that you are looking for not sure if they have it just ask Need assitance with something just ask etc.
I ve been a Sprint customer for about 5 or 6 years. Purchased countless phones Accessories tablets speakers cases etc. I walked in clearly on a mission to be done with them Paying about 250 a month for 2 phones is getting ridiculous I asked the associate how much it would be to break my contract and without any fight he looked up my account and unenthusiastically rattled off a total. Since I am in sales myself I was taken back that there was no question why I was wanting to leave was there anything they could try to help me with was there something they could do to keep me as a customer. Nope. Just a 5 year relationship brushed off with a number. I literally gave they guy a look like seriously and said So you are just going to let me walk out huh. And he gave me a nonchalant shoulder shrug and said Yeah . Great sales team Sprint. Doing a heck of a job on your customer retention!
Can I have a block of cheese with a side of pizza? This pizza was not great...way to much cheese too much sauce and soggy.
Carlos was rude and told me I m a horrible person for trying to use my groupon after it expired. Groupon says I can use it for its value after the expiration date. The guy came and the cleaning was great. After the 2 hrs he told me wait I went upstairs to find the corners of the hallway going upstairs had been torn up by the hoses pulled up there. Paint chipped off chunks of plaster gone etc. I called Carlos and this was his response I should have never done your carpet your a horrible person and no matter what I do you ll find a problem . I have photos to support this. I said I d just like the area where the chicks came off patched up and the rest of the corners I can just repaint. He continued to tell me he does not believe me and to text him the pictures. I texted him and received no message yet.
Watery bitter latte. Desserts tasted like they were from a grocery store not store made. Better gelato can be had elsewhere. Spend your money at the many other dessert and coffee shops in the area.
Was there on 3 23 18 Food was ok. The manager went around and spoke to everyone s table except mine. Never again
Came here on a Friday night with 4 friends. 4 very hungry friends. 4 hungry friends plus me that s like 7 hungry assholes. The place was nicely decorated. We were seated at a table with a single grill we cook efficiently so that was not too much of a problem. Got the basic AYCE no wagyu. We ordered a little bit of everything for the first round and the food came quickly. Meat was good and I enjoyed the other non meat options. Do not forget to get the lettuce to wrap yo meat! It pretty much goes downhill from there. Forgotten orders looooonnng wait times for food. I waited for my 2nd bibimbap for nearly 40 minutes.... do you know what it s like to eat asian style barbecued beef with no rice? Do you?!?!? No you do not cuz you d probably be dead. We ended up staying 3 hours even though it s a 2 hour limit mainly because we spent so much time waiting. At least they did not ask us to leave after 2 hours otherwise... tables would have been flipped. Our grill mesh was not changed until the 2 hour mark. At Gyubee which is also very busy they changed it 4 times in 90 minutes without us asking their service is so attentive it gets in the way of your eating! Good thing Shinta does not have that problem amiright?! If Shinta fixes their speed and memory loss issues problems mentioned in a gajillion of the other reviews I d recommend this place. But until then it s not all you can eat it s all you can glare cuz that s what you ll be doing all night at the staff and possibly your friends who you ll be fighting for what s left on the grill. One saving grace was one of our servers Michael. He was quick with whatever we asked of him and he knew how of fix our grill which stopped firing a couple times for some reason several of the other servers did not know how to get it going again . Anyway thanks Michael keep up the good work. Will return just for you no homo .
I purchased just the basic package since I m not a big tanner and did not want to pay a lot every month. I understand that since i had the cheapest package i would have the most basic of beds but they have a fan that on the highest setting is not felt at all so you sweat like crazy and it is hanging off the wall and ready to fall. Also there are 2 beds for the basic package and both beds bed 13 and 15 make a pop sound every minute or so. It feels and sounds like the plexiglass is just going to break apart. I mentioned both of these things to the front desk and the reply was yeah we hear that a lot . You would think that since they have heard this they should fix it. I would not recommend this place if you want an inexpensive tanning package.
Having been to Helena s cafe Cantinho de Lisboa that morning and loving the atmosphere and the food we were anxious to try Helena s food at her restaurant that night. To our shocking surprise the service unbelievably terrible. My wife and our one year old were on a vacation in Montreal. We brought our little guy to the restaurant in a stroller since it was late and he was fast asleep. Despite having several seats available in the front of the restaurant the host sat us all the way in the back making another table get up so that we could wheel our stroller in. It was an embarrassing situation for many. I guess they did not want us to ruin their style by having a stroller by fine tables in the front. We did not have the menus at first again shows the terrible job the host was doing. Our waiter comes by 15mins later realizes we do not have menus drops the menus by and disappears again for 30mins. 45mins have gone by after sitting down and no one has even taken our order. When the waiter finally comes by he flips out when I tell him there has been a significant wait to just put in an order. Needless to say we could not stay there any longer. We had to make the other table get up again so that we could wheel our stroller out. The manager tried to mitigate the issue by NOW offering us the table in the front but that consideration came way too late in the process and there was nothing that restaurant that could fix the evening.
i brought my grandson in because of a fever and sore throat. he has been going to Southwest Medical for the last 10 years for all of his medical needs shots etc. He just turned 18 has a current school ID with his picture and same medical insurance he has had since we adopted him 10 years ago. they refused to see him because he does not have a state ID yet. They told us it is the law. Really I could see if he was a brand new patient or did not have any identification there would be limitations. but he has been going there for 10 years. They are a bunch of idiots they did not care that he had strep throat. I ended up bringing him to a different urgent care on Cheyenne and Durango they had no problem with his ID or his insurance. So much for it being the law honestly my faith in the medical field has dwindled in the last few years.
Visiting Vegas in the Venetian and read the reviews. 4 stars??? This is a chain restaurant with just Ok but way overpriced food. Started with a 10 draft beer. Great selection but the price gauging had just begun. Add insult to injury and yelp offered a free beer on check in. Talk about a bait and switch! When you try to redeem it with a meal they tell you that it for a miller. WTF? They could not tell you then on the yelp offer? It would not have changed my mind on going but it was deceptive. Had poutine fries. Pretty good but pricey at 13 bucks. Had pub burger which was at best average but at 19 ridiculous. Wife had the lobster mac and cheese. Again just at or below average in quality. Place was empty and perhaps this portends things to come here.
After hearing about this place on DD and D I was really looking forward to trying a new pizza place. Unfortunately my experience was less than stellar. We came in on a Thursday night to a bar that was at best 40 filled. It took 15 minutes for the waitress to even come over and take our drink order not for lack of trying to get her attention and another 20 just to get our drinks. Considering we ordered a water and a soda I was a little disappointed. When the pizza finally arrived it was a little greasey. My friend got a standard pizza pepperoni and I got one of their specialty pies. He was disappointed but I thought the pizza was pretty decent. I just would have liked a refill on my water without having to ask the waitress three times. I worked in food service for many years so I understand that things can happen. But if that s the wait time on a slow Thursday night I would hate to be there on a weekend. Overall respectable pizza service that left something to be desired. Probably worth giving a second chance though.
Since my dealings with you my experience has been supported by several others I have spoken with so you tell it how you want. Good day Sir.
I used to really like this doc but would not recommend anyone going here now. Here is what happened on my visit on Monday What s Gleevac? I tell her it is chemo. Why are you on chemo? for the leukemia I answer. You have leukemia? is it a new diagnosis there is not any record of it in your chart. Um no. I have been in 3or 4 times since I was diagnosed a few years ago. I was just in right before my surgery in November. You had surgery? We have no record of that either. You guys did the EKG that I needed before the surgery. We did? bangs head repeatedly on wall I swear the staff works on commission too. You call to get a recommendation for another doc and they make you come in my EKG I needed for my surgery they wanted to make me come back in for another appt to send the results to the surgeon even though they said it was fine when i had it done. They called after the surgery after the hospital notified them I was in and said I HAVE to yes in just that tone come in for a follow up with them. I told them no I would follow up with the doc who did the surgery. What a shame because Dr Sink was really good.
We paid them 700 and left our car there 3 days and all they did was break the cruise control apparently because the manager is scared of his mechanics. All we wanted was to be able to fill my gas tank without the gas pump shutting off every few seconds. I told them that I suspected it was the evaporative canister. On the third day they tricked my wife letting them clean the fuel injectors cause that could be the problem...swindlers! I went down paid the bill told the manager at the time that they were obviously robbing us and took our car back. The manager apologized explaining that he has trouble with and does not get along with the mechanic he kept assigning to our car but he s been working there a long time so there s nothing the manager could do about it. I replaced some exhaust valve on evaporative canister that was blocked up and then the gas began filling up fine. It was easy and cost 8. It s acting up again so I will replace the whole canister this time and it will cost like 80.
I moved from Seattle WA to Phoenix AZ and bought over 30 pieces from Tommy Bahamas. I was new to Tommy s and in the middle of packing and ordered several items online. I returned several pieces in the WA University Village and Scottsdale Fashion Square stores and got different sizes. While in the stores I bought additional pieces. The exact number of pieces that I kept during my 6 month buying spree was 31. Was I surprised to get a letter from Tommy Bahamas that stated they had reviewed my return history. They requested that I contact their Loss Prevention Manager by a stated deadline to discuss the reasons for my returns. I was terribly insulted to receive this letter. I considered myself a VIP. It is none of Tommy Bahamas business why I decided to return clothing that was too big or too small especially since they advertised hassle free returns on their website. I noticed they have since taken down that hassle free returns graphic. I submitted a complaint on their Facebook page. A year later I gave Tommy Bahamas another try and ordered a white jean jacket and pink tank top online. A week after receiving the clothing I went into the same Scottsdale store and returned the pink tank top. It was scratchy and overpriced for the quality. The manager whom I recognized from my trips to the store a year earlier asked me to wait while she went to the back room to retrieve something. She left my credit card and pink tank top right on the counter which was in reach of any customer who happened to pass by. When she returned the employee handed me a sealed envelope with my name neatly handwritten on it. I looked at it and asked her what it was. She did not answer. I told her I thought it might be an apology. I decided to open it and was shocked to see that it was an exact copy of the letter Tommy Bahamas sent me a year earlier only it had a slightly different date. The letter had been stored in Tommy s back room for over one year. I think this employee showed very poor judgement holding onto the letter that long and then deciding to make me wait while she retrieved it then following through with handing it to me. If you like to order things online and use your home as the dressing room then I do not recommend Tommy Bahamas based on my experiences.
I know that no one really likes going to the airport now a days. You feel more like a piece of cattle working its way through a stockyard then a valued customer. However this airport certainly does not make that experience any better. Most of the facility is under construction but there is dust and dangerous construction equipment like pickaxes just strewn all about. The security line took almost an hour because they only had one woman checking the IDs at the end of the line creating a bottleneck to get to the security scanners. At the very end of my hour as I was nearing the destination three more people suddenly set up ID checking booths. Why did it take so long for them to realize that they were undermanned? Bathrooms at this airport are few and far between. I looked in the A terminal there were bathrooms at A3.... and A25. I do not know how recently anyone reading this has been to an airport but 22 Gates is a really long distance to walk to go to the bathroom. My flight was going out of A7 so I was not completely out of luck... But I feel for people that had a gate address in the teens. There were not A lot of choices for food or snacking the construction had blocked off whole sides of the terminal and it seems like the restaurants had just closed. I do not usually have much choice where my flights connect into but personally I would not want to have to stop at this airport again anytime soon. Or maybe I will check back and see if they are done with all this awful construction that takes away so many amenities.
THE WORST NAIL SALON I HAVE DEALT WITH. Got my nails done here with my daughter both gels. After a week one of my nails chipped off. The next week another one was peeling off. My daughter s gels still looked fine. I went in to talk to someone about it and the guy I spoke to was AWFUL. He told me that gels are not meant to last longer than 2 weeks and I needed to get them redone which is not true . He refused to admit they did not do a good job and was flat out rude about it. I told him when I go to my usual nail place they never chip this fast and if I ever have a problem they re very professional and nice about it. His response was well go back to them and have it fixed. Terrible customer service will NOT be going back. Would not recommend this place to anyone.
1 Star is too much for the experience I had at The Bank. I was promised by a promoter Joseph a table for a friend s 21st birthday. Less than one hour of sitting at the table we were rudely and forcibly removed from the table with no explanation but call Joseph . Now I know the table and alcohol was free but do not make promises you ca not keep and ruin a 21st birthday party. Bottom line forget The Bank and it s shady promoters exist.
My family went to this practice for 20 years. We stopped because we finally got fed up with the Invisilign sales pitches. They are great for pointing out alleged dental flaws.
This company is literally operated by two persons manager and assistant. You wo not get amount of rent income what you are suppose pay because manager is stealing the money month by month by billing you unnecessary house repair or some other things. I ve been ripped off and have to leave them.
Brace yourself. This is a sad story. I had a 2 year old husky named Kiba. Kiba developed coughing and sneezing the same time my other dog did. I gave him Benadryl and the symptoms seemed to be going away except for the lack of appetite which was not uncommon for him to be finicky. I never had any idea his liver was failing. His brain apparently swelled and he started acting sick while I was at work so my parents met me here with him. It was too late for him though and he died within an hour of being brought here. I do not blame them for the death of my dog but I do not appreciate their lack of compassion in handling a grieving pet owner. Positives They were very clinical and helped me understand what was happening to my dog so I could make the best choices for him. The vet tech was very professional in my interactions with him Negatives The vet while very clinical had horrible bedside manner. She talked in a way that me feel like she was blaming me for not knowing my dog was as sick as he was. Additionally the receptionist had no concept on how to be sensitive to a horrible situation. After she knew my dog had passed and seen how tragic it was for me she called Have a good night after us when we left which feels completely inappropriate and is only one example of her inability to approach a grieving family with any semblance of empathy. Additionally I received a note in the mail a few days later that was signed by the staff of the entire clinic in a manner reminiscent of birthday cards that go around in the office. This upset me more as it felt inappropriate and lacking in any real sympathy. They may be able to provide emergency vet services in a competent way but their emotional intelligence is severely lacking.
Live close to this place and it s awful but at least its expensive. They should hand sign during business hours that reads Sorry We re Open .
Ho Hum another Authentic Neapolitan Pizza store. No it is not good. Save your dollar go to another pizza place.
I gave Shane s two stars only because the wings have plenty of meat. The service is a par below my favorite gas station Quicktime. This is the second time here and last. You would think cheese fries would not be an issue. I was told that we do not melt the cheese
If you get the right table you do get a lovely view. But it is SO crowded that I ca not believe the Las Vegas Fire Marshalls allow the number of people they squeeze in. Scary crowded. Food is WAY overpriced.....and not very good. kind of blah. The food is French Wannabe not really French not really anything to tell the truth expect too expensive and dull. Go up see the view and LEAVE.
VERY AND UNHAPPY WITH MASTERS KENNELS!!!!! We signed up for training classes after talking to Greg and his wife Arlene on the phone. There were two different instructors during the course and their training styles contradicted each other. One trainer telling us the other trainer was less qualified because she used to train at Pets Mart. After expressing my frustrations with her the instructor became very rude. Not a people person. After this frustrating experience we tried to get a hold of Greg and left three messages with his wife never receiving a call back. When we called and finally got a hold of Greg several weeks later he told us he would put us in the next level class free of charge to compensate for the negative experience. We were pleased and decided to give their class another try. We showed up to class a week later to a new instructor who was much better. But Arlene called us a few days later to tell us her Husband Greg never told us we could take the class free of charge and that we had misconstrued the information. We were not allowed to continue the class unless we were willing to pay for the class in full. Terrible customer service.
If you ve been to a Golden Corral buffet you ve already had a better buffet with twice the selection and double the quality for half of the price. There was not a single item worth going back for seconds for except a necessary a refill on Pepsi to get the dry and overlooked food down. The sushi was dry. The corn bread was dry. The waffle fries were fried to a crisp. If this buffet was 6.99 I would have given it a 3 stars. Skip this casino buffet and go find an all you can eat Korean BBQ buffet and you ll have food 5x better for a lower price. You were warned. If you re from any big city you ve already had buffets better than this. Go eat a 2.99 hot dog next door at casino royal and at least you wo not feel like your money would have been better spent on slots.
nasty nasty nasty found. ticks in food!!! never ever ever again and owner did not refund money horrible selection as well never been to a worse asian buffet in my life!!!!!!
I went here looking for a new spring coat since the weather has warmed up and I was in the area. From what I experienced I m not surprised that they are closing. The salespeople were the opposite of helpful and did not do a good job of making me feel like buying something. It did not really matter since most of the styles were outdated and overpriced compared to other men s stores out there.
I ca not even give this place one star but I need to in order for my review to go up. They are very unprofessional and rude. They do not know what good customer service truly means. I am very disappointed of this place and they should really consider closing it down or passing it on to another owner. Do not waste your time or money!! Go up to Alma School and visit Delightful Nails. I love that place!
I was in this store earlier today with my friend and small daughter. I was looking for a subzero fridge freezer combo. I was not greeted or acknowledged the entire 20 minutes I was looking on the sales floor. There were at least 5 6 salesmen that did not even make eye contact. My friend noticed the same awkward and unprofessional behavior. Such a shame they seem to have a nice selection but I ll have to purchase from someone who is knowledgeable in customer service as well as high end appliances.
Call Corleone s only if you have two hours for delivery. The online order response told us 50 minutes. Horrible manager on duty. We called. Told us at 60 minutes the driver was in the car. Told us at 110 minutes that driver left 15 minutes ago. One of those has to be a lie right? Told us Online says it s 50min but really it is 90min. Food arrived 2hrs late. On dot. They never tried to update us or treat us honestly just kept feeding us lines. Kept calling me boss which I wish were true. Driver was nice enough and hustled said he was not even a driver but instead a cook. Do not know who to blame. But I know we wo not be calling Corleone s again. Or going in person.
Worst waitress ever I wish I could remember her name! Never thought their pizza was worth it anyway but other people fall for the hype and I get dragged here only to hear the others in my group think it was just ok pizza. Do not fall for the hype and I typically get bad service every time I am forced to go here. Thank god Giordano s is coming!!!!!!
This place gets worse every time I go. I thought it would be great to have a vegan place so close to my house but not this place. The food typically takes 30 45 minutes to get regardless of the amount of customers and it s cold and bland when it arrives. Like you d think if it takes so long it would at least be hot.... But anyways... It s really disappointing because someone who has their first experience with vegan food here is going to have a bad experience. Which is so bad because there s so much amazing vegan food out there!! Do yourself a favor and try literally any other vegan restaurant in Vegas.
So to be fair BR31 is my fave ice cream spot. Usually I m highly satisfied no matter which location i visit. However tonight was extremely disappointing. Our ice cream tender was not that friendly and the scoops were barely a scoop. He did one scrape across the top which I ve seen kiddie scoops more full than this. I m highly disappointed and feel jipped for my money. Here s the two scoop sundae we paid 6 for standing outside the establishment. Sad.
Cheap food for a low price. If you re going on a budget you should come here. The food is rather bland though. Service was meh.
71 American Grille is a great place for us Vistancia folk to eat. We ve been waiting for a venue like this forever. Simple menu and reasonable prices. We tried the burger and the patty melt. They were both excellent. Really liked the fries as well. Wish they had a cheaper version of the bulldog drink that Blu Agave had previous to 71. I think 71 s is about 12?? That is our all time favorite drink!
I broke an iPhone 6 screen. took it to them to have it replaced. while it was being replaced I went and bought an iphone6s plus. picked the 6 up and it looked good. took it home put it in a drawer. just pulled it out yesterday to realize there glue failed and the screen was not sitting in the actual phone!!!! I take it to them. they said since it is a month out of there warranty they wont fix it. you could see the dust on the phone. broke my6splus and they wanted almost 300 bones to fix it.... batteries and bulbs is 169. Cellairis does not back there workmanship and they are way over priced.
cleanness was far away from this salon. two stylists were giving horrible haircuts. never seen anything like that. they were sunglasses while they cut hair??? why n how??? how do they fade with darkness covering their eyes??? they scared me enough to walk out without hesitation. i am very sorry for those customers who have to put up with their hairs for while but i am truly thank them for their sacrificed... that s minus one star...
I ca not believe prices for being Mexican food...rice And beans Are one of the most un expensive products and sadly people still do not know how to prepare this.
BEWARE OF THIS PLACE. For real this place is VERY shady and will do anything to rip you off even if it means messing with your car so that you have to come back again. I went in there for the first time for an oil change and for them to replace my wipers. I got the oil change and then had them order all the parts for my wipers. I called the next day and turns out they didnt even order them. But that is not even the worst part that night i found my two front tires completely flat. They said they would have it towed there for 75 dollars then they would fix it along with my wipers. I had a friend some over and check it out who knew about cars and he told me someone took the metal piece OUT of the air valve of my tires. Obviously they did it do to make sure i came back to spend EVEN MORE money But after finding out they took out those metal pieces of my tires. I could have been seriously injured or even killed because they wanted to make extra cash. I find this COMPLETELY disturbing and i would never EVER go back to this place or even the company. Another reason why i knew they were being shady was everytime they said something it was something different with another technician who knew what was going on. Also when i was on the phone about my tires i told one of the guys that I had read all their reviews online and most of them are bad and about the same things that happened to me. after I said that to him my bill mysteriously changed to be lower. still I am not going back somewhere that pretty much almost threatened my life.
Very good food but not as good as it should be for the price... Tomato in the caprese salad was unripe and a bit mealy this is totally unforgivable as tomato is 1 3 of this dish s ingredients. Sauce on the ahi pasts dish was extremely oily and almost totally flavorless. Wild mushroom ravioli was outstanding. Gelato is almost as good as real Italian gelato delicious. Servers are a bit pretentious but not outright rude. Good wine menu. Dinner for two with a bottle of wine no dessert one appetizer 95
Been eating at this location for about 10 years. Service had gotten really bad lately.
The new policy Of no table Service is awful the hostes can not serve you even a glass of water. The food is not that good is used to be but the prices are the same or higher . Bad. Bad bad
I really want to like this place but it always seems to fall short. Tonight was no exception. Ordered a bottle of wine...only had half a bottle of what we requested. Ordered bread not complementary here to munch on while waiting for dinner. Had to ask for it twice. When food finally arrived mine was just barely warm. I asked for Parmesan. She came back with it half way through my meal. Once things were brought to the table it seemed she never came back to see how things were. I watched as one waitress was bussing her table after her party left and she broke some glasses. No one stepped in helped her! She had to clean it up herself! No bussers here? And apparently no teamwork here either. We watched servers walk by tables with empty dishes and glasses and did not bother taking something with them as they went back towards the kitchen. Finally my husband s birthday which I wrote on the online reservation. No mention of it....Customer service is sorely lacking here.
Not worth the price. Where do I begin... when I first moved in I knew right away the whole roommate pairing was bs. I mean how can you expect for them to match personalities of everyone who lives here in the first place. The place is decent. I lived in the master bedroom of a four bedroom which is only a little bigger with a small walk in closet and a bathtub. The carpet in my room is outdated from every other carpet I ve seen I was told one day it was going to be changed because of how old it was and it was never touched cleaned. The walls and fan were filled with dust and the bathtub was filthy. I cleaned the whole place with bleach just to be safe. They supply you with a mattress which is similar to the ones you get in a dorm uncomfortable and small. Due to the fact I have back problems I asked if it would be okay for me to bring my own mattress and get rid of theirs. They gave me such a problem about it telling me I would have to pay for a storage unit? Finally they came and took it away after sitting in my hall way for two months. The kitchen is extremely small and cheap. My stove top is filthy and almost impossible to clean. The microwave was cracked so management put duct tape over it to cover it up. The fridge is spacious but was also dirty upon arrival. The counter top is extremely cheap and peels easily. The dishwasher does 1 2 a job and garbage disposal was often breaking. Laundry room closet was decent. You ca not fit a queen comforter in the wash or dryer but it is pretty decent. Living room floors are cheap. The couches are a sad excuse. Easily torn maintenance replaced once after multiple complaints then they stopped replacing them. The living room table the apartment comes iwith is pretty useless at least it was for my roommates and i. Balcony disgusting floor no view. Gym outdated equipment. Dirty equipment and above the study room? Study room never in use maybe because it s underneath a gym. Pool outdated not in the sun Front desk they are mostly students so you can expect the service you will get. Management JAMES is amazing. Always helpful and kind. Security come and go pretty safe place to live. Maintenance fast response rate. Got the job done the first time. Overall I m very unsatisfied with my experience here. For my first apartment it really made me have trust issues and doubts. The good thing was that the 700 a month I pay went towards wifi heat cable. Their website pictures are not accurate what so ever. I wish they were a better company.
Well my soup was only Luke warm and my grilled cheese had cheese that was that kind that is hard to chew .... you know like plastic...... but the worst was the ice machine......it was covered in green and brown stuff! I will not be back!
i m not a usual sprouts shopper and usually go to walmart or target to get my normal everyday necessities and grocery items but decided to stop by sprouts on my way back from the gym. this location at first seemed very clean and healthy with the variety of options in the produce section but when taking a closer look there were many holes in the fruits and i even saw a bug sticking out of one of the apples! decided to give a second change to the vegetables only to find things to be much worse. the lettuce was brown ing the carrots soft and the cucumbers molding. 10 10 would not recommend and would much rather go to walmart or target to get your produce for a much better price! sprouts says their food is healthier and organic but is it really better for you?
This place is terrible. The waitress did not know the menu the food was ok but the bread was so dry and tasteless and overpriced.The bartender inside gave me a porter when I asked for a kolsch. They were also hosting a stupid white party and they threatened to throw me out if I did not pay the cover charge to go inside the bar when all I was trying to do was close my tAb. We were drinking outside cause the people and the music BLASTING inside was horrendous. If you like craft beer good food and good service. DO NOT go here. Save your time and money. The person who owns this place is failing.
Sadly we were disappointed. As a frequent visitor as the Scottsdale Poke restaurant we were excited to find something closer. We wo not be coming back. The lettuce was the iceberg cabbage carrot mix from the grocery. The iceberg was brown and had to be picked out. There really was nothing flavorful outside of the crab mix and avocado. With Poke restaurants popping up everywhere this one has a lot of things to do to match its competitors.
Searching for a good deal on a massage I thought Wet Spa at TI was a a great find after comparing it to the 200 massages at the Venetian and Wynn. I was not expecting the same level but still nice since it was a pretty brand new spa at the time. I was excited especially since I just had a baby 3 months prior and needed to get pampered. But the experience was a huge disappointment. The front desk was not friendly and they were just plain rude. They were snobs. The facilities were nice and clean. But the snack and beverage bar was not stocked and needed a replenishment in which the staff failed to do the entire 1 hour I was waiting for my massage. Yes my masseuse was 1 hour late. When I asked the girls who were chatting away about their personal lives every so often about my masseuse they just kept saying yeah she ll be here in a minute not even bothering to check. FINALLY my masseuse was ready. Right away I got a bad feeling that it was not going to be a good experience. She failed to turn down the lights like other places do and I had to stare at her dirty sneakers. What was worse she was sick! Her nose was runny and she started sneezing. Immediately I stopped her and asked if she was sick and she said yes really really sick. I had to stop the massage and asked for my money back. The front desk was rude about it and asked me what I wanted to do. I asked for a manager. She came and was kind enough to apologize and give back my money without question. But I will never return to this place again. You get what you pay for I guess.
I ordered food for pick up and was less than satisfied. My order was 24 medium wings 10 barbecue wings and a large order of fries for a grand total of 47.60. Picked the food up and the bartender was friendly. The barbecue wings were OK. They were not sauced evenly but they still had adequate sauce on them. The medium wings did not come sauced. Instead they were just fried wings sitting in a tray of separated buffalo sauce. The wings themselves were dry and chewy and the bones were broken making them difficult to eat. The fries were totally soggy even though I walked in the door as the food was being bagged and had less than a 5 minute drive home . On top of that it was clear the fries were from earlier in the day and had sat for a while and then been fried again. Before I left I was told they put extra celery and ranch 9 plastic cups of it . When I pulled the paper bag of celery and ranch out of the large bag the bottom of the bag ripped and all the ranch landed on the floor soaking into my carpet. The food was not the worst I ve had but I would not recommend getting take out from Duckworths. It seems like they cut corners on to go orders and do not properly package things. For 47.60 I expected a better experience.
The only thing missing from this place is a stripper pole. If your going on a date with a girl DON T GO HEAR. All of the staff are some hot sexy chicks your ass is going to get in trouble. The last time I was there I could not stop myself from staring at booty and cleavage. I ca not even remember what the food was like.
I was disappointed in this place overall. The service was slow the decor a bit cheesy and the food was average at best. The fried noodles seemed stale and the vegetables were not well cooked. The best part was the deep fried eggplant dish but the rest was really okay. I hate to rate family owned places lower but they need to focus more on getting the food right rather than trying to modernize their ambience.
I have been here before many times. I was a little irritated when they upcharge you for 4 tomato slices that was substituted for toast and if you do not like their homemade sausage and want all bacon they upcharge for that also. I mentioned this to my server and she explained that bacon is the most expensive meat and that they have been upcharging since they opened. I think 99 cents for a substitute for tomato slices is a bit much. I was also confused by the servers response that that is what the owner does and that I m low man on the totem pole. Weird experience.
The movers Eli Kyle did a fast job. Could have been better by not storing the garage full of clearly mark boxes... however I will take responsibility for not checking watching over them... I will however not accept responsibility for a cracked tv that was working right before the move. I ca not say they did it.. But I will say they could have shared in the responsibility... at least the part in Leaving boxes in garage and downstairs... I do appreciate their effort and pleasantries..
Went to his business 3 days ago to ask about pricing for buffing out scratches and maybe a paint restoration if needed. The scratches were fairly small and it was a brand new car. He quoted me 325 and said he would also detail in and out of the car. Even though i didnt need detailing because it was new. Thur morning I told him that I need to reschedule because i couldnt drop the car off at the time. He said he can just come pick up the car red flag and so me being niave said okay. We come back later evening and he said the window tints werent done correctly and that he would call up the guy who did my tints and ask that guy to replace them. Going on fri morning he tells me the guy wouldnt fix them and that he would just replace the tints as a courtesy free of charge and would also do my seat covers so I said thats fine. I come back later in the day and hes still fixing some stuff up with the seat covers and so I waited. So after about an hour and they install everything he asked me to be fair and asked for 150 for the tints. The tints he said that were done as a courtesy. I appreciate all the work his guys put in cleaning up my car and I m sure they dont even get paid enough or recognized for the work while he is collecting most of the money. What do you guys think?
If I could give less that one star I would. The staff was extremely rude. We checked in and had to be moved due to a major leak that was flooding the room. Then they were rude to my fiance when he went to request service in the room. When they moved us and put us in a room smaller than the original one with a view of the AC unit. Upon checking out they charged us a 30 resort fee per day when it was advertised at only 20. Then when I asked for a discount because of the room change and leak the front desk lady treated me terribly rude and said that the issue had been resolved and she would not help us. She also said the up charge of 10 a night was tax on the 20.. last time I checked tax was not that steep. I travel all the time and have never experienced a hotel with worse customer service.
If I could give zero stars I would!!! I will never ever come here again. Rude staff with bad attitude at the front desk.. almost everything is broken including lights and sounds on games my food took an hour to get. Which was only two pizzas. I also got the salad bar but guess what the staff there could not have enough work ethic to fill it without being told!!! Literally out of lettuce ham eggs croutons! Un freaking believable!!! When my kids took there tickets to get stuff the response they got was I m sorry we re out even though they sitting right there in the window. We asked can we have the one in window no sorry we do not do that then my kid could not make up her mind so the guy says oh my God and Huff s and puffs! then I asked to borrow a lighter to light my kids cake we do not have one seriously you have birthdays and you do not have lighters! So non the less I mouthed off and told them I was never ever coming here again! Ever! And I was going to leave a terrible but honest review everywhere!!! So here I am!!! I was a long time customer!! Never ever ever ever again!
I have called Vivint Security numerous times about home security system. Panel never works updates takes forever. I just came home and went to my panel to turn security off. I tried at the panel. It would not let me. System was updating again. Anyone could ve robbed my house as alarm should have went off. No one from Vivint called me to check on alarm. I called them and was told it needed to reboot. So as I said I could ve been walking in my house to an intruder. I do not feel safe with this security system. I ve complained numerous times and asked to be let out of contract was told I would have to pay 2 400.00 to get out. They need to cancel my contract and take there equipment. I will go to the BBB and to my Attorney. I hope no one else has to go through what I ve been going through. I wish I would have never left ADT for this system. Please if anyone else has or is going through this file complaint. I would not have given even one star not deserving of one star. This is in my opinion the worse company. They all seem to understand..No you do not I fear for my family s safety. I Am at my wits ends with this security system. You just sucker people in to contracts do not provide the service we signed up for. It s like a scam to me. I ve called and done my part do yours Vivint and let us all out of our contract..Maybe a Class Action Lawsuit will get your attention. Nothing else seems to. I m not the only one dissatisfied with your service.
Was here last night. Two very pregnant ladies one with celiac disease gluten makes her acutely sick . The server was a bit of a jerk and not very helpful when asked what on the menu might be gluten free. Food was good. Service continued to be rude and inattentive. Fast forward to next day wife has stomach cramps and vomiting. Called to ask if there was raw egg in her pasta there was and the guy I got sounded like it could have been the same server as before was a complete jerk on the phone about everything. So now we get to sit here an worry about whether she has salmonella from a raw egg. Not going back.
After seeing great reviews on Yelp thought I d try it out with my daughter who loooves sushi and my sis. The setting was nice clean simple. but not too fond of bench style seating without backs. Fish was fresh altho nothing spectacular. presentation of food... simple service was good. Our waitress was very polite smiley and very attentive...when it was just us in the whole place but then after 2 couples total 4 people came in our she forgot about us. No sake or beer. Green tea was served lukewarm and came with a tea bag which I found too light in taste and even coloration. Sushi chef looked unhappy and not cordial at all. Overall... an OK place if you want to eat and run. Too expensive for what was offered. It s more of an express sushi joint than a restaurant to hang out take time to eat sip talk and enjoy the place. I did not find the value in the food ambiance and the experience or lack of it . I do not think we ll be back. There are other places in town that has comparable or even better sushi livelier setting and more to offer for less money.
I feel no nostalgia or sympathy for the Bonanza Gift Shop. For an entire year I lived next door to this musty chamber of horrors. Out of sheer convenience and desperation I purchased their stale potato chips and dusty bottles of wine. Each experience attacked my dignity and my wallet leaving me feeling somehow less of a person. Apart from their miserable overpriced stock featuring monstrosities like Vendage and Barefoot chardonnay I always felt unwelcome here. In the parking lot there was usually an inebriate slumped against the wall loud music bumping from a parked car and a drifting panhandler screaming at the ground. The security guards snatch your bags the moment you enter and follow you around the room. Paying with a credit card necessitates mutiple ID checks and clerks scribbling down inscrutable numbers. I ve had a few truly absurd incidents here. Once I decided to save a tree and bring in my own reusable shopping bag. Not happening. Despite my protests the guard insisted I check the empty bag then vanished for the next half hour while I waited. Adding insult to injury they request your reciepts at the door and sometimes follow you outside. With all this security and suspicion you d assume the Star of Brazil was displayed somewhere on the premises. But no...all you ll find here is mini liquor bottles cheap wine and shameless kitsch. If you re just looking for a beer walk an extra block north to the Circle K. If however you re in the mood to be gouged and harassed then this is the place!
If Hemingway had visited Cold Tea and then written about it the next morning it would have gone something like this There was a small road that led off of a big road. You were guided into a narrow concrete hallway. It was lined with the rags of the morning. You go into a small concrete box where men and women ride out the vestiges of imagined courage. And if you stand in a particular corner you can smell the desperation and you can see the haunted looks. After awhile it gets hot and you have to leave.
The food here has beautiful presentation but nearly no taste. The portions are huge we got the famous chicken Benedict and the biscuits and gravy. Both were served on a giant bed of tasteless mashed red potatoes and the biscuits and gravy had barely enough gravy to make a thin layer over the biscuits. The service was terrible the waits were long...save yourself the time and money and go someplace else. Or try a pancake. Maybe they are better?
Was out in the area and needed to bring home a quick and reliable meal around dinner time. DT has pretty much never ever failed me. EVER! That was until......I came to this place. Not a lot of vehicles in the drive thru so I thought I scored. Rolling up to the squawk box I was patient with the not so pleasant order taker. The order was made in quick fashion. I rolled around to the window and after stopping immediately felt tension radiating out from the window. Awkward tension....anger tension. I tried to engage the order taker but they were really having none of it. I watched as my chow was thrown into a bag and brought towards me. No stop at the sauce tray no asking what sauce I wanted. Figuring the food had already been made and not having to fear any retaliation I asked for sauce. Sauce and attitude.......yummy. Now I do not live around the corner but I do not live that far away. The 215 makes for a quick trip back to the casa. When I arrived and threw the spread out on the kitchen table my quesadilla landed like a folded up frisbee. In retrospect a frisbee might taste like my quesadilla did. My bean burritos looked like who ever made them was trying to choke them. The choking killed them....no heart and no substance. Knowing what I know now.....there are a few other locations in the relative immediate area. This one is off the radar and I will seek out those alternate locations in the future.
My first visit there was not a good one. The service was very slow. My sister and I got the lunch special which was the boneless wings and i swear Tyson s wings which come in a bag are much better. I was hoping it was just a fluke and decided to give it another try. So later the same week I took my family there for dinner. I was not busy at all yet the service was still incredibly slow. We were there for almost 2 hours. It took roughly 45 mins for us to even get our food. Again the food was nothing to write home about. I spent 11 on a salad which would would have been fine if it was actually half decent. Sadly the 3 Walmart salad kits that come in a bag are a heck of a lot better. I would not recommend this establishment to anyone to be completely honest nor will I be giving it another chance.
Lovely atmosphere and beautiful crowd but I had to ask for and add salt to my steak and eggs brunch never a good sign when food is not seasoned by the chef. Fun for drinks and people watching.
Ok I have had three good oil changes here with great customer service. My mercedes started leaking oil. Parked it for a few months was bummed out thought itwas my head gasket. Which i replaced already come to find out my oil drain gasket was not put back on this was the last place my oil was changed. Thank goodness it was an easy fix but alot of stress so will NOT go back i would have given them five stars if it wasnt for this!!!
Over priced food that under performs in taste and consistency. that would be my one sentence description or review. Sure the girls are good looking sure your beer is about 1 2 per beer priced for it sure the girls are not making that extra 1 or 2 in their paycheck I am sure they are still 3 per hour plus tips The beer is cold but actually ANY BEER SNOB would tell you the idea temperature for beer is between 40 50 degrees F. NOT 29degrees. the location is pretty good off of FLW and 101 so it is a meeting site we have used on multiple occasions big parking lot helps. but everything inside could be dramatically improved if they were not after the horny old men or the party guys in the neighborhood. it is a very popular place to watch fight night. Food is over priced an average at best. at least unlike Zipps down the street it is consistent. Zipps is not even consistent!
After spending more than 1600 at All Team Auto Repair and Collision here is why I will never do business with them again 1. I paid upfront to ensure replacement parts would arrive when car scheduled to be repaired. 2. The parts did not arrive in time. 3. When parts finally arrived they were not inventoried. Turns out that still not all parts arrived. 4. Finally repair reportedly completed . 5. When I arrived car not fully repaired as I expected. Informed only when I came to pick up car that they could not fix a part but would require more money to order new part to fully repair it 800 . They should have told me this information on the phone so I would not arrive expecting a complete repair. 6. Also repair on car was shoddy. Bumper not aligned properly. Chalky substance in cracks and crevices around car. White powder on carpet in trunk. White fingerprints on bumper. Outside of car not cleaned but rinsed leaving large water spots on glass and body. 7. I was also informed by one of the mechanics that parts were after factory and that s why bumper did not align properly. I paid for new parts. Manager reprimanded mechanic and assured me that all installed parts are new. 8. I m still not happy with the way bumper is aligned. 9. Still wonder what white substance was if parts installed are new. I will find out though using another body shop and then respond accordingly. 10. I do need to mention that the paint job looks pretty good. There were still some slight scratch marks on the part replaced but I m not really picky about that as long as paint lasts. Good luck to you if you choose to use All Team Auto Repair and Collision. You will never see me there again though.
OMG Terrible even my wife likes vegetarian and hated this Quick give me a real egg and meat!! Even sub par for veggie lovers The first experience with a yelp recommendation I was totally turned off by
Went there in a Sunday afternoon and Waited 10 plus minutes for service so we left. Very disappointing since I really enjoyed the Brat Haus. It was even more frustrating that the tables around us were being served and no one stopped by the even ask if we needed anything.
I have had a terrible experience with how the school administration handles situations. My son s 3rd grade teacher has made my child feel terrible about himself. She has told him that she is going to put him in the kindergarten class because he takes too long to complete assignments and also tells the other students I am so sick and tired of each and every one of you. Principal Cunningham is the rudest most intolerant person I have met in a long time and told me this morning that since I do not seem to be happy with the school I can take my son elsewhere for the last 2 weeks of school. Are you kidding me??!!! How is that effective? This school seems to only defend the teachers improper behaviors and does not want to do anything to help the students that need the extra help. They just want to send the students somewhere else instead of fixing the problem internally. Worthless administration. I m sure there are lovely teachers and staff at this school but if you happen to have a child that needs something more they act like your child is such a bother to them. Do not expect them to work with you on an IEP either. I will be writing Superintendent Pat Skorkowsky about this.
I ve had it with this place. I ve been going here for years for one reason... PROXIMITY to my home. There is always the same rude little old Mexican lady or a little bit younger Mexican guy with a mustache. Where to begin. The food is decent. It s grilled chicken atop rice not terribly hard to conjure up. What irks me every time without fail is the rude service and JESUS GOD forbid you ask for any slight modification or side of sauce!!! If you ask for Siracha they scowl at you and hesitatingly pull out .5 of an ounce acting like it F ing liquid platinum. Give me as much Siracha as I please I just paid 7 for 3 oz of chicken and a scoop of steamed rice. Today I went and asked for rice instead of noodles on a dish and the dude actually yelled at me in the store... YELLED. ME Can I do rice instead of noodles please. HIM NO volume raised ME Why? HIM Look BUDDY it s PREMIXED WE DONT SUBSTITUTE THINGS LIKE THIS SO WHAT DO YOU WANT!? ME Fine I ll take it as is I guess. In my head knowing I wo not make a fuss because the power of yelp is much greater then going back and forth with this darling Do yourself a favor DON T give this place any of your money. I m done. Bye Felicia.
This was the worst chilpotle experience to date. From the inappropriate sexual conversation between cashier and line to super stale chips to the unacceptably over salted rice. The staff was playing more than serving. I will not return to this location under any circumstances.
I used to order take out from this place quite frequently but the last 3 times experiences have not been very good. I ordered spicy tuna every time and it used to be great! But now it seems like the fish is going bad. There is an overpowering fishy taste which causes me to feel like they are either serving bad fish or serving the older fish to take out customers. Which is unacceptable. I wo not be ordering from here again.
This place is a joke. Took my truck in for an oil change at 3 pm and was told it would be done in two hours. 3 hours later I got a call saying they needed to replace something with the tires and would call me first thing in the morning to let me know. First thing in the morning apparently means after 10 30 because that s when I called. The incompetent asshat that was my technician was not even sure if they had started on it but assured me he d have it done by 3pm 24 hours later. 4 pm now I call again and am told I can pick it up 5 maybe 5 15 just to be safe which makes me laugh. Tech Is that ok? Me I guess I do not have a choice. Tech Well we could not do it. do not worry asshole you ll never fucking do it again. Hopefully the Chevy dealer down the street is better...could NOT be any worse. Pretty sure the guy s name is Mark or Mike...Fuck you Mark Mike! And for the record this is the 2nd time in a row I was told it would be done on the day of drop off only to have it pushed to overnight. Update after arriving at 5 30 it literally took them 45 minutes to locate my car no one had any idea where it was. Going over the bill I asked what the 15 in miscellaneous charges were...her response rags. I got charged 15 for fucking rags.
Went for a 6 course meal for Mardi Gras. Was told to be there at 5 30pm only to be served the first course at 7pm. Each course took an additional 45 minutes to wait. We ended up leaving 5 hours later and had to get dessert togo. The whole event was disorganized as everyone was getting their food at different times. Also the owner was doing all the cooking and running around thus the long wait but also he was not in the best mood. We were hesitant to ask for anything! He was rude when we asked for hot sauce. The red beans were barely cooked still hard. The crawfish was boiled in salt water no seasoning. I used to live in Houston TX and have been to many different parts of Louisiana as well so I know that crawfish should not taste like dirt and be served with a bunch of huge baking potatoes. Luckily I had good company to dine with since it was such a disaster...at 60 a person too!
Had a beer and an appetizer so so. Service was nice and quick which is about all I need with the kids. Kids seemed to like their kids meals the usual Mac and cheese grilled cheese chicken fingers. Huge line at Mad Mex on Friday night none here. I doubt we will go back too many other choices.
Price was reasonable and the view was amazing. My server acted as if I were disturbing her. Not a single smile or friendly word. Ordered wings which seemed to take forever. I guess that s because they had to overcook them. Dry but lots of sauce which did not really help.
If you want a place to watch all of the NFL games... this is not it. They have the Sunday Direct ticket but dont put on all of the games because they arent paying attention. The service is poor and their draft beers sometimes taste like metal because they dont clean their lines well. It s a shame because the place is nice and the food is pretty good. There are much better options in the North Hills though. Find them. The management at this place is clueless and not helpful.
Where do i start.. Kaizen Sushi is a Japanese restaurant in front of the hard rock casino. Or at least it tries to be.. First it s korean owned like most sushi places.. In case you did not know sushi rolls were invented in korea not japan they serve Japanese food but not traditional Japanese cuisine if that s what you re looking for try Ichiza . I came here for sushi and to my dissapointment the sushi was not fresh I ve been here twice and both times the fish was old.. From tuna to uni the sushi was old and dry. Not to mention the size of their cuts.. For the price they charge they should at least make up for quantity. I ve had an order of 6 nigiri that filled me up more than their 22 chirashi bowl mix sushi bowl . Ok maybe not... but you get the idea.. The only reason why they dont deserve a 1 star review is the fact that they have friendly people working there and they are open later than most sushi places in vegas they close at 4am .. so prepare to order a couple of Sapporo s and Sake and hope it makes the food taste better.
I ve been coming to this location for over 10 years but the last few trips have been very disappointing. This weekend we tried again and had incredibly slow service even though the server was only bringing us water and fresh bowls. All our food tasted the same no matter what sauce or spice bc they were not cleaning the grill well in between diners. Not to mention the lack of cleanliness. It was frustrating to see 5 6 people hanging around the host stand and another few waiters standing at the drink station when the place was a disaster. Huge chunks of food all over there floor sauce on the counter where customers waited and tons of unbussed tables. It was clear the employees do not care so we will not be returning.
Bug infested!!! Mosquitos freaking everywhere. My husband gets bit up within 2 minutes of sitting on our porch. It s disgusting and a serious problem. I have yet to have a day without a bug inside my apartment. Ive found trails of ants that lead under the fridge and inside the cupboards. And stray cats come out at night thanks to the other residence leaving food out for them. Everyone at the front desk has no idea what they re doing. And remember THE PEOPLE IN THE OFFICE ARE THE ONES WHO HANDLE YOUR MONEY. I ve been here about 4 months now and have had endless problems. It s often that I am forced to call MINIMUM of 10 times to get anyone to answer. They have charged me random fees and are extremely disorganized. Not to mention they do not hesitate to begin eviction I ve seen plenty eviction notices on doors here. More than I ve ever seen in my past 5 years of apartment living. Do not be fooled by the quiet afternoons here It s also extremely loud in the morning and late into the night. Majority of the people here are very rude and disrespectful. The walls are VERY thin. I do not recommend this apartment complex for anyone especially anyone with pets or kids.
This is for the Starbucks in the Smith s grocery store on Horizon Ridge and Eastern. I go to order and the woman behind the counter who is leaning and chatting with a Smith s employee promptly states that her espresso machine is broken and no hot drinks so unless I want something cold she ca not make it. So I say a Venti Carmel Frappucino with whip no caramel drizzle with mocha drizzle . She actually looks disappointed that she has to make me a drink. She slowly makes the drink while she is still gossiping to the man. She is griping because she has to take pain meds and when she is off and comes back to work no one has done anything and she says so I m just done . Griping the entire time. Finally finishes my drink. Caramel drizzle all over the cup and on top. I say to her wow that s a lot of caramel drizzle and she says she put chocolate on too. I said that s not how I wanted it. She ignored me. As I walk out the frappucino looked incredibly runny not what I m used to at a Starbucks. What s up with that customer service? Someone needs to talk to the hired help there and give her a lesson on not bitching about the company you re working for in front of customers and just do your job.......so annoying....
I went to this location today and was absolutely appalled by the service. After being seated the server did not ask for our drink orders and decided to ignore us for 15 minutes before even placing an order. She left 3 extra menus on our table after ordering even though there were two of us. The chicken I ordered was dry and clearly old And we did not even receive the lemon water you normally get after a meal there. she disappeared for another half hour while we ate so we could not ask for additional service. All the other servers were obviously trying to avoid eye contact with tables that were not their own. And to top it off while paying for our bill the server had the nerve to take my gift card I was using to pay with and while punching in the cost blatantly asked me what her tip amount was! Please save yourself and do not spend your well earned money here.
My first experience at XS night swim and last. Yeah getting kicked out of a club is normal but I have NEVER been held at a club against my will. I was just trying to leave with my girl friend and security would not let us leave we went to another security who tried helping us get out of the club and he would not hear what she had to say. Finally after unwillingly letting us leave the two security guys called us bitches and kept saying fuck you. I spent a lot of money on these hotel rooms and drinks and to be so disrespected is just unreal and unacceptable. I m going to look into suing for false imprisonment as well. Do not come here unless you want to be held against your will and disrespected on every level.
My fiance and I were car shopping and this was by far the shadiest dealer we encountered. They had a VW we had our eye on but when we ran the NADA numbers on it we found out that they had it priced 4000 over what it was actually worth. They would not negotiate the car down to where we felt we were not being cheated. On top of that I felt like they were often talking down to me since I m a female. Even though I definitely do not know much about cars treat me as your equal!
First of all I love Mexican food and Mexican restaurants authentic or generic. The vibe in any Mexican restaurant is always fun. I ve been to the location in the Southside before a pens game and had a pretty good time! I was anxious to get my hands on another lime yinzerita lime margarita with a corona beer bottle added in the mix . However we were seated within seconds of arriving but we sat and waited at our table for 10 minutes with no service. Three waitresses walked past our table many times and they made many glances but no one ended up acknowledging us. Total bummer. We decided to leave. Maybe another time maybe not. Would love to recommend but do not at this time.
Worst dining experience I ve had in a long time. Our server took drink and food order and pretty much disappeared. Came back about 15 minutes later with drinks. 3 waters and ice tea almost no ice . Asked if we wanted more chips and salsa but never brought them. About 40 minutes after we ordered food finally came. He also brought chips with meal not sure why at that point. Our drinks had been empty for a while by then and the food was cold. Had to finally stop another server to ask for the manager since ours never came back. They cooked the food again and brought it out hot. For our trouble they bought us dessert. Not really sure what would have been appropriate but that was not it. We love the food but the service is so bad I m not sure we ll be back.
I ca not really even give them 1 star. Made an appt for a 2 hour massage with someone I found out was working there I was ready to buy a package because of how good Dena is however when I arrived they had no information about my appt! Thanks a lot for nothing! Very dissapointing Valerie
Decided to pop in with my girlfriend for a nice sit down lunch. Beautiful warm atmosphere but the second we walked in we had a server sigh because we were in his way. His displeased sigh was loud and obvious and rude considering we were just standing in line waiting for a table. Once we arrived to our table it took about 5 minutes for our server same guy to stop just staring at us but come over. When we opted for tap water and not mineral he left and never came back with it. 5 minutes later we had him come up and ask if we wanted bread. We asked if it came with the meal and he almost rolled his eyes and said yes. Still no water he leaves and returns two minutes later without a word drops the bread off and leaves. 5 minutes later we have a new server walk by and confusingly asks if we d like water. After that our server came back asked what we d like refused to take prosciutto off my girlfriends pizza and suggested she instead eat another pizza that was completely different it was confusing that they wasted prosciutto. Could have easily been saved for another customer. He never returned and we had to get other people to serve us. Extremely disappointed with the service. Both my girlfriend and I work in the restaurant industry and were majorly turned off from the crappy service. Step it up guys! The pizza was awesome the ravioli was tasty but oily and warm not hot. Glancing at other tables their dishes were steaming hot. Would have preferred duck ravioli to be hot not warm. Would I go back? Maybe to a different location.
Way to expensive for what it is. We had a very smelly room. Maybe leave the windows open between guests? We were on the first floor towards the back with a Very loud laundry room that played music all day and night. 300 a night is simply unreasonable but I found this to be a running theme in Arizona.
Unfortunately my husband and I ventured in here after turning down the 35 minute wait at The Yardhouse. Margaritaville was nearly empty.. It s a HUGE restaurant with a lower and upper level and on a Saturday night I would expect it to be packed. Not so there were maybe five tables in use. It all started out well enough. The place is visually entertaining. They ve clearly spent a small fortune on the island type decor and primo space viewing the fountains at Westgate. That s where the good ended. I was desperate for a steak after forgoing Yardhouse so I was happy when I saw a basic sirloin on the menu. There were two turf options and I opted for the non teriyaki version. At 21 and some change I was hoping for a fairly decent steak rare. I clarified to our server twice just to make sure My husband ordered a simple Cuban sandwich. The food took strangely long to come out seeing how there was nearly no one there. When it finally did come out it was presented in an ok fashion. Although my 21 sirloin was a mere deck of cards size and suspiciously dark. I cut into the center of the steak to find a ragingly overcooked piece of meat. Annoyed I began on my Caesar salad and fries which were incredibly ordinary but edible. Read frozen fried steak fries and generic Caesar The server came back to ask us how everything was and begrudgingly I presented her with my so overcooked it was dry steak. She apologized and was nice enough then promised to have another one cooked immediately. 10 minutes passes... Husband has decided that his Cuban is really actually kind of crappy. The bread was stale and crushed the ham flavorless all around it was just a really boring and terribly executed sandwich. 15 minutes passes.... 25 minutes pass.. And finally the server returns. She says that when they were cooking my second steak they botched it and unfortunately they have no more steaks prepped for tonight. At this point I was full on crappy fries and my Caesar salad and just said scrap it all. She tried to get me to order anything else.. I just was not having it. I wanted to go home and cook myself a steak. Eventually the manager came out and he was also desperate to take care of us and very apologetic. He and the server both seemed sincere but I just wanted nothing to do with the place any more. No I did not want a free meal next time. No I do not want a free slice of cheesecake. No I do not want coconut shrimp. It was nearly comical after the groveling session had concluded. Our server brought us our bill my food removed of course we paid and got the hell out of dodge. We will never return to this place. A junky sandwich insane time lapses between ordering and receiving and they run out of steaks on a Saturday night at 7 30 pm? Ridiculous. I d advise anyone considering Margaritaville to go to any one of the other restaurants within Westgate. There s a ton of good ones this one NOT being one of them.
I was quoted 700 after a 99 discount for a flush valve repair. 300 for flush valve. 450 for installation. 49 for valve adjustment. This was after already paying 148 a day earlier to diagnose the problem. Concerned about the pricing we contacted another company and they charged us 136.15 all in to perform the work above quoted at 700! 88 for labor 40 for trip charge 8.15 for the repair kit. Disappointing to be quoted at such a drastically higher amount for a relatively quick and easy fix. Please note that this occurred last October 2017.
I was really disappointed. Although the bbq was decent the portions were small and the sides were terrible. It felt like a tourist trap and unless someone else is driving me there and paying I ll never return.
Service was absolutely terrible. Dirty looks every time I asked for somthing. The girl taking our order asked probably 5 times what our order was. I felt like I was NOT welcome in this store. The onions were old the lettuce was old bread was old. Skimped on everything. These people working in here could literally not care less. Asked for new onions said that s all they had. Was about ready to just walk out. For some reason did not I did not want to be rude but what would it matter to these people anyway
Pubic hair in the bed poop on the wall in the bathroom smelt like a porta potty...... Other than that it was a grade A classy place. NOT! Save yourself never go here.
Just witnessed a horrible exchange between a woman who I presume is the owner and someone who parked momentarily in front of their store. Incredibly crude and racist comments were being shouted by the shop owner at the driver as I was about to enter. I decided to give this store a miss and not choose support behaviour like that...
Okay I want to preface this with every other time I have gone in there I have had decent service. One lame worker will not prevent me from going to PetSmart in the future. However this is what happened the last time I went in to buy dog food. I have a Chihuahua and a French Bulldog. As many dogs do they love to go on car rides walks and anything else that gets them out of the house. Since PetSmart is pet friendly I took my boys with. I have them on a leash with a coupler. I went straight back to the dog food. Two employees were having a conversation and saw me walking over with my dogs. They looked right at me walked away from me continued having their conversation and avoided helping me. Neither asked if I needed help or acknowledged me. I was told I needed to buy a specific type of dog food...I could not find it on the shelf so I walked to the end of the aisle. I asked if they were busy and could they help me. One of the workers walked the other direction and the second worker said I guess . Thanks for taking time out of your busy day at work as a CUSTOMER SERVICE representative to help me! LOL! He is there to help people shop for what they need! Come on! So he was nice enough to carry a 50 pound bag of dog food to the front where he then threw it up on the register and walked away. The woman at the register offered to have the man help me out to my car with the food. Since simply carrying the food to the register had been such a hassle for him in the first place I opted to carry the bag of food out by myself. In the future I would like to be able to bring my dogs. However if there is going to be such poor customer service I guess I ll have to leave them at home.
I ordered at 3. They said they ll call 20 mins later. They did not . I called at 4 30. And they said they are sending the guy now. They re 10 mins away!!! I ca not walk or drive at the moment. So I hungrily waited. I paid by card but they never gave me the receipt to sign. WTH is wrong with them?! Food was good but piss poor service. I ordered the Penang chicken and shrimp but it was mostly sauce with nearly NO MEAT at all!!! This is the thanks I get for ordering from them DAILY! They re lucky the food is good! Why did they punish me for their mistakes by skipping me out on meat! They re freakin 10 mins away!
Food is good but service is lacking. Been coming here for yrs and always spend close to 100 each time. Poor customer service too. Leaves dirty dishes to sit in front of you. Had to pile on the side before they grabbed some of them. Also asked them to for a plug to charge my phone and server said they could not do that. Really??? Well then we ll go spend someplace else where we CAN charge our phone.
Store is dirty unorganized and just all around a sh thole. Was completely empty there when I went I d be shocked if this business lasts another year.
Will not be returning. We decided to take a crazy chance on this place and it was worse than I thought it would be. Children running around and when they bring out crab legs you would have thought they were bringing out stacks of 100 bills. Food was terrible and the service was not much better. Do not waste your time or money
I ve stayed here for business for two weeks back to back. The place is alright but not great. The housekeeping is fine but my room smelled pretty bad. On the weekend the place was OVERRUN with a kids hockey tournament and a cheerleading competition which made peace and quiet impossible. The internet code is reset every few days which is pretty annoying when you re trying to work from your room. I m back in the area and not staying here.
Such mean service. And every time I asked for only a little bit of rice and salsa in my bowl I swear they purposely put more. Very rude workers
Well I will start with the fact that I m never ever coming back to this place! The service was really bad and the server even yelled at our 2 year old daughter for being noisy even though she was just having fun not screaming or anything! The food was below average cold tasteless soup salad was just full of onion and garlic and nobody could finish it. Starter course was some pie filled with shrimps but that was the most disgusting thing I ve eaten in a long time! Main course was ok nothing fancy and portions were really small! So based on the fact that we paid 60 per person I m very disappointed and would not advice anyone to visit that place!
I ve eaten at Jersey Mikes Subs a few times... usually this location and I always find the subs lacking flavor. On top of that the prices are more expensive than Jimmy Johns and I think JJs has better subs all around.
This is a bad American Chinese take out place. While I ve had worse I must say that the standards in this area are high and it puzzles me how this place can stay open when there are so many better options available. In particular what makes this restaurant inferior to the average American Chinese fare is the fact that the chefs do not know how to choose which vegetables to put in which dishes. Instead they seem to throw the same combinations of vegetables in all the dishes. For example green peppers and onion chunks go fairly well with the Chinese American curry dishes but they do not go well with many other dishes and yet they throw them in virtually everything. The dishes here all taste the same most of the stuff is quite muddled and all of it is mediocre.
I went with my baby and family on Thursday and the food was not bad but omg the service. We finished eating breakfast and the waitress gave us our bill without asking. We asked for a second refill of coffee 4 times to 3 different waiters! To top it off my 6 month old daughter spilled a glass of water on the table and on the seat the server saw and left a cloth on the table to clean it up ... seriously rude. We felt like we were being rushed and were not being served anymore so we decided to leave. While at the front desk I noticed I did not transfer enough money on my debit card to leave the tip on it but I had cash in my bag so I was going to leave it on the table. Then the waitress starts saying rude sarcastic remarks and giving me the stink eye for not leaving her a tip. Like seriously first of all we have not left yet second of all you do not know what I m doing and third of all you should not even expect a tip. I ended up giving her 10 for a 40 meal to shut her up. I was so upset she completely ruined my day. NEVER coming back to this place.
This hotel is really really Smokey. But overall ok. Had an issue at check in. We requested a King Suite but they had given our room away. They put us in a Smokey two queen room. My wife got sick from the smoke. They moved us the next day but it was pretty much ruined after that. We come to Vegas twice a year. Trying something new. Wo not be back.
Used to love this place until today. I picked what I thought was a regular color nail polish and they charged me for a shellac when I did not ask. When I told them at checkout that was not what I wanted they made me pay for it. I never communicated with them I wanted shellac. The girl who did my nails said I put your nails under the light so you should have known no. How was I supposed to know that? I do not work at a nail salon? As well as the design on my toe it was completely messed up and the girl saw it and did not opp to fix it. Extremely disappointed. This used to be my favorite place to go but not anymore.
I d give this place zero stars if I could. The customer service here is that bad and the owner is even worse. Went in and got a car wash and decided to sit in a massage chair. Put on 10 dollars the EXACT SECOND the chair stopped an employee rudely told me the massage chairs are for PAYING CUSTOMERS only. You need to get up or put more money in it Wow! Her tone was super rude. The. She flipped me off and told me fuck you. Wow! Then the owner got involved. He made things worse. I asked for a refund and he said no because he does not want to and he was super rude about it. Really a shame. I ve been coming to this car wash for years. The owner then started to belittle me in front of other customers. Wow. I do not get it. I walked out and waited for my car outside. Employees came up to me to apologize and the owner went outside and literally yelled at him at the top of his lungs for him to not talk to me. People at the Hooters heard him! Crazy! This is the last car wash I m ever getting here. New ownership has really let this place go. Do not let the new paint fool you.
I have to say it does really take the fun out of getting a treat like great chocolate when the staff is so grouchy. I called in an order and the person had no warmth in their voice at all. I hate giving business to people who do not act like they genuinly care about their customers.
I NEVER write reviews and I tend to be a very understanding positive type of person however my experience with the customer service agents and customer service managers at AFW was terrible. No lie I have only posted one other negative review and that was back in like 2014!!! I just feel very strongly that AFW is employing a few individuals who might need to find different jobs. From statements like we are not changing out practices to accommodate only you to I am the last one you can speak with I am appalled that these people have been put into the role they are in. I am supposed to have new furniture delivered to my new house on Thursday but I have not yet been provided with a window. While this seems like a minor issue when you are coordinating cleaners movers and other deliveries on that day not having the information makes everything impossible. I am being told that they schedule deliveries the day before however this was not mentioned in the delivery agreement. That agreement seems to be confusing for some of those individuals as they keep referencing it stating I was informed of the 24 hour delivery schedule but as you can see from the verbatim statements below this is not the case. I am starting to believe that none of these people have ever even read the agreement. 1. We will assign you a non negotiable 2 1 2 hour window for metro deliveries. No problem here as I am fine with a window but I need more than 24 hour notice of what window slot I have been assigned so I can coordinate with other vendors. This statement says nothing about when the window will be assigned to me. 2. You can receive your delivery window via email text message or phone the day prior to your delivery. Sounds great! Once again this statement says nothing about when the delivery window will be ASSIGNED to me only that I have options on how to receive my window the day before delivery. 3. To change your delivery date you must call customer service as soon as possible. The latest you can call if the day prior to deliver before 10 00am. I am not trying to change my delivery date only trying to find out what window has been assigned to me. It is a totally different topic. None of the statements elude to them scheduling deliveries with only 24 hours notice. Now my only options are to wait to see what they assign and then adjust everything else if possible to accommodate them cancel the delivery and pick another day leaving me without furniture in my new home or pay 99 in addition to the 67 I have already paid to pick a window. Huh... does not seem right. I have a good line of credit through AFW and still need to purchase a TV stand coffee table end tables kitchen table and patio furniture. Unfortunately I will be taking my business elsewhere. t s a shame.
I know Korean food and this place is NOT very good. Went here on a friend s recommendation and I was not impressed. ordered ddeuk bokgi soon tofu potato pancake and seafood pancake. Soon tofu was probably the best out of the bunch and that was just ok. maybe I ordered the wrong things. maybe I expected too much from their food. if you have a big group and drink this place does support that atmosphere but judging on food alone there are better Korean places in town. might give them one more try but this place is not on my go to list of spots. positives most items on the menu are under 10 and they re open late.
Been wanting to come here and try it out. I had to get gas at QT so I thought I would pop on over. Decided on the 10 wash...WELL I could not believe I spent that much because what I got was NOT worth 10! It seemed like I traveled way too fast through the tunnel and I do not believe the rinse cycle was even working. At first I thought I was receiving the express wash in error. After I pulled out and left I realized my passenger side mirror got flipped so I pulled over to fix it and realized how bad the wash really was. I think it made my car look worse! There was still globs of soap suds and water spots everywhere!!!! I would have gone back but was on my way to work and did not have anymore time to mess around with it. I ll be hesitant to try it again which is sad because it seems a lot of people had great experiences.
The service is subpar and the couple drinks I have tried are hit and miss. I am used to really good taro bubble tea from the other places and I ordered it here a few weeks ago and it was all watered down. It tasted like the milk had been watered down. Went there again last week to try a different drink and asked for a free sample of their red bean milk tea because they have a notice there that says ask for free samples. I was told they do not give out samples of the milk teas but can give a sample of the red bean if that makes any sense? Seriously she finished by asking me if that made any sense. It did not but I asked for the sample of the red bean anyway. I was given the sticky red bean paste in a small cup with no spoon. I asked for a spoon and was curtly told they were out of spoons and she suggested I stick the cup in my mouth and tap the bottom to get that sticky gooey red bean paste to fall into my mouth. I decided not to entertain her said No thank you and gave the cup back to her. She got upset took it with an attitude tossed it in the trash can took my order and then proceeded to make the drinks for the lady who ordered after me and saved my order for last and sent me on my way. Will not be going here ever again. The drinks match the horrible service. I thought I will save some time by coming here instead of going to the boba place near Lee Lee on Warner and Dobson. Their drinks taste really good and the kids that work there are so pleasant and smiling all the time. I will drive the extra distance to go there instead of here.
Made an appointment for an oil change. Waited an hour before I was told it would be another hour. Facility today is run by guys who admit they are in training and do not know what s going on. Another customer was told to come in for an oil change appt and walked out angry for same reason. Overbooked. If you do not have time then quit telling people it s ok to come in. Second time I ve had a bad experience here.
Terrible. Beet salad is wilted lettuce from a bag with a couple chunks of beets and dressing that seems to be from a bottle. Ham charcuterie is a few slivers of indifferent ham with dry toast. Beer was ok. Fail.
rude staff! food is ok. its overrated. it takes forever to get your food! i wanted to like this place... to bad..
I would give more stars seeing as how my first few visits were really nice but my last 3 visits have been terrible and this last visit today is the last time I go here. The lady whose name I do not know globbed on the acrylic my nails are thick there is dried acrylic all over my fingers the Polish is chunky. I ca not believe they let people leave their establishment like that.
So so sad. Have been a couple of times to this location and been pretty darn good. Was there last weekend and it was just terrible. The service was excellent bar and table but the food was so disappointing. Husband got the grilled scallops and shrimp with garlic mashed. His plate looked like an empty sea of beige too few pieces food thrown on too big of a plate was something I would never think acceptable to a higher end chain to serve. We both ordered Caesar salad where the lettuce was old looking and wilted. This the stuff you find in your fridge and toss. The reason we did not send it back was because they were so busy I ordered a chicken arugula was a few pieces barely there dish that featured this terrific Mediterranean vinaigrette not present . We could not wait to leave. Sad this experience was so very poor.
Ca not give a real review consider I never got the chance to get my services done. Went in at 6 to get a manicure and pedicure with my friend. Two ladies who came in after us got out in the pedi chairs before us. We waited 20 mins for pedi chairs. They finally had two chairs ready for us so we soaked for 25 mins. The lady in the chair beside us had been waiting for 45 mins for them to finish her pedi. Three nail techs were at register trying to help guest with her gift card. Three... we finally decided to just leave. My friend had been there before and had great reviews as did the people before me. Wish I could of gotten the chance to write a great review too!
Hello tonya im willing to give your restaurant a second chance if your willing to replace my previous bad meal is that possible its been a long time ive been waiting almost a year to get this resolved.
Tonight I had the prime rib. Our server told me they only had medium left. Really? We got here at 5 30pm and they are out of medium rare? My prime rib and broccoli arrived cold. They tasted okay but cold. Then our server left us for more than 15 minutes after we were done eating. I asked for a to go box and the check. She was gone for another 10 minutes. ug
We have been ordering from this PJ location for at least 5years and have lived in the same location the entire time. Tonight I was yelled at by some ignorant employee that it was my fault she could not find outer apt that even though I pointed out the building number and apt number she insisted she was not stupid. She insisted that i come downstairs and get my pizza as she was tired of driving around looking for our place. Then she proceeded to yell at me telling me that she was doing me a favor bringing me pizza!!!! This kind of service is unacceptable! She is doing US a favor? What has happened to work ethics these days! I hope this girl is fired and taught a lesson about customer service! The manager I spoke to did not seem all that shocked by my story so I doubt anything will happen to her but what a shame! The manager asked me what I felt was fair in handling this and he could not even give us a free pizza tonight! We have to wait and get out next pizza free. Like that s even the point here. I want it to goon record that if this girl is not fired for her actions we can all see where this Papa Johns stands on customer service. The sad thing is we generally have not had too many issues in the past but if this is not handled we may never go back.
Very dissatisfied with this bank. In fact if I had not already invested time and money into opening an account here I would switch in a heartbeat. Every time I come to this branch it feels like I have to wait into separate line the first one at the front counter and then wait for whichever person in the front counter person redirects me to. Additionally every time I come here For a specific purpose the staff tries to sell me something else. Definitely not a fan and would not recommend to a friend
I have to say I was not really impressed with Lannings. After the valet takes your car you first enter into a dark vestibule type area. The door is not opened for you you are not greeted in fact walking in I wondered if I was in the right spot it was completely deserted. Having never been here before I did not know which way to go so just we sort of stood there until the matre d finally appeared. The dining area itself definitely feels dated I sort of felt like I was taking a step back to the 80 s. We were greeted and our waiter seemed fine. That is until I saw his demeanor with other tables. He was much more attentive and friendly. Serving these tables more quickly and checking on them more often. Two tables who were sat and ordered after us both received their meals before us. When coming to check on our table it almost seemed to be a bit of a bother for him. In terms of food again we were not really impressed. We all ordered steaks two out of the three being over cooked. We would have communicated this to the waiter if he had bothered to come back and check. The steaks were also quite salty seemly season with a mixture of soy sauce and worcestershire sauce. Overall just a very off putting experience. With all of the other wonderful choices in this area Vaccaros being a 1 2 mile us the street and Ken Stewarts 2 miles down the street why go here? They certainly have their core crowd spoken for and have no interest in retaining new business.
Do not know what I expected going to Olivia Garden. Food was not that great and service was horrible. We waited a good 10 minutes to just get drinks thought it turned around when we got our order taken and got the salad and soup quickly. But then our server disappeared. My boyfriend had to get up and find someone just to get a togo box. The food itself was not bad but there were huge chunks of uncooked garlic in my meal. I love garlic as much as the next girl but this was too much I needed to go and pick through my food. We got a gift card for Olive Garden and used it and now will never go back.
Staff needs personal hygiene and stop touching their greasy faces scratching your heads then the food we eat.How are you people still in business seriously!Where is the health Department protecting us from your lack of cleanliness? Substandard beef jerky quality beef. GROSS US OUT FOOD! PIG SLOP CUISINE!
OK HERE WE GO!!!...first I want to say that I like this station I ve been a customer for about 2 years now I buy gas here a lot. It s not the safest area and I say this b c I was almost robbed at gunpoint around 3 AM over a year ago there but that s a whole other story it s Phoenix ANYWAY... On the morning of August 13 around 4 30 AM I stopped there to buy gas. I pulled up to pump 5 and put my sun shades inside of the windshield as previously stated the area is not so great because my purse was in there so it s best not to let people around there see what s in your car. Before I went in to pay for gas I was looking in the back of my SUV for something which took maybe 3 or 4 minutes. I went in and said to the clerk Francisco whom I had never seen working there before 10 on 5 he gave me my change from a 20 and as I was leaving he said Do not post! I asked what? he said again Do not post do not post! I asked What are you talking about? Are you on something are you ok? I turned to leave and he said just pump your gas and go you Nigger! There were other customers in there the place went silent!. I rushed back in and asked Did you just call me a Nigger? he said Yeah you Nigger Hoe look how you re dressed just pump your gas and go! I was wearing a short tight skirt but so what. Well I will admit at that point I lost it and let many vile expletives fly!!! I left pumped my gas in shock and left! Later today I will go there to find out the GM s name there and I ve searched the corp. number and address to find out who to speak to there and inform them of this incident. I ll update this as a follow up to let you guys know the out come of all of this. Thanks for your time for reading this mess.
Ok so I m a rollercoaster guru....and this rollercoaster....yea...I got a stiff neck too. I mean it was fun. But it s like getting in consecutive car accidents. I like em more fluid. Not like WWE....
Nous y sommes alls car je voulais vraiment manger un tartare de boeuf... nous n y retournerons pas je pense. Un samedi soir o il faisait beau et chaud tout le restaurant tait plein ! Comme nous voulions absolument un table en terrasse nous sommes alls patienter en buvant un verre dans un bar proche. 20mn nous avions notre table en terrasse comme prvu. Ce qui not ait pas prvu c tait que nous passions 2h au restaurant dont plus d 1h attendre notre plat !! Aprs notre planche charcuterie fromages trs bonne on est venu nous apporter nos salades composes... que nous n avions jamais command ! Et 1h aprs cette erreur nous avions nos plats. Une attente au del du raisonnable nous avons mme song demander l addition ! Et puis mon tartare tant attendu est arriv !!! vous le voulez relev non merci ... et bien a a t difficile de le finir tellement il l tait !!! Et pourtant j aime bien les choses un peu pic ! Pour mon chum un boeuf bourguignon qui lui tait bon mais pas transcendant. Pas de dessert merci on a dj bien trop attendu pour des plats juste bons et encore
This was my first meal in Tempe recommended by our hotel concierge. I should have spent the 5 min researching on Yelp to find a decent Mexican joint but was hungry and lazy. This is as authentic Mexican as P.F. Chang is to Chinese food. However the staff was great and very friendly. So its not their fault they work for a chain. But I can sum up my experience in one phrase not worth the calories. Pro location size and staff. Con
My family and I had Thanksgiving here. We were sitted immediately and they took our drinks order then appetizer order. The thanksgiving meal was already planned out and we knew what they would be serving . After we finished our salad we must have waited about 20 minutes before our waiter came and brought us our plates. The restaurant was less than full. When we finished once again we sat and sat and could not locate our waiter. I finally asked another server if he could get him. It still took another another 10 minutes for him to show up. After dessert we went through the same thing with him and had to ask another worker to get him and again it took a very long time. We were all wondering what he was doing in the back and our conclusion was that he was watching football? Finally he showed up and gave us our checks and the wait started again. After another worker saw our displeasure she kindly picked up our checks for us. This was supposed to be a nice family holiday dinner. It s one I want to forget as I left disgusted. The food was less than mediocre. I also really felt bad for my 83 yr old mother. We will not come back to the restaurant ever again.
i dont know if i went on an off night but the food was HORRIBLE. The wings literally tasted like they came from a frozen bag heated up and then tossed for a second in some gross thick ketchup mixed with tapatio. i couldnt even eat two of the damn wings i ordered. I will never go back!! i prefer wing stop.
This is not good Italian food. It s almost laughable that this restaurant has been around for a while in Little Italy and is not even good. We ordered the bruschetta which I kid you not was toasted baguette with tomatoes on top. Riveting. Then I ordered the rose sauce gnocchi. The sauce was so average it honestly tasted canned like a Chef Boyardee sauce. I definitely would not come back here. Not surprising we were able to get a seat without a reservation on a Saturday night. Also someone was there celebrating their birthday how sad to have your birthday meal at this tragic place.
i always have made good reviews for filly bs but stay away from this one went in for some rolled tacos thursday nite watched the cook cut RAW meat on the same cutting board and use the same gloves to make a burrito for some poor soul going thru the drive in he actually put the tortilla right on the exact spot where the meat was then it was my turn he took my tacos out of the fryer without tongs and he used the same gloves as before then to make matters worse he stuck his hand in the cheese and put it on the tacos. When i said to him do you know what you did he new then proceeded to say i wiill put some new gloves on and make you some more but i told him you contaminated the cheese you going to get rid of all that cheese? he said ? do you think he has been trained how to handle food ? does he have a card? food card sorry filly b s that mistake could get someone real sick
The food is SO good here however the service is always questionable. Today I had the horrifying experience of showing up to pick up my take out order and there were two credit cards belonging to other customers just lying at the front counter unattended. I was left alone with them for over two minutes and when someone came to help me they asked a server who they belong to. I could have swiped them and no one would have known. I m terribly alarmed at this restaurants lack of concern for other people s credit cards. I will NEVER use a credit card here after what I saw today. In fact not sure I ll return as I am so upset about it. Totally despicable behavior and ignorance.
I had heard about this place years ago finally tried the prix fixe menu for 25 for dinner the past weekend. It was not the worst Thai food but it did not really impress me either. Thai food is one of my favourite cuisines. I tried the appetizer of calamari which was good and flavourful. I tried the Penang chicken curry a red curry spicy sauce topped with grilled chicken it came with rice. Packed with flavour and a punch of heat as I requested. My friends Thai basil tofu looked very underwhelming just the deep fried tofu You buy at the supermarket sitting a top of a sauce and Bok Choy. Not impressive. I ve seen and tasted better. The dessert I had the fried bananas which was timbit shaped banana bites with a honey sauce it did not come with any ice cream or whipped cream as I expected. This is one of my most favourite Thai desserts and I sorely missed the ice cream. The waitress was incredibly polite and attentive and accommodated substituting chicken for the beef for us as we do not eat red meat. I would come here if I m in the area but wo not drive out to it. But am still on the hunt for really good Thai food!
Oh Baan Thai. I really had high hopes for my takeout meal as the Thai restaurant scene in the Junction is depressing at best. But the two lengthy dark hairs nestled in my pad thai have not only turned my stomach but also turned me completely off Thai food for the immediate future... Blech.
We have not even finished getting our gas set up yet and this company has been ATROCIOUS to work with. We were told installation of the line would be free. Later we were told only the first 100 ft would be free the rest would be 7 a foot. Then we were told it was 11 a foot these guys clearly have no knowledge about what their business charges. They have cancelled their appointment twice now the most recent time the excuse we were given was we ve got a lot of appointments so they are awful at overbooking. We were told it d be 3 4 weeks to have everything set up and running it s been over a month now and they re still putting it off. We were also told after the fact that there was a week postponed due to weather which they had not mentioned at all. If they could be upfront with prices information and stick to their scheduling it might be worth it. We DO NOT recommend them if you have any other decent choices for heating.
I was very excited to see David Copperfield for the first time and had much expectations. Come to find out as I entered the theatre it was very small. The stage was not that big either. Also the seating was annoying because you have to share your table with another 2 people. That was pretty lame. The worst thing of all was the service. We were one of the first to arrive about 30 min before and we were almost the last table to be asked for drinks. The lady was obviously in a grumpy mood from the get go. After asking about the frozen drinks she just pointed at the menu if we were stupid and just was very rude. I have to say I did enjoy the show very much it was filled with cool tricks and he was also very funny and got the crowd involved. For the price you pay it is not worth it. They need to make this place nicer with new staff. That whole sharing a table crap needs to go.
We ve been to this location on 8 separate occasions. The service has been less than desirable always seems to be slow service no matter how busy the bar is and once the food is dropped off at the table good luck seeing your server again unless you wave your hand to get their attention or ask another server for assistance. The straw that broke the camel s back for us was when I had a bug crawl up my leg and shortly there after my daughter had a bug crawling up her leg. I told the server and he said let me get the manager . The manager comes over with his cell phone turns on they light and looks under the table and says We do not have a bug problem . I told him I did not say you did and repeated way I told the server. So what does the manager repeat we do not have a bug problem . I did not want anything other than to bring it to his attention and I felt as if he thought I was lying. No apology no concern nothing in the way of caring about a customer. It was enough for us to never visit this location again. Show some concern even if you do not mean it. Extremely disappointed in the response I got.
Probably the worst service I ever had. We were never given waters until the END of our meal. 3 of us dinned here for dinner and only 2 of us got our food. Our 3rd person never even received their food! I will NEVER EVER consider coming back here. I ended up having to share my plate with my friend while the employee saw us sharing never asked once if we were okay.
This place does not even deserve 1 star. Was there for 1 hour and killed 7 roaches. Yes cucarachas! Got my refund and split!
Decided to try this restaurant because of the Chef and his TV shows which created an expectation level we were disappointed. While new restaurants generally have some kinks to work out this Chef s TV shows indicate a high regard for precision quality and industry expertise which should get the show started much faster but it did not. Interesting menu choices overall with something for everyone in a group or those looking for a wide array of options from finger food and sandwiches to a massive steak! Overall the atmosphere is bland which brings me to our actual meal... we got the poutin app. which was flavorful but was not at all hot and was very skimpy on the gravy... got the bechamel burger which is really messy and hard to eat but the burger had no seasoning on the meat... got the BLT to and the bacon was overlooked and the sandwich is a bit skimpy.. last meal was the fish and chips.. more like a plate of fries and a piece of very bland cod no flavor at all in the fish or the batter and no offer of any condiments! Skinny fries are a horrible choice for the meals and again no condiments were ever offered.. let alone put in the plate... specialty drinks were good and met expectations.. prices are reasonable for Vegas... given the choices in Vegas Chef Irvine gets my vote for one and done.
Barely worth it for the price after the novelty of ordering from an iPad wears off. The hostesses were very courteous and nice as they were showing me to my group since I arrived late. But our waitress was almost nowhere to be seen during the times we needed her to be there. I feel the iPad system hinders the waitstaff from actually doing their jobs as ours was often left for so long it sent the order through itself without interaction from our waitress. The food came out quickly but everything else took way too long. And for all of that the food was just ok it s food I ll eat it . I think the best things were the takoyaki the calamari and the banana shrimp rolls try it if you re adventurous . But who would order only that for AYCE? They should make everything just as good as those dishes. The eel on the eel pizza were tasteless as was the salmon in the rolls. The tuna rolls almost tasted like canned tuna which was weird. Not worth the overall price and experience. I think I d only come back if I was invited by someone else.
They barely opened for the day and they were out of granola. Also got a health nut smoothie with whey and goji berries and ca not taste either in it. It tastes like a bland ice drink with peanut butter. For how much everything here costs they do not have it together at all. The first time I came here the smoothie I ordered was out of this world but ca not say any other experiences have been good at all
Came here for the USBC bowling tournament and the rooms were large but for the price I do not know if it was worth it with what we had to deal with. Check out is at noon and they did not accommodate us at all even though we re here for the bowling tournament. We were only here for one day. Front desk lady was rude and told me it was our fault and that we absolutely HAD to check out at noon because they were booked. No that s not our fault... you should offer late check out. My boyfriend had to bowl from 9am 12 30 and basically the lady said well you could ve checked your bags earlier. So we re supposed to not be able to go back up to the room past 8 am in her eyes. Does not make any sense. I had to run down 3 bags by myself to try to make it to check out in time. Do not want to tip a bellhop after all of this nonsense. Only one employee was sympathetic to our situation and said he wished he could give us a late check out. Very disappointed. You should accommodate for guests that are already in your hotel instead of being rude and telling them they have to leave. Does everyone have to do that? I think it could ve been handled better and this does not make me want to come back.
Our reservation was through Open Table at 11 45 we arrived at 11 48 and she proceeded to tell us we would not receive Open Table points because we were late I should have turned around right then and there. The place was pretty dead for Fathers day noon and now I know why the service was horrific twice I had to go to the bar myself to get a glass of wine for my mother in law and myself and once I went to the waitress station to get a coffee refill. Our waitress was brutal worse ever. Food was meh. View was great and we sat outside on the terrace for awhile we would have enjoyed the view and some beverages for longer but could not get a server to save our lives. Do yourself a favor and go elsewhere! Note This review just pertains to Emma at The Statehouse the staff elsewhere in the hotel were amazing!!
Really did love this place but recently let us down big time for a party we were planning there. Also took our favorite appetizer off the menu.
I go to las vegas 3 4 times a year on vacation. Now I have been to several of the strip clubs there to compare my experience with. I have been to the rhino twice. the most recent time was this past eater weekend. i will NEVER go back. They have a deal with cab drivers that take you here they they give the cover that you pay to the drivers. This is a common occurrence in vegas. So they have a existing working business relationship with these cab companies. Our cab driver told us we would pay 33 dollars to get in and get 2 free drinks. we got there and it cost 44 dollars each. now this is not a big difference so we were like ok no big deal. went to the bar to get our drinks and they had no idea what we were talking about. so I spoke to a manager and he sent me to talk with the head bouncer and then he sent me to talk to the woman at the door who works with the cab companies. no one was helpful at all. they were extremely dismissive and rude to me and my friends. I complained that we had been lied too by someone they pay so that works with them for them and they just said tough luck. they would not call the cab company or try to rectify the situation at all. said it was not their problem. so we walked out... not going to give them another penny They have a working relationship with these people you would think they would care if they are ripping off their customers but i guess not. go to Sapphire. more girls better environment and the customer service is way better.
Another one of those restaurants I always see on my way to the gym downtown. I ve planned a sister date here for brunch we were excited to try somewhere new! and we got a spot on the terrace. Good Brunch had a limited selection but it looked pretty. The decor is clean the design is inviting and really gorgeous. I ordered the fish balls for an appetizer and it was really delicious. The grilled cheese with duck confit was amazing. That was probably my top 3 favorite grilled cheese. Bad I ll start off with the service. We ve waited a really long time for our appetizers to arrive. My sister ordered a yogurt which had the consistency of porridge and we were weirded out by how watery it was. Then after our appetizers we waited about 35 mins to get our main plate. Seriously...I ve watched other patrons that were seated after us get their meals before us. We also had a side salad to which I ve notice the greens are not even fresh...um this is a high end restaurant I d expect better. I had to flag our waitress to ask about our main plates because we ve been waiting for awhile and she asked if we already finished our appetizers? Yeah lady like half an hour ago give me my food. After a bit of prompting we got our food within 5 minutes. Was the grill cheese good? Yes. Was it worth waiting 35 minutes? No. Bottom line Not blown away by their cuisine but if you want expensive but delicious grilled cheese with a nice terrace then this is your spot. I ll keep biking pass this place next time.
Since the staff is so downright unfriendly I really have no business supporting and patronizing them. I go to Pet Club about once a month and their customer service is horrifying.... I am obviously not the first one to leave a poor one star review. It s about time the employees step up their game and be at least friendly to customers who frequent the store regularly to replenish their pet food supply. If you work there just to have a job and not be friendly I d rather you not have a job stay at home and stay away from the customer service industry. Thanks for listening!
At first I didnt want to write a review...but then thought otherwise because with the thought of someone else going through what we did would be horrible. I will say that the DJ the caterer and the photographers were VERY PROFESSIONAL and FRIENDLY. I had a problem with communicating with the provided florist. She took weeks to respond to emails and calls. The communication was very horrible. I had to pay for things that the venue was to provide like things that I wanted for the centerpieces. The venue nor the florist had what I needed so I went out to Michaels and bought everything myself. I gave her exactly the idea that I wanted with pictures included of samples. And she still was lost somehow and not knowing what was going on. With that being said I still received from her forceful suggestions. She called me the day before the wedding begging me to rent a arch when I had already communicated with her that I did not want or need an arch. She even offered to just accept any form of payment no matter how little for her to leave the arch up from another wedding that was previously done. I felt very pressured and irritated. That was very frustrating. I started out with Lisa and was very swept into having my wedding at this location. I was very excited but then when it was time to give the deposit I was met by Regina. Regina seem that she did not know what was going on because of dealing with Lisa guest or customer. Which was fine because I thought that everything was still be handled the same way. And that time prices changed how things were dealt with changed and I should have take heave and what my husband said and not have done my wedding here at all. The last meeting we met with Regina we were to pay for a 75 guest wedding. In which I told Regina there may or may not be that amount of guests and she reassured me that for however many guess we were over we would get our money back for that difference. We had a balance which I will admit of 600 for a 100 guest count wedding. The day of the wedding I was very overwhelmed already because of mishaps with makeup which I know is it the venue s issues. I had emailed Regina the day before and told her that my husband was skeptical of paying the last payment being that we knew for a fact there would not be a hundred guests. I did not get a response to that email but previously got responses to every other email in communicating. The day of the wedding I did not receive a call from Regina or communication from Regina. I assured her in the previous email that I sent her that we would be paying that last balance either during the reception or after the reception. We knew that we would have family coming in and can always get the money from them. Once again my husband was still skeptical and felt played because when asking Regina how many guests we had she did not even know how many guests were there. They do not do a guest count. Once I got to the venue I was met by Regina and the first thing that came out of her mouth was about the payment. I gave my husband a call to let him know what was going on. I was very frustrated and thought that Regina would have my best interest interest as a bride and care about my day of the wedding. At that time Regina stopped all the vendors from providing the services because of this 600 difference in balance. She shut down the bar and turned it into a cash bar she told the photographers not to take any pictures and she told the caterer not to serve any food. We had already paid thousands of dollars why does she have to stop certain vendors from doing their job? I was very upset and overwhelmed and thought that she had my best interest at heart but it was all about the money for this place. My concern was to have a stress less day of me getting married to my husband. I understand business is business but you have to understand communication wise and getting things in order and making your guests and your clients feel appreciated like you will do what you can for them. You also have to take in consideration of being professional pulling your clients to the side discussing with them making an arrangement and holding that. She argue with my husband when he had questions at our meetings and the day of the wedding she was very defensive. we had a contract and she let us pay when we can and then all of a sudden day of she wants to be very aggressive. I ve never went through anything like this in my lifetime. She did not care about us enjoying our time or even pulling us a side for the payment she did it in front of guests and really got my husband aggravated and myself aggravated as well. After we were married Regina received the payment from my sister in law as we have planned. But it still felt as though she really was not putting any effort into making us happy. After that I felt rushed and I just did not enjoy being there I just wanted to get it over with.
I was going down the stairs and the stairs broke therefore I fell forward and injured myself. After taking my case and sending me to the doctor for over a year I called all the time and they just kept saying they were waiting on their case manager and to continue follow up and shots from the doctors I was sent to. After a year I finally got a letter saying that they were not going to take the case and now I am stuffed with over a year of doctor bills that are unpayable in my current condition. Thanks Adam I ll be sure to spread the word.
There is only outdoor seating. We had a party of 12 and they were NOT prepared at all. They knew we were coming. Our service was horrible very slow and the sever was never around. The food came out cold and not all at once. I was done eating before the hostess got her order. A couple people in our group had eaten here before and they said the food was bad then but they were giving it a second chance and yet again the food was another big disappointment. They had big cooling fans blowing on our table and when the band played the section we were sitting lost power so we had to finish in the dark and sweating our asses off cuz the blowers went out. If its winter and you want to have a drink by the lake then yeah I d suggest this place but do not waste your money if you want food.
My first time at the Peace of Mind Massage Therapy Centre. Cramped Front End seating space for customers. I had pre filled out my form and waited in there. Was greeted by the RMT and she did not introduce herself. In the beginning pressure was good and she checked with me if pressure was good but near the middle and end was literally just smoothing her hands instead of applying pressure. I was supposed to get a whole body massage but did not feel like that at all. And her stomach kept rumbling. I had a 1 15pm appointment and I was hoping she d had lunch by then. I felt really bad for her but it s disrupting when her stomach kept rumbling while she was giving me a massage. She also took really large deep breaths as if she was having a hard time. Overall it was not a pleasant experience and I felt that it was a waste of money. I will go back to Oasis centre downtown where I actually had a FULL body massage with pressure and relaxation.
5.50 for a pint of ultra. that is a complete joke. Good thing for good bartenders and waitresses.
The service is so horrible! The hosted showed us to our seats then come back and threw the menu on the table at us. Then we had to wait for our food for 30min when the place was not that crowded. Our waitress was very nice but it would take her 15 minutes to get our drinks. Which is funny because we had 6 waitresses passing by our table Nd none of them bother to get us or drinks. The food started pretty good until I got the spider role and it was completely burned. Not only that but after the manager came and took the role but they still tried to charge me for it. My whole experience was horrible.
Rude cashier. If you do not like your job quit. Piss poor attitude over the bag of chips double scanning. Really? Wow. Gas is a good price just the attitude of the man in the booth is bad.
I gave your restaurant a second try thinking maybe you were having a bad day. I am sorry to say your changes that you have initiated are a mistake. Portions are very small. Food quality is poor and cold . No value for your money anymore since you raised your prices. You have lost the secret formula that made New York bistro a success for the past couple of year. This restaurant is headed on a track to going out of business. I hate to see a place close due to poor management but when you read the reviews over the past couple of months you can see why.
Nice gym open all the time. They re incredibly busy on holidays. It was very hard to get in contact with an employee to join. It seems like there s no one ever working there. They recently opened up a large wellness room for yoga and Zumba. Unfortunately they still have no babysitting area for my 2 kids. This would be a big improvement. Price is 55 for a couple.
I m rating this solely on the hostess. We went in 12 30 16 to enjoy a glass of wine and watch the duo play guitar. Upon arriving the hostess asked us where we would like to sit. My aunt pointed to an empty couch. Hostess replied obviously thats taken because there are girls sitting across from it. Puzzled I said ok why do not you just seat us then. Her reply yes I m the hostess that s my job with sincere bitchery. I just stood there and stared in complete shock. I could have just slapped her in the face. But I held my composure and she sat us. Never ever have we been insulted by anyone let alone a hostess. What terrible service. This establishment needs to take a closer look at this young lady if that s even what you can call her . She is the first face everyone sees. We should have just left but really wanted to try out the wine. Well OBVIOUSLY the most she will ever be is a hostess if she continues to be such a rude brat. Millennials are the worst! Wo not be going back here. Wine was overpriced as well.
Very sad! Maybe I ordered the wrong item as it is Chinese not Thai but it was pathetic . Wor won ton 12 for 2 shrimps 2 pieces of pork some chicken and bok Choy I sent it back telling them it had nothing in it and I got it back w more cabbage . Dishwater Tea in a mug w a bag!
this is the worst place to eat!!!!!!!!!! do not come here unless you want hair in your food. the food is disgusting and expensive. i came with 10 people and 5 out of the 10 had hair in the food. nobody was refunded or was given more food. the staff are dumb and have no idea how to run a business.
Wow I m so disappointed in this place!!! Sign out front clearly states that the drive thru is always open but there s never anyone there in the morning!!
The staff here seemed very stuck up to me. Not the place to go if you are a beginner. If you practice often this may be the place for you but if you like warm friendly helpful staff find a different studio.
Came here during happy hour and the service was horrible . They were all chit chatting and no one bothered to help us or take our order for awhile . It was slow and like no one cared . The pizza was ok at best . I will not be back.
Absolutely horrible service impossible to get a to go order in under 30 minutes even when only a handful of other people are in the restaurant. The staff also seems to think that it s a fair system that custom orders take priority over everything else. It does not matter if you ordered a set salad from the menu 20 minutes ago the guy who just showed up but ordered a build your own salad will get his made immediately while you continue to wait and wait. Ridiculous.
3 Layers of door managers completely confused about how to accommodate guests on a Saturday night. Hardly anyone in the dance club but they were more concerned about procedures for admitting guests. Our first time in Montreal I just spent 400 on dinner with wife we were dressed to the nines for a night club and ready to spend several 100s more for bottle service and dancing. Unfortunately folks at the front door do not know how to handle customers. I guess that s why it was so easy to get in the door with no crowd. Pretty weak and I hope not representative of Montreal. Very disappointing as we ve stayed at other W hotels in the US.
2.5 alright. not overly impressive got the curry chicken thru mealpal. meh chicken tasted boiled curry tasted neutral .. had to add a ton of hotsauce to get flavout and the bean spouts were a filler that didnt match the meal.
This was the worst service I have ever gotten the employee at the airport avis center stole money from us. We were trying to rent a car in the airport and we thought the price was too expensive so we asked her not to swipe the card while we confirmed that we wanted this price while we leave she swipes our card. And what happened we are 3500 short. Also the prices are really bad here for one car the price with insurance was 3500 while at enterprise is 1700 . We still have not gotten our money back and now we have no money in the middle of nowhere Pennsylvania. Avis customer service says we have to wait 72 hours. Thanks for starving us avis and making us sleep in our cars. Never go here.
I had the unfortunate experience of dealing with Healthcare Partners located at 283 N. Pecos Rd. this morning and felt it necessary to share my experience. I have been with this particular location for a little over a year now and usually receive good service but today was a bad exception. I called to inquire about an appointment due to an illness. When I first called the phone was answered and I was asked to hold. After 10 minutes on hold a women came on the line and identified herself then informed me that the wait would be longer and that there was one caller ahead of me. Another 10 minutes elapsed and she returned to help me but promptly put me back on hold to assist a patient checking out. Five more minutes elapsed and she came back on the line and asked for my information. I have a bad cold but I do speak clearly I had to phonetically spell my last name for her no less than 6 times she seemed very preoccupied. After having my full name she called me by a completely different name and after correcting her she did it again. Seeing that she was not able to help me properly and given the fact I have now been on the phone for 30 plus minutes I asked to speak to the office manager in which she informed me she was the office manager. Now I know I will not get the help I need. I asked if I could come into see my primary care physician in which I was informed there were no appointments available which I find hard to believe. She told me to go to quick care instead and offered no other solutions. The office manager was rude and seemed to be out of her element answering phones and dealing with patients which seems strange since she was the office manager. I was not happy with the level of unprofessionalism I received from my primary care physicians front office. I would like for anyone considering using this facility to be aware of the unprofessional conduct of the front office staff and most notably the office manager.
They showed up an hour and a half after the scheduled appointment time. I had to call them to find out when they would be here they did not even seem sympathetic that they made their customer wait. The guy that came out would not give me a quote in person he said he had to email it and never did. If I could give them zero stars I would. I wasted a day off of work for nothing. WORST CUSTOMER SERVICE IVE EVER EXPERIENCED.
Wow wish I would of looked at the reviews and seen that I am not the only one that thinks this place has rude people working there. Called to get estimate and talked to a Jeanna about some product ideas and she told me I needed to know what I wanted and to call back when I knew exactly what I wanted. They were too busy to talk. Sorry Jeanna this is why I called is to get ideas and not all customers are experts on what you have. Little did you know I am overseeing a little thing called Raiders Stadium signage. Glad I called the other Fast Signs and got professional help. I will be taking my business to them. Do not waste your time on this shop or this employee who has no customer service skills .
If you ll look at the Stewart P review for Big Creek Apartments its pretty factual. The only thing I d change is the fact that the person that caused most of the problems in the leasing office the miserable prick he s referring to is now history since his review was written. They have also put in a few brand new machines and flat screens into the workout room. The staff is for the most part helpful. However with at least one of the leasing agents it seems like she is not interested in helping in any fashion and is not even interested in acting cordial to the residents just seems odd. The majority of the staff are nice and will help you with whatever you need. After time you ll figure out which agent to avoid. There is some storage in the town home units. There s a small 8X4 unit under the stairs. There s also two large closets upstairs as well as a massive walk in closet in the 2BR 2BA town home units. With those units unlike the apartments you ll get a garage space that is not open like the apartment units so you can stack items in there even though the lease prohibits it. We pay about 975 per month for a 1075 square foot 2BR 2BA town home with a pet fee for one dog and get one garage space. From what I ve looked at in other similar spots in places like Seven Hills etc its a decent value compared to the less populated communities farther away from the city. I do not understand paying a monthly pet fee and also having to put down a pet deposit. What exactly is the pet fee for? There are no additional upkeep costs in us having a pet so it just seems we re paying that extra fee. Also like Stewart P. mentioned there s no individual actual water bill. Its just an amount tacked on with your rent. Weird. According to the rent sites where you can put in your location and your rent amount the complex is well above average in terms of price. However this really is not considering the actual look and feel of the complex which appears to be far ahead of the other complexes surrounding the area. The quality of the apartments is above average. Older decor trim used but the units are clean bathrooms carpet kitchens etc . At least from my experience the town homes are fairly sound proof. During the winter the only upkeep within the grounds is snow removal which is done pretty quickly. They do not remove the trash for most of the fall and winter months and some of the spring so you ll have cups and bags traveling with the wind around the complex and sitting inside the lake for more than half the year. The grass gets pretty tall in the spring but is cut generally once every week or two. The foliage bushes are trimmed once or twice a year so they tend to get overgrown at times. Entering the gym from the office side allows people to just enter the gym without verifying they re actual members of the complex so there s no screening by the staff of people entering this way. Entering from the other side requires a key code as well as a entry key which is only given to the residents. So at times there will be random people just sitting in the small gym room not working out. Sort of odd and a little creepy at times. In terms of the gym quality there is one newer elliptical machine one newer treadmill two older treadmills one newer recumbent bike an older non working stationary bike and old stepper in terms of cardio machines. The room is only 15X25 so it may seem you re stepping over one another if there are more then three people in the gym at once. A small selection of free weights and a multi use weightlifting machine. Three TVs. I would not join the complex expecting to get good use out of the gym. Its the same with the pool. A majority of the time is is not clean or heated. The pool season and hours are comical. Its open Memorial Day to Labor Day however when the kids are in school it is not open on those days so its only open on weekends a majority of the season. Its only open daily for about six to eight weeks. The pool closes at 7 45 each night. There s plenty of things around like the Metroparks a block or two away from the complex shopping grocery entertainment etc and its all very close. Downtown Cleveland is approximately 8 miles away. Maintenance can be hit or miss. It took us about half a dozen phone calls to get a response on one issue while other issues maintenance will be covering it the same or next day so I m guessing the lack of response at times it because of the leasing agent in contact with the maintenance department. Every time they ve actually come out for any type of work it has been fixed properly the first time. On a side note if you re getting a tour of a unit be sure to ask which unit it actually is. They ll show you one unit but may not disclose the actual unit location. So make sure you re actually unit is not directly next to the busy road or something similar if that bothers you.
Seriously twice during the movie in comes a girl with a flashlight pointed at the audience. Slightly at the floor but really enough to totally annoy you. I m mean really?! Twice in a movie terrible.
I went in today for the first to try one of their dishes. It was called Poisson en papillote which is baked fish in parchment paper. I never had this dish before and decided to have takeout and give it a try. I was utterly surprised later to find that the fish was raw and uncooked. I called them to let them know and they did not even offer me a free meal or my money back. If you re going to sell a dish at least know how to cook it. I was disgusted and will never step foot in there again.
purchased 2 desserts to go both had a freezer burn taste to them so we took them back with not even a bite out of them...just tasted the white chocolate shavings on top . Waitress said oh you just have to eat around the chocolate shavings the cake is actually really good. Ummm...no thanks. Do not think I should have to do that for a 6 slice of cake! Asked for a refund and was told only the owners can do that and they are not in tonight. Refund was made the next day however it was for the wrong amount. Guess they felt the need to charge us a processing fee for wanting a refund. Wo not be back.
I am committed to my all or nothing reviews so unfortunately Deluca s gets the short end of the stick because if they were in a different neighborhood they may have gotten 5 stars but not in the strip. I liked Deluca s food and selection but their booths are the most uncomfortable seating I have had in years. Deluca s is one block away from Pamela s in the strip. Comparing the two Pamela s food is better their prices are lower and the seating is much more comfortable Deluca s menu is larger both have long waits on weekends. If you are in the strip there is no reason to go to Deluca s go to Pamela s.
Three of us had a late dinner and made our selection from the Pick a Meal Make a Deal at the Grand Caf in Green Valley Ranch Casino. We ordered two steaks with baked idaho potatos and green beans and the Salisbury with onion ring. The Salisbury and two other steaks with the green peas and mushroom were served at room temperature. Some pieces were hot but when you take a bite you can feel frozen pieces. I was so hungry I ate the salisbury or leftover meatloaf even the cold peas I was not a good host I failed to complain. My guests were shy and hardly touched the steaks. I must take the blame for bringing my two guests over. My apple pie dessert was still cold. I waived to get the attention of the waitress who was conversing with the hostess and a bus boy and asked to please warm the food perhaps add a warm vanilla or cream sauce. She returned with the hot pie without the sauce. I was afraid to eat the pie. The chef may have spit on my pie. Despite the unfriendly demeanor of the staff and absolutely the most disappointing dinner in Henderson I gave the elderly waitress her 20 tip perhaps they will improve in service and taste for future customers . Sadly we will not return to the Grand Caf for their affordable cold surprise Deal perhaps a year from now for their onion ring. It was very embarrassing to my out of town guests.
The only reason I give this facility 2 stars is that it is open late and it was fairly clean. Otherwise I would not recommend this place to any families. We came here late one night because my son broke out in hives we filled out the application form and waited approximately 1 hour. 15 minutes in the car 10 minutes in the freezing cold waiting room and the final 30 minutes in the patient room. When the doctor came in she asked us what was wrong but did not really care what we had to say. She did a very fast assessment of our son and claimed he had an ear infection . She did not even look at the hives on his skin until my wife asked her as she was halfway out the door. The doctor calls in a Medical Assistant that does a throat swab on my son. About 10 minutes later the doctor comes back with our prescription for antibiotics and allergy medication. This doctor was not attentive to family or the patient and her only goal was moving on to the next patient to collect their 150 fee. To all families with young children think twice about coming here unless you want to leave disappointed. Sonny
The menu is a little bit on the pricey side for what s offered 5 for a piece of baklava? That s the most expensive I ve ever seen . The Yinzer hoagie with chicken buffalo sauce ranch cheese and veggies sounded interesting but you could not even taste the chicken. Fries are just your typical frozen fried variety.
Not worth the money. While the atmosphere and service is excellent the food is nothing special. We had a pasta and the whole grilled fish that others recommended on this site and were not impressed with either. For a 40 dish I want to love it. Neither my wife or I could finish the fish ...too dry and fishy tasting. We wo not go back.
I love Blaze s gluten free pizzas and have been frequenting their restaurants for many years. However I recently had two experiences with the restaurant manager at this N. Scottsdale location. The first was while quietly enjoying my pizza with my service animal at my side. Unfortunately their employees harassed me and threatened to contact security to have me removed. They did not understand that a service animal did not need to wear a vest or be with a blind person. Their COO apologized that their employees did not know ADA law and gave me several free coupons to make up for their poor behavior. I mistakenly returned to their restaurant to use one of these free coupons and this same manager was present. Once I left the restaurant I was met with a security guard who told me that this manager falsely stated that I had been yelling threatening and using profanity towards one of their minor employees. This is an extremely disturbing and a very serious accusation. Unfortunately their corporate office sees it as a coaching opportunity. I d say stay away until they relocate or fire this restaurant s very angry and aggressive manager Heather.
I ve been coming here for a couple years now and it s always a hit or miss with the service. The technician I had last week was alright I guess. He was realllllly rough on me he hurt me a few times throughout my full set and I m pretty good with pain. The filing job is crooked and my nails are different lengths. It seemed like he was rushing through the whole thing and did not really bother to check what he was really doing. The polish does not even cover the entire nail on some fingers. Kinda unfriendly and I think this will be my last time coming here.
I could not get any help in this place until they apparently decided I look like a shoplifter. When I need to get hardware for something oftentimes I will bring in a screw or bolt or whatever in the size I need. That way I can compare it to what they have and make sure I get the right thing. I think this is a fairly common practice. So I m rummaging around my purse looking for the bolt I need and was followed around the store for the remainder of my visit. I had to grab something in the garden center and their undercover security was so obvious I turned around and said you seem to be following me around the store is there something I can help you with? . He told me the garden center was closed and I could not check out there. I told him I was not ready to check out yet and I was unaware that the garden center closed two hours earlier than the rest of the store. He said they did not he just uh... Wanted to see if I needed any help. Really? Where were you when I needed help in the paint department 20 minutes ago? Oh yeah I had not been rifling around in my purse pulling out bolts you think I m trying to swipe. I just shook my head and said Nope! I m fine! . Unless you re a fan of extremely bad service and overly enthusiastic loss prevention cops I suggest steer clear of Home Depot.
Went there for lunch. Sat at table in the bar area. Waited more than 10 minutes for drink orders 15 mins for menus 25 mins for apps And 45 mins for wings After they brought the wrong order it took 10 mins for them to fix it. Worst part of all the place was empty. I d hate to see how long you wait if they were busy. Customer service is terrible Wings were terrible. Meanwhile I m waiting for a refill and 4 managers were standing behind us laughing and talking about personal buisness and laughing extremely obnoxiously Never ever will I go to any Buffalo Wild Wings ever agin. Experience ruined it for me.
I was excited to find a Pho restaurant in the area and went there for lunch. Unfortunately the broth was bland and the meat was very chewy.
Awaits Sarcastic response from Jason Dyer Operations Manager No point in a review. Jason Dyer will make sure he points out your stupidity and their awesomeness. Complaint Express wash Lane is blocked when full service is extremely packed. Some how this is my fault I understand Jason. Also Dryer does not seem to dry the car completely. Always have water built up. Have to drive away because they do cram the wash full so you have a car right behind you. I know I know. You follow Manufactures standards. And you are deeply sorry about my Frustration. Vacuum spaces could use a wash down every now and then. They were grimy the last 2 times i was there this week. I know this is somehow my fault. I apologize. Thanks for a Decent 10 buck car wash. I know I know.. I will be getting popcorn and wait for Jason s Clever and comical response.
Dirty dirty rooms. The shower looked like it had not been cleaned in a month. There were tons of pubic hair in the shower. Large red stain in carpet. The room stayed hot with no way to control temperature. Dust on everything
Worst management ever. They charged me twice for a single meal and they took for ever to serve.
I waited for 30 minutes not even a glass of water came!! They had 10 ppl party that should not slow the service like this i never experienced this in my life!! Just being ignored i totally discourage any person of coming here
Well I bought stir sticks and would all the stuff out side get ruined if it rained? Just a thought. Looks big but there is actually not much to it in side steep stairs and a tea party room.
We went here for our very first ultrasound with our first pregnancy about a month ago. We were not sure what to expect. When we walked in the woman at the counter was nice enough. The waiting room has no decor at all but that did not matter too much to us...just kind of odd. The place is very cold and there was a woman waiting in the waiting room when we got there...at least we thought she was a customer but it turns out she was our ultrasound tech sitting on her phone. Kind of odd as well... After we finished filling our our paperwork she got up and went into the other room where she pulled us back moments later. The room was huge so good if you have a big crowd but again zero personal touches to the decor of the room...just a long row of simple chairs up against the wall in front of a projector screen. She spent about 5 mins on our ultrasound which was actually very painful and she pushed so hard into my stomach I cringed said its a girl congrats and sat me up and said thanks. We walked out with about 4 printed pictures and an unfriendly goodbye. Would not ever go back here again. The people on the phone when I called back a couple weeks later were absolutely unwilling to help answer my questions and now that we ve had a couple other ultrasounds...would never recommend this place.
Food was good but service was bad and extremely slow!!! Didnt even get to enjoy and eat our food together because each plate came out every 20 minutes at the end we had to ask for my sisters plate to go bc everyone was already done and her order still was not ready. This is a big issue and needs to be fixed!
To the gentleman working at the Chandler Fashion Center location my wife brought in my daughters phone today 8 5 14 at roughly 12 30pm. When you tell someone you will give them a discount of they do a Yelp for you be sure you present it better. It would better serve you to give the discount and then ask politely to give a Yelp shout. Not a trade for them while we wait or the discount wo not apply. Crappy customer service. To the management this is an opportunity to re train your employee on customer service skills which he is deficient in. Not the same experience from location to location. In fact even the costing varied between your Superstition and Chandler locations. Hey or in line. To any future All Mobile Matters customers I m not down on this company just toys individual location. Vinnie at the Tempe Marketplace location is stellar based on my experience with him a few weeks ago which is why I was hopeful I would get the same experience at another location. Not the case.
Written by Husband I had a serious issue with them quoting me cash price in contrast with what they billed my insurance. My wife and I went in here just to get a doctors note for her absence at work . She received a five minute check up and the note was promptly typed up. we were in and out in 20 minutes. When we received our bill from our insurance we see that Doctor s Express billed our insurance company 289.00 for the same service they quoted us for cash as 99.00. I called and I was told It was our insurance company that billed themselves 289 and that they had nothing to do with it. I have never had to pay over 120 for any urgent care visit including having debris removed from my eye. This place is a HUGE RIP OFF! Unless you have a flat co pay insurance plan don not use your insurance it will end up costing you more than you think. I believe the doctors there charge 900 an hour . To people like me That is outrageous for a strip mall doctors note.
We just waited over 30 minutes in the drive thru lane at this Taco Bell. No one apologized for the long wait... the girl that handed us our food was rice and dismissive. She avoided making eye contact with us because she knew we waited so long. A manager should have been at the window apologizing and handing out gift cards. This is ridiculous. Horrible customer service.
I hate to do a review like this but I had Scott come out and give me a quote on tinting for my new shop. He gave me a fair quote while talking I mentioned I had to get 3 estimates. He then offered me a discount and said if I wanted it done today he could make it happen. His discount put him just under 1 bid and just over the other. Called him asked him to get it done. His crew showed up worked for a while the realized they had the wrong tint. Could not finish the job same day! Which is one reason I selected them. Said they would be back in the morning to finish. They came back the next day late afternoon and finished the job. Everything seemed good at this time. Then I got the bill. My card was charged the original price with out the discount. I called Scott and was told he did not realize I wanted the discount! Really.. when you offer it prior to closing the deal it should be part of the deal! He told me he would get the refund handled Asap. Over the next few weeks I called Scott as I have not received my refund. Then my corporate office called a few times still no refund! I work daily with nothing but my word. What a shame they must need the money much more than me so I m out the refund but learned a lesson. To bad we re going to have other new locations across the valley and certainly wont consider them for our tinting needs.
This place sucks. Boasts itself as an outlet mall when in reality it s a bunch of shoebox sized stores with nothing but old merchandise and barely discounted prices. I was able to get an OK deal on 2 year old Puma s Still cost me 60 CAD but other than that I ve seen nothing really worth coming out of your way for. The Ecco shoes are last years models and are maybe 10 off what you d pay at Square One. Places like Hugo Boss do not even have any sales they re merely another retail outlet. Same goes for Oakley and several others. The savings simply are not there. Parking is atrocious hideous food options and an overall cold and sterile design makes the place absolutely dreadful in cold weather. My advice? Do not waste your time because there are no deals to be had here
Not the first time I ve had problems here but this one kind of takes the cake. I place my order rotisserie chicken salad at 11 53am. I sat there and waited until 12 25pm when my salad was finally ready. 32 minutes for a SALAD?!?!?!? I literally could have gone up to Capriottis ordered eaten and been on my way back to my office in 32 minutes.
Average at best. Food was super salty! Every dish was so covered in it. Drinks were unique and tasty. Service was below average. I had to send back the raw lamb app smelled terrible.
I do not usually take time to write a review but the level of service with HSA is so low and disgusting that I must say I would never resign with them again. Not only they charge you for items that make head scratch which should be covered under a related repair but if your AC fail they will put in the lowest crap in the market that they have in their warehouse!!! I had a carrier heat pump and when it broke down they want to force down a Pane unit down my throat....reason that what they buy just to get the functionality of repair item going! Amazing. Scenario you have a car insurance and you get in an accident with your Lexus and the insurance company will only pay for a Yugo! Reason It has four wheels and it drives! Stay away!!!
I feel like I have written a review for Purrfect Pawsitting before... but whatever. I am housecleaning today. Anyway I thought I had found exactly what we were looking for in a pet sitter when I came across Purrfect Pawsitting. I was so wrong. My husband and I happily used Jessika and Rachel several times for short trips to San Diego and Tucson... referred them to our family and friends planned to use them forever. They started out so wonderful. Then we took a babymoon. I was 4 months pregnant and we were saving every penny but decided that we needed one last awesome vacation before he arrived. So we booked ourselves a week in Seattle. We left early one morning and I asked in my standard how to care for the dogs note that R and J call us when they arrived. Going by their contract I expected that to be prior to about 7pm 14 hours since our departure . 7pm passed 8pm 9pm you get the picture . I called and called them. Several increasingly panicky messages were left. By midnight my husband and I were beside ourselves with worry thinking our dogs had been inside with no access to a bathroom since 5am. We could not reach R and J by phone or email and we were considering getting a flight home first thing in the morning to the tune of thousands of dollars lost... . We did not want to rely on our neighbors to care for our dogs for the entirety of our trip. Finally the next morning I get a call. A somewhat bored what is your problem kind of call telling me that R and J had arrived around 8pm then left again to return after midnight. Long story shorter R and J did a half assed job. They ruined an expensive non stick pot with a metal fork. There was makeup all over the bathrooms on the door handles everywhere. The house was a mess. I would not feel comfortable leaving my dogs with them ever again after what happened besides the fact that my house was a wreck when we got home. Nothing is worse than coming home from a long trip to a dirty house. Nothing. My only consolation is that I did not come home to dead dogs or a house full of poop and pee thank goodness for caring neighbors. AND after all that Rachel and Jessika fired us! We were fired for expecting our dogs to be cared for in a reasonable and humane way. We were fired for relying on friends to care for our dogs when we could not reach the people we had paid to watch them. I would never use R and J again. Never.
My family had been going to barrows and always ordered the X large pizza with 24 wings special. The price has always been 29.95. With tax it was 33. Saturday Sept 23 my family went and ordered our usual special xlarge pizza and 24 wings. The total now is 36 with tax. When i asked about the increase we were told they now charge 3.00 extra for traditional wings bone in . We were not told at time of ordering and when you try to read the menu board it is very small lettering in non contrasting colors they dont want you to see it . Also on this visit we noticed a reduction in the amount of cheese on the Pizza. We use to love Barrows but it looks like they are skimping on ingredients and charging more. Perhaps these are the first steps before closing and declaring bankruptcy. I guess Barrows has lost these customers. We dont intend on going back anytime soon.
They re incredibly slow. Give yourself extra time if you come here. The first few times I tried to justify it by guessing they must be short staffed or have the B Team working but No... Every time I go to this location I wait in line for 7 10 mins before they even take my order. Maybe this does not sound very long but I go to Starbucks bc it s fast and easy. If I wanted to wait 15 mins for coffee I would go to some local coffee shop.
Everything was great the front desk gals the pool and the room was nice too. Great location too! Everything was great UNTIL 2 am my husband and I walked to our car quietly. We were not drunk or anything just quietly walking to our car. On our way back to our room we were stopped by a security officer named Dee. He was yelling and cussing us out saying he was going to call the police and have us kicked out and throwing us in jail all because he was mad that my husband did not have a shirt on. The security officer was VERY rude disrespectful and VERY unprofessional. We were not rude loud drunk or anything we were just quietly walking to our car and going back to our room. We are business owners and like to do alot of staycation so with our employees and their families so we were there for the night checking it out to see if this is a place to come back to. I was so upset by the way we were treated by the security officer I wanted to leave right then. So all in all the place was nice but be careful of the security officer on a power trip they might try to put you in jail.
One star is too many but you cant give negative stars! Finally am cancelling service before I ever got one bit of data. 4 hours on the phone 2 hours on chat and massive amount of lies....... Wbat a waste of my time! No matter how good the price seems its all a lie! They may never get your service established and require you to jump thru continual hoops to make it seem like somethings being done. No matter what Cox is charging you it is better to stay put. Run Away! Dont waste your time also! Heed my words or you will severely regret it.
Found a long black hair in my sandwich today. I had to pull it out of my mouth. It was pretty disgusting.
Overall the quality taste of food is good. My cripe is the staff..you could 3 customers in line but you will have 8 EE s just standing around doing nothing. Including the manager s . But my biggest gripe and this not just restaurant It the entire staff speaking Spanish in front of me. I personally feel insulted.. That itw
Just not what it use to be. It is fast food without awareness of the food they are cooking now. The people are nice but most are unaware of what they are doing. They do not care about the food they give you. They do not even mark the food as allergy aware as they use to. I do not know about you but I do not want to get sick do you? If you do decide to eat here and you have a allergy I highly suggest Demanding they make sure it is. If you get sick it is because they are cutting corners in cooking. It was not always this way. Things have changed.
Horrible appliances. Bought a new LG washer dryer motor burned out in 7 months of light usage. Bought extended 3 year warranty after 2 attempts still no fix. Called store and they say must be at least 3 visits attempts to fix before they will give new one. NEVER AGAIN Lowes.
Ok. So my daughter and I tried this place today and I was deeply disappointed. It has ambiance and props that strongly support the Italian theme however the food is boring and lackluster. I had the calamari from the appetizer section and my daughter had the Philly cheesesteak. She had no real issues with her food other than it being dry and over cooked. The calamari was missing calamari seriously no meat inside and the batter was totally unseasoned. Thank goodness for the red marinara or salsa?! sauce to make them edible. The waitress was the best part of our experience. She was very attentive although we were literally the only customers during the lunch hours and friendly. When this place closes down I hope a good restaurant picks the waitress up. She was great! I m not gonna say they re not gonna make it stranger things have happened. Maybe hire a chef with taste buds or at least serve fresh seafood and meats equivalent to the prices you charge. Not frozen quick fry bake foods. Im not saying you should change anything I m not saying you should fire your chef I m just sayin...But I really liked the waitress.
the poor girl at the counter taking orders had the voice of Minnie Mouse so faint I could not understand her. I do not think she understood me either asking for no tomato threw her into chaos. Little bit of an attitude. Food took a while to arrive at counter and the place was not super busy but the help seemed extremely confused and unable to read the tickets and place the food into the proper trays. A bit concerning. Food was as expected ok for what it is four for four meal. Vanilla frosty mix was out as well. restrooms was ok and clean.
The worst Thai food I ve had in Pittsburgh. The service was slow but expected for a Friday night. Wait staff is friendly. Restaurant is noisy when crowded. The food was a big disappointment. We had the fish in ginger sauce and mixed seafood with basil leaves. The fish was overcooked the scallops in the mixed seafood dish had gone bad and neither dish was tasty. What do others see in this restaurant?
Thoroughly disgusted!!! We called ahead to check if we can take our two month old and they said it s a relatively free day and we do not need an appointment. So I waited for my little one to be in a good mood and took her there. There was only one girl available and she was waiting for her client to show up. She looked at her appointment book and said I can schedule an appointment for you. I did not take my two month old there to get an appointment!!! I expected a little bit more friendliness from a salon that s meant for little kids. They need a lot more than chairs that look like cars and plane.
This is the worst pizza place in Las Vegas. Three hours for an order no apologies crappy placement and it s Luke warm. It sucks it sucks it sucks
We ordered this food for our work. All of the food tasted sickly. As in as you eat it you feel yourself getting sick. Nobody could finish the food and we all threw it away. Two of my coworkers are already in the bathroom. Very gross food.
I am driving away from this place as we speak! I do not normally give bad reviews I normally like to try the service a second time before reviewing so that I can make sure that I am being fair. The server at the drive through window did not know much of anything except how to repeat over and over again I m Sorry I never got to the food because it was after the 3rd or 4th or 5th or 6th I m sorry that I needed to just breathe and leave. I get that at times a person may be new or in training and may be nervous about what they are doing but the icing on the cake for me was when the gentleman told me they were out of certain menu items and also did not know what a frapp was. There are times you just have to call it quits and end the relationship before things go ugly. This was one of those times...
Absolutely terrible experience. They advertise the oyster special and by the time it s 9 pm they tell us it s all sold out. The steaks were okay but they did not have the 16 oz t bone so I had to get the 20 oz then 30 minutes later they came back to tell me they did not have that either so I had to settle for an 8 oz striploin. The lobster bisque was essentially a bowl with 2.5 chunks of microwaved lobster and they brought a tea kettle with a brown colored soup and just filled the bowl with it. Looks and tasted disgusting. To top it all off their water cost 5 dollars per bottle and they didnt have dinner napkins because the cleaners forgot to deliver them .
A solid three star gym as it is nothing special but it does share a parking lot with frys and 3 check cashing places. While issues within the gym are just normal annoyances such as waiting for machines stepping foot outside especially at night is tricky. Solid chance that you may get robbed stuck with a needle or run over. General rule of thumb for new Phoenix yelpers......if at all possible avoid anything within a block of the light rail on camelback and 19th.
Came here for lunch. I order a Grand Slamwich but when they brought me the food... the plate was filthy dirty had avocado stain coffee stain etc ... I wish I would of taken a picture but I told to waitress about it. Before I did that I cut off a piece of the bread to insure they do not bring me the same sandwich since the plate was very dirty. 5 min later they bring back the sandwich in a clean plate but it was the same sandwich they just put it in the microwave. I told them and they apologized but I could not believe they did that so I did not order anything. Wo not come back here again!
I sat at the bar on the terminal side. Asked for a menu and as the waitress bartender handed it to me she asked if i knew what I wanted or if I needed some time.......ummmm. I just asked you for a menu. Can I at least open it and see what you have. A few mins later placed order for turkey Cobb salad. a gentlemen then sat down next to me and proceeded to order same item. 10 minutes pass and the waitress brings out the salad and says to me yours is coming right up . After 20 more mins and 2 inquiries my salad arrives. Guy next to me finishes his salad and says you must have pissed someone off . The salad is pretty good and huge. Service is pretty mediocre and the attitude of the blonde behind the bar needs a serious adjustment. Some people should not be customer facing and she is certainly one of them.
Fail. Where to start. How about how our waitress did not show up to our table for about 20 minutes. Much of the awfulness of this place does have to do with possibly the worst person who has ever called herself a waitress. I m not sure how many tables she was responsible for but the wait at the door would have been at least 20 minutes less if she was even remotely competant. The food was below average and cold and not cheap. Denny s quality with gourmet prices...no thank you. With as much velvet and neon in this place the waitress should do a strip tease or something before I get my eggs.
Dirty. Definitely not up to Starbucks standards. But then again most all of Vegas dirty and low standard. Windows were smeared top to bottom. If they pay a service to clean them somebody deserves a refund. One friendly face greeted us but she was then sent on break. After that the rest of the staff made us feel like we had interrupted their conversation and made up our coffee begrudgingly. Did I mention it was dirty?
Repas plus qu ordinaire et service l avenant. Les plats aux saveurs typiquement fraches et explosives taient fades mme ceux marqus de 3 piments tides et tristes. Accompagns de carottes rapes et de persil fatigu aucun n avait de relief particulier. On nous a apport le caf avant le dessert le serveur ayant l vidence oubli notre commande... et le restaurant tait presque vide. J avais l habitude de frquenter ce restaurant quand l envie de manger de la bonne cuisine thalandaise me prenait... Plus jamais.
Waited 40 mins for one round of drinks bartender did not care and the manager did not either a pathetic display of customer service
Will not eat here again. 1 Waitress Angela could not be found for 10 minutes at a time. The entire meal was a running commentary on where she was and why we did not even get water refills until dinner came. She had to be specifically asked three times for water before we got our one and only refill. 2 Spilled mussel butter on my jacket and although she did apologize no manager ever came over to see if we were okay. When I did complain they offered a 25 gift card which did not even cover the cost of said jacket thanks but no thanks. 3 When asked specifically if a dessert was served warm the waitress said yes of course but spoiler alert it was not . Party involved said it was fine and asked me not to say something. 4 When asked if they had a very specific after dessert drink the waitress replied in the affirmative only to substitute Irish coffee instead. If you are out of something just own up to it do not try to pull one over on someone. Long story short decent if overpriced food nonexistent management and the worst service I have experienced in a long while. As a server myself I am pretty forgiving but the non service ruined a 150 meal and Mitchell s management could not care less.
No customer service! No class! No compentecy! This is the absolute worst of all the SPG hotels. I ve stayed at many W hotels. But this one makes me not want to stay at any other anymore. It was that awful. They made guests unwelcomed and treated us like we walked in from the streets. They re supposedly so concerned about security they allowed people to have sex in the elevator. It was disgusting! The hotel was full of drugged out 20 year olds! I felt like I was in cancun. The reception desk was rude the waitstaff was so confused and had an attitude about her mistake. Even the management had attitudes and felt their staff did no wrong by being incompetent and stupid! I only give it one star for the nice pool area. Never ever stay at this W!!! You will regret it! Do not bother complaining because they do not care.
Really there should be no stars. No service. No acknowledgement. The three guys are chatting it up like know bodies business. Seriously. No customer service at all. No sale. I m out.
Made an order inside waited over 25 to 30 minutes for my simple chicken kebab. When I went to the counter to ask the young lady she obviously had forgotten about my order and was just in the process of starting to make it. As I stood at the counter I listen to the manager make personal phone calls in front of customers. When I told the manager she simply stated that she apologized and that next time she would get me a free item. Unfortunately lunch was over so my eight dollar kebab was not to be eaten. Huge customer service fail!!!
Service was questionable at best. One our meals was not correct when brought to the table. One of the waiters wanted argue vs fix the order. Our other meal fajitas was brought with out the tortillas...took 10 mins for them to be brought to the table while the food became cool. They comp a meal but even the manager did not apologize. It s been a long time since I ve experienced anything like it.
This morning I arrived at the PKWY Tavern at Marks and Warm Springs. I ordered eggs over medium. I waited over 20 minutes for the food when the eggs arrived they were so over cooked they where like rubber. The bartender was kind and returned them. They arrived back at the table less then 5 minutes. The same plate I told the bartender it was the same plate and she agreed. She asked if I would like to return them I said no and paid for my drink. Do not go to this establishment. I give 1 Star only because of the bartender. To at insult to injury there was only one other couple eating.
DO NOT GET YOUR CAR DETAILED HERE. This place RUINED MY TINTED WINDOWS and would not take responsibility manger was rude and unprofessional. Manger offered a free wash to buy my silence and would not take responsibility for ruining my windows. Yeah and I want to come back to this place to get my car washed yeah right I wish I would have read the reviews before I went here. PLEASE SAVE YOUR CAR and MONEY and stay far away from this place.
Why is this the only theatre inside of the casino I have been to in Las Vegas wo not let you bring the drink from the food court. I understand that it is not part of them but if I decided not to buy a drink from them I am not going to buy it there either. So I am sitting here drinking my over priced drink that costs more than the movie ticket. Now I would understand if this theatre was located in some shopping center but now I am quite upset.
Foods alright but real rough customer service. Do not bother going past 8 30 they re still open but the employees are done working. I went in and the person at the drive through window told me there s only 2 entrees left nothing else no sides etc. So I order one f the two items and she says there s only enough for a small. They are not kidding when they say small. Why not close if you re not going to make food past 8 30? I called and they said they make things cooked to order past 8 30 and I asked why that option was not offered to me the girl got lippy with me and made some excuse about it taking 10 minutes. Clearly she just did not wanna lift a finger and neither did the other 5 employees sitting on their phone in the dining room waiting to close. Definitely skip this place in the evenings Piada and Chipotle are a parking lot away.
I have not eaten at this location so although I m sure it s the exact same food as the other L3B s in the area I wo not comment on the food quality here. I do not know what it is with their beers it s something that I ca not quite verbalize. I tried several different beers the blanche the blonde the IPA which was a new item on the menu and a couple of others including a seasonal. They all had this... funk about them except for the IPA. Like a hint of clove and foot. My wife noticed it immediately as well. In fact even though she does not care for IPA s the IPA was still her favorite of the group because it was sans funk . If you re not limited to the immediate area I d branch out and try a different place for a good micro brew. Or honestly either stick to the IPA or maybe the stout which I did not try or find another place with a decent selection that s not made in house.
Wish I could give negative stars. Called ahead to verify they were open for business was told that everything was warming up but yes they were open. Arrived at 9 36 left at 10 01. My g f waited at least five minutes to be seated while I went to use the restroom. Also your waitress took my g f s order and brought drinks but never came back to the table after I came out of the restroom. And my g f said the waitress was not even in her uniform yet and changed after she took the order. Never received the appetizer never had my order taken. Seriously get some softer fucking toilet paper and paper towels. That s a really chickenshit way to make more profit.
funny bring your stuff packaged and ready to ship.. i should of not switched ups stores this one wants to upcharge gor you to pay for a box... worthless!!! funny it took this long for you to respond!! the ups store by my house ships my packages the way i bring them in! just you dont.. respond quicker next time
My business colleague and myself wanted a quick dinner as we were both beat from a long day. Strike 1 my cocktail glass was broken on the rim. Luckily I avoided a cut lip Strike 2 Our appetizer was delivered with our meal Strike 3 They got my order wrong Bartender was nice enough but we should have received at a minimum a Comp on the App. Usually I would have spoken up but sometimes it just ai not worth it.
If you like strong coffee Peets is for you. Unfortunately I do not . No matter how many I ve gone here and told them to only put a shot or half a shot of espresso in my drink it s still too strong. I stopped going to this Peets because I found a hair INSIDE of my cup and when I told one of the employees they acted like it was my fault and were not very nice about it either.
Service was ridiculously SLOW! It took nearly an hour to get our entrees. Our wait person was MIA. We had to flag down a member of staff to ASK about the hold up. We were told There s a problem in the kitchen with NO APOLOGY!!! When our food finally arrived we found it to be average at best. NOT worth the wait! I wo not be going back!
The person who stated this is not a true Italian deli was correct. I was a bit confused walking in and being confronted with 2 Hispanics who were totally clueless about anything Italian as it turns out. The over sized sandwiches are anything but....and at about 8 a pop. Oh and thanks for the cook who cleverly hiding the burned sides of both sandwiches on the bottom you really tricked me on that one why I did not discover it until I got home. What I ended up getting for my 19 was 2 crappy sandwiches no pickle or any sort of garnish no sour kraut on the Ruben which my not be considered Italian...but they ARE on the menu and burned toast on one side. They proudly serve Boarshead meats here which to me is serving marginal product. I made it obvious I was there for the first time this apparently meant nothing to them. The odd thing was no one else was even in the deli they were not in the least busy. You d think since they had all the time in the world to do a decent job they would give some semblance of caring.
Well....My daughters and I decided to try out a new place. I wish we had not . My Pinot Noir was great. One of my daughters had a pizza and it was tasty. The problem we had was the Napa Short Ribs were good but came with a long hair on the plate. I pointed this out to the waiter and she was very apologetic. She removed the plate and offered to bring out the same entree. Manager came by and was very sorry to hear about the stray hair. I was very disappointed that they did not comp my daughters meal.....Or at least offer to comp a portion of the meal in a situation like this.
Service was horrible! Only 1 server he was trying his best but really rude. He had trouble with hearing and he told us to speak at him so he could hear. When we were trying to talk to him in respectful manner and loud just to make sure he could hear us He was very direct and super rude to each person at our table. Every time we come to this Ihop they are rude. I wo not be returning to this location. I m rating 1 star because food was okay but definitely not worth the constant disrespect. Customer Service is something they need to train each employee on BIG TIME. Ohhh also when we were walking out we had asked him if there was a manager on duty.. he told us he was the manager so we then told him oh well survive could of been better he then replied with FEAR ENOUGH just rude and very unprofessional.
Disappointed and confused...I just called Ra hoping to place an order for pick up. I realize its late and knew there was a good chance the kitchen may be closed. Here in yelp it says they close in 27 minutes. So I called and in the message it says that in friday and saturday they are open til 1am. But apperantly theyre closed at 12 27am? Am I missing something? So maybe someone from Ra could either post the actual hours of operation. Or hire employees that can keep the restaurant open during the hours of operation. Sounds like a place to strt right? I have heard good things of Ra but giving 1 star because I wasnt able to try any of the food or drinks because they closed early on a saturday night. Thanks I doubt ill make anoher attemot lots of places are open.
Maintenance is a joke! Nothing gets fixed on time and you have to call and go in the office to try and follow up and get things rolling. Currently waiting for my maintenance request to be completed after submitting it 4 days ago. I guess having your sink flood is acceptable.
The food was very expensive and not well prepared. Like most things in Vegas the presentation was beautiful but the substance very disappointing. The rating might have gotten 1 more star had it not been the most expensive burger and salad I ve ever eaten.... But that s still only 3 stars!
If I could give this zero stars I would but because of service as I did not even get to try the product. I went to The Village Bean today to get a drink. I walked in and there were only 2 people sitting at a table. They seemed like regulars as the cashier employee was talking to them. She came over to wait on me and acted as though I had inconvenienced her. I looked at the menu ordered a mocha and then asked if she had skim milk. She sort of huffed made a grunting noise and said yes reluctantly. So she proceeds to make my drink. I look at the gallon of milk she brought out and noticed that it was expired. She brought out another full gallon after and set it next to the first one on the counter. I assumed she was going to throw away the expired milk and use the new gallon but then she proceeded to pour it into my mocha. So I asked her if I could see the milk she flashed it at me trying to not show the expiration date I asked her to tilt it so I could see the date. I told her it was expired. She again huffed grunted and walked towards the back to throw it away and said it s still good in a harsh disgruntled voice. She then brought a different full gallon from the back and stated that the new gallon was also expired. So I said to forget about it and just walked out. Probably the worst customer service I have ever received. She was incredibly rude the entire time never even flashed a bit of a smile and then tried to serve me expired milk.
I m hoping that someone at the Health Department reads this and is as alarmed as I am about what I witnessed at BluBurger last night. I was sitting at the bar and ordered a cheeseburger with no add ons so no lettuce tomato any of that jazz. Literally within three minutes of placing my order the bartender put a plate in front of me. Surprised by the speed but not thinking much of it I ate a couple of sweet potato fries then noticed that my burger was awfully dressed up. I lifted the bun up with fingers I just wiped my runny nose with I know I m totally gross but I thought it was my food and saw that it was not what I ordered. At the very same time the bartender came hurrying back saying she accidentally gave me someone else s order. As she whisked it away I explained that she d have to make it over again because I already touched it and I have a cold. She kind of laughed and brought the plate back to the kitchen window. I watched while the cook did nothing more than put the big toothpick back into to bun and sent the contaminated plate out to the unsuspecting diner. I do not know if the bartender did not tell the cook what I said about already touching it and having a cold or if neither of them cared. What I do know however is that is really really gross and if I knew that I was eating someone else s snot germs I d barf. So if you ate at BluBurger last night and you develop a cold this weekend now you know why.
If you feel like gettin shamed into giving a 2 tip for a 7 bud light this is the place for you. This place sucks. Do not be distracted by the red white and blue hanging from the walls. There s no freedom here. The best part about watching a band perform here is these ladies jumping onto the bar dancing while screaming obnoxious nonsense into a bull horn. 0 STARS.
Yes....they are cheap but you are getting cheap service. I did not choose them but when Budget did not have my vehicle available and wanted to have me drive a minivan God forbid ..I said no way so they asked EZ to price match which they did. I was warned by a fellow colleague to be careful because they would try to force me to take the insurance which of course they did. They told me that I was required to provide them with a copy of my insurance if I declined their coverage...told to me by Ali. I told him that I was not required to provide that to him and he finally backed down. The gentlemen right next to me who also declined the 20 day insurance was not asked to provide his insurance....hum? I told Ali when I would be bringing the vehicle back and got a call the next day saying I was late bringing it back. This company has poor customer service but I guess I should not be surprised...you do get what you pay for.
Went here for Winterlicious and it took an hour for the mains to arrive. Food was not good at all. Got the apple tart with vanilla ice cream and was served an apple tart with sorbet instead. The sorbet tasted horrible with the apple tart... Avoid this restaurant if you can.
I wish there were a minus star. We ordered a whole suite of Thermador appliances to be installed fortunately we received all of the appliances not all of the parts and they were supposed to come out and install everything but they are out of business. I paid for the install I paid for the parts I did not receive and not I have to deal with another company to try to track down parts and pay for install and the parts I did not receive. We have been using this company for well over 20 years and this is what we get a lot of time spend on the phone time out of my day and time to schedule others to come out and do the job they were paid to do.
I always used to go to Teriyaki madness was amazing .decided to go there for lunch today and I found out the crab Rangoon s they changed were so amazing ... they replaced it with crap .....and the potstickers they changed were so dry and crappy and this place is not cheap ..... Looks like the food quality is going down .... Such a shame
Orange chicken MOSTLY breading no beef in beef and broccoli ... PLEASE may I know Where is the GOOD Chinese food?
My experience at this at first seemed great. But as the night went on the bartenders I do not know if it was because they were tired or not but started to cop major attitudes that made me not want to ever go back! Stuck up and rude would be the words I would use to describe the place... It s pretty sad that you pay for a service and receive stuck up attitudes of disrespect! It seemed like they were under the impression that I owed them something.... I left confused and completely unsatisfied! I do not recommended this place for anyone
This manager is rude!!!! She is NOT customer service oriented at all...... She did not care at all as she made our sandwich... You could hardly even hear her she just sucked in all areas!!!! Sandwich was not near as good as it is when I go to our usual subway now I know to not come BACK!!!
Elevators are ridiculous. Had to wait almost every time more than 5 minutes. Rooms are average at best. House cleaners were loud in hallways.
I take the 29 Dufferin bus on a regular basis commuting to and from work. It s an essential line for me and for other Torontonians and I do quite appreciate its existence. The thing though is that the buses of the 29 Dufferin clump up badly and leave the line underserviced for long periods and do so badly that Toronto transit expert Steve Munro devoted a category of his blog to explore just how it goes badly. Two nights ago I saw three buses clumped up the morning after four.
Six of us ate here on March 13 2018. If it were all about the food I would have given a strong 4 or 5 stars because the food was delicious. However the customer service was poor and very unsatisfactory. The waitress never cracked a smile and seemed unhappy to be there. Every time she brought us something we d thank her and she would simply ignore the gesture no you re welcome or even a no problem . The same waitress literally got into an argument with my mother over whether or not the menu stated there was pesto in the meal she chose. Instead of embracing a customer is always right service mentality the waitress wanted to dig her heels in and prove she was right Want me to show you the menu again? . I looked around and the other waitresses and staff looked as though they desperately wanted to be somewhere else as well. Where are the smiles? If you ca not be happy at least ACT happy for the customers. Earlier in the evening when we called to make reservations we had the following curt conversation Us Yes we d like to make a dinner reservation for six. Employee High table or low? Us Excuse me? Employee High table or low? Us I do not understand what you mean. Employee Do you want a high table or low table? Us Um we just want a table. And so it went. Upon arrival and throughout our visit we were treated similarly. Customer service is a dying art and this is on full display at the Twisted Italian.
This was the worst poutine I ve ever had. It was entirely flavourless and the fries became really soggy. The service was friendly enough nothing special though.
Love this place! My husband and I have been in every week since they opened. We normally sit at the bar. Staff is very friendly and accommodating. We have enjoyed several of their dishes. I think my favorite are the sausage stuffed mushrooms. The only thing I would suggest would be to add a few more appetizers to the menu. They also had a delicious pizza on the menu when first opening but have taken that off. Please add the pizza back. Ginger Monkey is a great addition to our neighborhood Unfortunately tonight was lacking. We came in to catch the D backs and U of A football game. We were confused at first....we thought maybe PAC 12 was not offered so we did ask the bartender on duty. His answer...we decided not to show U of A tonight. It s an AZ team!!! Are you kidding me???? Bar seating was pretty much empty. We visit your establishment at least once a week. To be honest if Sarah or Lauren are not around it s just not the same. Very disappointed!! We would have stuck around for a few drinks. Had one and left.
Discovered this place again after they moved from Eaton Centre. Female cashier is the same as old location and one other guy with salt and pepper mustache. However there is a young guy there with beard who has major attitude and refuses to serve you if your not Persian or white. He will see you enter and then walk away to the back..it is so blatant and obvious. For this reason I will take my business to Paramount.
Two years ago I shopped at WF Plano Texas daily. And I loved it. I kid you not and its because I do not cook. The WF in Arizona continue to disappoint. Its like they are a whole different chain. They seem terrible for customer service. Today I go into this location with one goal hot breakfast potatoes. Of course no one approaches and asks customers if they need any help or if they are looking for anything. That somehow is not part of the AZ ethos. I go to prepare foods and the guy has just dumped the hot breakfast potatoes into a tray with other breakfast foods. I asked him about it and he said they just struck the breakfast items and I ca not have any since it is a health issue. He did not offer to assist me in finding other solutions to my hunger. He just walked away with a smug look on his face. I looked around for another worker to help me but I saw none. Where are they? So I bought a gallon of water instead and the guy at the checkout did NOT ask did you find everything okay today? Because if he had I would I have told him that I did not find my potatoes and could he suggest somewhere nearby that might assist me. Oh well failed at the last attempt. I guess I will go check yelp for breakfast potatoes nearby. Plano would have tried to help solve my problem. AZ evidently does not. I am shocked when WF trains people who come across as arrogant non servant oriented individuals and then expects me to drop like 9 per pound for broccoli salad. Maybe its because WF pays X per hour? Maybe employees are frustrated? Just like I am frustrated at having to pay a lot? They are frustrated having to work for little? Not sure but maybe is part of some corporate disconnect. I do not really care about high prices as long as I get gold standard customer service. But if I do not get it I will shop elsewhere. PS. I found that the Camelback WF location seems to focus better on customer service.
Always follow your first mind! This place is always empty when passing by so my husband and I have never been interested in trying. A co worker suggested it and what a disaster. When I arrived at the peak of the lunch period 11 45 there were only 2 people dining. I ordered 2 sampler platters and took a seat. Later a group came in and placed orders and were seated. I noticed their orders started coming to their table and reminded the waitress I had been waiting for over a 1 2 hr. Finally go my food...the ribs were oven baked and nothing special the chicken fingers were so dry I could hardly chew and swallow and the pulled brisket which I was charged 1 extra for was a pile of mush. What a joke of an establishment.
Came for my husband s birthday.....it was terrible! The salad was soggy the breadsticks were cold and hard and the pasta dishes were flavorless. My husband ordered the shrimp scampi pasta. It was dry and flavorless so he asked for a side of the sauce...they brought him a bowl of alfredo sauce. We told the waiter that he brought the wrong sauce and he just shrugged. I had to have the hostess bring me a refill on my drink. We will not be coming back to this location.
First a little history. We had used A1 a couple times in the past. I always found the 1 addition fee for playing with the dog to be a little concerning but always paid for socialization. I believe that this establishment has good days but when things go wrong it results from poor management and procedural control which amounted to excuses lies to cover their tracks and a lack of communication and record keeping by under qualified caregivers. June 2018 we decided to vacation in Cozumel MX. Winston s medical shot records were updated and faxed to A1. The day prior to dropping him off I called to confirm boarding and to let A1 know I was bringing his food as he suffered from food allergies grain . I also asked for them to groom and cut his nails prior to picking him up. After all we like to tell Winston that he is going away to a posh Spa! lol. On the morning of drop off Winston and his food were given to the young lady who was doing the receiving. This is also a good time to mention that the girls working and answering the phones seemed awfully young perhaps high school to 18 years old as they were eager to please and seemed unseasoned in communicating details and facts. In fact one girl looked 12 which I later find out that it was the manager s daughter. More on this later. The Mexican adventure had begun! We arrived in Cozumel on 6 25 and without concern for all the pets we left behind. On 7 1 I received a phone call which I had quickly declined as I was boarding a SCUBA boat and did not want to take the call. Upon returning I revisited the number and discovered it was A1 as I copy and pasted it into google. I immediately called back and a young lady answered as I inquired the nature of the phone call. The young girl explained that Winston had hot spots on his neck and that they had contacted another dog named Winston s owner by mistake. Of course I was confused. The young lady explained that a day ago they had groomed him and it may have been from the shampoo. I was even more confused as any professional groomer uses PH balanced shampoo. The young lady explained that they were taking him to the vet and they would let me know how he was doing. I asked how large were these hot spots using a quarter as a reference and the girl said about about a quarter size and that there were 3 of them. I kindly thanked them for responding as quick as they did and I will be waiting for their phone call. On 7 2 a person the manager called and left a message explaining that they were in the car taking him to the vet a day later for an allergic reaction?? and that she apologized for the confusion but that they had bathed the wrong Winston . I was confused as I wanted him bathed! I immediately contacted A1 and spoke to Tilly the manager. I was told that the previous person I spoke to yesterday had been mistaken that the wounds were all over his neck and they believed that it was due to an allergic reaction. I explained that he has food allergies but not from shampoo use. The morning after returning to Ohio my 2 sons were excited to pick up Winston. Upon first sight and to my amazement Winston looked like a shrapnel war victim! I was enraged and confused to how this could have happened and to the degree of injury and response to medical care. Tilly the manager mentioned that she had a bunch of goodies to give me. The goodies she was referring to were his prescriptions and antibacterial ointments! Winston had bubbles all over his head and his neck was all crusted and bloody. I had paid the boarding fee and Tilly said she was not going to charge me for the doctor fee and grooming fee. I was perplexed as I needed time to figure out what really went wrong. I reluctantly thanked her and was given a bag of medications. When i got home I looked over Winston and recognized the bubbles sores as years early he exhibited the same rash feeding him grain. Ever since this allergic reaction Winston was given the proper diet and has NEVER had an outbreak since. Interesting uh? I contacted Tilly and explained to her that someone was lying. After excuses and twisting of facts I concluded that they mistakenly fed the other Winston MY Winston s food!! Tilly was speechless to an admission of fault of coverups and lies conceded. Wow just think if they did this with medication and were confused over a similarity in a dog s name! I demanded that Tilly refund me the total amount as they did not care for Winston and I would also send them the vet bill in the event of continued infection. Tilly said she would contact me after the holiday. On 7 5 another manager contacted me explaining they were sorry and that they were refunding me the total amount. I will never use A1 again and it s not because of an honest mistake but of the dishonest deceptive way they handled it.
I had to take my car in to figure out why the check engine light was on. After the 6 hours it took for them to scan the computer on my car they called and told me that there was a glow plug that was going out and it would cost 400 to replace. I told them not to worry about it at the time and was charged 130 for them to basically scan my car. It s my fault that I agreed to it when I could have taken it elsewhere to have it scanned for free. That s exactly what I did. I went to Exklusive Motorsports and they scanned my car for free AND replaced the glow plug. The owner Derek only charged me 100 and the cost of the part was 95. Now that s professional. I also called the stealership to see how much the part would cost from them and they quoted me something along the lines of 148. Do yourself a favor and find someone local. Not all repair shops are out to rip you off. Give Derek a call if you need some help with your VW and not the dealer!
Awful and disrespectful staff and store manager. We tried to buy a Christmas tree from this store and we found the one we wanted on display since they were out of stock on the Christmas tree size we need it. They told us we could have it but when went outside to ask a staff member to help us put it in our car in front of our kids and in a very rude way the store manager said we could not have the tree on display! We left in a horrible mood and empty handed! We are not going back to this store they really need to review their customer service practices and managers training and remember that customers come first!!! Selling and moving inventory is how a business makes money and not just displaying things. Home Depot needs to remember that!
This hospital is very dysfunctional i was there for 7 hours slipped and fracture my arm. i went in at 11am on Friday 15 Feb standing there for 15 minutes in front the STOP 1 sign and a 4 behind me then we were given a number. There was 2 nurses there and then 1 she taken her sweep time chatting with her colleagues as they walk by. She did check a few patience she seems working on a quota or something. very 15 20 per patience and yet there are 2 registration staff sitting there waiting to register patience. Short story is i waited about an hours before the nurse check what is wrong with me then to the registration. I was sent tot the green zone greeted by a friendly nurse.. great finally there is service... i was sent to xray.. and hour wait. worst no one is there and only a place to leave form in.. back to the green zone.. wait another hour.. and wait.. doctor came see the that the bone is broken and wait .. to put cast on.. then x ray and then wait.. Toronto East General there is not accountability no one seems to care about patience i could be wrong on this one but nurses and doctors a very good there but the service i m getting is subpar luckily this life death situation.
This fob situation is an awful daily burden. For instance your girlfriend ca not enter the building unassisted unless she s added to the lease pays a 75 background check and a 25 fob fee.
Considering the ambiance location and prices at this place you would expect a lot better service and quality wise. I came for my friends birthday on a Saturday night and we were there for three hours. Yes three hours. She made a reservation and when we arrived the table was not ready yet. We waited a half an hour just to be seated despite having her called ahead. When we were finally seated it took another half an hour to get our drinks brought to us and another half hour to put in our food order. The place is very very clearly understaffed as the server knew what he was doing just did not have enough time to do it all in. Once we all got our food the three people who had ordered fries all had to send them back because all three orders were cold. I had the Summer Ravioli which was good but considering the price unimpressive taste and size wise. My friend beside me ordered a Poached Pear and Brulled Cheese Salad and was also unimpressed with it considering the price. Once we had all finished eating it took ANOTHER half an hour just to get our bills and pay. It really is a beautiful location it just needs to be staffed more appropriately. On a busy Saturday night there really is no excuse for cold fries.
Went there for an early dinner after their grand opening. Decor is ok the restaurant has a huge stage that s awkwardly placed in the middle of the back wall tables sparsely placed around the restaurant. As per the menu happy hour is everyday from 2 7p. We ordered the beer sampler my husband ordered the Onion Burger and I ordered the East Valley Burger. both medium well and mac and cheese with fries for our kiddo. Beer came and it was good the waiter did not really explain much of the beers nor the seasonal he just gave us the paper that goes with the sampler that describes the beers. They were a good size for samplers enough for both of us to taste and have more than 4 sips each. Our son s food came with apple slices instead of the fries we order the waiter came back apologetic with the fries FYI the restaurant has no kiddie cups or to go cups for the kids drinks just big glass cups. Def not kid friendly . Our burgers came both burgers were beyond well done mind you we ordered them medium we let the waiter know but at this point we had already bitten into our flavorless burgers. Did I mention flavorless? Yes they were there was no seasoning whatsoever on them they tasted like regular cooked ground beed. The onion burger claims it has horseradish cream sauce...there was less than a sliver on the burger meanwhile the East Valley burger is described as having a cilantro lime sour cream...again a sliver we could barely taste it. After our son was done eating we asked for his ice cream as it s part of his meal. The ice cream tasted like it has been sitting in the freezer for months and months. You know the kind where there s freezer burn on your ice cream but you eat it anyway because you just have to have it...yeah that kind. Our son who LOVES ice cream did not even eat it. We then asked for our check upon reviewing it I noticed that we had been charged the regular price for the sampler. I asked the waiter and he said that it was not happy hour so I pulled out the beer menu where it clearly states HAPPY HOUR EVERYDAY 2 7p and then the bottom describes what the specials are he then went to the manager and comped is that even a word? whatever he reduced the price of the beer sampler. Would we return? Maybe for their beers and possibly appetizers. The service beer selection and location is good food...eh I ve had better. However I think I d rather save my and go to OHSO Brewery in Phoenix and if we want a good TASTY burger we ll go to Teakwoods.
This place deserves zero stars to be honest but unfortunately that is not an option. I m surprised that this particular location has stayed open as long as it has considering that everyone I ve spoken with has had negative experiences there. During my particularly negative experience I initially complained to the server however understanding that she could do little to resolve the issue for me I asked her to get the manager who was TOO LAZY to drag his fat useless ass out of his office to deal with an unhappy customer. Instead he just sent the poor girl back out to try and handle it on her own. Worst management ever I do not know where they find these clowns but if anyone from corporate is reading this I d strongly suggest that you fire all of your managers and start from scratch. I can see why the staff is unhappy if that s the kind of management they have to deal with. The food is mediocre the prices are too high unless you happen to make it for happy hour and the atmosphere is a joke.
80 of tables are available yet they do not seat anyone because they are fully committed Happened multiple times
You can see my original message from Nov 25 below. It s December 18 and I have had yet another disappointing encounter with the Associates at 6330 W. Flamingo. When I saw Susan Schuder Nurse Practicioner in October she gave me a prescription for Chantix. Because they will not give you a paper scrip I was unaware that the prescription was only for the starter pak or 30 days of a 90 day program. I filled the prescription but because of other pending bills I did not begin taking the medicine until I knew I would be able to afford the second month. It is not covered by insurance the starter pack was 330 and each of the 2nd and 3rd months is around 290. I really want to quit . I called the pharmacy to have my 2nd month of the program filled on Sunday December 13 and was amazed to be told that there was no order for either the 2nd or 3rd month of the Chantix regimen. The pharmacy called and left a message on Sunday Monday and Tuesday without any response from Ms. Schuder or the doctor Daniel Malone who is her supervisor. I called SWMA on Wednesday 12 16 and again today 12 18 and yet nothing was happening!! The pharmacist called me back to say they were very confused at that office and the person he spoke with was unaware that Chantix is a 3 month program. I finally was put in contact with a Dr. Choe with something called www.nowclinic.com. Never heard of this outfit before nor am I sure how nowclinic is connected with SWMA but I am grateful for his intercession although he did caution me to always contact the now clinic when I am having difficulties with the regular SWMA associates. Dr. Choe does this happen often? The pharmacy I use never has this product in stock that s why I started 5 days before I was due to run out of medication and hopefully my Chantix will be available to pick up Monday 12 21. BUT MY POINT IS Why should any patient have to put up with 4 and a half days of aggravation for health care follow through? Why did no representative of SWMA call me with their questions? I have no answers I can only posit on the nature of such shoddy treatment. After the issues giving rise to the 11 25 message I left for the Flamingo office it took a wonderful person called Phylana Thomas from 888 S. Rancho Urgent Care to see my post and to contact me on THANKSGIVING DAY and get me an appointment for some quality healthcare the following day. Please see that review I cannot tell you how much I appreciated the quality of care I received at that location. Wonderful experience. NOVEMBER 28 EMAIL FROM YELP REPRINTED HERE No reply yet from Southwest Medical Associates at Flamingo Hi Joyce You sent a message to Southwest Medical Associates at Flamingo on Nov 25. Just wanted to let you know that we have not heard anything back from them yet. Bummer! You may want to consider calling them instead 702 876 4449 Your original message to Southwest Medical Associates at Flamingo I am still waiting to be contacted by your staff. You phoned at 3 asked if I could return the call I did but was unable to speak to Dr. Malone or his nurse. No one was picking up and the receptionist told me that the calls were not being picked up by voice mail. Questions regarding treatment options that needed to be addressed were not I am waiting for Dr. Malone or susan to call in a prescription for me. Thank you.
Food is pretty good for bar food but nothing that I have sampled is stellar. They also have an impressive beer selection. Lots and lots of tv s as one would expect so if you re looking to see an obscure game they should be able to accommodate you. We have pretty much ruled this place out because of the noise level. I know I know it s a sports bar. But this is my review so I think it s a fair comment. I like to converse with my wife during dinner and I find hearing very difficult at Duckworth s.
I inquired about a vehicle that was had just newly been posted on Autotrader. Spoke with a salesperson named Moe who advised me that the car is still in service and it has not yet passed the pre sale inspection yet. I had called to put a hold on the vehicle and he said he would call me in the afternoon once it had passed the inspection. 10 minutes later another salesperson calls to tell me that the vehicle is sold. Typical salespeople. Sales Ploy 2011 Lexus ISF was listed for 32 998 on autotrader. I guess I was the first one to call in and triggered someone to pull the ad and edit it. Car is now listed for 7000 more. This is one shady dealership that lies. Stay away.
One month later and over 800 down the drain. My lips are 100 back to their original shape and look. I am very disappointed. I had lumps and bumps and my lips went back their original form only with large bumps in them. I was so embarrassed because it was obvious and I got questions from others about my lips. I did not know what to expect because this was my first time being injected. I corresponded with Melanie and sent her photos and she told me to massage the lumps and if they did not go away to come back in. They did not so I contacted her again and was booked for an appointment. When I arrived for my appointment instead of bringing me to the back to get numbing cream put on they had me wait in the lobby and did not even bother to ask if I would like numbing cream. I had to ask for it and was met with sighs and rude looks from the staff. They brought it out to me and put it on. I was kind of embarrassed because I had white cream all over my mouth and people were in the lobby. They tried to bring someone else back when it was time for my appointment who had arrived much after me and her appointment was after mine. I heard her when she checked in. What I found hilarious is that she was asked if she would like numbing cream and they brought her to the back for lip numbing cream. I had to wait in the lobby but not her. When Melanie brought me back I explained how dissatisfied I was and she told me that she saw what I was talking about but was trying to play it off lightly. After she injected me with a dissolver and another syringe she charged me another four hundred something dollars. I m so pissed. I feel ripped off and conned. Both times I bruised like crazy and my lips were in pain. I could not cover my bruises with makeup. I saw another injector for a consultation and they said they do not believe I was injected with what I was led to believe I was. I want my money back. It has been a traumatic experience all the way through. Do not go here. I tell you no lies and I have documented proof.
We love chick fil A bc it offers dairy free options for our children with dairy allergies... however we have been to this location many times and 5 times in a row we have ordered grilled nuggets and we always have to pull around bc they take longer which is fine but all 5 times we have had an item s missing... fries or we received fried nuggets which are not dairy free or we were given the wrong sauce which also wo not work since the bbq sauce is the only dairy free sauce or drinks... Seems like maybe the operator needs to spend some time in there to figure things out.
Just had lunch at this beautiful restaurant. My husband and I ordered the brussels sprouts the chicken tenders crabcakes which were 28 for two of them and lobster bisque. I was excited to try the new restaurant but I have to say it was nothing but a disappointment. The food was bland nothing made me feel like I would ever come back. Service was fine but the food was disappointing.
I really do not understand the fascination or draw to this place? We had a coupon and while visiting my parents in the area decided to stop for a quick bite. We all ordered the waffle fries and spicy chicken sandwich. Both were soggy and did not appeal to our taste buds one bit. Suppose it has a lot to do with the fact that none of us enjoy fast food but I really was expecting more on my sandwich other than a lone sad looking pickle. Service was decent and everyone looked squeaky clean as I m sure they all do working in such a strict Christian establishment but that did not make up for our disappointing meal.
Came here for one night on business. The room is in bad need of being updated. It looks like an 80 s bachelor pad. Complete with a red leather armless chair to a cheaply converted dresser into an entertainment center. It also has way to many mirrors a bathroom counter that is to small for a hair brush and no coffee maker. I also got a towel with a 6 hole in it. If this is remodeled and grander do not expect MGM to survive much longer. I wo not be back. Ps...there is a hidden 25 fee that you wo not see any where other than the fine print of your confirmation email.
I love Baton Rouge I really do! We would always find an occasion to go to celebrate something whether it was a birthday or just going to the mall.. I do not know what happened. Or rather I do the previous owner wanted to cash out so he sold the place. It s all downhill from here. The point of going to Baton Rouge was their warm decor a true steakhouse. Forget about that the new look is what some middle aged Porsche driving CEO probably described as classy to a boardroom. It s...empty. The doorways are 12 feet tall the colours are faded. I kept thinking Why am I eating in a hangar? The new seats can fit 3 people side by side..but will you really need all the space? The saddest thing is that it looks not only bad but bland. Maybe you are at La Cage or in one of those new St Huberts? It all looks the same now.. The food is the same but the menu is a lot smaller... More tellingly the staff which I knew from years back is all gone. Why would not you want to keep people who know your menu back to front? Or rather why would they leave? Maybe because the new employees are very young and less demanding... You have to leave the mall to reach the restaurant and I would not bother. I know I love their ribs but..I m sorry. It s so ugly. This is how it ends for me I wo not be back.
On multiple occasions my wife and I have come here and had horrible service. Waiting for a long time for someone to even a acknowledge us. Waiting long enough that we have legitimately discussed just getting up and leaving. When they have helped us it has been a crap shoot. Servers that do not know the drinks they have and items on the menu that they are out of. Honestly if you are thinking of coming here just go a mile down the road and there are numerous places just like it that have good service
Ugh... sorry for the bad review but here we go.. 1 Electronic music was really bad keep in mind I m a deep house music lover ... repetitive beat no change up in the music not even danceable 2 Do not waste your money
Should have listened to the reviews on here... Crappy customer service plenty of people walked by while we were waiting to ask for a table not so much as a hello or we will be with you shortly. Then told us it d be a 25 minute wait when we saw several tables open. Do not plan on coming back but the food was decent. Too bad they could not improve their customer service...
VINTAGE. Maybe 10 or 15 Antique s. Considering how much time it took to get through it I was disappointed. Some about 25 yrs. old Lladro pieces. Snow babies also. Bought nothing I have the pieces that caught my attention that is why I know the age . A generous 2 star s
I am not going to say much never paid so much for so little and my breakfast was tasteless to top it off On the other hand The service was nice! Montreal offer tons of better options to eat that offers much more in terms of taste and quality and I do not think I m ever going back.. this place was great before the new owner you knew what to expect greasy deliciousness and huge portions. Now it s like they trying to hard to be something different but end up being a deception.
This place has horrible costumer service. I m not sure how the food taste. After sitting there for 15 minutes with no waitress I even flagged one down and she told me to wait . Needless to say I walked out. Lastly the menu is pretty expensive breakfast and a drink . You might as well do the MORE buffet.
I honestly would give this place 0 stars if I could. One of the most unprofessional services I ve ever had in my life. Owner was 20 minutes late to my appointment said she would only be 5 minutes late but ended up being 20 minutes late not to mention that my 30 minute facial lasted only 20 minutes because she was late. Would not stop talking throughout the entire facial trying to sell me her products. Also when she was applying the facial on me she accidentally put some of it inside my mouth. WTF? At the end of the session she had the nerves to ask me for a tip. I ve never written a negative yelp review but the experience was so terrible that I felt compelled to write this. DO NOT RECOMMEND. DO NOT VISIT THIS BUSINESS.
Ok. Where to start? First after check in on the way to the room there were no lights. Practically pitch black at the end of the hotel. Not safe. We also noticed the door to the room had been broken down with the inside main lock removed. I ve never seen a hotel room without a phone of some kind to reach the front desk. With so many red flags we insisted on a different room. And when they changed the room nobody came back to say anything. I was sitting there for over 20 minutes before I walked to the front desk. Apparently they switched my room and the app was supposed to notify me. The keyless system is not quite perfected yet. This room was just as bad if not worse. The carpeting had no pad. Like none. It was literally carpet on concrete. The ceiling had all kinds of ports and vents that look like access points that look like an easy way in. The rooms look like they covered up an old sixties hotel with art and paint and said screw it. There were 3 air conditioners in the room left over from renovating with one of these units switches was on the ceiling! Really. Come morning the coffee maker had rust and dirt CLEARLY visible and no hot water in the shower?!?! Avoid this place at all costs! With the state of the hotel rooms I am leery about eating here. How are their cleaning practices? The poor maintenance kid is running around like a mad man. Super polite but over worked. Give that kid a raise. He has his work cut out for him.
This store is the worst store ever been on hold for 20 minuets... Ask to speak to the manager he have yet to come to the phone.. We call this morning was on hold for about 20 minuets they did not even come back to the phone.We Left are name and number and who ever the manager is have not never called back.. As I write the review I am on hold and it s really crazy how when you go to the store they run up too you without a problem..But once you buy stuff and walk out the door you are on your own ... I do not recommend this place to anyone. very very very bad business ....
I really think this place is a scam of some sort. I originally bought a living social deal for my husband to get his car detailed and when he called to schedule they told him to call and get a refund because there was a mix up with living social but they would honor the price of the living social deal. I was skeptical about calling back but then saw weekly plus had the same deal a few days later. So I bought through them and my husband called and scheduled. They were about a month out which was fine being the holidays. Well...we are still waiting for them to show and when you call no one answers and you must leave a message. I WISH that I would have checked on here first before purchasing since most others have had the same problem and the ones giving good reviews are probably family members! I guess im off to try to get a refund from weekly plus!
SCAM. DO NOT DEAL OR GIVE OUT YOUR INFO. SCAM. I was relocating for business and they promise to send you a list of apartments properties that will suit you based on your need. There was no reply or feedback so I had to resort to other inside outside help through my company. The guy emails you 2 months later asking if you found a place and demands to know where you live so that he can collect a referral from your new location. If not criminal definitely unethical. He says his services are free but to request his service you actually already give out some of your personal information. No results to speak of either except harassment. Another lazy and unethical being who puts a bad name to America s integrity.
There are few times in life that I feel so cheated after a meal that I dispute my bill but this was one of them. I ordered the salmon sashimi as part of my lunch and when it came it was served on a giant pile of ice. It s an interesting choice because the fish was one of the tiniest portions of salmon I have ever been served. The fish was 12 on the menu the big problem was that it came as 13 on the final bill. Normally I would just pay it and get on with my day but given how sad the portion was I decided to fight it. The restaurant manager said he would take care of it and within 10 minutes he had taken 1 off my bill. Thanks for taking care of it buddy.... It cost your waiter part of the tip and it earned you a nice 1 star for you yelp page. Buyer beware.
I ve been here now 5 or 6 times mostly because I keep hoping the food will get better. I m a local and I was really excited about this place. The servers and staff are really nice. I ve never hard to wait long. But the food oh it s terrible. I think they may have hired someone who never worked as a chef before. The burgers are a disaster. The sandwiches taste awful. The soups are over salty and terribly put together except the lobster bisque . I will keep going back every few months hoping they hire a much better chef.
Dirty! Old inventory candy etc disrespectful Arabs who need to get the fuck out our neighborhood and sell that old shit to their community!
HORRIBLE!!! Stay far away away they will not fight your case or for your freedom!!! They promise and guarantee probation next thing you know you will be on a prison bus!!!.... they will be cheaper than any other but dont waste your money your public defender will fight harder... spend your money somewhere else!!! TRUST ME!! They might have credentials in this and that but they dont like to argue the way a real lawyer does... not Telles anyways he didint fight at all he was scared of the prosecuter... didnt explain things fully and was late to court.. smh telles... thx for nothing and over 10 000 down the drain!!
At five star prices about 100 a person I would expect a five star meal. When I can get a better steak at places like Texas Roadhouse something has really gone wrong. Out of four meals ordered at our table two had to go back. One a filet was better the second time around but just better and not amazing. The other a ribeye was replaced because the first was over half fat. The replacement tasted like a sirloin and was also sent back. At over 50 the meat should be marbeled tender and flavorful. It was crusty nearly burnt on the outside and just tasteless. Such a disappointment. Our server was excellent and apologetic about the food so that s why they get a couple stars. The manager stopped by to apologize for the steaks the first time but not the second. At a steakhouse of this caliber you should not ever have to apologize for your meat. The table next to us also complained about their meals so perhaps the restaurant was just having a bad night? For what it s worth I rarely send anything back. I actually feel bad doing so but I just could not choke down a cut of fat this bad. My wife and I are Landry s Select VIP members parent company of Morton s so we have eaten at quite a few nice restaurants all over the country. With that said it is highly unlikely that we will visit this one again.
Absolute terrible service. Was there on Saturday afternoon you would think they would know it s a busy day they had two cashiers out of a possible 10 open. One of them was so slow that it was painful to watch. Never bothered to put any more staff on. Waited 20 minutes in line to buy something. Then tried to get a propane tank and waited another 15 minutes outside until they could finally get someone out to get me a propane tank. I mean for crying out loud you are a national chain. Put some damn staff on the weekend
Seriously? This place gets 4 5 stars? I d give them 0 5 if there was only an option. Ok maybe 1 5 just because of the screaming orgasm and ama ebi. Service was awful. The server Mark we got was very rude right from the beginning. Really why will you question our quantity of orders if we could finish it? Every time we order Are you sure? It made us very uncomfortable the whole time especially when we try to order. Just awful! Never coming back! Nigiris have very thin slices of fish portion rice portion was a lot. They try to make you full because of the rice not because the fish portion. Also after the first batch of orders we noticed they take longer time to get our orders out. Place was not even full at that time. There are other much better sushi joints around town. Friendly better service and muuuuch better tasty sushi. Pass on this one!
Went here for Valentines day. We ordered the potato skin appetizzer which was actually awesome.. The entrees were just sad.. I got some country chicken and my man got a ribeye.. He liked his steak but my meal was inedible. The manager gave us a free dessert and took my meal off the bill which was respectable. Would I come back never recommend never. Should have just waited in the mile long line for The Cheesecake Factory.
This is probably the lowest Jersey Mike s rating I ve ever given. Two things rubbed me really wrong about my visit here. First was the owner manager s attitude. He said something to my wife about her order I forget what it was exactly... trying to be funny I guess but it came off in a total d bag style. Second thing was the kid ringing up our order. He looked about 10. Are not there some sort of child labor laws or does anything go in Vegas?
Great Wall Not So Great After All! I went in one day to place an order to eat in. When the order was done I was called over to the counter. They made it to go instead. I yelled over that I am eating in not taking it to go. Do you think they would have brought it over? Hell no. I had to go get my food myself. Pathetic. So I unpack all of the unnecessary crap that I should not have had to and there was not any silverware either. Did they respond to me asking for it? NO! I had to go get it myself. Pathetic. To make it worse the food was only mediocre at best. I have definitely had much better. On top of that they are one of those Chinese places that are really super ultra stingy with veggies. I love my fried rice and low meins when they are packed with veggies. So many places hardly use any at all and this is one of them. So sad they ca not do it right.
I seriously wish I could not even give one star. This place sucks SO bad! The customer service alone is horrible. They point at you and start yelling at the employees in their native tongue while you sit there waiting...oh! did I mention there was a wait? My feet were pruny by the time the girl decided to get to me. I decided to get the luxury pedi for the callus remover because let s face it I m on my feet all day and I need it. Terrible job did not even smooth it out. The massage was timed which is stupid because the girl doing my feet was too busy helping another girl turn on a machine while she was supposed to be massaging me because it s timed. SO not worth the price. Most expensive in the area and I m wondering it s because we re next to all the snobs over at AJ s Fine Foods...I was generous to give an 8 dollar tip but I did not even have time to dry my toes. She sprayed some drying stuff on me and assured me it would be fine. Got home smudged nail polish...FUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUCK! I hate you Nail Depoit of 67th Ave next to snobby AJ s.
Not coming here again. Orders are not correct. Disappointed cause I would like to grab to go coffee on the way to work. I m a Starbucks fan and my drinks does not taste the same. I know the difference between skim milk n 2 ..my drink is not hot enough. So bad. I ordered a skinny venti caramel macchiato extra hot n they me a grande semi hot super sweet caramel rich milk drink. I went thru drive thru so. Waiting in line and did not want to re order.... I m not coming here next time
Probably not worth your time coming here. I got a manicure and pedicure with french tips on my fingers. I had to correct the artist about 10 times and it still came out awful. It actually looks like some are more rounded and then some are more Square. It was probably one of the worst nail experiences I ve ever had. I honestly ca not believe I paid 60... do not go here..
When I arrived on Saturday they did not have lamp or beef Kafta so I had to eat something that they wanted me to eat! Than I ordered to go one Gyro and one platter beef strip slices. I could not find any extra napkins ..When I needed to ask them napkins staff members no where to be found! So I had to basically lousy lunch which cost me 20 !not a customer friendly and after all not a pleasant visit! I will not recommend any want to go there
Totally disappointed with the service! I took a Brazilian blowout groupon deal and went in last Tuesday! I had my 1st hairwash today and it dint even look like a starightened hair...not even 10 the worst service I ever had! If they are going to treat customers with deals with such a service I dont understand why they offer deals! Total Waste of money and time!
Worst buffett. Everything was not cooked proper. Paid 70 dlls for brunch and Man I over paid. Then noticed Chinese food that looked really good and had this nice plates. Wow I was wrong. Rice was so hard I could not eat it. The fruit was the only thing that was good. But not worth 70 dlls.
We went there for a date night night expecting the fun atmosphere and good food of Betty s Nosh and left extremely disappointed. We ordered fajitas and kickin chicken both were very bland and the portions were small for the price. The menu seems all over the place a combination of Mexican food with some sandwiches which are only available before four pm and then a few stuffed mushrooms. We both left feeling like we overpaid for what we got and definitely miss the old Betty s Nosh! Will not be going back.
Local breeze is purgatory for a bar. Does not have any direction and has no idea what it wants to be. Food and service are inconsistent along with hours of operation. Has so much potential considering the beautiful patio space. Maybe live music on weekends or some tvs for watching football...? Ok pick something. Food is circling the drain. This local is done with it. Yuk. There are other patio games in town.
After a year or more being open they have gotten lazy and apathetic about service. The bar tender this Sunday tells me he ca not change a channel cause the TV is temperamental . Multiple people have asked for the channel to be changed. They no longer according to another manager have service to any of the bowling alley for food and drink. So after a year we will spend our last dollars here. Shame on them!!!!
After both of the hairdressers I liked here left without any warning I decided to try a new one that was the same skill level . Her name was Maria and she completely butchered my straight easy to manage hair. I m ashamed to be in public. Could have gone to first choice for the same result but way cheaper. Looks like I did it myself. She was also rushing to get me out of her chair. Disgusting never coming back here again.
I just completed a one year membership and I will not renew. It is very DIRTY and gross. Many members do not wipe down the equipment as they get off and no one seems to care. There was a towel on the floor in the bathroom and i noticed it on saturday sunday and again monday. Gross and smelly Finally the 50.00 fee for the key is a scam for 2 cents worth of plastic. . How about take a 50.00 deposit and charge me if I lose it? with cheaper cleaner places right down the road Midvale by Hilldale and on odana they should clean up their act. But.. most importantly. there is a high pressure sales pitch to join and buy training packages. I was told the membership included one visit with a trainer. NOT TRUE it was a quick assessment and he told me I was needed to work out . really??? and then I was steered into an office where a salesmen offered me training packages. iNo kidding..the packages run up to 10 000. 00.
Found this place for lunch just while walking down the street with some friends. Atmosphere seemed pretty good upon sitting down. I noticed only two people were working here. Food did not take long and was pretty good. Nothing amazing though.. my friend had got ingredients in her food that she had asked not to have included and only really realized 1 3 of the way through so after we informed the waiter he apologized and that was it. We were hoping for the do not worry we ll take care of the bill since we messed up line but that never happened. Moreover we asked to at least have the tiny cup of 2 sour cream removed from the bill and the waiter disagreed and could not understand why were asking that of him but he somehow took it off anyway so that was fine. As we were paying the waiter so very close and behind my friend as she was paying making her feel uncomfortable so all in all it was a poor customer service experience with decent food.
Wanted to like this place gave them a year to prove themselves because of the great location and the people seem nice. However they did lose several of my shirts and because I did not have my ticket could not prove it even though I never keep my ticket because they log orders by phone number in their computer . Months later I go to pick up another order and suddenly my shirts from months before appear. I point out the date on the ticket and the guy shrugged his shoulders and walked away. It was very strange. Also their hours can be challenging and my shirts do not always seem clean as I ve noticed simple stains still present after cleaning. For all of these reasons I m out.
Might be the worst idea ever if you want brunch. Expect it to take 45 minutes to get a bottle of champagne when it s half empty get raw eggs pay 9 dollars for a slice of bread and have the manager come by to address our concerns to only walk away without commenting on anything except saying I ll be right back.... and never returned. Glad to know service exists. Thx Christina server and Morgan manager . It was nice to watch you run your mouth from the corner immediately after stopping at our table. Christina was training another new server and with a two person team they still could not manage to stop by and check on our empty drinks and untouched food. Awful.
AWFUL HOTEL DO NOT STAY HERE Staff is the most unfriendly I ve ever seen. Security is slow and sluggish when there s an issue and hotel is dirty and run down. I ve stayed in many hotels in Vegas and this one is by far the worst. Do not let the low rates tempt you the food is awful staff is awful rooms and machines are run down and it s just not a good place to stay. Other comparable hotels may be a little but more money but it s well worth it...this place is a dump. A lot of security issues here unauthorized people with room keys breaking into rooms etc as happened to our friends and security does nothing about it except allow you to fill out a report.
please invite me back once the Bohae Bokbujajoo wine is in the system. The products should not be on the shelf if you ca not sell. I left empty handed. Could not the ladies put in the open item and sell them for me? It said so how much it cost on the price tag! The store has been opened for quite sometimes now. It is very convenient from my house. I actually signed the petition for the city when they asked if anyone would not want Lee Liquor store in our community. Why would I oppose? I was like please open Lee liqueur here!!! I shall return to get my bottles of the Bohae wine once it s ready in the system. There is many sake selection here too. I will be back. Come check them out they have everything you can think of but I did not get what I came for today 5.18.17 9 30pm.
I ve noticed a difference in the quality since the last time I came unfortunately I forgot to take a picture before the review. Their portions are WAY too big for one. And secondly the eggs benedict I ordered were drenched in a pool of sauce and the hash browns next to them turned out soggy due to it. There was not as much spinach as I m used to there being. The consistency in quality should be upheld there should not be fluctuations. Their juices and smoothies are always amazing though.
i did not even want to give this place 1 star. i went in around 11 45 i asked if i could get some food while the bar keep was bringing out fucking food. he declined me food without even checking with the kitchen staff of a hot dog joint. then i still tried to give this place a chance and ordered a beer. i did not leave a tip but oh was i surprised when i got my bank statement. the fucking thief of a bar keep gave himself a tip. so you have been warned never go to happy dog and use your bank or credit card because they will rob you!
Definitely a two star experience. The building is beautiful. The drinks were great. But I ca not get over how dull and unsatisfactory the entire food experience is. You d think they would really try to justify this beautiful location with some great food. Honestly I was not impressed. The first offense was the temperature of the food lukewarm and the second offense was the puddle of refried beans taking up half my plate. It was just nothing special and certainly not worth the 35 minutes it took to arrive. This place would have my respect if they AT LEAST had complementary chips and salsa. I think it s the least they could do if we are to wait such a long time for our meals. Bravo on the delicious margaritas though! I m sorry Pasqual s. You could be great but I need to feel like I m getting a bit more bang for my buck here.
200 U.S on two very small star tattoos Temporary Tattoo would have lasted longer. Had a nice time and experience until the tattoo disappeared a few days later. Not a nice memory of our holiday and nuptials. Long story short things happen but the folks at Skin Design were not willing to offer any compensation and did not stand behind their work. I d expect that from one of those 10 per tattoo places but not one with the reviews I researched and reputable name. Caution Do not get tattoo on holiday unless you plan on going back for touch ups! I should also mention that after all the back and forth trying to get some sort of restitution without resolve they asked for a review so here it is! Anyone in Toronto area looking for a touch up I know guy who does an awesome job and stands behind his work!
Really a bad Irish bar. How long should you sit with an empty beer with 6 bartenders and 12 customers? They should be busy on St Practice day but I understand why they were not. They were geared up for business except they had bad staff. I walked over to the Yard House where the place was packed and I received a beer in minutes. They were appropriately staffed but they can effectively produce quality service with a lower staff ratio.
Over the years I have not come to expect much from the original Royal Oak s in Ottawa but figured I d give one a try in the GTA and have to say I was less then pleased by the experience. Let me ask you this. When you order a drink should it take 20 minutes to arrive? Should a burger take another 30 minutes? Thats how long we waited mind you we were not in a rush to get anywhere but still. It s a shame because the Royal Oaks used to be great places for food but that was many years ago Food for thought
Almost 1hour late starting. Saw more of her backup performers than Cher. Would not recommend it to anyone.
Food was ok I guess my Fianc had a steak that was so so but she loved her Steak. My mom had Tri tip that she was not very fond of I had the brisket that was ok. Nothing really jumped at me like it was high quality BBQ save the money you would spend here and go too Famous Daves for a cheaper but better tasting experience
They flubbed a simple order. And took FOREVER filling it. I ordered an Egg White Delight sub bacon I know. I weakened at the last minute. . Sandwich only. To go. Took so long 5 minutes or so that I wondered if they were hatching the egg. Everyone coming in after me had their food. Raced over to EQT Plaza and found a biscuit instead of a muffin doing the backstroke in butter. I called and spoke to Michelle a manager. She apologized and put me on hold to check. Apparently someone new ? did not know that sandwich comes on an English muffin. She apologized again and promised to comp it when I m in again. So we re good except that while I m hungry there s some really plump pigeons in EQT Paza.
Are you kidding with these good reviews? Are you relatives? Lol The WORST meal I have had since moving to the area. Arrived at lunch to this dreary place we were the only ones at noon which should have been a red flag. The miserable waitress barely spoke and never did crack a smile. Was she angry we were there? Ribs 2 were fatty the other 2 tasted like they were a week old. Ordered Sesame Shrimp and got some sort of meat were told by Miss Crabby she made a mistake and it was chicken who knew I thought we were eating pencils erasures. Mongolian beef had lots of rice and what may have been beef in days past. Sad miserable place crossed off our list to ever visit but how does this place stay open?
I have had an extremely bad experience with First Choice. The installer was great but he never mentioned an equipment warranty that would incur a 7.99 monthly charge. I was not aware of it until they started to automatically charge my credit card every month. I called them and had a couple of very unpleasantly frustrating conversations with them where they spoke to me like I was the problem. I finally had to argue with them in order to cancel the warranty. After I cancelled they continued to charge my credit card without my authorization. I called to request that they refund these charges and they told me that I had never cancelled the warranty. I feel like I m in the Twilight Zone. Seriously?? I ended up having to cancel my credit card and report First Choice to my credit card company in order to dispute the charges and get the refund. This company makes me want to quit Direct TV and NEVER use their service again. If Direct TV uses this dishonest and rude company then how honest can Direct TV be? Makes me wonder. Anyway do what you want but I would steer clear if I were you. There are other choices out there these days that wo not try to steal from you.
I have been a customer of cricket for years. Recently I needed to purchase a new phone and Virginia went above and beyond to help me with getting a new one. She was very patient with me and helped me a lot. So for her customer service I d give 5 stars. Unfortunately the phone I purchased is defective. I purchased it last Monday and went back to Monday 1 week later. The manager refused to replace my phone stating I was a day late! He also stated the district manager was in a meeting so I could not speak to him even the he had just called him. This will be my last phone through Cricket unfortunately I also added my husband to my account last week so when it s time for a new phone for one of us we will be looking at a new plan with another carrier.
Service and product continue to decline. I ve been eating here since they opened. Loved the previous WS that was at the old cedar center years ago. Was so happy they came back!! Ate there several times when they first opened. Great service great wings!!! Over time it s rapidly deteriorated. Have been left on hold for 5 minutes b4 I hung up and went somewhere else. When they do answer the phone and take the order they say 17 minutes. Have waited as long as 40!!! But ok the garlic Parmesan wings are worth it. Until today.... wings underdone and soggy. So disappointing!!
PLEASE READ! This establishment is dishonest untrustworthy and definitely not careful at all. They ruined my wedding dress lost my crown and veil and would not give us a refund for it or even acknowledge the damage that had been done. Working with them through the whole ordeal was a nightmare. It s devastating to have your dress ruined but the lack of communication and integrity has made this the worst experience I ve ever had with a business. PLEASE do not take anything of value to this cleaners. Here s my story if you re interested We dropped my dress off at the Sossaman location. We told them there was glue on some parts of the dress they reassured us that they would do a spot test and use the proper method for it and that everything would be fine. We paid for it to be boxed with the crown and veil proof on receipt . When we went to pick it up there was glue residue all over the dress the lace and sequins were yellow and falling off and it was ruined. They also could not find my crown and veil and sent us to the Higley store to ask if it was there. They would not give us a refund instead they held the dress at their location sitting under the florescent lights not even in a bag and said they would contact the owner Mike but would not give us his number to contact him directly very shady. This went on for months with no answer from Mike. One time when we went to look at it they asked if we wanted a seamstress to make alterations to it. I told them it would be fine for a seamstress to assess what could be done but to call me before they did anything to it. The next time we went in everything had been taken off. Still we had never heard from Mike. Finally after 1.5 years of this run around we took the dress and told them to have Mike contact us. He never has. We took the issue to small claims court and they have been unresponsive during this process as well. Customer service has been non existent. They have never owned up to the mistake. Completely unprofessional dishonest and careless especially with something as special as a wedding dress. Take your business somewhere else.
Sadly I m compelled to update my previous review and in not such a great manner might I add? I ll begin by stating ANY and EVERYTHING GOES AT THIS HOTEL. They do not mind SHITTT!!! Booked reservations for Valentine s Day online by way of Booking.com and arrived 1 2 an hour early in full realization that check in was at 4pm. We d honestly just planned on grabbing drinks from Addiction while we waited. Went on to notice that valet has since been discontinued. BUMMER!!! Went to check in and despite my our reservation being somewhat easily located the staff seemed to have been jet lagged if not hung over . A line of 5 6 potential guest s accrued behind us and the front desk staff seemed completely oblivious to it all as they continued to take their sweet azz time never so much as even acknowledging anyone waiting behind us one gal even had to calculate the change back multiple times when given a penny extra per our furnishing 200.01 for a bill equating 160.01. ....sighs ....Are you really so damn remedial that you re unable to configure 40 to be adequate change??? Did the penny throw you off? No.... Really??? All in all they all needed to GET THEIR PHUKKIN LIVES. This was absolutely abysmal. Whereas this used to be the ONLY place that I d stay I ve since amended my thoughts. Wana know why? Keep on reading......it gets far worse! My partner had a business Visa card complete w the logo at the bottom of it only for us to be informed by staff that Rumor could NOT honor this card and that we were in need of a bank card of some sort. We re from Cali and this is clearly some Nevada b s. SMFH. Having nothing but cash on us it s Vega after all and not knowing the location of banks etc. we opted to load a prepaid card from CVS not too far away and were told that the hotel did not take this method of payment as well. Uhm....okay? Last time I checked it was 2014 is Nevada void of technology? We were then informed by the manager or so she alleged upon her gracing our presence that to leave a cash deposit we would be required to drop off 300 cash as opposed to 50 using a card that qualified. Uhm... WTF??? Are we staying overnight or moving the phuk in??? This compelled us to contact my sister to partition her services THANKFULLY SHE S A LOCAL. She consented to having her bank card charged the required 50 and we were thereon compelled to forage through The Strip traffic at rush hour on Valentine s Day Friday......across town...... to pick her up only to turn around and take the same trip back just to prevent our room reservations from being cancelled at 6pm. We get back to find that there was NOOO availability apparently our room was given away only to request to speak w this same less than helpful manager. Evidently this was a 2 person process as both stoned front desk employees left the front counter unattended to fetch this woman .....in turn compromising ALL OF THE CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION OF THEIR GUEST S by leaving vital information exposed upon the counter. This chick finally reappeared and points us in the direction of our room only to inform us both that apparently she neglected to leave adequate documentation to pinpoint that we d be returning to claim our room. SMFH still not an apology. Thereon we arrived only to walk in and realize that it was THE INCORRECT ROOM!!! We d paid for a suite... Upon exiting my sister decided to check out the decor in the bathroom whereas she and my partner walked in and I could not make this up if I tried only to find SHIT yes feces on the floor and door!! GUH ROSSSS!!! Now I do realize this place to be pet friendly but this was effin disgusting and compels you to question what s lurking behind your sheets prior to resting your head for a good night s sleep. We could not even make out if it was Fido s turd ling or an actual human being s! It should go w o stating that we were led to abort and request a NEW ROOM. After being given a new key card we all left for dinner. Returned 2 hours later w much accrued reluctancy....to a nicer room yet we were never apologized to for any of the above. We were however lied to and informed that the fecal matter on the floor was make up of some sort? Question Who in the hell applies make up while laying down on bathroom tile??? I m just saying.... My hypothesis is that this type of HazMat Hazardous Material fiasco transpires on a routine basis yet MOST people neglect to so much as acknowledge it further allowing the hotel to continue skimping by on a wing and a prayer. They agreed to comp a room within the future and we both refused emphatically. What the hell do you all think you ve done so well to merit our return?! Really?! I used to be a regular here staying at least once every few months however I ca not see myself returning. Why you ask?... because I CALL BULLSHIT!!! P.S. A spa tub is just a pool of hot water if the jets do not work!!!
You ca not seat a party of 10 because you are out of silverware? But you can seat the next two groups of 4? Give a better excuse next time.
Sorry but I have to say there is nothing extraordinary here 20.00 for an ordinary eggs over easy breakfast and a cup of tea is a bit much not to mention I was still hungry and I did have something before attending. I might not be a plus sized woman but hey I do need to eat! The place itself is very nicely laid out and very inviting service adequate but I ll restrict my brunch venues to places where you actually can get fed for half the price.
The food was good but the service really was not all that. In fact it was terrible. We came in on a Friday night around 9 30 PM it was not crowded but it took 20 minutes before staff noticed us seated waiting to order. The waitress provided lousy service by not checking on us till it came time to pay. The music was blasting from their cantina which made it difficult to hear much less have a conversation. I would not recommend this place unless you want 2nd rate service and have extra patience.
Wife and I have been coming here for years and have always enjoyed coming here. They have discontinued any entertainment no live music anymore. No young people anymore just retired folks. Last time I will ever be here and will pass on my opinion to all my friends. Management has no clue.
Way to earn a one star management. Ordered 2 build your own slams to go order. Tried to add the 2 additional add items for 1.29 each that is on the menu and was told they closed the ticket so I ll have to pay full price. Going the extra mile is something im sure the manager could do. Its not like I didnt order food at regular price. Not happy at all. Doesnt feel good to feel unappreciated for my business. Another Dennys who obviously wont do whats reasonably necessary to please a customer smh. I hope that not taking an extra minute of your time to allow me to pay the fair price is worth another bad star for this location.
Pour emporter c est fcking long le systme entre employer a fonctionne pas il dise toujours c est cause de la cuisine... ok vas leur demander reste l puis elle te regarde la fille au cash
Had the Enchilada Chicken Mole on Tuesday Nov. 6 and was sick with food poisoning.... bad day Wednesday...
Went for dinner with a friend...disappointing service. When it s 5 00 pm and your restaurant is not packed I would think you could afford to be pleasant and attentive. I was also disappointed they did not have bottled gluten free beer only cider...come on this is the 2016 and many many many people are GF.
Iced caramel latte and classic Caesar side salad for lunch...... first time trying out the place ordered this for lunch while I looked over the menu. The girl brought my drink right away but actually took 20min to get a side salad mmmmm was not really happy about that.
I came here to get my nails done for the first day of school and I wanted coffin gel nails. And I think this lady was new because these nails are so thick and just lumpy and are very round. She applied 8 LAYERS OF POLISH alltogether. The nail sizes are not proportional and she did not know what she was doing half the time because she needed help from another lady the other half. I m very sad that this is what happened tonight and that she could not realize what she was doing and how the end product looked. I m extremely dissappointed and also every time I asked her nicely to fix it she would give some attitude and it was a little rude. Just disappointed.
This place is nice inside but the food did not match the decor. I got the hangar steak and frites...it just was not very good. I was going to give it a second chance the next night I was in town anyway because it was close to my hotel. I walked in and saw the bar was full. The hostess said I could sit at one of the tables in the bar as they are full service so I did. Sat about 10 minutes with no service. Then some dude sits across from me at my table with his back to me and leans his elbow on the table to BS with his buddies. That was enough. I went down the street to Ruth Chris and had a really good steak. I m giving it 2 stars because the first time I went for lunch the bartender was nice and the food came out in a timely manner.
I came aboard at the wrong time they did my accounting bookkeeping for a brief stint from Nov 2015 May 2016. They had just moved offices from Gilbert and I was a part of an influx of clients they were sorely unprepared for. I would not get a response to any emails for weeks even after multiple sends or calls. When I did receive some kind of response I felt like I was quite the bother. Did not feel comfortable reaching out to them except for utmost necessary tasks. Details gone over in meetings were forgotten. Going over my files since there were a few year end deductions that were not taken advantage of. It was my first year of business so I did not know. But I m not surprised. There was not any kind of guidance or communication because they were just trying to get through my files as soon as possible. Hopefully they have figured things out since then. It could be a much better experience for anyone looking to use them now. Unfortunately it was an unnecessarily stressful relationship for my business.
We walked in at 7 on a Friday night and was asked if we had a reservation. No... or we would have said hi we have a reservation... The restaurant looked half full but the bar was full. We were told a 10 min wait which seemed odd as my boyfriend counted 13 open tables. That many reservations??? We waited about 10 min and were seated at a table next to one that was empty next to the wall. My boyfriend asked the host if we could have that one and he said he thought it was reserved... Ok whatever... We took a look at the menu and it was not anything like what I saw online. Maybe the menu is different on weekend nights. My boyfriend was annoyed by the service and was totally turned off by the menu. And he wanted to go. So this maybe an unfair review as we did not even try the food. Service is very important to us and it seemed like the individual who sat us would rather be somewhere else. It worked out well for us because we went to Base up the street and had excellent service and a great meal.
Worst hookah bar ever. Hookah is subpar. No music. 5 byob which is not displayed on the front door. Colorful chairs that look nice but are hard plastic that are uncomfortable. Only good thing is that the waiter ca not remember her name is very nice. So yelps folks if ur looking for hookah look elsewhere because this is not it. 1 star for Sphinx.
I was very excited to try this place but it was a big let down. Being from LA I ate Pinks hot dogs a lot and was expecting something of that caliber. Unfortunately the hot dog was overcooked and the bun was stale. It was a huge disappointment.
If you like Avocado do not bother asking them for it. If you like to pay for Avocado and not receive it ask them for it. This has a opened to me atleast 5 times with this place.
Food quality needs improvement. Sunday afternoon
Let me start by saying I used to LOVE to see movies here. My hubby and I are huge movie goers at least 5 6 movies a month. However my last two trips here have been horrible! Saturday night the theater was so hot I could hardly breath on top of this my seat was broken. I am 5 month pregnant and my waitress felt bad so she said she would get someone to fix the chair.... It took about 15 min of me standing on the side but it did get fixed. Then today we went back to the movies different theater this time however same problem the chair was broken. We were early before the lights went off so I called the waitress over. This time the waitress said to us I know it s broken I told my manager during the last movie but I guess he choose not to fix it this one was really uncomfortable.... I could hardly sit. She said she would go talk to her manager and see if he would fix it the . 15 min later The waitress came back and said sorry there is noway for us to fix now that the lights are off so I stuck it out and watched the movie. They then proceeded to charge me 7 for tea not even a compt drink. This manager working today on 11 23 14 should really learn what Customer service is. I m not sure I will be back. I m willing to drive 10 more min to scottsdale.
1 star is not even acceptable for the bad service i received today. Ive seen lisa in the past and i was very satisfied thats why i decided to go back. Tommorow is my bday and im in tears because i got my full face threated by the other indian lady which i believe is the owner. Let me start off by saying how she asked me if it was ok to give her 5 min to go drink her tea. I said yes i understand she was probably busy earlier and didnt get to drink her tea. So she finally takes me and threads my face and my eyebrows are horrible they are super thin and mishape. One eyebrow is thinner than the other one. I told her and she said is fine she tried fixing it and it looked the same! So i told her thats fine after she insisted that it looked even. This is Horrible my bday is tomorrow and ill i can see is my horrible looking eyebrows. But is my fault for trying someone new i gave it a try because lisa had a doctor s appointment. Which is understandable. Now i dont even wanna go back to this place i ca not believe im gonna spend my bday with this horrible eywbrows.
We have had Lorex outdoor surveillance cameras for about a year. During a recent rain storm a cable on one of the cameras was damaged by water why an outdoor product ca not withstand rain is a mystery . My husband tried to contact Lorex to find out where to get a replacement cable but was either put on hold for ages or never got a requested call back. The one time he finally got thru he was rudely told to try eBay or Costco! Why sell something you wo not support? We have to go to an auction site to try and find a part!?! Just as an fyi Costco does not sell parts! When my husband asked to speak with a manager he was put on hold and ignored. We ve also tried emailing consumer support only to be told we reached the wrong department no offer to redirect our message. We are now left with a camera that is useless because we ca not get a cable. Heaven help us if our other cameras fail!!
Found a Cafe Rio and stood in a forever long line on Tuesday for their delicious Barbacoa tacos!! The tacos were so delicious and so were their quesadillas however I was SUPER BUMMED OUT not to mentioned SUPER GROSSED out to find some kind of a metal cap bolt cap looking thing in my salsa as I went to scoop some out!! I saw another post on here while reading reviews in line that someone found a Piece of plastic Wrap in their salad... Can you say quality check?!
Arrived for a family breakfast after church around 8am with grandparents. We had a party of 7 whereas 5 of us were present but still could not be seated until the WHOLE party was here. I figured the host would bypass that policy due to the fact that there were elderly people who have a hard enough time walking. Once we were seated and ordered our food we were able to enjoy each other s company. The food was brought out to us but somehow every plate at the table had one minor error. One person received something he did not even order. Another had ordered strawberries and whipped cream on her waffle and received a waffle with strawberries sloppily plated no whipped cream . She stopped the waitress and asked for whipped cream and the waitress did not acknowledge her request and walked away. She came back with a bowl of whipped cream. Fortunately the food was delicious.
Let me be clear you come here for the music and vibe not the food or service. Casual drinks or a date its a great spot. However if you are planning on having dinner this is not the place. Very few waitstaff so the service is slow even when they are around they are not attentive. Who brings over two waters for a table of four? food is typical bar fare and it is mediocre at best. If this place didnt have live music I really couldnt see a reason to come here unless i was desperate for a pint.
Meh. We ordered quite the smorgasbord and I was not delighted with anything. My veggie roll was large but not very tasteful same goes for my boyfriend s shrimp roll. The Crab Rangoon was lacking in any filling I felt like I was biting into deep fried air! Our veggie moo shu was boring and had no egg in it? The wraps for the moo shu made me feel like I was eating paper. The bf ordered General Tso s chicken and said it was decent. I would not order from this place again unless I had no other choices...
Definitely not worth the wait. The barber spent more time talking and did not even have any consideration on waiting customers. If you re willing to wait 1 hour without a cut than this place is for you.
20 maker mark manhattans????!!!!!! Outrageous prices. I ve been here before and never paid that much even on the strip.
I was in love with the place until I found out keep in mind there are very few signs that after my son was given a special under 21 band that after he had been asked if he wanted water or something like that after an hour of being there that children are not allowed on the 3rd and Forth floors and 2 staff told us that we had to go away from our party and go 1 or 2 floors down where children where allowed thing is that we where there with a convention so that meant that after having fun getting drinks and hang out that we had to go down stairs after we got up we where followed to an elevator after getting in we were no longer followed by the men where there was no clear exit so we where about to go out the back way when we looked and found out employees only luckily a very nice staff member asked us if we wanted to smoke we said that no we were not and we turned back but before we did we where wondering were the taxis where and asked him he said we could just go out back and that they would be there we went out back and there it was the taxi lot we ordered an Uber and left due to the fact there where no taxis that was it for the record the only reason this is a 2 star review is due to the fact that the golfing was nice everything else you could find at an airport
I m not sure if this is the right location or not but I ordered at one of their restaurants a few weeks back. I ordered nilaga. The beef tasted like it was in sinigang and then they rinsed the meat in water and put it in a nilaga broth. It was utterly disgusting. There was a gamy taste to the soup. It was disappointing. I ve never tasted nilaga like that.
Pretty disappointed this time around I walked in and there was one person in front of me they ordered .I placed my order chicken wrap. After waiting a long 25 min an 3 ordered a that walked in after me I asked what s going on and had noticed the guy in back making food was not wearing gloves and touching the food ! So I asked girl at front counter if they normally do not wear gloves to protect food aka health code she said it was only her first few days here and she did not know she said I think so ? I said well he s not now and now he s making my good gross. so I just asked for a refund . The staff was nice and the owner came out and was able to issue refund an apologized. The food coming out for others looked really good but I guess I wo not be finding out.
Not a fan of their clothing or prices. You can find higher quality clothes for affordable prices somewhere else. The staff did not seem too friendly and seemed extremely persistent on making the sale and up selling with their credit card. Never going back here again.
If I could give zero stars I would.. this is the worst gel manicure I ve ever had. It s lumpy all over my cuticles and the tips of my fingers. Wish i was better at speaking up paying for this was torture.
i had a high expectation for this place but yet i was let down. i placed an order over the phone ordered the 6 piece chicken. ended up being around 10. and once you ll sit down and open up that box you ll be in a world of shock! they got wings so small that you re mother would not believe her eyes! the cashier she s the owner i m predicting. i could not believe she hid her baby under the register! my lady and I was trying to enjoy our chicken then all the sudden. we heard a baby crying! upon observation it was coming from under the register...yes believe it. a chicken shack turned into daycare service. and the funny part as we re eating. the chef walks out and calls me a fool i m sure he calls everyone a fool whoever he sees like get with the program if you re representing an establishment you gotta be professional! and not insult a customer. the verdict sad to say. i ve experience better chicken popeyes is still the best.
Service 1.5 Do not really review much but because of my experience had to write something. First off this is the strangest restaurant I ve been to. It s inside a Hair and Nail Salon Spa inside a strip mall. Could not find it initially then after 5 minutes of looping the parking lot found a small sign next to the Salon sign. We walked in and there were two gentlemen in front of us waiting to order. They ordered then we ordered. The lady who took our order told us it would be a few minutes. We waited for 15 minutes then the lady came up to us and said there are two other orders in front of us so it would be a few more minutes. So we decided to go out and come back. We waited outside eating ice cream because it took so long. She came outside with two bottles of water to apologize then another 15 minutes went by before we got our meal to go . Left Office 12 55pm Arrived in Parking Lot 1 10pm Got Lost for 5 Min 1 15pm Ordered our food 1 20pm Left the restaurant 2 05 pm Got Back to Office to Eat 2 18pm. Did not know this was going to be a journey.... Food 2.5 The food was ok at best. We ordered all the BAOs on the menu. 1. Duck Bao Good flavor probably the best there Could add more meat though. Just one slice of duck. 2. Pork Belly Bao Two slabs of 1 inch thick slabs of pork belly. A bit dry. 3. Chicken Bao Extremely dry chicken. Crispy skin but tasted like they definitely overcooked the chicken. 4. Tofu and Mushroom Bao Combination of ingredient blended well. Fried tofu but the sauce made it softer. Also ordered the Chicken salad because they ran out of sesame noodles. The chicken salad was not good at all. Dry chicken meat with cucumber slices and spring mix? To add to that found a hair in my salad. I know it s not my hair because I do not have hair on my head and it was longer than an eyelash.
I love the deals and the ability to use their Kohl s cash. But I will be forever scarred by their restroom. I went in and it looked like there was a case of explosive diarrhea. I wish I was joking and I wish I could forget.
My rating is for the food and the food only. Staff is amazing the place itself is ectremely clean. But the food is not up to par.
A cockroach poor service and quality are ingredients to an out of business future. Pass on this.
I had my heating system go out at my condo. They sent a technician out to take a look. He came to my place and left within 10 minutes saying they need to order a certain part. Seemed rushed for the 10minutes he was here. As he was practically running out he said the company will call to reschedule. They did for another three days later. That was supposed to be Friday. Thursday they call and have to reschedule for Sunday. It s now been about a whole week without any heat in the dead of winter. Sunday comes and he s here for ANOTHER 10 minutes saying that because a valve is a little rusty he s not able to touch it and needs a plumber which is going to need a new work order and so on. So he tells me he s going to have to come back tomorrow Monday BUT he said he would return in the morning with the plumber to get it all taken care of fast. The plumber did show up but no HVac technician so I call Air Squad and they tell me I have to wait anywhere from 1 4pm which Sunday he was supposed to be at my place 8am 11am and showed up at 11am . Over all the company is unprofessional and has ZERO customer service. These people just push one job after the next working with insurance companies trying to fill as much orders as possible with providing horrible quality and service.
I find it just ok. I d give it a 2.5 if I could but definitely not a 3 so...2 it is. By just ok I mean that you wo not feel hungry afterwards nor feel sick you wo not need to frown when eating those tacos but wo not remember what they taste like as soon as you re done with your meal. There s nothing special to it the tortillas seem to be store bought and sauces pre made and watery like almost every other Mexican place in Montreal... Or maybe I m just being picky having lived in Mexico for many years...
The best advice I can give you about this hotel is to BE CAREFUL. They are very deceitful and dishonest when it comes to the room rates and promotions. After my experience with them I felt like I had been involved in a classic bait and switch scam. I received a promotional e mail for room rates of 139 night. The promotion included a room plus two buffet tickets per day for two days. The promotion specifically stated that I could book up to 4 rooms with this rate. Since I was coming to Vegas with family this seemed like a great deal. I called and made a reservation over the phone. I asked many questions to confirm the promotional rate and was told that including taxes and fees the total would come to 155.68 per night. We were coming in the off season and in the middle of the week. There were other hotels on the strip with cheaper rates but considering this is a very nice hotel and the rates included the buffet tickets we decided to book here. We booked two rooms which would have included a total of 8 buffet tickets. the buffet tickets are 25 per person On our way to Vegas I called the hotel to confirm what time the lunch buffet started since we would be arriving around 11. I was told at that time that my room did not come with buffet tickets. I spoke to two different representatives in reservations who told me that my room did not include the buffet. I asked to speak to a manager and she insisted that I must have misunderstood the promotion. I was confident that I did not because I had looked into other hotels to compare all of the rates and had taken a lot of notes from my conversation with the Encore reservation personnel. Instead of being reasonable and working with me the manager continued to tell me that I was incorrect. Finally she said she would have to review the phone call of when I called and reserved the room. After 30 minutes she called me back and said that she listened to the tape of my reservation phone call and confirmed as I had said that the woman I booked the reservation with did in fact say that the buffet tickets would come with the rooms. The manager told me that as a showing of good faith they would give me the buffet tickets. I do not see how that is a showing of good faith it was what they had promised! Upon check out I noticed we had been charged an additional 35 resort fee per night. I asked about this because I was specifically told that 155.68 included all taxes and fees. The woman another one told me that the resort fee just gets charged at the end which is why they did not tell me about it up front when I booked the room. I find this to be completely dishonest especially in light of the fact that I specifically asked when I booked the room to be given a total figure for the room rates. The hotel itself was beautiful and the rooms were great. However I had such a poor experience with the staff all the way to the management level that I cannot in good faith recommend this hotel to anybody.
Backdoor shanty feedstore type places like this need to be shut down. Absolutely disgusting that not only do they offer something like cosmetic ear cropping but they also sell vaccines that can be administered by anyone with absolutely ZERO medical training. If you ve never gone to school for medical you have ZERO business giving vaccinations to your animals as you have no knowledge as to proper injection sites nor are you a doctor to know if the animal is healthy enough to receive a vaccine in the first place. Besides that to have a business support something as selfish as to change an animal s natural biology due to human aesthetics is absolutely disturbing. I would never give a place like this my business and I will be sure to let my friends and family know what kind of a back door operation this place is. I cant tell you how many hack job are croppings done from this place I ve seen at MULTIPLE veterinary clinics. DON T support this business DON T change your animal s natural biology and BRING your pet to medically trained professional for vaccinations. EDIT IN REGARDS TO YOUR RESPONSE Being in business for years means absolutely nothing so that does not discredit you from being shanty. You SUPPORT and RECOMMEND a cruel and useless cosmetically aesthetic procedure due to vanity rather than to keep an animal s natural biology which is what is the ultimate best interest in the animal. You hardly have the best interest of ANY breed in mind by supporting such a procedure. You still offer vaccinations OVER THE COUNTER to be sold to anyone to administer that has absolutely no medical knowledge whatsoever. It s reckless and irresponsible and again does NOT have the best interest of any pet at heart. You are a disgusting company that is money hungry and what you support and provide proves that further. I will never support your business regardless of any excuse you have and neither will my friends family or their acquaintances either. I will happily always be a voice against mom and pop places like yourself that will eventually be shut down. Have a wonderful day yourself
I just got here. Just arrived in the room and am abhorred at how terrible the room is. As my boyfriend is calling to switch hotels I am writing this yelp review. First off the room is terribly overpriced. For what this is we should ve paid 20 night. The elevator and hallways are dilapidated. The bed cover has stains on it. There is popcorn and trash left under the bed. We can hear loud music from the strip below I have no idea how people sleep here. The lady at the desk warned us that we could hear the music but I did not think that meant CLEARLY and LOUDLY. At least offer ear plugs. Do not stay here. Ever.
Messy store no customer service and just an all round bad experience! I think I will take my business elsewhere.
I had the worst customer experience. I d purchased my office furniture there previously. I a black woman entered the showroom this evening looking for a sectional walked around the entire store and was never greeted with two salesmen on staff and a manager at her desk and only one other customer in the store. I did not want to think the worst but it was clear when I spoke to a salesman and he looked at me m then looked away and did not respond that this was no oversight. Instead he buried his interest into his cell phone to avoid me. Two caucasian women entered the showroom less than 30 seconds later and were greeted and given the sale of the day spiel right in front of me. Apparently he did not think I was worthy to be courted as a customer. I told the manager Michelle and she apologized with the two sorry excuses for salesman less than 5 feet away. They never apologized or tried to explain. I am not being sensitive or over reacting. I have better things to do than type up a horrible review on Yelp. But this was blatant and infuriating. I suggest corporate review their cameras on 7 16 18 some time between 4 30 and 5 30 pm to see what kind of treatment good paying customers receive. This is why I will take my money elsewhere and tell everyone I meet why Mors will be losing Mor business as long as I can spread the word.
I had an amazing experience for my bridal shower last year and I wanted to bring my husband to experience the Ritz brunch for his first time. Unfortunately our experience fell far below our expectations. Our server was extremely passive and appeared to not even want to serve us. We had to ask 3 4 times for tea coffee and toast. Our plates were never cleared from the table until we asked other serving staff. The ambience of the restaurant is lovely however for 79 per person the food selection was fairly limited and the service was very disappointing. There are far better and more reasonably priced options in Toronto for a Sunday brunch.
Who ever said this is the best pizza in town either works there or knows someone that does. Because I just ate there and the pizza was bad. But the guy next to me his looked really good. The person that was working was his personal waitress thou. I ve been there more then a couple times it seems it s good when the owner is there. If you try it go to the one on Ray road it s better. O what sauce ?
I tried their pho last year and thought it was good so I decided to come back today for a meal. This time I had beef fried rice it was pretty average but expected. I also asked for a glass of water along side but I never got it! I would not mind if the place was busy and she forgot about it but I was the only person there. The bill came up to 7.90 I gave a 10 and received a toonie and a penny for change. I m never coming back again.
Avoid this company at all costs. 1. Do me a favor and call their phone number 602 840 7663. I bet you a nickel they will not answer. The first sign of poor customer service. Business principal 1 answer the phone for your customers. 2. Arcadia roofing owner Tommy is the typical contractor that over promises and under delivers. Do not let their competitive low price bid sway you. The provide very poor quality roofing and hire under skilled roofers. The saying You get what you pay for is absolutely true for this company . They cut their costs on poor materials and workmanship. 3. Arcadia roofing replaced a roof on my residence less then 6 months ago and after the 1st monsoon there was significant leakage. 4. I called to have them send somebody out to assess the leakage.....No response no return call nothing . Based upon my experience they are a turn and burn company . They take your money and on to the next. I plan on filing a complaint with the AZ ROC and hope to get some resolution. Shoot if I get real motivated I may have my counsel draw up something in Court. Companies like these should think otherwise or move out of the state. AZ does not need more bad businesses. P.S. Their so called 5 year workmanship warranty . Think of it more like...1 year. The house I was raised in had the same roof for over 30 years. I can guarantee wait that sounds like the sales pitch they gave me the roofs they install would never even come close to true craftsmanship of 30 years.
Went with a small group for lunch. Group of 7 when it was not busy. Service friendly but food late in coming out lukewarm when arrived and two of our group the food did not arrive until we asked where it was and then it arrived after the rest of us were already done eating. Would not recommend .
Took my mom and grandma back in june. Service was not as i had experienced in other olive garden locations but the food was good. I assumed it was a one time thing. Took a friend to this same place and this time the service as well as the food was awful. They brought our soups entrees appetizers and wine all at once. The silver ware was not clean. It was the first time for my friend so i wanted him to have a good experience. He swears of never going to another olive garden again!
Let s see..... where to start Sat at the bar....very slow and no service. Had to ask for service every time we wanted something And food....they bring a new definition to small plates and BIG DOLLARS. We do not mind spending money but mix in some service and a little portion size. Great location and atmosphere but not much else.
My wife and I had always enjoyed the pies here until our last visit. What used to be a light flaky smokey crust is now is hard dense and tasteless. Maybe the guy who was manning the oven was recruited away to a competitor? Whatever he reason we will not be going back to this store anytime soon. Too bad as we thought the pizza here was very close to Pizzaria Bianco.
For beer drinkers they probably like it. For those that want to eat skip it. Basically the chef only believes in one flavor yes this is an exaggeration but not by much the crust on the pizza despite their hype on the menu is tough. The beer pretzel is tough and has enough salt that maybe they hired a Roman still salting Carthage. The brat was cooked twice over. Do not go with a date too much noise to have a conversation. More on the pizza. We attempted to order one with an ingredient withheld. Turns out the pizzas are pre made. We did not ask further but maybe frozen? We got a different pizza and discovered the crust to be tough and I thought the top could have been cooked more. Sort of why I guess if it could have been frozen. While the prices are reasonable and the service was okay we wo not be going back for food. Maybe a beer after work.
Macarons are dry dry dry! They also do not have a wide variety of flavors. I hope the owners and pastry chef read this. Please work on your ganache or filling and please make sure there is available flavors especially on a 3 day MLK weekend! I usually give bakeries 1 or 2 chances but the guy at the counter was kind of rude and he was not very receptive or knowledgeable.
Just like my recent meal at Studio Cafe in the MGM Grand Cafe Vettro really personifies a lot of Vegas dining. There definitely seems to be nice restaurants in Vegas but there are just as many restaurants that are below average. What makes matters worse is that these restaurants can be really bad and still turn a profit. These restaurants get so much traffic from the casinos that no matter how bad they are they will always have customers. This 24 hour cafe located in Aria is very big. There is not much to the decor but it is comfortable. The menu features breakfast served all day sandwiches salads and plates including fish beef and pasta . The sandwiches are priced below 20 the plates go over 20. The complimentary bread was some pretzel bread with dried fruit . I do not know if it was purposely served cold but the bread definitely would have been better if served warm. I went with the barramundi because it did look decent when I saw a waitress carrying it. The barramundi kind of like a sea bass was pan seared and served over fingerling potatoes and garnished with edamame kind of an odd pairing and a thin cream sauce. The fish was flaky and moist. Mine was not as seared as the one I saw. It was okay. The veggies and sauce were bland and boring. Some of the veggies were cold too. My friends mentioned that some of their food was cold as well. The waitress was trying hard but the service at Cafe Vettro was not that great. It took a while to put in the orders as well as to receive the food. It was hard to flag down a server too because it did not seem like they had enough staff. Cafe Vettro may have some other stuff on the menu that is better but from what I had I probably would not give it another shot maybe I would try it for breakfast . I think on my next trip to Vegas I really need to plan out each meal no matter how small to avoid having another subpar and overpriced meal like the one we had at Cafe Vettro.
Take your money else where went to the show room at superstition springs mall to buy a bunk bed from pigsty sales people were really friendly and seemed helpful at the time paid for bed and delivery and was told it would be delivered that week. While driving home we received a call saying it was back order and would now be 3 weeks. 4 weeks later we had still not heard any thing so when I called the girl with the attitude told me it might be here in 6 8 weeks but most likely more then that. When I asked for my money back they saidvit would take 3 6 weeks for that only took them 15 seconds to take my money but ended up taking 3 weeks to get my money back to me. Found a better bed online for 300 dollars less and had it in 2 weeks.
This club is lower tier and the fact that Scott Disick is a featured celeb here should have been a tell tell sign. I got on a list from a promoter and surprisingly the line moved fast and I was in in less than 10 minutes. Average age here is about 24 27. The women dressed liked women of the night prostitutes and looked like they were in training for street work. The guys did mostly have on collared shirts but it looked like they only wore them due to dress code rules. If you are looking for a more upscale Cosmo type of professional chic crowd this would be the opposite of that. The music was good and mostly hip hop which was a great mix. Water was bottled only and they charged 10 for a small bottle water.Noooooo thanks. The Security guards were a holes. There was nowhere to stand as the dance floor was sooo small in fact noone was even dancing really since it was so packed. They were just standing huddled together moving. Everyone was lined up against the wall. Every five seconds some wanna b robo cop security guard who wanted to feel important or wanted something to do would come over to you amd tell you that you couldnt stand here or there. After the third time it was annoying and I left. Sorry douchebags but I was doing you a favor being there and bringing up the quakity of the lanes there. So I quickly assessed the ratchness and left. Again there was nowhere to dance no where to stand and the bar was 5 lines deep so where exactly am I supposed to stand numbnuts? anyway I had enough after 15 minutes and left the rachet dump and would suggest unless you like hanging around people that are constsntly messing with their noses several people I saw kept nervously rubbing their noses or dressed in clothing in which you are unsure if they are there to party or to meet paying customers then I would avoid.Its really a dump.
Bathtub had a ton of hair in it obviously had not been cleaned. Very noisy right next to the highway. Dated rooms with rough sheets. Stay somewhere else.
Dr. Montana is a misogynist. He tried to make me feel stupid because I brought my dog in to have her teeth looked at because I thought it looked like she had cavities or gum disease. He laughed at me and told me dogs do not get cavities . Not true . He then laughed at me and repeated to me several times that yeah chuckle chuckle I m sure she has cavities on both sides of her mouth at the same time unilaterally . I do not know how he found this funny? I also asked him to look at growth on her face. Which again he tried to condescend and berate me. Not a nice man! Upon arriving at home I looked up dental cavities in dogs because I still felt my dog has some kind of dental disease. I found an article on Dental Caries in Dogs.... Dental caries is a condition in which the dental hard tissues decay as the result of oral bacteria on the tooth surface. While dental caries is not common in the domestic pet it does occur and should be watched for. A 1988 study reported in the Journal of Veterinary Dentistry found that 5.3 percent of dogs one year of age or older had one or more caries lesions with 52 percent of that group having BILATERALLY SYMMETRICAL lesions. Caries can affect the crown or the roots of the teeth and is classified as pit and fissure caries smooth surface caries or root caries. There is no known breed age or gender risk. Dr. Montana here s what I have to say to you we WON T be coming back!
Horrible service. No one cared about us when we arrived. We ve been standing at door for 10mins without any greeting even though the place wasnt busy at all. After sitting no one serves us for tea or coffee. My bf kept his hand up but was ignored for a while. Finally called waitor to ask for some tea. The service is super slow and low in quality. I am a big fan of their cakes. But if a resturant want to be sucess in the future or long run. Service is the first thing they need to improve. I hope this place will exist for decades and decades. But to compete the other competitors they should do more. Im writing to hope michi cafe wont give its position up in a competitive situation.
Went there for a falafel mixed veggie sandwich. 1st for middle eastern food and or sandwich.. I do not really expect to pay 9 it s the large but it s not really large I went there for falafel.. and seriously I wo not come back they were really not good.. mushy flavorless... not my idea of a great falafel place... nop.. wo not come back I usually go at Mona s Shawarma and Falafel Fast Food Inc at 661 College St by grace street. I will stick to that place
Last week my husband stopped by to rent a car due to a car accident he had. At around 7pm when he picked me up from work I got inside the car and was horrified by the smell of marijuana penetrating the car. It smelled like someone had just smoked and closed all the doors causing the smell the penetrate. I had to drive in 60degree weather with the windows down because it smelled so bad and it even caused a headache and some dizziness. When we go home we checked the car and there were crumbs of marijuana cigarette around the car. There were chips in the car headphones and even lighters inside. It seems that the person turned in the car and the staff at Hertz never even bothered to get it cleaned. My husband was ready to take the car to get it detailed or even clean it himself but because of his accident he could not bend or drive very much. I was EXTREMELY disappointed with the company since it was our first time renting from them. I ca not believe they rent out cars to people in that state. Fortunately my husband went back and got another car the following morning but if he had been stopped by the police and they had smelled or seen the crumbs he could ve gotten into a predicament. First impressions are very important and after this experience I hope never to have to rent from Hertz again.
I got my car repairs completed in a timely manner back in April. After going through my insurance I realized I was over charged. Antonio stated he would refund me and until this day he refuses to return any of my calls or my money. He promise my insurance he would. He lied and continues to lie. This is disappointing that he ca not keep his word as a business owner
So almost a year ago I took my sister here to help her purchase a car. Everything went pretty smoothly except the fact that the salesperson had not been trained and it was her first sale. Overall my sister got a good deal and we were happy. Flash forward about a year later I go here with my father in law. He had gone the day before and checked it out and decided he wanted to go back and buy the car. First thing his sales guy had the day off so the manager pawned us off onto another salesperson . This guys was super lazy and not at all interested in helping us. Worthless is an understatement. The first sales manager comes out and remembers me from dealing with my sister. He steps away and sends out the other sales manager who is this short bald guy with a Napoleon complex. The first thing he tries to do is RAISE our payment because we asked about another rebate. I asked the guy to stop wasting our time and bring us a real offer and he loses his mind. the guy was a complete prick. He even tried to belittle me. Eventually we did get the payment down under the limit my father in law set for himself but I do not think the deal was overly fair at all. They should have lost this sale but I assure you I will NOT recommend this dealer to ANYONE! Avoid at all costs they treat you like you do not matter. If that attitude keeps up they will probably go under!
I came here a couple of times to see if the service has changed and really it has not . I was expecting that since I was paying that much I should at least have a server who smiles. For some reason other tables servers were all pleasant and smiling with them making them feel special and happy to be there. Both times my husband and I went we went for special occasions and both times we left feeling dissatisfied and disappointed. The service I think needs to be re evaluated by management. Maybe they need more training or maybe they need people who can do the job and not show that they are unhappy working there. The only things that I was satisfied with was the decor which is amazing and the food which is pretty good. We pretty much decided that if we were to be coming back it will be for someone else s occassion.
I purchased the coupon on Living Social. I booked online and they never showed up. I called to rebook and spoke directly to the owner. She said she was busy and would call me back shortly. I never heard back. One star because I cannot get service. Not sure how the quality would have been had they shown up but based on how they schedule appointments I would not expect much.
While I was in town for my birthday for a few days I was referred to Tiffany s Nails to get a mani and pedi. The morning of my appointment my sister who was on speaker phone scheduled my appointment for 4pm in the afternoon. When I arrived for my appointment I was told to pick a color. I picked my color and was waiting until about 4 30pm. My sister asked when would I d be assisted and was told in about 10 15 more minutes probably because they were running behind. The lack of professionalism was unacceptable so I then went to Capri Nails who took me right away and did a wonderful job on my nails.
I am so tired of business ooohing and ahhhing over Veterans say they will give you 10 discount anytime if active duty retired or VA. when you show proof that they require they have to try and get approval and act like the world is coming to an end just to do this. For Christ sake if you do not want to give the discount man up and say so but do embarrass people and make them feel like second class citizens. Train your people daily if necessary or quit offering the discount veterans do not need your handout if you do not mean it.
So my son was taken here last night to the emergency for a dislocated finger. After keeping him there all night and sedating him they ransacked his wallet stole most of his money and refused to file a claim or take any blame for their actions!!! Never go here if you do not have to. He s from Out of town and was recommended to go there Thieves work there! And take advantage when you re asleep!!
If I could I would have given this joint negativity stars. As I was there with a female friend of mine while she was using the restroom an employee their s with the name tag Sarah was as well. The employee had blown up the stall next to my female friend and proceeded to exit the bathroom without making a stop to the sink. My female friend asked if are not all employees required to wash up after using the bathroom. The employee told my female friend to fuck off and to mind her own business. Needless to say we decided to discard our food and to never return to this Dunken Donuts again.
Absolutely horrifying. I wanted to get lobster as I ve tried it but never my own. Its a 50 50 because my moms was decent.... mine was a burnt tail shell with rubbery meat and sharp black things. For 44 dollars I could have made several lobsters and never having made one I think with Google it would have turned out edible. They asked if like another and I explained I will likely never eat any again. On a 44 dollar meal that s a pretty big screw up. Other red lobsters have better reviews but I doubt if I d even go to those. I am very seriously horrified. Its insanely up charged a 27 dollar meal turned into 44 because of mashed potato upgrades. Just make some shrimp and save yourself the heart ache.
I ve worked at Oliver and bonocinis. I know what is expected of a visit to any of the O and B restaurants. Honestly .. if this place keeps up with the terrible service that I experienced tonight in such a prime location Oliver and bonocinis will eventually lose their good reputation. My friends and I waited for over ten minutes no menus. No water. No server. No SERVICE. and it s really not that busy. The server in the section looked absolutely miserable and did not acknowledge us once until after the manager came over 35 mins after already sitting there and ordering drinks off a bus boy who forgot and I ended up just ordering from the bar The manager then forgot our second round of drinks remembering once we waved him down. The food ... not up to O and B standard .. calamari tasted like frozen calamari .. the tacos were in lack of better terms slop. And the wings and crab cakes .. they were alright . This review is slightly harsh however I expected much more from this restaurant and was slightly embarrassed as I told my friends from out of town how great it was.
I got terrible food poisoning from here. I m not surprised either. This place is so dirty and poorly ran. So sad. Save yourself the 24 hours of pain and go somewhere else.
Wow I m really glad I was able to avoid this place for so long. I finally got sucked in and went for dinner with a co worker. I thought it was bad stuff. Terrible and flavorless tasted like crappy TGI Friday but in the jungle. Honestly did not enjoy anything from appetizer or entree ordered. I do not suggest it touristy and awful. Cool waiter saved this from being a total disaster.
What a joke!!! Horrible food and horrible service. I know the city was packed that weekend July 5th 2014 but if you ca not handle busy then do not throw tables everywhere. First we seat down and after 10 minutes the waitress came in. Took forever to bring our drinks only soda and everything was wrong. The food took near 40 minutes and when finally came in it was cold not cooked and all over the place. These people should be ashamed to run a business like this. Many people around us left before finishing their plates and we did the same. Will never go back and do not waste your time going there either. We left very upset.
Three years ago we purchased 3 expensive pindo palms. The customer service was great at the nursery and they came promptly to the house to plant them. My husband was watching the workers plant the palms but they told him to go inside and that the had everything under control. Anyway... these palms never grew! They are pitiful! We have fertilizered and watered as directed but they have not grown. We feel they were not planted correctly ... just thrown in the hole with no fertilizer perhaps that s why they wanted my husband to go into the house ! .
YUCK...skip! Easily the WORST BURGERS I ve ever eaten. The burgers lacked flavor even with the toppings. We ordered Applerum burger and Tinshack smokehouse burger. Both left a lot to be desired. The fries were not fries at all more like potato chips some thin and crispy and others thick . The sweet potato fries chips were good but not enough to return for. POOR SERVICE. TEPID FOOD. The service left a lot to be desired also. She the waitress was behaving as though she was doing us a favor oppose to her job. The FLIES that kept landing on my plate was the last straw...I could not finish my food
The view from this hotel is really cool at night especially but the hotel itself is not that great. It s kind of old and shabby. The bathtub was not very inviting even for a shower.
I bought a car here and subsequent was informed that it had been in a car accident with airbag deployment before I bought it. I was too naive to ask but they certainly never bothered to tell me.
I got the Prime Rib Steak sandwich. They said they made their own horseradish so I was excited but I could not really taste it when I got it. Maybe they did not put enough. I also wanted to try the potato salad because I love a good potato salad. But the sandwich and potato salad were nothing to come running back to this place for. It was not bad but nothing stood out to me either. It s so close to my house so maybe I ll try more sandwiches. I guess I was hoping to find another sandwich shop like Sourdough Eatery. Sincerely not a mean girl
Please bring back a legitimate happy hour!!! My friends and I are regulars there and I fear 10 dollars a drink is overpriced for a margarita or a Jameson and ginger. Your food is amazing but who would want to frequent a bar that charges so much compared to the other bars in the area.
I really love Boot Barn. I ve been a Boot Barn customer for about 3 years however today is the last day I will consider shopping at a Boot Barn. I was excited to visit their new location in the Mesa Riverview location. I went in today with my boyfriend to shop for boots for him. We were looking around for a few minutes and we were waiting on an associate named Abigail Abby as she was helping another customer. Another associate saw us waiting and asked is she could help us. We asked her what we were looking for and she explained that since it was her third day she d look for a boot person to assist us. Of course that boot person was Abby. Our associate Nikola asked Abby for help. The tone and attitude Abby had while answering her co worker s question was awful enough for me to wish they did not have what we were looking for so we could walk away and not give Boot Barn our money. Abby never once asked us what we were looking for or said be right with you. Her customer service was terrible but what even worse was the way in which she helped her co worker. No thank you Boot Barn you can keep your awful customer service and I will be sure to tell everyone how helpful Abby was to your customers and your staff. As someone who trains other departments in my office on customer service I will be sure to use the behavior I saw today at Boot Barn as a do not in my trainings. As someone who supervises staff on teamwork among other things I will also be sure to use this example of terrible teamwork among staff at Boot Barn. I felt really bad for Nikola after she got such an awful answer from Abby. I hope she moves on to experience a better work environment. Luckily they did not have the boot we were looking for and we were able to walk out without spending a dime at Boot Barn. This experience made me angry and feel terrible for the associate that tried to help because of the way she was talked down to in front of customers. Not okay. I hope Boot Barn would focus a little more on the importance of good customer service with their employees.
Ummmmm....yuck. Just yuck . I mean seriously? I give it one star because the waitress was nice and we got good service. We were here last week. Wife got her birthday grand slam . OMG...I do not know what they did but it was disgusting. The pancakes tasted heavy and fat and well just yucky . They should have been light and fluffy as most breakfast places will make them. Eggs were not a lot better. I would not be surprised if eating that shaved a year or two off her life. It was free for her birthday and I still think we got ripped off on that one! I had a burger and fries. Well...they were better than McDonald s. Ca not say they were bad. But definitely nothing special. You could make a better one in your own kitchen in about 10 minutes for a fraction of the cost. If you want a decent burger try Fuddruckers or Red Robin or someplace like that. For the price Denny s burger was definitely not worth it. I do not care if it s free on your birthday it s not worth it. Do not come here.
Scruffy s is the very definition of grungy pub. I work pretty close to this pub so my meeting with this pub was bound to happen. Let me start of with the good things about this pub Layout Scruffy s has a great layout it is cozy enough to be a stop for a first date and large enough to accommodate large parties of 20 guests. Servers they are polite will take your order and get it right more often than not !! which is surprising for a pub and even crack a joke once in a while Prices drinks are cheap assuming you do not want anything too fancy ....grungy pub cheap local drinks That is unfortunately where the good things end. If you re going to Scruffy s for food you will be disappointed. There s no question in my mind about this fact their food sucks. To top it off it s overpriced. There are countless other places with better food in the same intersection. Finally this is the big reason they lose points the service here is the WORST. You re probably thinking David you said the staff is great. What gives? . Well dear reader although the staff is wonderful the process this pub has set up to transfer food orders into food is very bad. Story time Went with some work buddies about 7 of us in total for a quick lunch and drinks. Ordered our food and began our never ending wait. We get our drinks a little late 15 minutes after ordering . We finish our drinks and we re told the food will be right there just order another round . We order another round. Finish the 2nd round. No drinks. It s been 45 minutes by this time. Finally almost an hour after ordering our food drinks all of our food arrives together thank goodness . Our quick lunch drinks turns into an hour and a half of waiting All in all Scruffy s is a great place to go for a quick drink maybe some dirty food ....and that s it. TL DR cheap drinks nothing fancy awesome layout garbage food and horrible process flow
Every time I come here I want to love this place but there is always an issue. Once I ordered a South Beach salad and because they were out of some ingredients they substituted things not normally in the salad without asking. This time I ask them to use raw nuts instead of roasted and now they do not carry raw nuts anymore!!! Also the orange cashew dressing the only dressing without oil is now made with roasted cashews! I come here because I can eat completely clean and raw now not possible. The other issue it that the place is slightly filthy. The sun is shining in and I see dust everywhere. Both doors look like they have not been wiped down in a month and the transition plate underneath the door is gross! Truly I love the immune juice and as I said before I REALLY WANT TO LOVE THIS PLACE! Please clean it up and keep things raw and healthy! Now they say they have never had raw nuts always roasted. Strange that is not what they said two months ago!!! Frustrating!!!!!
Arghh... where do I start? Well allow me to say that I am not a big fan of Macaroni Grill but the hubby and the kids seem to like it so we go there once in a while. Come to think about it I think we have gotten better service consistently at the Agua Fria and Tatum locations we also went once in Mesa. However the few times I have been to the Gold Dust locations... huge disappointments. Once our daughter s wheat pasta was uncooked and missing the pine nuts we ordered it because she did not know what they were . We like the Chianti BBQ Steak and we have had it at Tatum location delicious. We went to this place for Christmas Eve and we were expecting them to be busy. To our surprise we did not have to wait that long to be seated. We got a booth 4 of us and ordered fetuccini and Penne Rustica for the kids hubby the Chianti BBQ steak and the Parmesan Veal Chop for me. We ate one piece of bread. We asked for one more. We ate it. Our server apologized for the delay. Long wait. Our server came back and apologized again. Long wait. Our server nowhere to be seen. Over 50 minutes went by since our order which I think it is beyond a reasonable delay. We caught the attention of our server and asked for the manager. After a while a manager stopped by and explained they had 2 very big parties he mention the number 17 each I think in a back room. Honestly in my mind this translated to we do have customers more important than you ... we said this was beyond reasonable and were considering leaving he said being Christmas Eve everywhere would be busy and we would be better off waiting here he offered a discount... and left. I tried to get his attention to ask how much longer but he did not hear me or else... About 8 10 min later he brought our food. As he was leaving I said pointing to the Chianti steak this should have prosciutto and crostini and garlic dip added my husband. He said the prosciutto is in there... and left. Well in my mind I translated that as I am in a hurry so I am going to treat you like an idiot . That is the utmost disrespect and hence the one star. There is no discount that makes up for that. There was no prosciutto in there. At all. We caught the attention of our server and mentioned the missing ingredients and he brought a side of prosciutto some garlic dip and a piece of bread... nothing like the crostini we have had at the Tatum location. Also the veal chop is usually huge and this time it was like half of what I usually get somewhere else. Also sadly this still may be an improvement because last time we ordered the Chianti steak here they did not even believe us it was supposed to come with garlic dip... honestly... geeezz ca not they read their own menus? oh well no more Gold Dust in my macaroni... ever.
I ca not for the life of me understand their four star rating. We ve been there a couple of times so this review is based on the few trips we ve had so far. The first time we came for the AYCE and their selection as well as quality was way below par compared to the other Brazilian steakhouses in town. Very little to choose from at the salad bar and the taste was bland. The meats did not taste very fresh and everything was super chewy and salty. The next couple times we came for their bar menu with groups of 8 to 10 people. The food took over an hour to come out and this last time it took an hour and a half for everybody to receive their meals.!!! There were only like four other tables with people so we could not understand why the kitchen was so slow. On top of that the pao de Cajo bread came out stone cold 2x and when they served them the third time they felt like they had been microwaved. The plain rice was insanely salty The Churrasco steak was so salty and chewy I had to return it. The Angus sliders Were so dry they were not edible. This place is a far cry from Texas de Brazil. If you want good Brazilian barbecue it s worth dealing with the strip traffic and wait unless u have reservation to eat there. That place is awesome on all levels.
Worst hospital I have ever had the displeasure of going to. All the nurses in the emergency room suck they do not know how to actually talk to patients. For some reason they all have a serious attitude problem to where I told 2 of them off. Avoid this hospitals emergency room at all cost. These people should ve chose a different profession.
store is always in some sort of disarray but I overlook since it has the cheapest gas besides Circle K down the street.
Came here for the first time to have my dip powder nails removed which I had gotten done from another salon. The manicurist cut my nail tip off and filed my nails down into NUBS. When I told her they look like round nubs instead of squares like I had told her to keep she said it ll look fine once we put the top coat on . She finished my nails told me to go wash my hands at the sink. I washed my hands with hot water soap and towel dried come to find an INEXCUSABLE amount of color glued to my skin. I told the receptionist I am NOT paying for these nails and their response Either you pay or we have to remove them . I have been to many nail salons and this by far was the WORST customer service wise and final product wise. Not only did I pay 40 for my nails to look like nubs but paid to be humiliated by the staff in front of other customers. I am thoroughly disappointed and livid. DO NOT GET YOUR NAILS DONE HERE.
Not very good at all. Went there with a friend waited about 15 minutes for our food. It was cooked in front of us but when we picked it up it was cold! Not to mention some tables are directly across from the rest room. A little off putting. My friend got a chicken egg roll that had a weird smell to it. She did not risk it and threw it away. It was soggy too. I would rather go to teriyaki madness.
I bought a ticket to go into Gates of Hell but when I went to buy my ticket there was no mention of a waiver that you must sign prior to going into the haunted house. After paying and waiting in line for over an hour they gave us a waiver to sign that said that it is a full contact haunted house and that you will be electrically shocked. After reading the terms I decided I did not want to sign such a waiver and politely asked for a refund. The guy called the owner to come talk to me and I explained my situation and mentioned how I thought it was unfair that I could not get a refund when there was no sign and no one mentioned a waiver when purchasing the ticket. Long story short he rudely told me I was not getting a refund and I told him to go f himself. He grabbed a security guard and scorted me out for telling him to go f himself. I am not writing my negative review for being scorted out but I am writing my negative review due to the unethical practice of selling tickets with no warning of having such extreme waivers and refusing to give a refund after to people who do not agree with the terms. I do not think it is legal nor ethical. I do not give my business to people who run their business in an unethical manner and I will make sure to let everyone I know about my awful experience.
This place is a joke. It seems like they raise the prices every week I have tried this place three times and it is very disappointing. The portions you get for what you pay are way out of balance. I know Asian places are cheap but this is extreme. Latest example? Sesame chicken for 14.63 carry out. I almost finished the entire take out in one sitting. While yes I might be over weight and can eat this is still ridiculous for Chinese food. Also if you pay 14.63 do you think you would get ONE napkin or pair of chop sticks? Nope Asian restaurant cheapness again. With the billions of choices for Asian and Chinese food try anyone else but them. Even Hunan Garden right up the street in the plaza is better....but not by much.
I ve been to a lot of ramen places in Toronto ranging from spaghetti at Ajisen Ramen in North York to almost Japan decent at Kinton. This place is a bit more authentic but oddly the noodles tasted like Chinese Chow Mein. I ordered the King dish which I thought was a heafty meaty plate and was not as spicy as advertised. It did not really taste that great sort of too much vegetable to noodle meat ratio. Shame.
Horrible customer service. Put our name down and sat right in front of the host. Never called our name but noticed he crossed our name off the list. Asked why it was crossed out and he said I ca not help you if you do not respond to your name...excuse me? We ca not hear mumbling. This place needs a better host who can speak up and seat people accordingly. Do not care how popular the place is...if I m about to spend money at your restaurant I would hope for the decency of respect and good customer service.
Great shop with a wonderful selection of fabrics unless you happen to go in when the owner is in a foul mood apparently. A friend of mine was heading to Las Vegas last week and I HIGHLY recommended she check out the shop. I was totally embarrassed today when she told me about the behavior of the owner when she was in the shop. Rude snappish and dressed like she was working in the yard instead of in a place of business. Everyone has a bad day now and then but do not take it out on your customers especially one who came with an empty suitcase expecting to need the space for all her purchases. I wo not make the mistake of recommending this shop again.
We were in town from chicago.found this restaurant on yelp. Went there around 7 and it was closed n closing hours were 930.
I ve been here 3 times and each time it was either closed or they were on vacation. When I finally got a seat in which I had to wait 40 mins for the staff tells me they re out of eggs Benny the only reason we re there an hour before brunch ends. Been trying to eat here for 2 years now and I still ca not tell you what it s like. Nothing against the food but the experience has not been pleasant.
I choose to take our new kitten to this clinic because of all the great reviews. My experience does not even merit one star but that s the least I could give. We arrived for our appointment five minutes early. After waiting half an hour and seeing a couple patients go back to a room that arrived after we did we questioned the receptionist if we would be called back soon as we had somewhere to be shortly. She checked in the back and informed us she is almost finished with her patient it will be just a few minutes. We continued to wait another 15 minutes and questioned the receptionist again about when our appointment time was and how much longer it would be. She went to the back again and then told us the doctor was running 15 minutes behind. To be correct the doc was not 15 minutes behind she was 45 and soon to be an hour if we waited . We can either wait another 15 or schedule another appointment. At that point four patients that had arrived AFTER us had already went back to see the doctor so we choose to leave and NOT reschedule. No apologies from the staff. No nothing. We called another clinic to see our kitten and will never go back here with any of our animals. I have never had such poor customer service from a Vet. EVER.
The pizza is alright. My bone to pick is that they keep mailing us coupons for 16 for wings pizza. We get them weekly for the past 5 months! If you call and try to redeem it they will tell you they do not offer that coupon anymore or as one employee said that was a misprint and we were told not to honor them . I would give them zero stars for not honoring their coupons.
I have been going to concerts all over America for the past decade and I ve never been to such an awful venue in my life. I went to see my favorite band there two weeks ago and they cut the mic during the middle of their last song and would not let them finish their set. All the fans were upset and the vocalist got upset as well and they did not seem to care as they rushed everybody out for no good reason. I think the venue clothed in about 15 minutes or something? Clearly they decided to be selfish and make everyone go home early. Plus theyre way too controlling when it comes to lines where to drink where to smoke I just made it not fun for anyone. Plus the security guards were so rude and acted like military sergeants it was just ridiculous.
Like walking into a Courtyard Marriott or even a commercialized Hilton. Nothing special about the Signature at MGM as the hotels on the strip blow the extravagance of this hotel out of the water. We were greeted with minimal smiles and were hustled to check in when we arrived to the drive way. Front Desk The concierge did not have a customer friendly attitude in any way. We attempted to arrange a few cabs or a limo to our destination for the night however the hotel does NOT offer this service. I asked if they would be able to give us an estimated time of arrival for the next cab and they were also unable to ask the parking attendants manager the waiting time. I also attempted to ask if I could be transferred to speak to the car service manager and the concierge responded with a no and hung up. Room Service Cleaning Called for extra pillows blankets on the first night and the items arrived within 20 minutes. Asked for extra towels and toiletries on the 2nd night and that took about 1.5 hours with 2 calls to remind them and they apologized with a sorry we forgot . On the plus side valet and wifi is free. That is all.
Just could not join this gym despite the proximity and a corporate discount. First the positive things It s clean It s pretty spacious They have a range of cardio machine brands mix of Life Fitness Precor and Cybex. I like Precor ellipticals best but prefer Life Fitness treadmills so this is good for me. I m stuggling to think of anything else that I liked. I wandered in because I d been inundated with flyers in my post box from them but one actually looked promising 2 months at 10 month. No obligation. No long term contract. Sounded good! Obviously I expected it was too good to be true though. I happened to be passing one day so decided to pop in. The girl at the desk said she knew nothing about such offers so I d have to speak to the membership guy. He walked out all fake smiles and joviality. He decided that I was Australian after I d uttered a couple of words obviously wrong and did not bother just asking me where I was from. I asked him about the offer and he basically refused to tell me about it mumbling something about it only being for the first 2 months of a 12 month contract. We had to go on a tour of the gym then. He took the elevator up one floor because he had hurt his back training. In the gym. Good lot of cardio machines and it did not seem that busy but was a Saturday lunchtime so hard to judge. Some weight machines but scant free weights. Saw a room for personal training which had the kettlebells and balls....for use with the personal trainers. The changing room was nice. The thing he seemed most proud of in the whole gym was the lounge and juice bar. Honestly in my opinion this is the most pointless waste of space imaginable. I want to go to the gym do my workout and leave. i can sit on my ass undoing my good work by drinking hundreds of calories at home or somewhere else. I was then brought to the office. He took my details scrawled down on a scrap of paper and then started pushing me to join there and then. I was repeatedly asked WHY I would not join then. I said I had to think about it. But why not? And on.... I had to invent somewhere I had to be to escape. I said I d prefer to try the gym first but he d only allow me a pass for sometime he was on duty. I sprinted out the door. At home later after my fictitious important thing to do I started Googling. Turns out blog.to wrote about these tactics a couple of years ago and got 258 comments from dissatisfied people One of the big gripes was an inability to contact managers and or head office. I tried emailing the marketing division twice and got no reply. I also checked the Better Business Bureau they get a big fat F. At the moment I m doing a week s free trial at Goodlife. Not half as fancy but has everything I want and they were not at all as aggressive. 99 certain I ll be joining there. Would not touch this place.
I ve heard of supply demand but this place truly capitalized on other rental car companies in airport being unavailable. 600 for 4 day rental of a ridiculous Mustang! I took for the day then reserved a vehicle with Avis the next day. Enterprise also does not have a preferred program worthwhile... I ll stay with Avis and now I know why Time Warner does not use them as a corporate provider.
The fall of a once fabulous buffet have not been here in years the rio and the buffet seem like they have fallen on hard times hotel it self fell a little but the once grand rio buffet has to be the laughing stock of all the other buffets or genius for what they charge for a scaled down Denny s of the buffet world. 33 bucks for really old dry lousy food or a 20 upgrade gets too a hand stamp and entrance to a poorly stocked seafood section it s crazy your better off at hash house and that place sucks Your best bet is to avoid this place food bad service worse and everyone s unhappy The place including hotel looks likes its fallen on hard times. What s going on Vegas your grand old lady s are fading away to late for the rio buffet it died and no one cares
This is a very stylish friendly and serene property connected to Mandalay Bay. I like the look the suite rooms and the blissful absence of slot machines in the lobby but they got several things very wrong for a property seeking to be higher end 1 Sneaking in phony charges on the bill I was inexplicably charged twice each night for the resort fee 2x 25 and had to call back navigating through their nightmare phone system to get the charges reversed. 2 While they have a fitness center in the Delano you have to pay an additional 20 fee to use it or walk a mile into the Mandalay Bay to use theirs for free. Excuse me what is the resort fee for if not to let your guests use your facilities? I am okay with paying extra for wifi you expect that but the charge for using the FITNESS CENTER is just silly. 3 The Franklin Lounge I was lured here by the promise of craft cocktails. What I found was artfully named sugary drinks. If you are going to position yourself as an artisinal cocktail destination have SOME spirit forward classics on hand Negronis Manhattans etc . A menu of sugary punches and lemon drop variants does not do the trick. To be fair Vesper Bar in the Cosmopolitan is the only property in Vegas that gets the cocktail thing right. Guess I should stick to NYC or SF for my cocktails. Also they charge 20 for valet parking which I think of as unusual in Vegas or maybe this has changed . Most properties offer valet as a complimentary service you just tip the valey heartily. If you get a good room rate here go for it. The rooms are stylish and comfortable and they may just be working out some kinks. However do not expect anything near a Cosmo or Wynn type of experience.
Not great not bad it s Panda Express. Only thing bad I can say is the typical Hurry up and order hustle that the employees lay on you. It goes like this Give me the Orange Chicken.OK WHAT ELSE?Uhhhh do you have steamed vegetables?FIVE MINUTES WHAT ELSE? 5 minutes what?IT TAKES 5 MINUTES. 5 minutes to make?YES WHAT ELSE? Ok give me the Firecracker Chicken.OK WHAT ELSE?And the steamed vegetables.OK WHAT ELSE? Not a minute to consider your thoughts. Every location is like this. WHAT ELSE WHAT ELSE WHAT ELSE. To be fair the food is fresh and crisp about 90 of the time more than you can say than most chinese places... but that s not saying much.
This place has great pizza but my experience with this location has been awful. They either take over an hour to get you a pizza or they do not deliver it at all. The first time I tried to order a pizza from here they ended up being closed because of a management issue and I never got my pizza I never got charged but I also had to wait an hour and a half before realizing it was never coming. The second time I ordered we had to call about delivery and they had the address written down as Camelflower instead of Camelback. Took about 90 mins. The third time I tried to order a pizza it took 90 mins before it was delivered and that was only after I called to check in on it. They gave me a free pizza credited to my account as a result. Now I m sitting here waiting for yet another pizza that was quoted as being delivered in 45 mins.. It has been 90 minutes again. We called to check in on the pizza see a trend? and they said they only had one driver. Now I m wondering if my pizza is going to be cold. Bottom line if you ca not figure out how to offer delivery then do not offer it. The food is good but the experience is awful. Stop telling people you deliver if you really do not I could pull off this kind of delivery service as a one man shop . If you re wondering why Domino s or Pizza Hut has been successful it is because they ve mastered the art of pizza delivery. Either figure your system out or give it up. If you re wondering if you should try this place then you should drive to the location and enjoy the food. Do not wait for your pizza to be delivered. You might starve.
A sign clearly on the front door states any part 15 or less. Now 15 or less means exactly what it says. I found a part took it to the counter and lo and behold they said it was 30 how can that be I have no idea so be aware if they tell you 15 it could be more. In my opinion this is totally false advertisement I mentioned the price to the guy and he says oh this is 30 so Why have 15 or less on any vehicle on the door.
Referred by hotel concierge. Other suggestion was L express. Slow service. Ordered one salad but got two. Salty duck leg. Ordered Americano but got charged for cappuccino. Server forgot fries for mussels. Bad wifi to look up tourist info. Had to get another one with different SSID and password. After mentioning the slowness I was told both salads will be on the house but charged for one. Very disappointed with service and taste after its appearance.
I have been trying the Fro yo in the area and can say this one is not on my list to return. They have a lot of flavors but there were no samples cups out..... I tried the chocolate but it had a weird tang to it. The vanilla tasted almost like milk. The place was also hard to find.
I hope their customer service and plumbing skills are better than the way they treat people on the road. The van in the photo was tailgating numerous cars and even passed someone on the right using the bike lane one of those times you WISH there was a cop around . I will never use their services are recommend them to anyone based on this alone. Integrity.....
I ve been to the House of Blues for a few concerts now and there are plenty of other venues that offer a better sound quality especially in Las Vegas. If you have the opportunity to see a band at another venue I highly recommend it. The sound quality is awful so there will be a very low chance you ll understand anything coming out of the singers mouth. It ends up being just a muffle that fades into the rest of the band.
Tried it for breakfast today ca not say I was at all impressed. The server was kind of pushy and had pretty sarcastic answers and not in a charming way. They do not refill soda even though they have it on fountain. Weird. I asked for a glass of water which she never brought. Eventually had to get up and take a glass and water pitcher back to our table. They forgot to give my companion his toast it sat on the counter until we had basically finished our meal. I love diners but I could do without going back here.
Was really juiced to try this new hot pot spot especially since it s death ass cold in Vegas now. BUT sad to say was so disappointed in the first 35 minutes inside I had to leave. Was not seated properly lady told me to pick a spot for 4 so I did. Then we were ignored the entire time even with more than half of the restaurant empty and to top that off the fire alarms went off and we along with everyone that was eating already were unattended and not kept updated with what was happening. One of the servers was running around frantically not knowing what she was looking for and they did not even have their fans on and still did not turn them on when the alarms went off. Eh maybe I ll give them another chance in the future if others tell me it s bomb.
Just another average radio station in Las Vegas trying to keep their heads above water by putting the word x treme in their title. This station is more mainstream than extreme. They seem to specialize in playing hipster douchebag banjo top 40 one hit wonder songs over and over and over again . Yeah they will occasionally throw in the token Bush or Smashing Pumpkins song to perpetuate the illusion of coolness but it s not enough to really make a difference.
After hearing about how great this restaurant was from a few of my friends my girlfriend and I were looking forward to a really nice meal. Unfortunately the experience left a lot to be desired. The drinks martini and a beer came out and were great service was a bit slow but it was a nice night and we did not mind the wait to much. We had the muscles and crab cake appetizers the muscles were amazing a huge portion and cooked perfectly. The crab cake was small and not very flavorful defiantly did not seem like fresh crab probably canned or frozen I would not get it again. The problem was really with the entree. I ordered the filet and my girlfriend ordered the duck. The other couple with us ordered a filet and the duck as well. The duck was good not a large portion but about what was expected. Both of the filet s were ordered medium rare and came out very overcooked. I would say they were medium well quite dry and no pink in the center. We both let the waitress know and she took them back to the kitchen and said we would have new one out shortly. A few minutes later the chef came out with the steaks we had sent back he had cut them open a few places and told us that they were done properly and he would not re cook them any differently. He set them down and walked away. We realized that he had switched the plates I had my friends steak he had mine unfortunately we only realized after we had another bite so I we just decided we would keep them. We were both a bit shocked it s pretty rare for me to send something back but when I m paying 20 for a very small filet I really expect it to be cooked properly. Instead we were both stuck with dry over cooked and pretty flavor less steaks. I have NEVER seen anything sent back to the kitchen only to have the cook refuse to fix the food. We were never asked again how our food was and the owner was going around visiting all the tables but made it very clear to avoid us. While this is not the most expensive place in town when I m spending 50 per person for a meal I expect thing to be at least cooked properly and treated like the restaurant values my business. This was not the case. We will not be returning.
I wanted to like this rental company but they just do not provide even some basic services that you d expect from a rental company. I also dislike leaving bad reviews as most of the time it just is not worth my time. However this is my third 3 negative experience with SIXT in a row! The last time I rented everything seemed fine except they decided to charge my credit card later than when I paid for the car. It would have been fine except my credit card was compromised and my bank Chase blocked it and had to re issue me another card. Unaware of the problem I receive an email from SIXT about the outstanding balance. After talking to SIXT and offering them the new credit card number they told me that they do not want to incur another charge by using a different card and that I should contact my bank and tell them to ok the original transaction. I called my bank Chase and they were quite surprised at the request. They said that once a card is compromised there s no way a 3 week old transaction would be approved. My bank was also surprised that SIXT would not take the new credit card number. ANY OTHER CAR RENTAL COMPANY WOULD BE HAPPY TO ACCEPT A CREDIT CARD PAYMENT! I could only agree with the quote of the Chase representative They have to take your new card their whole business is based on credit card payments! So one of my options was to mail in a check. I did so and of course there s no trace of the payment. As if the check got lost in the mail. Meanwhile I m getting a final notice with 30 administration charge and a threat that if I do not wire them the payment the only option they give me they ll submit my case to A COLLECTION AGENCY!!! My first two negative experiences with this company had to do with what I though was dishonest personnel or a pressure from the management to add extra charges. This time around the abysmal customer service and THEIR BUSINESS MODEL FAILED! Fare at least better if not well SIXT. Meanwhile you resurrected previous bad experiences that I feel compelled to publicly express.
This is by far the worst place to change your oil. First off all the guy with the gray hair and glasses is rude and has no customer service skills. I started going to them because the price was cheap and the service was fast but I recently noticed their prices increasing. So today I got an oil change and asked the guy why so much if last time I paid less and the time before that I paid even less? The kid working replies not even in my conversation your oil filter is premium so it s an extra 5 bucks not knowing that I worked in autoparts through highschool. I knew this not to be true so I called my old boss who still owns the autoparts stores and asked for a price for oil filters he gave me an economy line price of 5.45 and a premium one for 6.50. Right then and there I told him to not lie to me so I made the call in front of him which he also tried interrupting while I was on the phone. So I realized these guys are not experienced and lacked knowledge. I recommend people to do their research about these oil change places it will save you money. Overall this place sucks. Erin Mills Parkway location.
I ordered from this place because someone recommended it. I figured I should just play it safe and order tikka masala meat samosas and naan. Made my order online at around 8pm after a 12hr work shift. Got to the place it was empty and the employees barely said two words to me. Swiped my card and gave me the food. Get home to realize that there were no samosas. Instead they gave me something that looked like chicken samosa filling but wrapped in a naan. The tikka masala was spicy but not flavorful and the naan tasted like it was a day old. I m not a picky eater but this was mediocre. My godmother had an Indian restaurant so maybe I was spoiled but this is by far the worst Indian food I ve had. Gave them two stars for having the food ready when I got there
I came in for happy hour to satisfy a margarita craving! I got the s and l margarita on the rocks which their house margarita. It looked beautiful and was served in a nice glass with a cool green salted rim. However it tasted like it came from a premade mix and was too sweet. I would expect a fresh and balanced margarita for this type of restaurant upscale Mexican and price point. I then switched to the red sangria which was decent. For food I order the mini chimis which were 2 off for happy hour. The chimis has an external texture more similar to an egg roll. The inside was overly moist and did not have the typical chimichanga filling and taste. It was served on top of bed of lettuce which had some pieces that looked not so fresh. It s rare for me to not leave a clean plate but I could only eat about half of them before I gave up. I ultimately gave this place 2 stars because the chips and salsa were great! The service was also good but I would not come back.
This may be backlash due to all the hype I have heard about this place but it was not particularly amazing. I got a loaf of white bread and Challah bread. Both were slightly dry and stale maybe I was unlucky . I also got some baked treats which were good but nothing stood out. I would walk an extra couple of blocks to go to Sweet Lorraine s for treats. As far as service one person was really friendly and one was slightly edgy and impatient so they canceled each other out. Net score 0. Bottom line is that there is nothing drawing me into this place. I would be just as satisfied going to Teeter for bakery bread. Although it is open 24 7 so if I needed some late night hard rolls this may be the place to go.
Sadly I m so disappointed. I ordered the beef fajitas the meat was so chewy and impossible to cut through. The vegetables were not cooked enough and did not give the dish enough flavor. They were out of rice because it was not cooked right. Seems like a common theme. Everything seemed to lack flavor. The atmosphere is cute and comfy. The service was super friendly helpful and fast. My margarita was delicious though!
Just noticed this place on the way to the only Taco Bell in my area inside Bridlewood Mall. Decided to try this out instead of tacos for an afternoon snack just to be different. Considering we arrived just around 4 30 pm it was nice of them to let us avail of their lunch specials rather than their all you can eat option. So we decided to go with their chashew ramen since we wanted something simple and cheap like a taco. One good thing about the ramen is that they are generous with the chashew portions and the broth had the slight thickness of a pork bone soup. However that s about the only good things I can say about it. The ramen noodles tastes a little eggy and did not really taste right even for an eggy noodle. The seaweeds they used are not nori. They were the rehydrated seaweeds. So it feels out of place. The broth is like water and almost no flavour. After drinking it my tongue started to feel numb so I guess it has some MSG. Finally the egg tastes like the tea egg that you get at Taiwanese shops. But does not match the rest of the ramen. So overall I wo not recommend this place for Ramen. Niwatei which is nearby is much better.
Ordered Thai ice tea with boba tastes watered down. I do not taste the tea it is bland. Terrible will not order this again.
SCAAAAMMMMM!!!!!! Went through a time share presentation to get a deal on tickets for a Vegas show What a BIG Mistake! Why do hotels in Las Vegas allow these people to SCAM their clients? I have to say that I stayed at The Encore Hotel and those uneducated people were not there . I went to several casinos in Las Vegas including Rio here is where those people were . At Rio is where the whole nightmare begins. They lied to me saying You get a deal on these tickets if you go in a tour.They told me the tour was about Las Vegas show how were they done so I could go back to CA and tell my family and friends about all these new shows. Lost 4 hours of my vacation time. I was told it would take 2 hours max. The salesman Nick was being pushy.He wanted me and my husband to sign to buy a timeshare. Are you crazy? After a while trying to convince us Nick called the manager Tyron Kyser and he was rude and pushy too. Both were disgusting uneducated and unprofessional people. The salesman even told my husband just because she does not want to sign for this great deal you wo not do it? . Are you serious? Also the manager threated us saying that he was not giving us any tickets because we were not cooperating so I said That s fine give me my money back . You can tell right away that they are unprofessional.Every single person who was in this Grandview tour was extremely angry. These people do not care about having good costumer service.They just want you to sign for the timeshare not matter what it takes. They will be pushy rude disrespectful etc. Worst experience ever. I usually do not take the time to write reviews but I feel people should know about this Horrible and unethical people.
This place has always been really good but the last 3 times I ve ordered take out the quality has really gone down hill. They ve forgotten things such as fries. The next time the fries were cold as if they had been sitting out for awhile not even somewhat warm. When we ve gone to eat at the restaurant the service has been terrible I do not know if management has changed or employees but this place has really gone down hill. I would no longer recommend it which is sad because it used to be so good.
This is a Korean hair salon right by Finch Station. It s a very convenient location. So my first impression of this salon when I entered was damn it smells of chemicals . However the staff were nice and welcomed me with a hello. Since I do not speak Korean I came here with the help of a Korean friend. We arrived without an appointment and had to wait a good hour and a half most likely because it was the day before Christmas . It was super crowded with young folk around my age! I maybe only saw one ajumma here and she was getting a perm done. I came here for a colour and cut. It costs 30 for women s cut and 60 for the colour since I have short hair . I believe it costs about 70 80 for colour on longer hair. They do not charge tax so these are final prices. Their colour catalogue has a lot of colours to choose from purples reds blues . My hairstylist did a good job on my colour I wanted chocolate brown and got what I wanted. The cut was also nice got my friend to explain it to the stylist . But I find that the stylist did not talk to me or get to know me as a person which is an important part of going to a salon. Also I felt a little neglected while waiting in waiting area. What I also do not like is that for plain cuts hair wash is not included. My sis came in for just a cut and they did not do any wash. Perhaps they decided to cheat a bit and not give her a hair wash? It s pretty standard to do a hair wash before or after a cut at salons. In my opinion that makes it not so worthwhile to get a cut here. She was not happy with her haircut but the receptionist was nice and told her that if she is still not happy after a week she can come back and they ll cut and style it again free of charge. I m not too sure if I would come back since I have a language barrier and prefer my hairstylist to be able to speak to me.
So I go to this Vet over the weekend to have my dog get his shots I was treated like a piece of crap!!! The lady Brunette hair front desk saw me walk in and did not say one word to me and left me sitting in the lobby for about 15 min or longer and no one said a word! She actually went to the back when I walked into the office and did not come out until someone else walked in! Totally RUDE!! So I sat there with my little puppy waiting to be called or acknowledged with complete silence! Another guy walks in with his 2 dogs and she came right out and started to assist him . I hate to say that people still discriminate in this day and age but sad for my dog because he has nothing to do with anyone s prejudice attitudes! I am of another race and it was just the worst experience feeling that way after just sitting there and no one saying anything at all....I was actually recommended by a neighbor but this place sucks at least your front office staff have issues with race and need to be trained to their jobs no matter who walks in with their pet. After all is not this place for animals? Why treat the owner bad? Be kind to all animals and do not discriminate if you work at a Vet! This is a nasty and disgusting way to treat a new customer regardless of race gender etc! This was the worst Vet I have ever been to in terms of customer service get a grip and learn to live with everyone at least be courteous at work and work with everyone who walks into your establishment animals love everyone regardless of race gender etc you should never work in this industry if you ca not help every animal that comes there regardless if who the owner is what does that have to do with the dog?? Shameful!!!!
THE FOOD GET 1 STAR AND THE SERVICE IS 1STAR I WAS THERE AND GOT THE FISH TACO PLATE....... the food finally came and the plate looks good.i was hungry. i ask the waitress for more lemons. since it only has one slice on the plate. im sure its not a big deal. the waitress was telling that they charge for lemons.. and is it going to be ok with me. i was like really your going to charge for lemons.and she said yes and she was sorry. i have two fish tacos and one small size lemon. i was like WTF. are U really charging for lemons. when you order fish tacos. so I just enjoy my tacos and it was not the best terrible oversalted overgreased. i can make it better at home. At the end we ask for the tab. she came back with a bill that has service fee. for 12 there are only 3 of us. she added the tip for her self like we are not going to see it. So we ask why is there 12 service charge. you only do that if there are like 6 or more on most places.in your table. She came back and was telling us that she handed us the wrong bill. Then handed us the new bill. without the service charge same bill. turns out she was doing that to all her table.she wanted to tip her self and wait for the costumer to tip again. we used to go there two times a week. NOW I WILL NEVER GO BACK AGAIN. AND BY THE WAY THIS IS MY FIRST REVIEW OF A PLACE THAT I HAVE TO TELL PPL ABOUT. DONT GO THERE IF YOU WANT GOOD SERVICE. SHE GOT A big fat O.000 tip
The owner Kristin is a lying cheat do not bother with the dirty racist liar a nasty tattoo parlour atmosphere....u can do better for such a special moment ...trashy
The place is very clean. Staff very nice. I m saddened to say got a gel manicure Monday. Today is Friday and it s actually peeling chipped which i ve never seen on gels. The guy who did it told me it was the chrome polish I picked and he did not want to get it on my skin so he stayed away from edges. I paid 45 for hot stone pedicure and received no more than two minutes of stones and no foot massage. I wish them luck but wo not be back.
Great food and great prices but my time there was cut short due to middle aged woman sobbing crying fighting and being carried out. Sadly wont be returning which sucks since I m new to the area.
This is a Takeout only Sushi place it is of course designed to be a quick grab and go type of sushi place. like Mac Sushi at the malls. Unlike Mac Sushi their sushi combos are affordable and not overly expensive. i can say their normal pries are still better then Mac Sushi s end of day sale. Although the price is better the food quality is pretty much the same. Much like Mac sushi the sushi is not really the most fresh or the best. i ordered 2 boxes of sushi and the first one the Yellow Dragon Roll which consisted of Salmon on top with tempura and avocado. The mix is not an issue however it is the tempura one taste into it and you can tell that the tempura was fried with oil that is severely used. as it has the taste of that old oil on it and the smell of it. my suggestion would be if your not going to change the oil daily to fry the tempura to use for this just avoid using tempura at all and stick to fish. the Mini Salmon Roll it is serviceable for the price the salmon was average and serviceable. The fish is decent and the price is very cheap. Overall the owner is friendly and the prices are very much on the cheaper scale so if you want cheap take out sushi this place is suggested. However overall it is by far not one of the better take out sushi places i ve been to. i highly doubt i will be back for more in this place.
Mean people suck! I do not know if that s a chip on your shoulder or it s something that just came out of your hair. Maybe her hair was pulled back earlier in the day but now it looks a mess even tho it matched what she was wearing. I would think the old man behind the filthy plexiglass hired lil miss nasty with a HEALTH CARD not that he was a kept man! But to permit her to have an attitude as well!?? Clearly those two are doing much more than making pizza. Pass! Ps who does pizza AND subs anyway. When u fail at pizza you re not supposed to add subs next to it. Try harder or give up.
Was excited to try this place. Who does not like bagels. I ordered a pineapple and coconut smoothie 12oz. A bit over priced at 4.79 and it came in a cheap styrofoam cup. The jalapeo bagel was good but the creme cheese was oily and the 1 bagel was almost 4. I m not cheap but i know a bagel and small smoothie should not be almost 10. The majority of us are in a hurry in the morning and the 2 women working there move slower than snails. I do not like to rush anyone but it was beyond slow service. Only reason I m even giving it a 2 star is because it s clean and the atmosphere is relaxing. Wo not be returning for their high prices or slow service.
Add to the list of what makes winco different that they do not take credit cards. Unfortunately they do not make this abundantly clear in the store. Hopefully you ll read this review before you embarrass yourself in the store in front of a line of shoppers like me. Humiliated. 1st visit. Last visit.
I rushed here after work and got here 30 minutes before closing time 5 30p . They had a sorry we re full sign taped to the door and the closed sign up. Not good business! There were 2 people waiting but 3 4 barbers working. They could have easily accepted more customers before closing time. One barber even made eye contact with me through the window and just let me walk away with sheer disappointment on my face!! I ve heard of closing up 5 10 minutes before closing time but 30 minutes?! That s just bad business! I ll go find somewhere else more accommodating. If you say you close at 6pm honor it!
Ordered a pot of breakfast blend tea and a cappuccino mocha single. The tea was alright nothing special. The cappuccino had like 5 actual coffee and the rest was foam. Finished it in 2 sips and paid 3 dollars. Most definitely not worth the price. Also this place does not accept cards which makes the other cafes in the neighborhood much better choices.
Left right after drinks were served. The waiter would not stop arguing with my girlfriend. She asked about pizza on the menu and because he was not a fan of pizza he could not stop saying you can get pizza anytime. He kept interrupting her every time she tried to talk. When she said she did not want something he recommended he was condescending. I also tried being polite when we got up to leave and tip him for his time and to go as far as telling him we just did not like the menu for tonight to be nice. He follows that you with a snide remark. Hopefully management sees this so they can act accordingly.
I would give this place no star but that option is not available. I m celiac and told the server and explained how I could not have gluten as it would make me very sick. This place does not even carry gluten free soya sauce. I travel a fair bit for work and this is the first place that I encounter that does not have any accommodation gluten free soya sauce . There was an error in my order and I was served some gluten with one of the rolls. I only noticed it on the third bite. The server said there was a mistake on the menu. I told her that I had explained to her my situation and she should have known. Consequently I am currently very ill and will likely be for a couple of days. In addition I eat sushi on a regular basis when i travel and this is one of he worst I have had.
Service is very bad food has no taste price is too hi atmosphere is nice I wo not go back again .
Hours are wrong... Went there today on Friday at 10 45 and they were already closed... would have been nice to know instead of driving there and wasting my time
I have come to this store multiple times over that past few years to pick up odds and ends arrows or just practice. And every time it seems to fluctuate on how good their service is. Sometimes it s ok sometimes it mediocre at best. If you are new to archery and want to try it it s a great place to go. If you just want to practice it s a great place. If you want to buy a new bow it s a great place. But that s where it stops. Let me tell you about my experiences I have come in on multiple occasions to have some work performed on my bow and every time has been a absolute disaster. I brought my brand new bow in to have it set up and tuned and the guy who was working on my bow was too young cocky and inexperienced to be working on people s bows. I came in for a basic set up and tune and I barely got set up. The guy acted completely inconvenienced that a customer asked him to perform his job! Not only did he treat me extremely poorly he treated by 1000 bow like it was a chunk of aluminum. He set my draw length too long did not check my cam timing did not set center shot would not help me paper tune and did not even set my limb bolts evenly. When I asked for his proper effort and time he said he was too busy that day and that his work was close enough. He then went as far to say he would not set up my sight like I asked him to because I was not good enough yet. Little did he know I have been shooting for a few years. To be treated like that and denied services I want to pay for is appalling! So I figured hey it was probably the one guy I ca not base my opinion off just one experience. So I have gone back multiple times. And each time was no better than the last. I have gone in for practice multiple times and when I m trying to purchase time the staff might as well just roll their eyes and say I do not want to do this out loud. Cause it s all over their face. I have gone back in for work to be performed on my bow as I do not have a bow press at home but I can check their work the second I get home. And I do! I have brought my bow in three times for the cam timing to be adjusted. Each time it was not done correctly my cams are still not timed! Two of the times the owner of the store did the work! If the owner ca not even bother to get it right I have no faith in the rest of the staff. So after all of my terrible experiences I have spent the money to buy all my own tools to do my own work and watched some YouTube videos to fix what they did and do the work myself after spending my hard earned money in their store. And now my bow is shooting better than it ever did before! It s seems to me that this shop is so busy with new shooters and being such a popular spot to try archery that they have forgotten about their veteran archers and providing quality service than quantity. I have since stopped going to impact except for to shoot in their range and if I need bow work I will either do it myself or take it to the other local pro shop as I am now scarred by my experiences here. I could continue but I m not going to. I have said enough. I hope one day the service quality will improve and I could possibly return to this place and give them another try. Till then I ll just shoot
The place looks great the new owners have invested well and tastefully. Sadly the same cannot be said of the food and service. The menu looks promising but is a mix of heavy sauces drowning out taste or skimping in the basics my Jiffy burger had half a schmear of PB barley enough to be recognizable and drowned out by the cheese. The service tries but has obviously not been trained. Not only did it take an extraordinary time for orders to be taken we ended up having to get our own menus because the hostess took us to our table and left us. The waitress forgot one order probably because she could not hear us over the overly loud music. The food that eventually came out did not match the orders and then they messed up payments. If we go back it will be 6 months from now after they shake more things out hopefully.
This location is awful. I came in at 1030 on a Sunday and waited 45 minutes for a wrap and a smoothie. Poor girl was there by herself!!!! Where were the other employees? There was literally 13 people in there and they left her by herself until 2 people came in at 11 am. My smoothie was delicious and wrap was perfect however the wait time was not . This place is so poorly managed unclean and full of teenagers all the time at odd hours. I remember like a mob of little kids hanging out 11 pm on a weekday blasting music and cussing messing around with the employees!
I saw this as number 1 on yelp when I did my search but I did not see the 3 stars. This restaurant is located center of Mandalay casino. The menu is limited to primarily sushi with 3 selections for dinner of either eel chicken teriyaki or a vegetable curry. The sushi that my friend had did not state California roll ingredients in it yet it came out with a California roll inside and topped with ingredients on top as suggested in menu. There was not a wait time since area was practically empty around 5 30pm. I will not be going back to this place. It lacks imagination to create a unique sushi roll and menu is mostly drinks and sushi.
I have to keep going back to this place because my 8 year old loves the pizza my husband loves the coffee and my daughter loves the gelato but I truly dislike the people who work at this place. This is by far the worst Service you will ever get anywhere and its not even a Vegas strip thing these people are just rude. One side of the cafe does not even like the people working on the other side. When I was there there was an argument about which side was responsible for heating up my brownie! I went back and forth till someone reluctantly did it the brownie was so good Look the pizzas good and affordable the coffee is great and the raspberry gelato is delicious but these people need to be retrained in the art of being human.
. Have been going to Miracle Mile for more than 30 years. Use to visit the one at Christown in Phoenix and never left unsatisfied. Today my mother and I happen to be in the area of 20th St and Camelback and decided to stop in and pick up an order to go. First I had to ask the cashier 3 times before I received a courtesy glass of ice water. When we got home the following was missing No applesauce for our potato pancakes no mustard for our sandwiches or extra au jus we requested no salt and pepper no utensils and no napkins. The sandwiches were good pastrami on rye and brisket on onion roll . We were happy to pay for any extra costs for our requests and did. Unfortunately they were not included with our 28 order. What has happened to the great service that went along with the great food? Do not know if I will return Regards M.E. Schiraldi
Maybe the pepperoni has the same mind altering properties as magic mushrooms because there is no way the other reviewers are reviewing this pizzeria. The women behind the counter and the guy making the pizza were both very friendly and welcoming. I picked up a menu pamphlet while waiting for my pizza to come out and it reminded me of the Verrazano s Pizza menu in its style and a good portion of its offerings. So far I was impressed with Sunset Pizzeria. A few minutes pass and my pizza comes out and was piping hot. It looked amazing. The cheese pizza here could pass for extra cheese at most other pizzerias. The first slice tasted pretty good. I m not sure if it was my near starvation that made it taste good or that fact that it was molten lava hot so my taste buds were scorched from my mouth. The second slice I started to come to my senses and my taste buds regenerated. I could tell there was something I was not a fan of. Third time is the charm right? Nope After the third slice I was convinced the quality was sub par and my hungry belly tapped out. Normally I can easily eat 4 5 slices in my hunger state but Sunset Pizzeria your flavors or lack there of just did not do it for me. It s not that its bad but its not at all good either. I could easily give the service 4 stars and bump it up to a 3 star review but doing so would be a disservice to fellow Yelpers. I find Sunset Pizzeria a place you could easily skip and your taste buds will thank me for it. If you must try it its near the bank across from Sunset Park directly across the lot from Egg and I. The map on Yelp is deceiving.
Fix the parking and traffic. Taking 4 hours to leave a parking lot is ridiculous even if it is Boxing Day.
Nothing like going through the drive thru as the only person and still having them mess the order up. I ordered 2 egg white delights and instead was surprised after getting to my destination with 2 plain old egg mcmuffins. To complete my order of dissatisfaction I paid over 6 for these sloppily made jems. This will complete my ordering at this dive. Oh and the one star is simply because I cannot give a zero star rating.
Did not enjoy the food. Idli was rock solid. And the chutney and sambar was equally bad too. Wo not be back. Would not recommend
Is there an email address I can complain to about my experience somewhere? For being the priciest place we ate at during my trip to LV this was definitely the most disappointing. Service was incredibly aloof. The food was sub par. For 2 we ordered a few drinks the Caesar salad and the Chateaubriand both to share. The Caesar salad was delicious but how can you really go wrong with that? The main course was the absolute worst. Three pieces of meat per person and it was barely lukewarm. I saw our server heat it up for maybe 3 seconds and then take it off the grill. Although the meat was flavorful the fact that it was almost COLD ruined the whole meal. Not only that I asked our server to take a picture of us since it was my bday and he handed over my camera to another server as if he was too good to take a damn picture! At the end we had a couple cups of coffee and was given their birthday raspberry sorbet which was not even edible. Overall NOT recommended.
Our company bought a car here three months ago. This dealership collected the money for out of state registration and never followed through with it. This car was bought as a work vehicle for installers but without the registration we re am unable to drive it. Instead of being able to drive it it is currently sitting in our shop parking lot being paid for and unable to use! Upon calling we were disconnected. We have managed to get through a few times but have been transferred to almost nine different people. These people have tried to shift the blame to pretty much everyone else imaginable. AWFUL SERVICE. DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME
Not really worth the hype. The ice cream is okay but not very creamy. It also melted very quickly dispite the cold weather.
This has got to be the weirdest waitressing experience I have ever had. This was the Friday lunch with the colleagues. We get to the main entrance and ask if there is room on the terrace. Response No. You have to go all around to McGill College and ask yourself. We get to terrace and ask the waitress if there is room on the terrace. Response No. We then ask her if there is room in the main restaurant. Response No. You have to ask yourself. What kind of restaurant does not have a communication system of some sort where waiters can ask each other whether they have tables left?! Moving on. We get a table inside. We managed to order our food very quickly. I asked for no tomatoes on my burger and yet I got them. My colleague asked for no onions on her sandwich and yet she got them. We asked a busboy to give us some forks and knives. He said Ask your waiter. In the end we got them OURSELVES and I noticed how it made our waiter a little nervous. The food My burger was a little dry. I make better burgers than this one and yet I am not a fantastic cook. I think my colleagues liked their pizzas. It was definitely overpriced. I m not a beer person but the people who had a beer said they were average. Conclusion Will not go back unless someone asks me too because there is a hockey game on or something. Actually I would probably try to convince them to go elsewhere. P. S. When you leave the restaurant there is a little station where you can press a button to show your dis satisfaction. Needless to say we all pressed the red button very enthusiastically.
I would give it less if I could. You would think that at a high end place you get good customer service no that s not the case. I went there and the people working at the bakery were too busy talking. Upon being checked out I was not even greeted or a please or thank you said to me during the transaction. While we were looking at the meat section the person there did not bother asking if we wanted something. Sent an email to their customer service and they do not even care enough to get back to you. If you want to waste money for the same quality just go to loblaws. At least you ll have money to spare if you go there instead. Avoid this pretencious place and the young staff.
For starters the 3 young women at the check in desk looked like they did not have a clue what was going on. They just stared at their computer screens. My wife had made a reservation many weeks in advance of our visit and requested a window table. We arrived about 15 minutes early so we went to the bar for a drink. Another unknown couple joined our table. The cocktail waitress handed us an iPod showing the drink menu. So far OK. I ordered a Stoli on the rocks that was listed at 14. They brought the drinks and we waited. She said we could start a tab and take our bar bill to the table. Then the cocktail waitress came over and said one of our tables was ready but she did not know who. So I went up to the front desk and asked and they said I had to settle up with the bar before we could be seated. So I did. They charged me 19 instead of 14. When I asked why they said it was because the listed prices were for a martini not an on the rocks drink. We were seated at a table nowhere near the windows. We ordered the bacon wrapped dates a caprisi salad and the lobster ravioli to start. The waiter brought the dates in good time. I thought they were just OK and after the second one the taste was so sickly sweet I could not eat more. Then we waited and waited and waited. At least 45 minutes passed when our waiter came up and apologized saying the kitchen was overwhelmed with an influx of 200 guests. I thought this was a poor excuse. It was a Saturday night they knew how many reservations they had and should accomodate accordingly. We were about ready to walk out almost an hour later when the food arrived. The caprisi salad was bad. The tomotoes were tough and the dish had little flavor. I took 1 2 bite of the ravioli and put my fork down. This stuff was tough as leather had no flavor and was lukewarm at best. My assumption was our food sat in the kitchen for some time before being delivered. But even then the pasta was not cooked well. So we complained and the assistant manager came to our table. She apologized up and down offered spaghetti cookies etc. At that point I just wanted to get out of there. The damage was done. She was generous enough to not make us pay for the bill. When we asked why we could not get a window table after specifically requesting it on the reservation WEEKS in advance she said that only if guests can guarantee they will spend 100 per person they do not give you a window table. REALLY? And of course none of this was mentioned when booking. On top of this it was my birthday they knew of this thanks to my wife s reservation and this is what we got. We wo not return. Maybe go there for a drink then eat somewhere else. We had a more enjoyable experience at Fuddrucker s. I m sure Giada would not want her name associated with anything we experienced there. I can cook better at home.
Went there for the first time and I was not impressed. salsas not good one way to spicy the other one too watery. Tacos did not have guacamole like they said. They said to wait for the guacamole but it never arrived. Personally I think a good taco must have a delicious salsa. The 2 stars are for the homemade tortillas. It s really not hard to make good salsa.
Not sure why everyone loves this place? Got barbacoa chicken tinga and carne asada tacos. All were not fresh tasting. Meat over done. Carne asada had no sauce or toppings on it. I asked for empanadas or tamales. They did not have stock. At 6 pm in the middle of dinner service there should not be a shortage of food. All in all for the price and the quality not worth it.
No stars. Just spreading the word that the basic steps of service is non existent here. The food is tasteless except if you are getting a samdwich or pizza I have only heard good things from people I dined with about the pizza and sandwiches I have gone twice and after my lost experience I will never go again. Cause truely there is nothing bringing me back which is disappointing considering I live in the area. Also the response I got in email form from the manager was really not what I expected after the long extensive email I gave I work as a restaurant and if someone ever emailed the owner like that they would do a lot more then just hoping for me to come back. So yeah just spreading the word do not bother wasting your time here unless you enjoy tasteless food with crap service! Only receiving a star because you have to in order to post a review p
On March 7 my husband and I arrived at Red Robin around 6 15pm understanding there would be a wait as it is a Saturday night. Upon arriving a host was holding the door for other patrons and just as we approached he walked in and did not hold the door for us as well. We got inside and put our name on the list and were given the estimated wait time of 30 35 minutes. After waiting for about half an hour a party of four sat themselves at a table on the patio. We waited an additional 10 minutes before giving up. In that 10 minutes the party of four that seated themselves had received menus drinks and fries. After this experience we do not plan on going to this location again.
A group of coworkers and I chose this location for our monthly dinner hoping to enjoy the upstairs patio overlooking the lake. From the beginning we were let down. The hostess told us that they were not opening the patio that evening and we would have to dine on the main level. We ordered an appetizer which came out in a timely manner. We then placed our dinner order around 6 30. To make a LONG story much shorter we left at 8 30 with half of our group the other half gave up on getting our food and 3 of nine meals which we realized were not even what anyone at our table ordered. In the meantime between ordering and leaving the waitress and the manager made us to believe multiple times that our food ticket was due next. Coming right up is a relative term for the staff there. The manager kept saying there was no excuse and that she had called her GM with no solution to the problem. Ultimately the manager did comp our meals and provided 25 gift cards at our request although most of us vowed to never return. There were some staff who were very gracious and understanding of our complaints but others who made blatantly rude remarks as though all of the issues of the evening were the guests fault. With dining experiences like this I do not anticipate Margaritaville will become a Cleveland staple anytime soon.
Although most of the staff is nice and helpful the Hotel Mgmt here is terrible. The check in Kiosks are confusing while some of the people helping do not make it much easier if there is any complications. Like checking in early or if the room is under your spouse s name forget it you do not exist. Then there is the business center with nobody in it. It s a FedEx supposed office where the print machine does not work. After complaining to someone I finally found to help the best advice was walk 15 min to the Aria and get lost because everyone s directions to their biz center was very confusing. It actually took me almost a half hour and stressful. I could go on but it s a disfunctional Hotel. Not planning to come back.
I came in there at about 3 55 pm and asked for a notary. The teller than told me it s busy and will take an hour since only person is there. Okay fine no worries. Sat there for about 45 mins left went across the road to get a drink come back now it s already been an hour and 25 minutes waiting. Chris is with the same person sitting there talking about sports and random conversation with this guy laughing and messing around. I got his attention and said hey there I ve been waiting here for a while can you please help me and you can back to your conversation he laughs and makes me feel worthless and says have a seat I ll get with you when I get with you . Extremely rude and unprofessional. I was in the process of selling my car and just needed a notary. I have multiple accounts there including my mortgage and since I sold my car was going to talk about an auto loan. No way in hell that is going to happen with the service I received and I am debating and talking my business elsewhere! Super unprofessional and rude people at that branch from what I have experienced. Anyway I ended up leaving and going somewhere else since it was almost 6 and everything closes.
Ate here today with my elderly mom and sister. While the food was good the service was atrocious. The waitress was very rude we sat ourselves got our own menus. My very elderly mom who is less than 100lbs wanted the kids ham and cheese as that is all she can eat and has been looking for it. The waitress at first refused that s he kids menu then after conferring with the chef who also refused then said well only if we charge them double. Seriously? It s the same effort ingredients etc but it magically becomes more expensive for an old lady? I m wondering if this is even legal or age discrimination. Then she asked for a tomato on it and the chef said oh god and rolled his eyes. I ca not even believe this. Will not return or use them for future catering and would not recommend to others.
Well I only noticed this apartment because of my sister she told me about The Crossing at lake mead. From the start of me looking into the apartment everything was wrong and outdated information the website they have available gives a nice a specific explanation of the apartment but once I called in to verify the associates all told me that the website is all wrong from prices to special deals to move in everything and it seemed they had no intention of correcting the misleading internet site. My fiance decided to just give them a chance maybe I was being to eccentric ok. Once we decided to go ahead and make an appointment they did not let us see the exact unit available instead they showed us some 2bed room display unit fully furnished. That would of been ok if we were not looking for a one bedroom with a specific floor plan. Then when they assured us we would be able to see the specific unit once it was available we thought all would be well No we did not see the unit until my fiance singed the lease. There was things wrong in the unit and the signs all around the office are wrong to this is ridiculous And I ve only been here a week.
My boyfriend and I decided to give this fast food resto a try after a game of soccer. He ordered a super bacon burger and i ordered the portabello mushroom burger. Kudos to the fast service. We were barely settled in our corner booth when they burgers were delivered. A lot ledt to be desired though for the food taste and quality. The burgers were not juicy and there was very little sauce in on the buns so all you can taste is meat and vegetables. A bit pricey too for a 1 3 pound burger. We then decided to order one more time. I was next to be served when i realized that i was at the wrong end of the line up. The sign did clearly say where to line up but the cashier still took the lady who was behind me and stayed in the wrong. I got served next which wasnt a big deal but its very confusing to people. The highlight of it all is yet to come. I ordered chicke strips with crisscut fries and a drink. Got charged 12 for it and the first thing my bf says when it got deliversis are those nuggets? . They were pathetic excuses for a chicken strip. More like a chicken cube. Fat Burger charges the same for a combo and they give you your money s worth. It was so disapponting. My bf finished them all in four bites. And the crisscut fries were not very good. They were not hot nor fresh. For the sake of the employees there I hope quality gets better at this location. They had a friendly staff so the 2 stars are for them and their speedy service. At the rate they are going they are going to fail at attracting repeat customers and might end up like the previous establishments they ve replaced. I ve eaten at the sushi restaurant that stood there before and was not impressed either. Maybe it s the location???
The staff is friendly enough but either inexperienced or indifferent to their customers needs. We bought a new Kia Soul from here with all the bells and whistles. Their only goals were to get our money and not care about what happens after that. They pushed the insurance for nicks and scrapes but entirely failed to offer the more useful protection of new car replacement insurance. As well we asked our sales rep to order a spare tire their new cars do not come with spares anymore and a trunk cover. We asked repeatedly for these things. He completely dropped the ball and never followed up. Fast forward to 2 months later. We get into a nasty car accident on the 401. We call the dealership to inquire about our warranties and ask other questions. They were entirely unhelpful and condescending and did not answer our questions about our what happens to our warranties. Our car was pretty badly damaged. It may get written off. We REALLY liked our Kia Soul. But even if our car gets written off we will not return here.
Sitting at the table now got here at 12 15 was seated immediately but NO ONE came to take our drink order until 12 25 at that time we were ready to order so we did so. Ordered pad Thai and curry it is 12 49 and still have not received our order but guest who came in after us order before us and got their order before us 2 separate tables when we asked for it to go at 12 45 we were told are you sure your food is ready? Yet we are still waiting. Wo not be coming back or recommending this place. No one even apologized for the horrible service. The curry here is not good it s very watery unlike any curry I ve had before. Disappointed
I was really excited to try this place out but after my recent visit I was not a huge fan of the food. It was greasy and not very appetizing. Probably wont be back based on that experience.
Dr. Perez 5 STARS He was so informative. He took his time explaining everything to me since it was my first time ever getting glasses. I felt comfortable around him and I normally dislike doctors. He had a great sense of humor as well. He let me know that I could contact him with what ever issues concerns or questions I may have and that was reassuring. The Staff 0 STARS Super unprofessional. I first spoke with Veronica who kept cutting me off after she d ask me a question. She did not seem interested at all when I was telling her why I was at the doctor s after she had asked me what issues I had going on with my eyes. Her tone and the way she carried herself was definitely very standoffish. She was definitely uninterested in providing good customer service and seemed like she just wanted to get her work done and leave. You would think someone who works at a doctor s office would show a little more compassion and understanding. As far as picking my frames out I do not feel like I received any help. The lady with red bangs helped me out but she as well was very standoffish. She stood there with me the whole time yes but as far as suggesting some styles for me she did not give me any feedback at all and on top of that it seemed like it bugged her when I kept asking for prices on the frames. I wish I would ve been more informed on the plastic lenses vs the poly carbonate ones. I would ve paid the extra 45 for the poly carbonate ones would I have known that they protect against UV rays which I need because I m always driving in the daytime but again I felt like I was bugging her with all the questions. It seems like the staff just wants to hurry and get people out the door. I m undecided if I ll continue treatment here or not. At this point I just want my glasses. Definitely not a pleasant first experience with the staff the doctor himself was great.
Never again! Never again will I attempt to order anything from this company. I was literally told on the phone when I called 48 hours in advance to order a birthday cake that we re booked good luck and was hung up on... WOW! I did not even get a chance to ask my question. Thanks Gwyneddh Jones!!! So there it is... never again. I have a choice and choose never to do business with a company that has no professional decorum.
Save your money and frustrations. We did not go in the bar but the server and food in the restaurant are terrible. Seats were sticky too. Wo not be coming back.
Rolls were sloppy and they did not let our friend eat due to the fact he did not want AYCE. Manager was not helpful
We decided to invite some friends for dinner at this location to celebrate my birthday because we have always had good food and good service. We arrived early and were seated right away. The waiter brought the chips and salsa and drinks quickly. After we ordered our food we waited a long period of time. I finally questioned the waiter as to why it was taking so long. There were people that came in after us and already had eaten and left. He said I see it up now . When the food was brought to our table it was room temperature at best. One person sent hers back and all they did was heat it up and send the same plate back out. Two others just sent theirs back as it was awful. The rest of us just ate most of the cold food as we were hungry. The manager came out and apologized and offered to discount our bill. Considering how bad this was we should not have had to pay anything. After we were done the manager never came back out to make sure we were ok. I felt she was very insincere. My wife and I have been very loyal to OTB but with this experience we will not go back.
There food was not even good to begin with now you have to pay more to eat this garbage. Eggs are always old and never fresh I thought I would give this place a second chance but after today I m done with this place.
Had my first cleaning with Molly Maid yesterday. Came home to find one of my decorations broken and whole parts of the house not cleaned windows baseboards and bathroom floor . Left them a message and they did not call me back this morning so I called them again. Told them to NOT cash my check and we would not be using them again. They basically told me that I was a liar because the team did not tell them that they broke my porcelain cross. It fell behind the TV and on top of my son s Lego and now we have to clean up all the pieces. You screw up and I get called a liar. Not the way to win business!
I went here once so that I could have my portfolio bound. I had done my original portfolio by myself so it was looking not so up to snuff. I was pretty excited to have it magically transform into a beautiful piece of art that I could show off to potential employers. Except when I walked in the door I was greeted by less than friendly staff. I did not expect to be given a tiara and a glass of champagne but I think I stood at the counter for 10 minutes before someone helped me. Then the guy who served me kind of gave me the yah? What do you want routine and so I coyly suggested I have some of the pages redone and the cover re bound. I asked if he suggest I do anything else and he said he did not know. He then swiftly took my stuff away and came back 15 minutes later with my semi new portfolio in hand. He rang up what I owed him while answering a phone call. He did not look at me or have the courtesy to call the guy back while he finished serving me. I left feeling deflated that I had not asked for more help or been more assertive but I did not have the energy. Should not these people WANT to help you? WANT to make something look professional and beautiful that you d be proud of and then presumably you d suggest their services to your friends or potential employers? I dunno maybe not all TPH locations are like this but I ll never go back here again.
So we thought we would support a local establishment and indulge in a little stay cation at The Clarendon. A dog friendly establishment well not really. Dogs are tolerated in the room and hallways but be prepared this hotel has no extras or pet accommodations. Notice the pictures are only of the pool it s the best thing going for this hotel and it s marginal at best. If your standards are low enough to clear wet towels and empty plastic cups from other guests then this is the party place for you. The courtesy PC in the lobby was utilized by some guy surfing match . com for hours straight on Saturday AND Sunday. No one from the staff found that creepy enough to make it stop which kind of made me question the cleanliness of the rooms. Roof top for fireworks was the motive to stay here unfortunately the desk attendant did not communicate the restrictions to the property when we booked our room. The roof top bartender has not changed his approach since the last review about his demeanor with guests. A couple had a bottle of wine with them and he treated them as if they were bringing a gun or something. It was uncomfortable to watch and we soon learned it was equally embarrassing to be on the receiving end when he noticed... our wristbands. We received wrist bands at check in from the front desk attendant informing us we had pool and roof access. We were sitting roof top among the bartenders family friends a family with kids and a few other hotel guests and the couple with the wine bottle when we were told we were not allowed on the roof and our wristbands were only for the pool. The front desk attendant informed us the roof had a limited occupancy and they were not able to accommodate us. We watched fireworks on our TV in our room nice eh? Gallo Blanco staff and the kind turn down attendant excluded the hotel staff here was rude and unfriendly. I am baffled by the avoidance of eye contact and cool reserve both front desk attendants displayed. Was it a I m too cool to be working here? Possibly you re not cool enough to be here? Maybe it was I m just miserable being here attitude. Whatever their case may be it was not welcoming. I prefer posting positive reviews about businesses but this hotel failed us on so many levels it is my hope this review will have a positive impact on The Clarendon. We did receive a complimentary pass to enjoy the rooftop another night but there wo not be a next time for us at The Clarendon.
This place is stupid. Family only. Do not take a date. What do you mean you ca not feed 2 people what they want?
DON T GO HERE It simply is not worth it and I am not just talking about the food. The food is meh at best nothing special at all. We tried it for breakfast and we had the ham and cheese omelet and the kids french toast. Was not horrible but was not great either. Why the 1 star? Because they do not validate parking. Which means when your total breakfast tab is less than 20 bucks you are going to pay 12 bucks for parking unless you are lucky enough to get a spot with a meter right in front of the restaurant. Oh and there are no signs that tell you they do not valiate parking you just get to learn it the hard way. Or read this and simply skip this place. Trust me you are not missing anything there are plenty of other great places within a 5 block radius to go to breakfast.
This place was a disappointment unfortunately. While the service was super friendly and helpful the food was surprisingly subpar. We had the chirashi which was excellent and the 85 toshi set which cost far too much considering what we got. The 7 pieces of sashimi were the smallest saddest pieces of sashimi we ve ever seen at an a la carte sushi place and some of the fish in the sashimi and the nigiri sushi were not very fresh looking or tasting. The two appetizers were not good either and absolutely tiny. In the end we paid about 170 for two and we both felt the money could have been better spent elsewhere.
Not impressed. I had not been here in a while but remembered as much better than it was tonight. As I sit here my stomach hurts. We ordered a turkey burger it was dry and had an odd taste combined with the taste of char which was dominating . My husband got a mushroom burger the mushrooms were so weird chopped into nothing clearly from a can and a sick yellow color . My daughters kids burger was all char no flavor. Very disappointing. We left most of our food when the waitress came over she could see by the looks on our face that it was not going over well she never offered anything. Usually when most of the food except one or 2 bites are still on the plate that might trigger some alarm bells.
I am a super big fan but this location has sacrificed volume for quality. The Fry s were cold and greasy no salt at all and no salt in the bag. I have never encountered that. I ate about 10 Fry s and dumped the rest. Both burgers had thick stale bread that overwhemed the beef and fell apart and just was not up to the In and Out standard. Lastly the grilled onions were not grilled enough to take the crunch out of them. None of this I expect from this company. This location has a company store and warehouse on site so I would expect the standard to be at it s Highest level. Still the place was hopping and all those poor unsuspecting soles from Kansas and beyond were happy knowing they finally got to go. Too bad this location did not represent the brand better.
Disappointing experience from the start. I made a reservation for my husband and I plus our baby girl and my mother. Never been here was going to be our first time. We met my husband there and he was beyond upset. The staff at the front we re extremely rude and disrespectful to him not greeting him and staring at him like he was crazy. They gave him attitude when he said our reservations were at 6 15 since they had it for 6 30. Who cares! No need for attitude. The people after him were welcomed with open arms while my husband was treated poorly. I went in to speak with the manager who took no ownership of the disrespect and poor customer service. Instead mentioned how great the food was. Was not apologetic whatsoever instead just made excuses for her and her staff. So much for customer service and the customer always being right. We wo not be back here. Hugely disappointed.
I grew up eating here and man I wish this place was half as good as it used to be 15 years ago!! used to be my favorite I would say taste has gone down hill and custom orders arent as fun as it used to be still cheap and quality double cheesburger under 5 ? not really a thing these days so they win there plus fun place and Secret menu is cool you cant call to complain thou however they will route you to there caliornia office and there customer servise and mission statement as a company is excellent they gave me a card for any burger fries and a shake and a personall letter to bad there crap employees make sure to let you know that is only for things On the Menu funny the Burger they keep messing up is a triple Animal Style oh well... this place used to literally be the best burger stand ....... if u still wanna go make sure to miss this Garbage location theyve screwed me over 5 times 5 times i got free food card too
Dirty run down and harassed repeatedly like by two or three people every time we walked to the room about buying in. Wo not ever be staying here again...
The WORST strip Club in Las Vegas they have these ugly ghetto girls with some OLD ASS man as a floor host and have another OLD ASS host in the VIP room who ever is running this place is a fucking complete MORON !! They need to close this place down !!!!
I purchased a Groupon for this salon so I could give it a try I m looking for a good place on the west side to have my hair done. I was really excited after looking at the website it looked like a really nice place. So I made my appointment and gave it a try. I wear my hair in a chin length bob with little bit of layering in the back a cut that is pretty common and most stylists can do a pretty decent job on the cut. Meshell seemed baffled she did not undercut the bottom the sides were uneven and the layers were really chunky. After struggling with my hair for a week I called and tried to have my hair fixed. I was told Meshell is one of their best stylists that she has never had a complaint and that this salon does not undercut bobs. Huh? Jerrie B seems to be happy with lesser service because she bought her groupon at a discount but I did not purchase the groupon to be treated like a cut rate customer I purchased it so I could give a new salon a chance. I had the cut redone at a reputable salon and once again have my sleek bob that takes 5 minutes to style not the 20 minutes it took to style the mess that Meshell made of my hair. The only bright spot is that the rose studio did refund the unused portion of my groupon.
We are a regular here and every time they make some mistake on our orders because we order around 15 meals at a time... Today they did not make a mistake but had to fight over 1.73 of extra sauce on a 150 order... I can understand if I ordered one meal and asked for free sauce...
I originally found a groupon for 19 night at the riviera so my husband and i reserved a room for monday thru wednesday and then as our party grew bigger we reserved the connecting room from sunday thru tuesday.. So on sunday we waited in line for about an hour. We were exhausted from our 4 hour drive from cali. Service was sooo slow. After we checked in everything was fine but on monday they apparently had a systems failure. The front desk told everyone to come back by 4pm and everything will be fixed. We came back by 4pm and nothing was done. There was actually a very long line of very angry customers at this point. So everyone in my party just had to cram all their belongings into the one room. We went out came back exhausted waited about 40 minutes in line and then finally checked in around 10pm. What a nightmare. The following night my husband and i got back to the room late. Had to be around 2am. He was famished so he called up room service. Room service connected him to the burger joint in the food court. They told him they were closed. So he asked if any of the other restaurant were opened. They forwarded him back to the room service which im assuming is front desk and they connected him again to the same people that just told him no. Except this time they made it sound like someone was opened until they forwarded him to this other restaurant that never picked up. It kept ringing and the same food coourt people picked up. Seriously?? They are all in the same area.. they couldnt just step out from behind their counter to see who was opened or not? Every time he was reconnected with the food court guy he was given hope that something was available. After about 15 minutes of this fiasco my husband just hung up. I looked on that little room service pamphlet thing thats next to the phone and it loooked like it all said they were closed by that hour. I know we should have probably looked at that first but hunger makes you stupid sometimes why couldnt these customer service reps and food court people just have said that to begin with? Then it was time to check out of the rooms. I noticed the checkin checkout kiosk was working so i decided to go with that to beat the long line. It was simple enough but then when it printed out the receipt it came out blank. I had to get back in line just to make sure everything was in order. Ridiculous! Pros decent rooms decent location cheap. Cons incredibly unorganized slow front desk service lack of knowledge regarding room service terrible food in food court One more thing! The things included in the resort fee are completely useless unless youre going to utilize the swimming pool but who wants to pay 15 to play in some chemically filled dirty old pool? Couldnt even use the wifi.. signal wasnt strong enough.. Dont think ill be returning here unless desperate for a room.
Came here on Sunday. I asked if she can cut my daughter s hair like a bob cut. A little shorter in the back and longer in the front. My daughter s hair came out very uneven. Right side is obviously longer. And the back looks like my daughter had cut her own hair!!!!!!!! Lady that cut her hair talked to her like my 7 year old was a teenager. Made jokes and comments that my daughter would not even understand. Very inappropriate. Never coming back here EVER!
Not a big fan. I would much rather Honey Pig or Sura. The meat was not that tasty and I was not a fan of the banchan side dishes as well. The staff was not that friendly or seemingly interested in helping. The restaurant is clean but I m not really looking to return.
I ve stayed at nearly every hotel on the strip and this one ranks pretty low. Rooms are cramped and devoid of any style substance or luxury. Beds are not comfortable. Walking to our room was a nightmare.. the way the hotel is laid out lends to LONG meandering hallways 5 10 min walk to a room is kind of ridiculous and I ve stayed at many other large resorts . Found the quick food options to have LONG lines and bad service. Monte Carlo is similarly priced and I find it to be much better... better pools better service better location etc etc. The only redeeming thing about this place was that it s across from MGM and has a sky bridge. Otherwise I ve found everything else about NYNY to be mediocre at best.
I m not to happy with the customer service it s a big store. I needed a battery for my cell phone. I looked online saw 1 for 14.95 great. So went to go get one could not find them. So asked a salesman where are they.. over there down the next isle 1 2 down so walked down the next isle and finally found them.. but could not find the one I saw online. So ask another salesman. He said well we must be out that s all the batteries we have but did not look or help. So I found a 29.95 battery.. bought it and it works great.. but when I was going to the front to check out I told a manager he said where on Google did you look I told him he said let him see where you found the 14.95 one.. I said my phone is dead that s why I m getting a battery he looked on Google did not see what I found said no that s at Walmart . I bought the 29.95 one went out put it in my phone went back in the store told the manager why did not you ask for help I did nobody helped me He said where was you at that nobody helped you I looked at him and shook my head and left. Well I ai not going back there again.
Do not ever go to this place to get your driver license instructor was very unprofessional and try everything to make you fail road test very disappointed with service.
Worst customer service imaginable. I wo not even go into the numbers but after saying they could close the refinance in about 30 days it s been over 3 months and still no close. Latest issue is the funding Institute for the cash out amount says the paperwork from Nations Choice is out of date because it was not submitted in a timely manner...again...this is the third time we have had to have paperwork RE submitted because it was not received in a timely manner. When we began this process both of us have FICA scores of over 800. We have less than a 5 credit card useage and our debt to income ratio is superb. Every request from them was completed and returned immediately and yet the paperwork still gets held up because of being out of date . This company should be sanctioned by the BBB as they are really a joke to work with.
I was really excited about the concept of this place because as a night nurse it s really difficult to eat healthy and maintain my weight. So I purchased about a weeks worth of meals and decided to give it a try. Unfortunately the food lacks flavor and two of the dishes gave me food poisoning sad to say I wo not be returning. I really wish I could find a place that makes healthy meals that taste good.
This place was my first ever sushi. Since then sushi is my main stay at least once a week. I love sushi! I do NOT however love Daily Sushi. The restaurant itself is nothing special and service is less than stellar. I am pretty sure my tempura was cooked in the same oil that fried my very first tempura years ago. Yuck. It s pretty rare I do not finish my bento. Daily Sushi thanks for introducing me to the world of sushi years ago and today thank you for reminding me what good sushi SHOULD taste like.
We checked in at 515 and we re told 35 minute wait on a Sunday. We were seated an hour later. We stopped a waitress 20 minutes later and she said she would find our server. Twenty minutes later....We left. Menu looked good. Place was not even busy
Not sure if this has changed hands but the gyro I got had minimal meet at best. Big dissatisfaction. Wo not be back
I have always ordered from KFC but decided to try Popeye s now that they are in Goodyear. I ca not give more than 2 stars. The mild chicken is tasty but my god how small the pieces are compared to KFC. I pictured tiny little chickens running around the farm. The sides were also totally ridiculous. They could not fill a shot glass they are so tiny compared to KFC s side dishes. I paid for 3 cinnamon apple pies and they were not in the bag when I got home. I m not driving back 8 miles to get them. You only get once chance to make a first impression and I m far from impressed. Going back to KFC. Popeye s is dead to me.
Service is under average no smile at all from any of the waitress. Food is just so so. There are a lot of other restaurants nearby on Yonge st. You do not have to choose this one. However they do have very good tea and non alcohol drinks.
Terrible customer service. Just got yelled at by who I believe to be the owner for trying to use a restaurant.com certificate for just me. I was still going to spend the full amount just take home the leftovers. Way to discriminate against single people ... Will NEVER go back!!!
This place is crazy that let me gamble my money then would not let me buy a tobacco product I m 48 years old did not have my license with me had other photo I D with birthday and picture crazy You have to be 21 to gamble did not card me for that while shoving my money in the machine
AVOID. The apparent message here is if you re not Portuguese you ll be served last or not served at all. I stood in line for almost ten mins as other customers were in queue. So far so good. Finally it s my turn I thought. Then the cashier looked right through me like I I had my invisibility shield on and served the Portuguese lady behind me even kindly talking to her in her native language. There s plenty of other neighbourhood bakeries.
Wow! I have to say I was horribly disappointed in this place. We went in at 11am on a Friday. They said there was 5 people in front of us. I went in because of a pretty decent car accident and wanted to make sure that there were not any underlying problems. When we walked in the receptionist was very rude and stated that because I was in a car accident they could not do any x rays. Funny when my partner went in after a car accident in October they took x rays. So we waited and waited and 7 people went in before us! Then the receptionist calls me up saying she does not know where to send the billing. So I make the phone call is not this supposed to be her job get the info walk back up. Nope it s the wrong info! So I call back again her job and get the physical mailing address because a fax was not good enough along with the name OR the claim number. But whatever. FINALLY we get called back after another 3 people go in front of us. We go back. The nurse is just this side of rude not to mention made some inappropriate comments. The dr nurse prac whom ever she was basically looked me up and down said it sounds like it s all muscle and went to get me pain meds. I m sorry WHAT??? No checking my eyes reflexes NOTHING!!! I was made to feel like I had walked in there simply to get meds. I did not even bother to fill either scripts. You guys were totally worthless and I will NEVER waste my time there again!! You have no idea how much it took me to get to the drs and to be made to feel like complete shit was NOT what I needed.
First of all for what they do their offices are located in a questionable area. They will tell you that they will come to you but that only happens initially so that you can sign your money over to them. There was nothing to my case another motorist was at fault it s as simple as that and yet they dragged it out for nearly a year. If I did not have my case manager s number on speed dial I am certain I would still be waiting as she and my attorney would still be producing excuses for this and that. Bernstein and Poisson profited off my settlement. They did not pay off all my bills with my settlement and they took more of it than I received. I will never recommend Bernstein and Poisson to anyone.
I agree with Stephanie C. s review. This place is a rip off. I paid 940 for HCG. After thinking about it for a week I changed my mind and was told I could get a refund. However I decided to do vitamin B and fat burner shots plus meds and worry about the difference they owed me later. On my 2nd month Doctor visit I was told that I only have a credit of 139 Seriously 139 credit that s it??? and if I wanted to continue the program and see the doctor it s 250 month and I need to pay the difference. No thank you! I kindly asked for the difference to be returned to my credit card and was told they do not do refunds. Really that s not what you said a month ago. Be warned...there are better weight management places in Las Vegas that wo not try to nickel and dime you. Plus their drink supplement taste disgusting!
Made an appointment for Wednesday between 12 2. It s 4pm and no technician. I called ama and the young lady I spoke to was not only rude but practically yelled at me on the phone. Not only do they fall through on appointments they will try and make you feel you are a liar and to top it off speak to you in such a manner. You are providing me a service. So Thursday technician was supposed to come between the hours of 2 6. It s about 4 45 and I call again. I am told I am next on the list and that the scheduled appointment was 3 7. Funny because I wrote the time down. I grit my teeth and wait. It s about 7 15 no technician shows. Surprise surprise. You would think if you re next on the list that someone would be showing up. No phone call to say running late or ca not make it just do not show. So another phone call is made again. Now I m very upset. I m told Friday between the hours 9 12. Technician comes finally. He was very nice. It sucks for him to work for such a poorly managed company. I d like to say thank you for making me sit around for 3 days waiting and wasting my time while I could have been doing more productive things.
i love good meats and was excited to try this place. i walked in on a sunday for lunch and they were just serving a large table as i placed my single cold sandwich order. after a 20 minute wait i told chef marc that i was in a hurry and he TOSSED the OPENED box containing my sandwich at me. i was very surprised and laughed and asked for a napkin. he said he thought i was in a hurry but if i had time he would give me a napkin. after explaining that i waited 20 minutes for a cold sandwich he grumpily told just handed me a sandwich. i half expect that from a server but an owner that displays that kind of service should not be in business. the lady who placed the large to go order behind me was laughing in shock that he acted that way. he lost a couple of customers today. too bad the sandwich meat was good.
Went here a few times the food was horrible the snowpeas were old. They were chewy and stringy some dishes were cold there was a hair in one dish. The bowls werent clean. The service is horrible the cashier was so rude we ordered to go and we stood near the till and she shouted at us to stand in the front the place wasnt that busy at the time so we got our money back and left never coming back again
While the food here is standard MacDonald s fare the service is horrendous. The location and convenience to Estrella Mountain Ranch residents is probably what keeps the doors from closing. Not once have I been handed the correct items at the drive thru. For example I may order and pay for an ice cream sundae yet every time I get to the pick up window I am being handed a cheeseburger or a Big Mac etc.
Shady. Talked into full detail by Travis. Price started at 120 and got to 99. Told 45 min. 2 hours later nothing finished. Told an hour more. Interesting that the 20 year old in front of me was charged 45 and done in 45 for same service.
I generally do not set my expectations too high when it comes to airport strip bars. Somehow I expected my experience St the Arizona B to be at least passable since they have been there for a very long time. They must be doing something right....right? I sat in their outside patio which was pleasant. I had a great view of the planes landing on runway 24R. I ordered the BBQ Bison Burger which was described in the menu as a leaner choice of meat. What was brought to me nearly made me fall out of my chair. It was nothing less than a store bought frozen hamburger patty with BBQ sauce brushed on it. Most fast food restaurants serve real fresh ground beef. Not only was this not fresh but it was not even bison. Even worse they charged 12. I have never been in a restaurant that did not make it s hamburger patties by hand. To place what they did in front of me was like saying screw you we do not want your business . And I assure you they will never have it again.
I will bring a priest to this facility to wash away the demons that are infesting this place of horror. Enough is enough i feel like we are in the times of Revelations God has had enough with this filth and will have to end the world cause of terror like this. A hospital was made to be friendly and helpful and after reading alot of reviews on Sunrise Hospital its time to shut this place down as it is infecting our community.
I started to write a review for Switch a while back. I loved it at first. I literally thought there could be nothing better. However I have been back a several times since then and the food has never been the same. I have ordered several different items off the menu and they change each time I go back. I throughly suggest NOT ordering the hamburger simply because it they cannot cook it to order and it tastes like freezer burn. The buffalo sandwich continues to be a staple. It is the one thing that is always the same when I order it there. It s good if you are in the neighborhood but there are much better sandwich shops around.
Horrible customer service! If they treated someone who was just trying to verify an employee s work status then GOD only knows how they would treat a possible client or tenant. I would move on the girls in their office reflect their business and obviously they employee people who do not care to be a positive outlook for their company.
Was a weekly loyal customer for years. Im a fan of supporting local small businesses. Most his staff are lovely to deal with and i thought the owner was a charming gentlemen. Once you actually get to know the owners mannerisms how he views his customers and how he treats people you will find it hard to go back . Without going into too much detail I dont think ive ever experienced such offensive behavior in my life. Great product but ill sacrifice and go a bit further to be served at a place that actually appreciates my loyalty.
Ordered takeout from here on countless occasions. Always is great and all. Today I got the amazing chicken with fried rice. Once I got back to my house 20 minutes away my fried rice was horrendously undercooked. It the point where it was mushy and still plain white grains of rice. Now I ve never cooked rice before so the rice could actually have been over cooked. I m not sure. I just know that this rice I spent 10 on was inedible and I threw the rice out. Not too happy about my lunch.
This is a review based on being a customer for 8 years and watching the steady decline of this once fun place to shop. It has become increasingly hostile. The people who come here day after day to specifically resell the items have completely ruined this store. They stalk workers to the point where security has to block people out of areas being restocked they intimidate the average shopper browsing for their own items and create an air of anxiety and panic in an otherwise very cool store. These frantic guerrilla shoppers will demolish areas like a tornado take items from carts or out of your hands and in general wreak havoc on the entire store. Thank them for higher prices and a dwindling selection of good deals. Please be nice to the people that work there they are most likely as frustrated as you and they are working in an impossible retail situation. My tips are Do not go with anything super specific in mind. The only thing you are guaranteed to find in abundance are gowns and cocktail dresses amazing place to shop for a wedding or event Give yourself time to look it s impractical to expect the employees to keep the store organized under the circumstances. There are diamonds in the rough but it has gotten pretty rough as of late. Breathe smile and try to not get sucked into the insanity. It is not a relaxing shopping experience but the deals can be worth it Nordstrom the employees here should have access to free counseling this is undoubtedly a traumatizing work environment
The food was good. My husband loved the wing sauce but they were undercooked. The service at the bar was great BUT when we moved to a table for 12 the service sucked! We had to get our own silverware and napkins then small plates. The waitress was not even friendly and if she stopped at one end of the table for an order we had to flag her down for service at the other end. Should have circled the table.
Worse experience ever staff assisting us was completely wrong about our photos did not seem to know much about the apple cloud which is worrisome since most things today will use a similar platform luckily we had already backed up on computer which I highly suggest since they are at risk of being lost after they tell you they wo not ....!!??? We wasted more than 4 hours on a weekend with a bad experience. Should go someplace else until more training done.
I would not take my vehicle here again if it was the last place on earth! This place is a total rip off. The a c quit working in my truck so I brought it in to have it diagnosed. I made it very clear that I just wanted to know what was wrong with it. I am fairly handy and can fix a lot of things if I know what the problem is. The guy told me 20 bucks for a diagnosis. Great! He said about half an hour so I told him to call me when done and I went to get lunch. He calls me and says that I have a bad low pressure switch the condensor needs replaced and the main hose is leaking. He said that they had the hose off and were in the process of installing the new one and it would be a total of 761 dollars! I told him to put the new hose back on and stop working on it. When I got back he told me that he could probably just recharge the system with refrigerant and it would last me through the summer for 200 dollars! I paid him 20 dollars as agreed and I went and bought a can of refigerant for 20 bucks and recharged it myself. The low pressure switch was fine the condensor was fine but there was a leak in the main hose that I know was not there before I arrived because I examined almost every inch of the hoses for leaks the day before. It looks exactly like someone stuck a knife in it! These people are thieves!!!!
I expected so much more... Grass fed beef is more expensive I get it but when you re going to cook with specialty ingredients you have to learn to do it right. The burgers may as well have been McDonald s value menu burgers for the size and consistency. They cooked the life out of that beautiful meat a sad end for a product that has had so much extra effort put into it before it arrived at this underwhelming burger joint. I m not sure why it takes 20 minutes to cook onion rings they were not worth the wait. It s a costly meal for small portions and poor technique. Offering run of the mill ketchup was disappointing at best. Definitely will not be back I d be surprised if they last long. 2 stars for a few good beers in the selection but overall not worth a visit.
Had two different okonomiyakis...too much egg and too much dough...not enough cabbage and other vegetables. It was too much like a Western pancake. I have tasted authentic okonomiyaki before and this is NOT it. And it s not like it s one of those tasty fusion foods it s just bad okonomiyaki. The sauce tasted better than the actual okonomiyaki... It s pretty big but not very thick. What seemed like a huge okonomiyaki was just a very flattened one that lacked the width. It s not like I found hair or it was too dirty or anything but it just did not taste good. Service was OK.
Coffee tastes like paint. Nice atmosphere but too many minuses for how angry their coffee make me. On my top ten list of reasons why Calgary will never achieve greatness.
I only gave 3 stars because even though the atmosphere was nice and the food was good. Our server seemed to have a problem with the fact that I ordered ribs and when they came I did not realize they put honey mustard and hot peppers all over the ribs. I asked if I could have done without sauce and told her I will still pay for these. Usually the server would say oh no problem let me go put that in and I will be right back. But she had this attitude and then when she brought the check she said she did not charge me and I said thanks you did not have to do that. And then she proceeded to talk to me like a child and remind me that bbq sauce only comes on the chicken and one other dish and not the ribs. Thinking to myself the issue is done why talk down to me again when the issue had been resolved. I will most likely not return sorry but one can spoil the bunch.
This place is just horrible I do not even know where to begin the Customer services is just awful when I walk in nobody say hi so I was like what a good start slow careless kids just messing around a total joke. I do not think that I want to come back to this places I rather drive a little bit and just go to blaze.
Worst car place ever!! Cars were dirty and unsafe. People were rude and cussed at my whole family. Tried taking our money. Never go here!
These are some messsy people !! They charged my card an additional 25 aside from what i originally had to pay. The food was good but after this i will never return and i do not recommend. I was charged an additional 25 with out my knowledge !!! Please stay away
Went here again and the pho was still excellent however the service was terrible. I swear it was everyone s first day. Ingredients the pho I ordered 1. noodles 2. raw beef 3. tendon Pho Saigon attempt 1 1. noodles 2. flank 3. tendon Pho Saigon attempt 2 1. noodles 2. raw beef 3. tripe What the hell? Not only did it take about 15 minutes for everyone s pho to come out with the two errors on my order everyone was done their lunch before I started. I hate to penalize Vietnamese joints for service but they must know that a lunch clientele have time restrictions!
We were very dissatisfied with the food and the service was very slow I had ordered penne with meatballs and the meatballs tasted very funny must have been some kind of mystery meat? I sent them back and they gave me sausage instead which was good!The sauce was very sweet almost sugary.My wife had beef bracciole which was burnt and her sauce was very watery! Our biil came to around 60 and it was not at all worth it I was looking for some good homemade Italian cooking and it wasnt even close!We could have went to several other places for less money for instance Olive Garden and it would have been better!Ill say one thing that was good was their homemade bread Ill give that an A grade! The waitress was friendly and kept apologizing fort he food and slow service We will definitely not be returning there!
BY FAR the worst company I have EVER dealt with. Do not use their service! Trust me I do not have enough room to list all of my complaints. I would rather not have TV and would go to Starbucks to use the internet before I used Centurylink again. They provide horrible service are rude and unhelpful and the employees at least on the phone are the dumbest people I have ever dealt with. One of them even called me a liar and when I asked for her supervisor the call got dropped . Oh and when you finally disconnect the service they try to charge you a huge fee plus your bill. BEWARE it is literally the worst company and service that I have EVER dealt with.
I v been sitting in this drive through for 25 minutes. 10 of that waiting to have them take my order. These people are idiots. Do not waste your time
I ride a motorcycle as my only means of transportation. Which means I carry a backpack if I m running errands. I walk in wearing my backpack and grab a basket. Then I m told I have to leave my backpack at the front. I m not a teenager or some punk trying to shoplift. I m in my mid thirties. I would think the action of me grabbing a basket would show I m a paying customer. I m not going to leave my belongings in the care of a stranger. I say Then you re going to lose a customer because I m not doing that. Then two employees say That s fine. I put the basket back and left. I wear a backpack into other businesses all the time and NEVER had an issue. Including other Dollar Trees. Would they make my wife or any woman leave her purse at the front?
Went with family because it was advertised halal. Poor choice. Ordered almost everything from the menu but everything turned very bad. The Raitha has gone bad and the owner acknowledged too. Very sad to submit such review. Biriyani both chicken and goat were extremely bad dry burnt.
I took my car into their shop knowing that my mercury had a bad coil. I even told them which one it was. When they hooked it up to their machine they told me it was a different coil than what I had told them originally. So I had them do that work plus some other things I needed done and when I picked up my car I still had the same issues as when I dropped it off. I took the mercury back to them and the ran another diagnostic and now their machine was saying that my PCM ECU was bad on the car and it s gonna cost me 1500 to fix it. I decided at this point I have to take it somewhere else so I broke down and took it to the dealership and when they checked it out it was coil number 5 which is the one I originally told the car guys it was Be careful taking your car here!
Tried this place for the first time. Came early before the lunch crowd. after 20 minutes checked on our order and they said they lost our ticket. waited another 10 to fill a simple Poke Bowl order. For the price of the poke bowl could have gotten two at a regular poke joint and would have been better. Way too expensive for the quality quantity and service.
Nice folks but uninformed about pool filters. They sold me a part that takes 2 strong men to reassemble due to the internal spring learned this via YouTube video . Apparently they could have recommended selling me just a new piece altogether for not much more money. ...ordering that piece online today filter will have to wait another day
Very unfriendly group of women. they barely spoke to me the entire time. Manicure was ok pedicure was done quickly and sloppily. This was my second time going and I wo not be going again. I d rather travel a bit further to another salon for a much better experience.
Do not waste your money! The young man that did my nails took over an hour to do a fill and did a horrible job....within 2 days the polish was peeling and chipping off!! When I complained to the owner she said it was not their fault since my previous acrylic fill was done elsewhere. If I could give them 1 2 star I would.
I have come so many times to this location and have been in love with Corner Bakery. This time they screwed up my order big time. I ordered a trio option and the quinoa salad had an ingredient that had gone bad so I threw that out and my second choice was cavatappi pasta salad and they gave me chicken salad instead and I am a vegetarian so threw that out. So all I ate was hummus and pita for 8 bucks. They need to provide training to their order takers. The dude was so confused. I do not think I will go there again.
This is one of those instances where my expectations were simply not met. In some ways I feel that Ouzeri SAW my expectations from across the room averted their gaze and avoided them all night. The food was uneven the dips were all fresh and first rate the bread was of the oven warmed commercial variety seriously in Toronto? the spanikopita was great although I am personally done with it for awhile . Things dropped precipitously at the grilled veggies which were nether grilled nor varied sufficiently . The marinated octopus was an abomination I love my Cephalopods and this stuff just was not right. Funky chewy yucky! Yes I know I should have ordered the grilled squid but after one bite it was too late to fix. Perhaps the place was suffering from a long weekend hangover perhaps it was just the proverbial bad night... whatever it was it will be awhile before I venture in again.
Terrible service. Terrible quality. Went in to get my nails done and came out with super thin nails that broke the next day. I tried going back several times to get them redone and they were extremely difficult to work with. I do not recommend this place and will not be going back again.
We stayed at this hotel for 3 days I will say that the AC works great the bed was comfortable but besides that it was not that great of an experience the pool was cloudy and dirty it look like it had not been cleaned in a while as well as the hot tub it had a lot of leaves in it not only that but the area was terrible one night we walked in and there were what looked to be two prostitutes with two men with them sitting on the hallway floor. The bar next to the hotel plays very loud music and we heard a fight one of the nights. Instead of charging station for cars they need to invest in flat screen TVs. There s too much room in the rooms and with all that space they should invest in microwaves as well as a fridge or maybe even a safe. The hotel housekeeper did not change our sheets she just made our bed. The room was not very clean at all I do not think we will ever stay at this hotel again nor would we ever recommend it. 1 others thing the hotel elevator service certificate was out of date I mentioned it to one of the hotel receptionist and she made up some sorry excuse I thought once we went back to the hotel a new certificate would be put up but it never was. Another thing it seems that the receptionists that work there also live there they were in and out all night in normal clothes going to and from the hotel room I asked the hotel receptionist if their workers live there and she said that some of them do. WEIRD! This place is just ghetto.
When we arrived we were greeted by a harried hostess. It was hot as hell on the first floor. They said they were getting our table ready. After a bit of a wait put table is ready upstairs. As we go up a rickety set of stairs we step into a room where we were relegated into a sad fold out table with three colourful salads on a banana leaf spread amidst a sad interrogation like room. Our table faced the air conditioner. We faced a wall basically as there were only three of us. We had the kamayan feast which is good but not memorable. They definitely pulled back on the flavours to handle the volume of people who clamour for the place. The only great thing would be the milkfish Bangus which was enpointe. Everything g else was meh. The flavours redolent of delicious heart stopping Filipino food was not there. Sorry but at this point I will not go back and I do not recommend this place at all to friends. How sad to introduce them to Filipino foods in this way. And the general area was worn down and not clean. I am just not a fan.
We pull in the parking lot at 7pm. Its spring break week. Line is out the door and half way around the building. The entire crowd is ghetto rats. Gangbangers dressed in blood and crypt colors. Gang tats covering faces. They had ONE person working the cash window. We waited in a line that resembled south central LA crowd for 45 friggin minutes! Ive never been so nervous in my life. The behaviour of these people was unreal. Screaming yelling fighting jumping the gates foul language. What kind of people dress their toddlers like gang bangers? Easy E and his NWA posse would have been scared to walk in this place. And the guys advertising murder with their teardrop tats were the best. They have signs in the door no colors on hats and no colored rags gang problem??? . The signage says 10 entry fee but they now charge 11...so you have to deal with change now. Is that extra 1 really worth the hassel? NEVER AGAIN will I step near this place. Its was taking your children s safety into question. And no offense to any hard working brothers out there who raise their kids right you would not want to be around this human garbage either. I really would have enjoyed an old school 1970s roller rink but the whole area along the Rt 582 Boulder Hwy has changed from middle class to ghetto apartments and weekly rental places.
This place is pretty bad. The only good thing about it is the portion sizes.. that s it. The small sized burrito is pretty big even. Okay now onto the bad. First off they put way too much sauce into the burritos and their tortilla is way too thin or something because the moment I opened my burrito wrapping there was already a gigantic hole in the burrito tortilla and everything was leaking out. I ended up eating the burrito with a spoon. That s how bad it was. Also it does not even taste that good! Avoid the Jarrito drinks as well. More pricey than regular fountain drinks and tastes like a bad version of Crush too.
The Mac and cheese was the only high point of our experience. The bread was dry and crumbly the sauce was bland and the staff outnumbered the guests by a good amount yet we could never get a simple bottle of beer in under 10 minutes. fyi we went back in January so perhaps they ve changed improved on some things. . .
I have extremely mixed feelings about this place. Up until my hair service incident I absolutely loved this place but now will not be returning. All the staff was friendly and helpful but DO NOT go there for their hair services. I have had colored hair since I was 16.. always did it myself always came out nice... but on Dec 24 2016 I decided to finally treat myself and have a professional do it for me. HUGE mistake. Although my hair stylist was really nice and had great customer service but would not recommend for bright hair color. I am completely disappointed. I came in for an ombre blue hair and came out with a patchy green mess. First she did not hear me clearly on the type of cut I wanted. She cut too much my hair was to my butt and now above my breast and was cut straight.. no layers like i wanted. Secondly I was charged for a cut and style but my stylist was running late with her next appointment so she sent me on my way with wet hair. Thirdly I left feeling great until my hair dried. I started to notice how patchy my color was and how much green and brown was left. Lastly when I texted my stylist and sent her pictures she agreed to fix it for me because she is the one that made the mistake but last minute her management was making her charge me to come back in. It was just ridiculous. I contacted ULTA about it and said they would contact me but they never did. This is just a warning to future customers wanting to dye their hair there save your money and time. NOT WORTH IT!!
The customer service was terrible at this store. I felt like they sent out some kind of alert that I might be a shoplifter or something because every time I turned around someone was asking if I needed any help. Normally that would be a good sign but it s all in the delivery of asking I suppose. I had a Tanger Outlet coupon for Guess and they would not take it because one item was on sale and they said it s only for full priced items. I asked for a discount on a handbag because it had a slight indentation on the strap and was told no but I could buy it there and have a brand new one shipped. That was not my point I wanted that handbag but maybe a 10 discount. In checking out I was asked if I had a frequent shopper card which I did not . So I said I wanted one but the worker said it was too late because she already processed my order. Now I need to call customer service when you should have just signed me up to begin with as I gave you two phone numbers obviously I was interested in getting points. They really need to start from scratch on training. I ve never had a store at Tanger not give me some kind of discount but Guess has the distinction of being the first now.
Horrible horrible service! I was in the plumbing area to renovate my entire bathroom and it took me two phone calls to the front desk to get any service. 45 minutes before someone acknowledged us. Then they lied to my contractor that I ordered the wrong bathtub which i had the paperwork to back up my order . I went back today to exchange a faucet not their fault and it took more than 20 minutes mostly because they needed a plumbing person to review my return. I will not step foot into Lowe s ever again.
Worst place ever! Bad food ordered a bagel sandwich yuck! And the customer service was horrible. Apparently the guy was the owner but he was beyond rude. The coffee was expensive and tasted like dirt. Avoid this place as all costs. Just bad all around!
Its been over a year now since I would first come to Pallets and it has only gotten worse. Broken plastic bar stools half of the tap selection they used to have disaster of a liquor selection and a strange new room that is supposedly under construction. Where did the swings go? Check in and you get 15 off... Sure! Show your next Yelp review to your server and get 10 off... This is actually printed on the back of their menu? Seems like bribery to me. We sat at the bar and our bartender Amy leaned against the POS while I yelled our food order over the music instead of coming over to take the order. As if we were inconveniencing her. She then complains to the bar guests about getting stiffed how she apparently works for free and has been there all day. Worded politely We all have those days but that is not how the service industry works. Save it for closing when customers are not around to hear you complain about the place we are trying to spend our money at. Key word trying. My friends and I wanted to get our food finish our drinks and close out ASAP! I get it the sloppy beer liquor selection tacky misspelled menus and broken furniture is not her fault but the extremely awkward and uncomfortable dining drinking experience was. As always I enjoyed the sushi and pup friendly patio. And the polite and accommodating food runner server guy!That makes for 2 stars instead of one.
First visit tonight and probably last. Ordered tacos quesadilla and chips with salsa. All looked like it was from the kids menu. Waited 30 minutes which is fine since they just opened their doors but the drive through was not working and they were still training their staff. Salsa bar would have been great if they had the supplies to take it with you and if it was any good. Guacamole was watery with no flavor. Salsa tasted like straight lemon juice. I had my husband buy a bag of chips on the way home to eat with the bland pico. Filibertos is way better
I gave this place a shot because it is close to my house. Never again worst Chinese takeout I ve ever had. I ordered the Mongolian Beef which barley had any meat in it...it was mostly sauce. It was more like soup and it tasted horrible.
Moved in here last year. The staff is helpful. The way they set up the parking is inconvenient. Quiet neighborhood. Turnaround time for maintenance is good. The only gripe is they shut water off at crucial hours for an extremely long time. That makes it difficult to accomplish certain take such as laundry cooking and showers.
I grew up just the street from Pino s and my family were probably its most regular customers we got take out at least once or twice a week for many many years and always enjoyed the pizza and hot subs. I ve just been back for the first time in 6 years after moving away and was pretty unimpressed... The decor looks nice but the food was wayyyyy overpriced for what it was. 22 dollars for a plate of pasta really? It claimed to be fresh pasta but it was completely tough and chewy not al dente just undercooked and not very large. I m not sure when the restaurant changed but I think it really missed the mark... People WANT a casual friendly affordable neighborhood place that they can bring the kids to. Why take that away?
Do yourself a favor and if you are going to Las Vegas and want to go to the grand canyon call an Enterprise off of the strip and have them pick you up at the hotel and drive yourself there via GPS like I ended up doing. Everything about this company was a nightmare. Like other reviewers stated they did heard us like cattle. We got picked up at 6 10 had been up since 4 30 to be ready . They screwed up the hotels where they were picking other people up at and which resulted in us having to make more stops than necessary and we ended up being the last bus to the terminal to check in. Stood in line to check in for about 40 mins and finally got assigned a bus at maybe 8 8 30am . Welllllll that bus broke down around 10 30am and we were stuck outside the Hoover Dam for almost two hours. I literally had a nervous breakdown. It was the last day of my extremely short vacation being RUINED by this company. I ended up finding an Enterprise in Boulder City and they actually came and picked us up. The car was only 55 including mileage. Sure I paid 100 for gas roundtrip Grand Canyon National Park but it cost me 160 for the bus anyway for two of us so the price was exactly the same. I called the company to say I wanted a refund and they told me I signed a waiver against mechanical failure...REALLY?! The only thing I signed was a list of names that they told me to sign next to my name to say I was checked in. They never said ANYTHING about a waiver nor did I read any material having to do with waiving liability due to mechanical issues. Complete and utter BS! Worst. Company. EVER!
Worst Mediterranean food ever! I would eat Mediterranean food ANYWHERE ELSE but here. My friend and I both ordered a platter each and some hummus everything was dry and not tasty. We left disappointed and angry at how bad the food was.
I made an appointment for a balance facial but called ahead the day of to see if I could come in a little earlier. The receptionist told me I could come in early but forgot to tell the aesthetician so I had to sit and wait for a while. I came in with specific questions about some skin issues but the aesthetician did not really know how to help me so she spent the next hour mixing together greasy concoctions to rub on my face. I was really disappointed with the end result it did not look like any extractions were done and my face was unbearably oily. I definitely do not think the facial was worth 90. Side note you ca not add a tip on to your credit card.
Long long long lines. OK their prices are cheaper but is 3 hours in line worth it. No more Dollar Rentals. Rather pay more and not wait.
Ahh Bailey s. What was once a solid neighborhood bar for my friends and I to have a few beers shoot some pool and socialize has turned into something far different. The drinks have not changed much the pool tables are still plentiful and the servers are still friendly for the most part . So you re probably wondering why the sudden change of heart about this place. Well Bailey s recently underwent a change of management due to the former one getting transferred. Things sure went downhill after that! They are simply trying WAY too hard to lure in customers now. DJs bands unnecessary events most of which nobody cares about are a regular occurrence here. This would not be too big of an issue but you have to pay a cover for these! And that is just annoying. Bailey s you just need to keep it simple! Stick with alcohol and pool ditch the new frills and I ll be back then.
Disappointed that this establishment does not have a public restroom or hand washing facilities. When asked the cashier suggested I drive to a Walmart. It is set up as a take out window with picnic tables so the place is exposed to all of the outdoor elements. They did not have any BBQ sauce set out when we arrived so be sure to ask for some. The food was above average. The quality of the meat was excellent.
Waited more than 15minutes just to get a smoothie and mcflurry.....they take for ever and wen we went to complain the manager did not care...
I m a general contractor doing a total renovation on my personal residence and needed the A C line set re routed from the attic to the exterior condenser. My house was built with a 45 degree wall that made a void space in the corner of the kitchen. The original installers ran the line set in this void space instead of running from the attic through the double top plates and down the exterior wall to the condenser. The walls are open for them to work. When I called to make an appointment I was handed off to three different people before I finally get an appointment for an install tech to come out to my place the next morning sometime between 08 00 and 12 00. I shuffle my schedule around for that morning and waited... At 12 03 Rebecca calls and leaves a message. I call back and get the 3 person hand off again finally talking to the install tech . He tells me that the whole copper line set run needs to be replaced at a cost of 1 600.00. First off they made me wait around four hours this morning for them only to be a No Show . Second they gave me a B.S. quote. The whole line set does not need replacing. Evacuation lines cut reroute lines through top plates sweat the connections add refrigerant. Thirdly if they gave me a quote over the phone AFTER their scheduled appointment why could t they have done that when I called yesterday and avoided the 4 hours I wasted waiting for them when I should have been elsewhere. No Melvins? Really? More like No Shows.
I called to place a to go order for 1 and was told they are too busy and would not accept a to go order. I m guessing their food is good but I believe it shows a lack of work ethic to turn away a customer during normal business hours. I prefer to support local restaurants but I ended going to Smokey Bones. The food was delicious and they had no problem taking my to go order.
I went for my initial visit and it was extremely expensive. In my opinion my first visit was so high in price I ca not see how anyone could afford it. If you go though your insurance company like I did he filed a lien against me for payment. The guy even called me at home at 9 00pm at night wanting money. He did not know his secretary had my insurance info.
CR BUNS what can i get you dudes US we will take the house salad to start and French Dip Cheese steak and a kids pizza for dinner CR BUNS no prob US is everything ok we been here 45 minutes and only got a grilled cheese we didnt order!! CR BUNS oooo i am sorry about that the french dip and cheese steak are on the 86 list !!!!! would you like something different ??? US what about the salad and pizza we ordered will that be ready soon ??? CR BUNS The cook was not happy with the greens and we only have Slices of pizza now left . US So basically you dont have any of what we ordered and did not tell us you have none of our food for 45 minutes lol Frustrated Laugh Ill just take a beer CR BUNS Here you go your amstel its kinda of warm would you like some ice ?? MMMEEEE LOL ABSOLUTLY THIS IS SIMPLY AMAZING lol YOU GUYS CANT EVEN MESS UP RIGHT LOL ill take my check please CR BUNS Here is your check CHECK Cheese steak Pizza Salad French Dip Amstel Light 3 Sodas Grilled Cheese HAVE A GREAT DAY!!!! Smily face Picture I paid the bill laughed my ass off high five my wife and said now thats how you get rapped lol tipped 50 too This place should be a brothel cause there good at making you pay to get screwed !!!! best part is ill be back and i hope it is changed and way better !!!! there is no way this happens at a place all the time
Horrible Experience! Waiter lacked manners and was more interested in getting a date with the table next door then he was to making sure other tables were taken care of. Went there Monday evening for my boyfriends birthday. Been there before but never had this bad of service. Issue with the food but that was not the issue...while trying to share with the waiter what the problem was..he walked away...and manager when she showed up...did not listen either...guess they re too busy to want repeat business....wo not be giving them my monies in the future...issues happen but how they are dealt with is what matters. Very disappointed with the waiter and manager s attention. The only person that seemed to care was the kitchen manager and it was not her fault. Guess this chain thinks that people skills are not important Update the manager finally called me 3 days later...we spoke briefly during that conversation he was going to check into whether the server noted about the allergies... week later and I m still waiting for that phone call back from the manager... He was so quick to defend the lousy service and issue with the meal that he has not contacted me back.... kept apologizing but did NOTHING TO MAKE IT RIGHT!
Went for dinner on a Friday night really crowded and quite loud making it hard to have a conversation. Everyone raves about the burgers but not me...asked for medium got well done!! Waitress said she d redo but did not feel like waiting again when it already had taken quite some time. Sweet potato fries nothing special either. My wife had the fish tacos which were very good. Finally did not look at the bill closely and when we got home realized we were overcharged on our drinks...so how impressed was I ...not too much.
This place is generally ok but I m severely peeved after placing takeout order and getting all the way home to discover NO GINGER OR WASABI?! WTF guys do you make people ask for these staples? Next time I ll go elsewhere.
I had a cleaning and a check up for a new crown. The cleaning took 5 minutes and a quick look said the crown would cost 1250 dollars. The cleaning cost 179 dollars. My dentist in south dakota is charging 750 dollars. They upgraded the office and added staff so I can see why they need the extra money. They are just not going to get it from me.
I wanted to try this place 3 days after they opened. It took 20 minutes to get a beer because the girl was on her phone so I left. So I went a second time yesterday giving it another chance my friends were sitting on the patio the server completely ignored me 22 minutes my friend asked the server why it took so long the server had a bad attitude so we all left I would never recommend this place service was horrible I m also a server and bartender so I know what good and bad service is and I also hear the same from others who have come here how horrible the customer service is......
One star for having everything under 5 the second star for having an option to donate a meal to the homeless and third star for decent food. You get what you pay for however. The beet and goat cheese salad is really great. The mushroom Swiss burger is good. The Mac and cheese is bland and colourless. Warehouse Caesar is pretty good and very full of flavour which some may actually find overpowering. I liked it though. I deducted one star however because of the staff and service. The staff are a bunch of pretentious tattooed and pierced cotton candy haired man bun and beard type typical hipsters who are slow and totally think they re better than you. The service here is extremely lacklustre. If I did not feel guilty I would not tip at all. And do not even get me started on the management.
It does not look like the pictutes. I previously lived in a luxurious luxury apartment complex so I will tell you with certainty that this place is nowhere near luxury. This place living at the poverty line. It is old and falling apart and ultimately the maintenance upkeep is falling on the tenants by a use of a CAM common area maintenance fee. Ive asked the office employees about the fees but theyre cluelees. I find that its relatively quiet here however it smells of illegal substance and the police are in the complex a few nights a week. From the people to the grounds keeping this place is outright dirty. My washer broke and flooded my apartment the first month of living here. It took maintenance 6 days to get me a new washer.....but it was not new it was replaced with a 20 year old disgustingly dirty one hair rust dirt and missing buttons . When I complained maintenance came up wiped a few dirt spots on it and left. I was also left with the electricity bill for the 4 days running industrial floor dryers they gave me to dry out my apartment. Im summary youll be certain to encounter problema and you ll be overpaying for low quality living.
Overpriced overcrowded and over hyped. 2.25 for a king sized candy bar?? Me thinks not. I do not understand all the five star reviews.
This may be the worst experience I ve had at Panera Bread. My grilled cheese sandwich was burnt to a crisp. The girl at the front counter was nice but I would not come back. Food was not good. My advice do not get the hot food.
Went to the new Jim and Nicks on Charlotte Highway in Indian land SC Had the brisket was only OK Place very crowed and noisy Staff was OK Found the brisket in City Bar B Q up the road by Publix by Providence Road West was much better
If I can give this place zero stars I would. Do not stay at this hotel it is the worst customer service on the strip the whole entire Las Vegas. They do not accommodate you for your needs when you have special requests they do not give you other options and their favorite answer is no we cannot or no ma am I m sorry but... Nothing but excuses this hotel is outdated it was good 20 years ago and it s definitely not good anymore do not stay here do not play here you will lose all your money if you played here
Come here for all your smoke goods.. NOT YOUR VAPING GOODS!!! First juice I ve ever had that literally gave me a headache waste of money. Obviously they go for the best deal and not the quality juice I do not think anyone actually tries the stuff before they buy it. Just terrible
I wanted to like this place really! I sat at the counter so that I could get a look at all of the restaurant. Boy did I get an eyeful and earful. Besides the very slow service the management of the restaurant is awful. There is a person that stands with their back to the counter that coordinates the food as it comes up. Between his stink eye looks around the restaurant his berating the cooking staff slamming dishes and throwing silverware it was hard to enjoy my meal. His actions were very disturbing. They need someone who can manage people not an ogre. We had a nice waitress who apologized for the slow service and the food was ok. I hope this makes it but with Cheese Mo s and Cosmos right there it is not looking too good!
I called this place to get some information about laser hair removal. I was excited about this place since it was so recommended by a friend of mine who went here about 6 months ago. So this girl called April answer the phone. I guess she is the receptionist there. I seriously ca not belive they have someone so rude answering the phone. I was explaining that my friend went there for laser and she just kept rushing me to get to the point and kept cutting me off. It was so uncomfortable talking to her. It makes me think that if they have people like this answering phones how is the staff doing the laser part. I ll just find another place. And hopefully the person in charge of this place talks to their staff about being polite and nice.
WTF no more late night steak and eggs for 4 bucks? got replaced for a TGIF? not cool!
I was recently in Vegas for a convention and day trip excursions with my family. We planned to stay for an entire week but ended up checking out early because we hated it so much. 1 Rooms We were offered upgraded rooms at check in for 50 night extra so we agreed. I would hate to see what the standard rooms looked like. There were two beds and a dresser then all this space near the window but not even a single chair. Really weird. Then there was an odd draft like sound at the door that would only stop if we placed a towel at the base of the door. Very annoying. My husband found an upright safety pin on the floor and I found a long hair on the side of the lamp very disgusting. Did not look like it had been cleaned recently. The alarm clock malfunctioned as well. There were dirty dishes lined up outside of the room across from ours . . . and were still there two days later. I finally notified the front desk about that issue when we requested the early check out and they wanted to charge us for that. Luckily after informing them of all of the issues with the room they did not charge us. 2 Pool The pool was very crowded and rather small for the amount of people. What really pissed me off was the fact that there were dozens of broken lounge chairs just sitting there. You could not raise them to an upright sitting position. Throw them away! The vinyl was peeling. They were really beat up. I would not have something like that at my home and this is supposed to be a resort? What is the high resort fee for? 3 Restaurants This is probably the case with most hotels on the strip but it was so expensive. We went for some late appetizers our first night there. We went to Hexx will be doing a detailed separate review . The food was good but it was 11 for a beer! I could not believe it. Me my husband and son had lunch there the next day lunch for three of us was 100 and service was poor. 4 Poor service We found similar service issues at the other restaurants in Paris Bally corridor. Brassier Burger very rude. We sat at the side table in the bar area and it took 15 minutes for a rude waitress to walk by and say There s no service at these tables. No one else said anything bartender included. Just let us sit there. We left of course. My husband tried to order a special at a pizza shop at Paris. It was 14.99 for two slices and a beer. When he got up to the front of the very long line they told him they did not have any beer so the special was no longer available. Great well then why have the sign out? 5 Elevator issue On our second day we purchased some items from the CVS which is not far from the hotel bottled water snacks and beer so we had a few bags we were carrying. All of the elevators malfunctioned so we had to stand there for quite a while before they began working again. No employees were around. The place seems extremely understaffed. 6 Alternate plan We ended up checking into Ellis Island hotel just around the corner from Paris. So reasonably priced at 50 for an upgraded room on weeknights. I will be writing a separate detailed review about that visit. Much happier though. I would never stay on the strip again if we would even go back which I doubt. It was so incredibly crowded all day and night. You could barely walk along the sidewalk. It was not pleasant. 7 Ambiance It was very smoky and stale throughout Paris. Not just from smoke but some stale bad food odors. It was gross. 8 Finally if you are staying there be prepared for a very long wait at check in.
Hate to go against the grain on this one...but we ordered our meals to go...there were cold upon pick up.. even though waiting for it to be completed ..I ordered the biscuits and gravy...super dry biscuits..and small amount of gravy. Overall I needed to add some salsa simply to add some flavor to the dish overall. I will give this place another chance..simply because most people I know like it.
Anti pasta salad was absolutely terrible and they would not make a right we complain never came out when we asked to see him. Keith the owner manager never came to talk to us.Maybe on the entire salad for two there was a 1 2 piece cheese sliced there was not enough for two people! For 12.95 we mostly got lettuce! What a disappointment !!!
I have been going to this Jackson s for a coulpe years now. Before they had ripped me off but I gave them another shot several months back and they had gotten the job done. Well....this is the last time. Long story short the nice sales guy talked me into getting my leather seats cleaned detailed and looking brand new . I paid the extra 50 and said yes. Well....that did not happen. There was no deep cleaning the leather which admittedly needed a good cleaning looked exactly the same. The guy who finished cleaning my car gave me some BS excuse the package must have been miscommunicated to you ..and then tried to upsell me further. After dropping 150 on wash and gas I got hosed and ended up bringing it home to finish the job. These guys will never see me again. There are way too many other small mom and pop places that ll commit to what they are selling. Stop going to Jackson s.
Dr. Bloomberg is consistently 1 to 2 hours late to all appointments no matter if you scheduled your appointment 1 month in advance... Do not waste your time here.
Seriously the worst dining experience that I ve ever had at an airport...the waitress Maggie was negligent rude and unapologetic after making mistakes. The menu does not state that the nearly alcohol less margaritas are 13 piece. We got a virgin strawberry marg that tasted the same as the ones that supposedly had tequila. I asked the waitress for the virgin marg in a plastic cup with a lid since it was going to be for a child. She stated that they do not have children s cups and that they did not have to go cups with lids. She brought the children s drink in a glass container. Very soon after the virgin marg was spilled. The waitress then replied oh do you want me to get you a plastic to go cup with that? I asked why we did not get one in the first place and she replied that she forgot. She then brought out our really subpar food which none of us got to eat because we were busy cleaning up from her mess. She then brought the bill which was 114! We asked her about it and she replied that she comped our virgin marg. We replied that none of got to touch our meals because of this mistake and she shrugged her shoulders. I do not feel like I am usually very critical of waitstaff I have waited tables before and I know how hectic it can be. But this was far and away some of the worst service I ve received.
Saw Dr. Shannon Chandler for an exam and contact lenses. She acknowledged my need for contacts and agreed to file the claim against my insurance. Actually got the managers approval to do so she said. This was in May. Every two weeks since I have been promised that the contacts are coming now 2 months later the insurance tells me they never filed the paperwork. Apparently they do not make enough doing so. Used to be you could trust doctors. Not these guys though. Go somewhere else.
I arrived at the restaurant at 10 30 am and wanted to order a breakfast panini but was told that the panini press had been turned off so I ordered a BLT. For 6.50 tax I received a small sandwich on stale sourdough bread not toasted with limp bacon and an unripe tasteless tomato. No chips pickles etc. Not a fan of this place
Beware they will change the price when they finish. Very deceitful and unprofessional gondus. Beware of the braider named Agi. Horrible quality of work. What a waste of 100. She lied about the price said 50 and then said 100 at the end! Never again. Others seem to have the same problem as you can see here in the reviews.
I have never in all of my 17 years in Las Vegas been treated with the amount of disrespect and abuse that occurred tonight. Our family will NEVER come back to this restaurant. We normally go to another sushi restaurant and we should have stuck with our regular place.... Here is what occurred... 4 people ordered sushi and 1 person ordered a bento box. The sushi came out and 20 mins later after we were almost completely through with our meal the bento box finally arrived. We mentioned it twice to the server. He was very nice and apologized but said there was nothing he could do because the kitchen was behind. We asked to speak to a manager. We started by complimenting the quality of the food and Dylan our server. But we told her how unsatisfactory it was that the person in our party was sitting with no food for the majority of the meal. Just watching everyone else eat is not fun. She apologized and said that should never have happened and she hoped it would be better next time. She then offered free dessert for the whole party of 5. My grandmother was getting tired and we needed to get her home so we thanked her for that offer but asked instead just to have the bento box taken off the bill. It was as if a switch in her was flipped. She turned into a monster for lack of a better word. The rest of the conversation was nothing short of embarrassing at that point. For her not for us. She loudly told us that she was the owner and she would not adjust the bill. To quote her Did you eat the bento box? Yes he ate it. He was starving by the time it came. Then she said I have chefs to pay and they make more than 10 hr so I ca not be taking food off the bill that you ate. Huh? So you were going to comp dessert for 5 people but you wo not credit 18 for a bento box??? For the OWNER to treat customers in such an abusive manner is ridiculous. We were not a young rowdy group. We were there with our parents and grandmother. We were customers that deserved to be treated with respect. I insisted at that point that she take the money off the bill and she finally did after arguing and mocking me in front of other customers. When she looked at the bill and saw that we had a Groupon she turned around and loudly said You have a Groupon and you re trying to get something for free? That is not the point at all. A Groupon does not mean that we should not get the same quality of service as someone else. And obviously the business is looking for new customers or they would not have offered a Groupon. She then came back and literally threw the bill down on the counter in front of me and told us I hope you never come back here again. No worries there. And just for the record Dylan was fantastic and we tipped him 20 in cash on the entire amount of the bill including the full amount of the Groupon. So the owner cannot say that we were trying to be cheap. We were disgusted to say the least by the owner s behavior.
I am a fairly new patient here but might not be going back after the last few visits. I had tons of serious lab work done and had never received a call back regarding any information about the labs I finally after a month had to schedule to talk to someone about it and then told me over the phone my diagnosis but when k went in for the appointment she said that information is completely wrong and unsure where I came up with that. HORRIBLE communication. This is only 1 incident I ve had here .
Brooklyn Bedding Worst customer service ever. my parents got a bed from them after tuft and needle changed their formula. They were super happy. I was going to buy that as my next bed. They got free pillows and I ordered another online for my sister because we loved those two so much. The new one was half the depth and thickness of the two we had received. After multiple back and forth with customer service because they wanted to send her foam for her to fix a pillow that should have been right in the first place I finally insisted they send her a new pillow. Well the new pillow was the same as the last one and we could not understand how the thickness could change so much. I said OK you can go ahead and send us the extra foam they had offered in the first place but I did not want us to have to fix a pillow that should ve been different. Now they wo not even send the form saying we re spending too much money on you . I had recommended so many people to check them out. Never again.
We wanted a quick bite to eat after our show ended so we stopped in for lunch. There was 1 waitress and she was stressed and trying to do everything. We waited 25 minutes to get drinks and order. It took over an hour to get our food. They ended up.having managers and other staff come in to help. As another poster said they were not prepared for anyone to come in. I ordered the lobster mac and cheese. It was decent but I did not find a single piece of lobster in it. It was more like mac and cheese with lobster bisque poured over it. It was overpriced and limited on options especially for the long wait.
I will say...they did move us in a record amount of time but was not until after they were gone that we realized why. I have moved 5 times in the 15 years I have lived in Henderson....and this is the first moving company that I have ever come close to giving a bad review about. They did more nicks dings chips scraps to my furniture that if I had paid my son and his friends to move us which I should have done in the first place. There are trims missing on pieces that they broke off and of course did not bother to leave so we could repair it. There is a long credenza that my husband build me 28 years ago. It has traveled across the country and through each move without it even as much giving flex. It is all made out of sold 2x4. Weighs a ton. It has custom trim molding on it and they broke a piece off and never left it anywhere for us to at least find later so we could repair it. My 3 piece wall unit is oak. The sides at the tops all on the same side....the finish is scraped as if they slide the pieces. I have a unit with cubicles done in a blonde oak Formica they chipped the and dented the ends. My next door neighbor asked me while I was moving in if I thought they were good and I said yes they do not mess around they move along. Right...HELLO! So she decided to hire them too. She was really unhappy. I felt so bad as I see her often because she renting out the house next door and they are here doing things getting it ready. I feel terrible that she got a bad deal on my recommendation. And I have two small end units that have deep scratches in them and a desk. Like they say folks....you get what you pay for. Cheapest is not always the way to go!! I have already let my realtor and mtg lender know....these guys are a NO NO recommendation!
I ordered cheese enchiladas looked like most of what was on my plate was microwaved. The sides of the enchilada tortilla were hard. I ordered potatoes on the side they were not even seasoned. They did not look appealing either. I had one bite because there was no taste. Ordered guacamole it s not fresh FYI meaning they do not make it by your table. They bring it out already served in a large tortilla chip cup but it has no taste. I added salt and pepper to make it somewhat better.
Tony doesnt know de wae I speet on cold stone Speet Speet Speet Speet Speet Speet Speet Speet Speet
NO STARS! This is the second review I have done here because I did not take my own advise and never come back. This Jack in the Box went from 2 stars to 0. Just do not go here! Drive a mile north and go to the one on Happy Valley.
Sorry to have to do this but York un. Is the worst place you can go for education. I spent 4 years there with no gain no degree and no skills I can apply in the real world. The professors are professional students and the facilities are terrible. There is little to no activities outside of school and it is located on the ass end of Toronto. Every year the degree program changes and there is a large requiement for redundant Gen Ed courses and courses outaide the major area of study and even when you study your subject it does not help you in any real world job situations It is basically like extended high school. I m not sure why degrees are praised as it does not give you anything practical any skills or even industry specific knowledge it costs more and there are no standards of education because the university is self governing. Most of the people there are awkward slackers just like people in high school not the mature successful hopeful go getters advertised on movies and TV. Do not waste time on university go to college which is much more affordable and learn something good for a job or carrier. If you do not like it you can always get more credentials as the are much easier to obtain once you have a diploma. York u you are the epitome of failure.
Very sketchy part of town dated the Front desk was nice when we checked in but the next day when we asked for new towels when our room was cleaned you would have thought we asked for the moon not a great person to represent your motel! Free breakfast is what you get for free I was surprised there was no butter for toast or cream cheese for bagels but there was some sort of spam meat Would not go back.
You know you re in the worst gift shop you ve ever been in when tacky Hoover Dam drinking mugs are sold next to a plaque with Jesus Loves You And Your Mother Does Too. Star Wars light sabers are sold below a shelf of faux sewing thimbles that read This finger has other uses. Really. This is the best our Reclamation and Parks dept can have? I counted less than ten booklets or pamphlets that had anything to do with Hoover Dam but there were half a dozen Indian spirit catchers. WTF? Just a note for others there is a very small gift shop within the visitor s center that sells a few interesting items not for sale anywhere else. It is easily overlooked because that s where you view and order the photo of yourself they took when you entered the visitor s center. Look in the cabinet for poignant gifts.
For some reason my review was deleted? Posting again. Wondering if Yelp deletes bad reviews? Wake up and smell the coffee!!! Dirty understaffed no passion for delivering good service. Staff spends more time talking to each other about their personal plans and the prior night than engaging with customers Welcome Please and Thank you are not part of their vocabulary. Teach your team how to take an order should not have to repeat it three times before it clicks. It s clear management has lost it s focus and passion. At one time Barriques set the tone for Madison coffee shops. All the details that once made Barriques special are no longer retrain refocus clean your store and bring back the service that made going to Barriques a special experience. Management spent some time in your stores observe or work a day in the life of your staff and maybe you will WAKE UP AND SMELL THE COFFEE once again. We miss what made Barriques a special place to visit!!! Visit your competition and up your game the competition has surpassed you. Once voted my best coffee shop in Madison is now my WORST!!! What have you lost Barriques? On average I would spend 6.50 a day at Barriques 5 days a week 1 650.00 in addition to the word of mouth. Resulting in a potential loss of. 25 000. I will stop in in 6 months and update this review. Crossing my fingers. How many other customers like me have you disappointed and never to return? The reason you got one star is because I live in the building so convenience was worth a star and yelp does not allow a zero rating. Now I walk to Collectivo and get my morning fix.
It pains me to write a two star review for a David Chang restaurant. PAINS me. I have said often that the meal I had at the noodle bar in NYC was one of the best meals of my life. To be fair in NYC I had the fried chicken dinner. I have not had it in Toronto and plan to. And I ll update then. We also did not have noodles. So keep that in mind as well. The space is really lovely and we were seated immediately and warmly at 8 45 on a Thursday night. We were offered tap water and our order was taken shortly after. We had the pork buns to start because that is what you do here And shared the chicken wings and pork shoulder kimchi stew. I have to point out that Momofuku Noodle Bar in NYC has several 5 6 dollar beers but in Toronto I believe 8 or 9 was the cheapest. Extra points for having growlers though good on ya. So. Fair point pork buns are bangin . Two orders 4 buns and a beer and I d be set. The hoisin sauce is absolutely delicious and the pork is a flavourful fatty party in your mouth. Highly recommend. The kimchi stew is more of a soup and for me was not great. It had that muddled one note flavour you get with stews and I found it under seasoned. The pork chunks were pulled and plentiful but totally unspecial. But I do not normally enjoy stews. My dining partner does and he loved it. It did have these round coin shaped disks that were a glutinous noodle alternative and those were tasty. The wings were better and the chicken was very juicy and tender. However the skin is only browned on a small portion and the result is a little slimy and the deliciousness a bit spotty from wing to wing. There were seven quite small wings in the order. Overall they were fine but by no means great. The best way I can put it is that it was a decent 60 meal but not as good as some of the other 60 meals I have had lately. It was fine. Nothing made me go Uhhhnnnnh that is SO good. For instance the Bestellen burger is the best burger I have ever had in my life. The pork tenderloin at County General is exquisite. The pot pies they used to serve at the Emmet Ray made me moan. And those are much bigger portions at the same or better price. We got fine dining portions for a meal that was decidedly average. Bottom line go for the Fried Chicken Dinner with five friends. But if my experience was the usual for the rest sadly I d reccomend you skip it.
If there were 0 stars that would be my pick. The WORST ever. They charged me for parts not needed and could not even find the issue. They said and charged me for OEM parts and they were NOT! I told them that I could go get the part which would cost me 5 in gas. They said no worries they will deliver it to us. What they did not tell me id that they charge 100 just for the request for the part plus whatever the part costs. BIG SCAM!! And i have proof of all of this. Ended up taking it to the dealer after paying UN PURE FACT AUTO Hundreds for nothing and the dealer told me that they actually made it worse. They took fuses out and put them back in the wrong place. I ended up paying for extra hours of labor at the dealership because of things they messed up or it would have taken no time to fix. TRUST ME and avoid them!!!
This place has seriously taken a nose dive. I have been here several times years ago and enjoyed it. The gf wanted pasta tonight so I suggested it rather than wait an hour at Oregano s. However this was today s experience When you walk in you are not greeted. You get told Just pick a table. There were plenty to pick from at 5 30 on a Saturday and that should have been our first clue. Then before we were given menus we are asked if we knew what we wanted to drink. Water for now. Two minutes later waited comes back to tell us that they are out of ice so it s going to be a while for the water. Mind you we really wanted some nice Italian wine or beer but the menus had none of these options nor did they have any other beverages. So I asked and was only given four soft drink options. Really? Because the specials board sitting outside the front for clearly lists a wine and a beer on special. Fine. We ll have some Dr Pepper I guess. So we order build your own pasta and a caprese salad for an appetizer. The side salads were average not great served on old school cafeteria plastic plates. Then the waitress did not know the difference between penne and fettuccini as she tried to hand the bowl of penne to the gf saying You had the fettuccini right? Then asked if we needed anything else to which I replied We still have not received our caprese. I should have just kept my mouth shut. When it came out it looked unappealing at best. Low grade tomatoes limp basil leaves iffy pieces not slices of mediocre mozzarella served on store bought crostini. Why is there crostini in the first place? Whatever..at least the pasta would be good right? Uh nope! My creamy alfredo pesto would have been better out of a Ragu jar from the store. The gf s pesto was nothing more than a sprinkle of olive oil and a sprinkle of dried basil leaves. She ate a few bites I was just hungry so I ate a few more. For 35 take your business anywhere else. I wo not be back.
Monte Carlo is renovating. Do not come here until it s done. Jackhammering right above my room. I think it s a ploy to get me in the Casino.
Jennifer the cashier was very rude. Didnt great cutomers as they entered the restaurant. Jennifer the cashier was very rude. Didnt great cutomers as they entered the restaurant.Jennifer the cashier was very rude. Didnt great cutomers as they entered the restaurant. Jennifer the cashier was very rude. Didnt great cutomers as they entered the restaurant. Jennifer the cashier was very rude. Didnt great cutomers as they entered the restaurant.
Poor Service. No return to multiple messages left on their voice mail. Go Elsewhere!!!
The rental company that I leased my house from hired these guys to repair a broken water heater. The woman that does the scheduling called me and set an appointment up with me for 9am. I said that was fine. they seemed professional and courteous. So the morning of the appointment I m getting my kids ready for school and I did not hear my phone ring at 825am they were calling but i did not see the phone call until about 840am. So I called them back several times but no answer. Then I waited and no one showed up. Finally at 10 am the woman answers and I ask her what happened. She informs me that she instructed the plumber to go to the next call since I did not answer the phone. That I am going to have to reschedule for another day. I told her that I had not previously been told if I did not answer that would happen and to please get someone out that day since my hot water had been out for about three months all ready. I did not know they were going to be calling me at 825 am for 9am appointment or they were going to cancel. That is something you should inform your customers of at the time the appointment is made. I told her I tried to return the call several times with no answer. She starts yelling at me telling me that she had an appointment that she could not miss and that she is not sending anyone out today they didnt have time. I told her that I felt that was very unprofessional and asked for a manager she replied very rudely she was the only one there and if I wanted them to schedule me or not! I hung up and called the rental company who finished dealing with them. I would only recommend this company to people who like being treated rudely and unprofessional!
Be aware they charge you a fee for wifi and parking when that is supposed to be free everywhere also in our room the wifi was super crappy until finally they fix it!! Also how a hotel in vegas doesnt have fridge or where keep cool the drinks!! They just offer ice cubes machines i expected more from this hotel no anymore ohhh and the pool was freezing
The girl who works the front had the WORST personality and customer service. She acted as if she totally hated her job. We asked her a simple question about adding to our bowl and she ROLLED HER EYES! So dry and blah! Food was great but the customer service ruined it for us.
I ate there with husband recently and I ca not understand how it got good reviews. I do not even know where to start so I ll simply put up my 1 star. I could not even finish my meal because it was so bad and I ca not remember ever doing that. Having said that my husband had the steak and he enjoyed it.
I ve been to Flo s multiple times and not had a super positive experience. I ordered the spicy thai coconut milk soup assuming it was tom ka and the soup that came out was more like orange colored hot water. No taste no spice either. It looked akin to the plastic heatable containers of tomato soup you can buy at a grocery store. I ve also ordered with brown rice before and was served white rice which was easy to fix but in retrospect another negative mark. I came here with my parents once and ordered hot green tea which came as a small cup and only a small cup and that showed up on the bill as like 2. Then the potstickers are like 5 for 4 of them and they re probably just potstickers purchased from the nearby Trader Joe s market. To be honest the only reason why I even come here now is because someone else is paying.
Laser tag arena is good however extremely expensive and over priced. Every video game is either broken or works very poorly.
I would give less if possible. Complete disregard for medical well being. This is an office staff that only cares about getting your money. Office manager Tim I believe it s his name actually good me that they are absolved of any symptoms I am having from the IUD that Dr Staci McHale placed because I asked for my medical records to be released. Can you believe it??! They NEVER answer the phone. Dr Staci McHale told me that even if she hires more people to answer phones they would be overrun with calls and ca not answer them all so there is no point to hiring more staff. Expect minimal service and no help with your billing issues or any questions you have throughout your obgyn care. Only met the doctor 1 time out of 6 visits. Went for a doctors visit today and she was called out for delivery so no one could talk to me about symptoms while I was physically in the office either. Experienced disregard for my personal issues in terms of birth control and was initially given the Nuva ring which only exasperated the issues i wanted the birth control method to resolve. When given a Nuva Ring first I got a packet of paraphernalia from the drug company probably because the office receives kickbacks from the drug company. Very unhelpful. Very rude when I have issues. The entire staff protects one another at your expense. Avoid at all costs
Here on New Year s Day eating next to a massive dehumidifier in the middle of the restaurant. We arrived for an early lunch and it took us 20 minutes to be seated as the restaurant was still being set up. While it used to be nice our chef told us the chicken was Tyson s brand from walmart ... ew. Restaurant needs updating with a serious investment in better ingredients. I remember this place as delicious and a treat. Now it s a boring show of spatula flipping with bland food and sub par shrimp sauce to boot. Sad! Do not go here ... head to Otani instead.
Usually I love this place but FUCK them! I was trying to add mango sticky rice. When I clicked on the picture of mango sticky rice ordered it. Apparently it was just sticky rice. Why do they have a picture of MANGO sticky rice when it s just plain rice!?!?! They would not even correct it. Fuck this place!
Do not let Luisa touch your eyebrows. She waxed mine and left a bunch a broken hairs. Then she did not even tweeze the broken hairs. She tinted my brows and put the dye all over the place. Afterwards I went straight to Sally Beauty Supply to buy color remover and scrub the dye off my brows.
My husband and I went for a late breakfast they open at 10 on Sunday to check this place out. There are not that many breakfast places near me so we were excited. Although they open at 10 there were already 2 3 tables seated so that was good. Did not need to wait! I would say there are about 12 15 tables in there and the cafe is on the smaller side. I might give the place another chance once they get the swing of things going but I was not too impressed. I wanted to be! Again think service and food will get better but its not there yet. The service was not super friendly which I dont need but a smile would be welcoming. The coffee comes out of a thermos that you pump out the top which is fine if it keeps it hot but it wasnt too hot. Maybe thicker mugs would keep it that way. We ordered the house made ricotta with fruit and walnuts which was different but I was surprised that the ricotta had lemon and herbs in it. They forgot the honey which I think it was supposed to come with so I asked for that and added it and it tasted better. My husband got the cinnamon waffler slightly underdone so just not crisp enough and I got the eggs benedict. There are two eggs which it did not say on the menu so that is good! However they were overcooked so not runny. The hollandaise was delicious however. I do applaud the fact that they support and use some local products. I am glad that the cafe is in this location though because it seems like lots of familes are taking advantage of it.
Apparently there are only TWO BK whopper bars and somehow the Rio in Las Vegas got one of them. Now I have to admit I liked the concept of the BK whopper bar. A build your own whopper bar complete with a plethora of different toppings you would not see in a normal Burger King? Count me in! However for some odd reason the BK whopper bar had incredibly SLOW service. Like painstakingly slow. I had ordered something simple and they somehow took 20 minutes to get me my food. I guess since I was there at around 7 they may have been hit by a dinner crowd? However it looked like the set up was just not conducive to more than 1 person putting together people s seriously complex build your own whoppers. I m sure if BK Whopper Bars can get the set up more like a subway restaurant this would be a concept that could be taken to other locations. Until then I think I ll just go to a regular BK where I know that my food will be out within 5 minutes.
The vacuum do not work very well . They need a better vacuums. The staff is not very helpful. When the car come out of the car wash have a lot of water still a lot of water spots left in the car.
Save your money and eat somewhere else. The buffet dinner is way too expensive for the quality. The ONLY thing worth eating was the prime rib the rest left a lot to be desired. Instead of providing a huge selection of mediocre food they should concentrate on a smaller selection and improving the quality and taste.
It s important to remember that when you go for all you can eat sushi you ca not expect quality. You have to take it for what it is quantity. Zushi Sushi is your typical AYCE sushi experience in that the food is nothing to write home about but there is a ton of it. I found it pretty tasteless but I ve come to realize that these days when I crave sushi I would much rather pay for quality and get less of it then stuff my face on AYCE sushi. Like all AYCE sushi places you pay more on weekends and there are fees for uneaten pieces. There service is pretty fast and they usually remember to bring everything you ordered. Just a heads up that it is cash only so make sure you have enough on you. If you forget they have an ATM in the restaurant.
They are dishonest. Buyer beware. I bought a 250 40mm sized watch. They sent me a 34mm watch. No response from emails fb messages or instagram. Their phone on this site was picked up by a restaurant in Texas asking for my order. No way to leave a voice mail on their other . CROOKS!
The dishes I had were not cooked well more like warm serve. It should be well cooked given the waiting time of this place.
This is a popular place by length of wait on a Saturday at lunch time. I had the chicken curry bowl. It tasted ok but had chicken bones and cartilage in it. Overall a bad dish. If you had great curry dishes or great vegetable bowls from Japan Korea or China this is the opposite of that expectation. My wife had a breakfast dish and enjoyed it.
Just went here yesterday looking to trade in my 2010 Nissan Maxima for a new or used 14 or 15 Honda Civic. I spoke with a man on the phone who was able to work me an incredible deal on a new 2015 Honda Civic. As I drove up the dealership looked really nice. Needless to say the inside of the buildings looked cheap unprofessional and had way to many cars in it. It feels cramped due to the quantity of cars they had shoved Un there. Anyways the man I spoke to was not avaliable so I had to work with his partner Missy. I was HIGHLY dissatisfied with her. A sales person is supposed to be friendly welcoming confident and able to lead you through the process. I had to drag Missy along with me and I was the one who had to lead her through everything. She was highly disinterested or so it felt. They wrote me an OK offer on my trade in but refused to include all the extra luxuries it had on it since they were not in the kbb system . Then they gave me a layout of the discount they were gonna give me on a new car. I told them I was not paying more than 16 500 and so they took a bunch of MSRP but tacked on extra fees package charges and various other things so I was still gonna end up paying over 20 000. Needless to say I found a used car closer to my budget I liked and they refused to move on sticker price we re very rude about it too. I did get to talk to the manager at the end of the visit and he was the type of guy I d buy a car from but unfortunately Missy s poor customer service skills have ruined Tempe Honda from me and I will not be buying a car from them now or ever. Taking my time and money elsewhere.
This was recommended to me from Yelp as new business near me so I stopped by. It s a family owned business and I like that aspect but our waitress was a 10 year old and a 3 year old set our menus out. I do not think that s legal but it s cute as a family owned business I guess. The food was mediocre could ve made a better meal at my house and we did mention it to our server and she just said sorry and kept walking. If you re looking for a pho spot this is not probably what you re looking for.
I made an appointment to get a mani pedi and when I showed up they had taken two walk ins who were together and were finishing up a manicure on a third person. They asked if I had an appointment which I did right at that time and then they totally ignored me. One pedi was done and they started her manicure. They never told me how long I was expected to wait so after 15 minutes of complete inattention I left and went to Wonder Nails nearby. Their friendliness attention and good work did not go unappreciated since I was a walk in.
BUYER BEWARE. DO NOT MAKE RESERVATIONS through Byron Copeland founder of Vegas Hotel Escapes. In July 2016 I booked and prepaid for two hotel rooms for the weekend of October 7 9 2016. My credit card was charged for the full amount and I received confirmation for my booking and assumed everything was fine. On the morning of my arrival to Vegas I called the hotel that we had reservations at to request that our rooms be adjoining at which time the hotel representative informed me that I did not have any reservations at the hotel. At that time I contacted Byron Copeland and he was unable to resolve the matter for me. We were left without reservations for the weekend. He stated that he would promptly issue a refund he has failed to do so. Further he fails to take liability of the excess charges that we have incurred as a result of having to re book our rooms the day of. Terrible fraudulent company with even more terrible customer service.
Yuck!! One star is a gift the food is awful the service worse. The only redeeming value this place has are the televisions. The jambalaya does not even have any seafood in it! No way will we be returning
I m always looking for a great salon for my manicures. Future Nails is 2 mins away from the house so I thought I d give it a try. Guess I ll be making my usual 20 min trip to the one I ve been frequenting. You get no soapy water to soften your cuticles just plain lukewarm water. My cuticles were nipped and became raw. The base coat was old and thick which caused my nails to be EXTREMELY bubbly. Gross. Hopefully my picture was uploaded above mine are the orange nails. My husband was disgusted with the wasted money and obviously so was I.
Completely unmemorable. Sure... they have some beers but you can get most at better places. In a city with fantastic breweries and great food beer culture... why? Belgians are just not my thing I guess. I m not sure why people love it. Perhaps we did not get great service because we came in with our kids? Not sure... but I wont be back maybe they like it better that way .
I received a free ticket voucher from one of the bartenders at the MGM and who does not like free? I went over with some friends who also had free tickets stood in line for 20 minutes but was still a good sport because I figured it was free. Got to the front and then was told it was going to be 70 dollars! At that point I got annoyed because I wasted my time so I decided to talk to the manager because I was essentially tricked into going there. He was so rude to me and told me that the ticket was only good until 11 pm. I asked him to show me where it said that. Guess what he could not because it was not on there! The supposed free ticket is just a scam to get people there. Vegas is full of great places do not waste your time on this one.
Went out to eat for my last night in North Carolina . Found a piece of hair wrapped up in the napkin . Was gonna let it go because was not using that silverware . Order stuffed mushrooms when they come I eat one but the second one I picked up I find a piece of hair wrapped in the mushroom . Literally baked into the mushroom . Manger comes over she was nice but tried to say it s because they re peeling the corn back there in the kitchen now that it was probably corn hair that we found . Had to correct her and let her no it was Hair . She said she would take half of on our bill . Then ask what I was drinking . I let her know a soda . She said she would get me a refill . 6 min go by still do not have one . Ask the waiter if I can get a refill ? He never comes back with one . My fianc had to go up to the bar and ask for one his self . Because we were waiting So long . Place was not even that busy . When our waiter brought out the food I ask for more sour cream for my Bake potato. Waiter never came. Back until it was time to go and he s like oh I forgot something does she still want that . Slowest place ever . I would not recommend going here unless you want human hair in your food .
crappy service unclean store and why is there ice cream machine ALWAYS down?! And they never seem to have enough people working or a bunch of call offs. I can never just come here order and have a great time.
The chunky monkey was good but the orange crepe was terrible. The sweet orange was so over powering.
You ll have to forgive me. I live in Los Angeles where there is valet parking for hamburgers and top chefs have food trucks that can be found here there and everywhere. A burger with a side of fries smothered in Duck Confit with White Truffle Sauce so perhaps the bar is a tad higher than here in ack Pittsburgh where I found myself searching for sustenance before attending the wedding that brought me here. I only hope the godawful mess I actually ate does not rear it s ugly head mid ceremony. It sounded like such a novel concept a sandwich with all the sides just piled on. After all it s all going to the same place right? Having been born and raised in Chicago it was a familiar concept. The noble Chicago Dog a study in contradictions sweet and sour spicy and mild hot and cold a veritable melange that blends and tantalizes from the first bite to the last. Yes! I ll try it! With my omnivore brother and his lovely wife I made my way through the chilly streets of downtown Pittsburgh on this frosty Saturday. A bustling little metropolis scant parking so I am shamed to admit I pulled in a nearby lot that charged an 8 flt fee. A small price to pay I reasoned for a gastronomic delight as has been described here. Yes as I said I m from out of town. On to the main event my bro and his bride went with the signature piece the pastrami sandwich. I opted for the Hot Sausage with cheese. May god have mercy on my gastrointestinal tract. It is a wonder how a sandwich with so many things can be so uniformly bland. Perhaps it starts with the niggardly portions of actual meat when confronted with this sandwich in profile it is hard to find under the wad of soggy fries and tasteless cole slaw. The liquid in the slaw makes the bread begin to disintegrate almost immediately so that should you be as foolhardy as I and actually attempt to eat this mess it will be all over the table in short order. I ate it I admit that. I m not proud of it but I was that hungry. The saving grace of the near complete lack of any discernable seasoning is that I do not have an aftertaste to suffer through but the leaden ball in the pit of my stomach promises to make up for that with a trip or two to the bathroom in the hopefully not too distant future. I would eat at McDonalds before I went back here. Please do not fall for the raves here. It s pure unadulterated crap.
We drove a long way here for brunch at around 12pm craving banh cuon . However it was to our disappointment that they completely ran out! However this is not the reason to the low rating as we got other dishes there. We got the following com tam suon nuong broken rice with grilled pork very small portioned overcooked and dry bun bo hue Hue style vermicelli in soup visually very unappealing resembled vermicelli in pho broth very little meat there was only 1 piece of sausage! pho tai bo vien pho with rare beef and beef balls beef was extremely chewy freezer burnt taste broth was bland banh beo steamed rice cakes and banh cong fried rice cakes with green beans extremely doughy texture Service was below average as our waitress was occasionally snappish and had idle responses to our dessert orders.
I do not know much about the jewelry they sell it looks like people are pretty happy. I went there because we were selling a ring. The place was pretty busy for a Thursday and we stood and waited like normal people do. We saw a bunch of the sales people working with other customers and we were just going to wait our turn. Now typically when a place is busy an employee will say someone will be with you soon sorry for the delay something like that. We had 3 employees actually make eye contact with us and put their heads down. One employee walked over by the glass case kept his head down almost to intentionally not say anything to us. I m no one special I understand that but when you deal in an industry that potentially could have someone come in and drop 10k ignoring them seems like the last thing you should do professionally speaking. I never mind waiting I do not expect to cut the line all that would have worked would have been hey thanks for coming in we will be with you soon as we can. Then you would have me feel welcome and I would have started poking around and perhaps found something to buy. Walking over to me and acting like 2 people are not standing there seems almost deliberate. I definitely will not return and will let as many people as I know to stay away. Unless you like being treated rudely id stay away from this place! You have a friend in the diamond business? Looks like that friend is a real hole.
This was a terrible experience. There are no prices posted and it s very expensive. Three days later and my fake tattoo still looks faded. The guy who did my tattoo was very personable and pleasant. It s the cost that was awful and the tat is faded looking. I never would have paid this much for a fake tattoo in a sober state of mind.
DONT COME HERE MEMBERS ONLY it s Sunday morning decided to post my negative review Rude bartender Pics of drinks on Facebook and Yelp not same Warm beer watered down margarita lots of though Lots more but just a horrible experience ended up a twin peaks same price but 100 percent better!
Hotel room had a faulty Iron destroyed my shirt and they did not refund me or do anything about except replace my iron with a working one. Worst customer care of all time
Initially was a big fan of this place and the curry katsu plates we got there. Until we went back a few times and then it all went downhill. The second time we went the curry was cold. The third time we went the curry was lukewarm and crusted over like it had been sitting out for quite awhile. The last time we went we waited 30 minutes for drinks cans with cups of ice and an hour for the curry katsu plates that were this time terrible and salty and again lukewarm. Like the other reviewer said there s no excuse for this kind of service. It s also pretty expensive for what it is. Definitely would not recommend unless you were going when there are no other customers at all.. that s how it was the first time we went and it was pretty great. But if you go during lunch hour or something and there are other people around.. forget about it.
I took a dress here to be altered because I thought it was showing too much cleavage to wear to a wedding. They did not think it was and wanted to add these pads that pushed my boobs up even more and made me look like a hussy. We settled on them bring up the shoulder seam. It was 60. I should have just had my mom do it.
Well where do I start. It s in the same building as a bar so when you walk in it s very smokey. Our drink orders were taken quickly. We ordered our food. Three other tables came in about 15 minutes after we ordered and they all got their food while we re eating what tasted like store bought chips and salsa. When our food arrived the beans and rice looked nuked. Food was ok. My husband ended up getting sick after eating the shrimp quesadilla. What did it in for me is the filthy disgusting bathroom. I ve never seen a bathroom with so many bodily fluids on the seats in my life! And no soap! So gross. Please....do not go!
The store is okay but the staff is less then friendly. I went in to buy something that I knew they had after researching it online. I asked the owner about accessories for the item and when he would start carrying them. He insisted that the company does not make accessories. I told him about my research and he still insisted that the company did not make accessories. I had to pull up the company s website on my phone and show him. His story then changed and he said the he would be getting the accessories in the spring. I do not see why you need to be argumentative with your customers especially when you can get most stuff online now.
I ve always had a positive image of American Eagle. They always carry the hottest clothes carry my size which can be a challenge sometimes because I m 6 4 and are always friendly and happy to help! However this store was the COMPLETE opposite of that!!! The greeter was very selective in who she was passing promotional flyers to when I arrived. After finding the men s section specifically the jeans section I found myself lost and confused on which pair would best suit me. I kept looking around hoping that an associate would come over and help but I could not even see any associates. When I finally did find an associate she was busy chatting it up with another associate and I had to interrupt their conversation to get her attention. Her english was very fragmented but I could tell that she could still understand what I was asking looking for. She finally found me a pair of jeans to try on and I went off to the dressing room to try them on. While I was back there she came back and yelled over the door that they could not find the larger size that I was hoping they would have which is weird because this store is located DOWNTOWN . Then she left before I could ask her a question. I finally left feeling disappointed and emotionally drained. My experience here totally killed my day of shopping and I highly recommend just traveling down to Burlington VT to shop at one of their stores because at least there you ll see friendly associates wanting to help you find what you need.
Nice place to eat if you re a biker. We went there on a Sunday and the place was flooded with grubby looking biker types. They were loud and obnoxious. Food was fair at best. If we were not there the average IQ would not break 80 . I would pass on this place and go somewhere else.
Well they were open and not doing anything special for NYE. That should have been a clue. But...I have not been there in years and I have a friend who s been doing a lot of work for them and I wanted to see how the food stacked up these days. Sadly the report is not a good one. First it was nearly empty another bad sign. Then the waiter seemed to be a friendly guy but not good at waiting tables. I never got enough water my date did not get an offer of another drink... The food. Oh boy. I have never in my life tasted frijoles that tasted like they were made with dried french onion soup mix before. The salsa verde had the same bizarre flavor. We ordered two different dishes and they were both indistinguishable and not good. The decor is strictly 1979 dark wood and the railing for the steps had a handwritten sign on it that said something like this is not a seat. It was not expensive but Juliobertos has MUCH better food so who cares? I m tempted to give it one star but we did not get sick.
Very disappointed! I ve had a carry out each of the half dozen times I ve eaten here so do not know the dining experience but decided that it was the last time. I usually get the Sweet and Sour chicken and fried rice. The Sweet and Sour chicken is usually soggy and the fried rice just OK. So tonight I decided to ask for the sauce on the side when I placed my phone order. When I got there they charged me almost 2 dollars more for the privilege of having the sauce on the side. I mentioned this to the clerk and to the lady in charge that it would have been nice to been told that when I ordered it. They both said sorry but it s only a dollar. I said no it s almost 2 dollars. She just smiled and walked away. On top of it all I got less food as well. Very expensive place for what you get. I wo not be back.
It was good once I ate it but after I got a food poisoning from their olives I know it was the olives for sure.I could not recover 3 days after with severe stomach pain. I think its a good place but they need to check for expired products....
Stayed here in January for two nights with my husband. We were given no option regarding the resort fee....even though the pool area was completely torn up from construction being done and the Wi Fi did not work the first night. Can someone explain why I paid an extra 30 a night? Not to mention parking was a pain in the butt. They were doing something with the parking structure too...so we had to wind our way twice through said pool area and enter through the back of the hotel with all our luggage. Never again.
A place can have great decor food and location but if you ca not get any service then what is the point in going? This place lost my business because of the terrible service. I left before I was able to try any dishes because the service was so poor. I was very excited to try the happy hour that lasted until 6 30 but I sat at the bar for 10 minutes with no service. I finally decided to leave and they could have cared less. There were at least 5 waitresses behind the bar but no one acknowledged me. It was extremely poor customer service and I would never return. So disappointing. I hope the owners would be ashamed of their staff.
I visited some friends in Phoenix a few months back and we ended up patronizing Amy s for dinner one night. My friends had not tried it yet themselves so none of us were sure what to expect. We all decided to share some pizza which was not all that great. It was not seasoned properly and at points it felt doughy as if it had not been cooked thoroughly enough. Our waitress was nice but we could tell that she was stressed. It was probably from the owner s occasional yelling and somewhat rude comments. We only stayed at this place about 1.5 hours and were definitely ready to leave once we finished. I did not feel that the price paid for the quality of food received was justified. The value was certainly lacking. I figured this might have been an isolated incident until I read about this place being featured on Kitchen Nightmares . I found that episode on YouTube and then thought Well if the shoe fits... .
Horrible service ! Manager let me walk did not want to sell me floor model even at full price! Went somewhere else got chair no problem and it was another value city they need to fire the manager at this store!
Look I do not live here and I know nothing about Antonio s Pizza. I was interested in learning about their pizza and so I ordered some. Thing is it never arrived. About an hour after ordering we called. We were assured it was running behind and the driver had left 40 min ago. Well at this point we were looking forward to the prospect of 40 minute old pizza but not to worry it never showed up. We tried calling several times afterwards and no one answered. I sincerely hope everyone at Antonio s is well and that some tragic incident did not interrupt our pizza but never before has pizza just not showed up. At least the courtesy of a phone call you ask? Nothing.
WORST experience EVER no haggle pricing means CarMax way or hit the highway worn out dry rotted tires would be negotiations they do not do that???? this is involving stock 14970692 there internet pictures show truck DIRTY it was delivered that way bed with nails and staples pieces of tile.....interior NASTY as traded in by previous owner never washed or cleaned.....was told truck was in prep when I came to pick it up they had 3 days notice I was bringing a check for truck called 1.5 hour before there and they delivered the truck with mud on drivers door???and would not detail truck JUST BAD .Truck was priced 2k over kbb 1k over nada and was sold with unsafe dry rotted tires that leak every 6 days....bought truck because double cab 6.2l is HARD TO FIND.......but I would strongly recommend being careful with this place or just go look somewhere else.....absolutely totally useless customer service they will not call back and they still owe me a bed cover THEY ARE DODGING!!!!!
I raved about this place until the 3rd time I went the Carne Asada was very drythen the 4th time my Cousin and I became very ill for 24 hours. No more for us.
I used to eat at this restaurant all the time. The food went from decent New Mexican style cuisine to ill cooked meals that taste like salty cheese. I stopped going months ago and wo not return. Not sure what happened and it s a shame! I agree with the other posters that say the service has gone downhill too. I once asked 3 times for a drink refill and never got it till after I paid.
I ended up waiting 30 minutes for two items only for my order to incorrect. Definitely am not coming back to this one. Extremely disappointed by the lack of professionalism in this establishment the place appears to be run by children who do not know whats going on.
Very disappointed on two separate occasions with the customer service staff. This evening upon requesting a table the host s first question was essentially how long do you think your meal will take? There was certainly no shortage of seats. Not a very welcoming greeting. On a prior visit this time with a friend our waiter approached the table and said let me guess two chicken tikka masalas? My friend and I found this off putting. I do not enjoy being stereotyped over dinner. I will not be taking my friends or family back after these two experiences.
Overall lunch buffet is REALLY bad and the most expensive across the valley. The rice tasted stale and the tandoori chicken.....man I do not know what was going on with that but I could not stomach more than one bite. The chicken in the other dishes were hard overcooked. The naan was pretty substandard as well. They only good food item they had was the dessert rice pudding. I really wanted to like this place and I would have given it another chance had the lady asking for my feedback at the register handled it appropriately
The food is ok. You do not have to wait for the check. These are the 2 stars. Our waiter did not provide the friendly customer service that you expect he was more about keeping his eyes on the television screen as he took our order so he was not all there he asked if there is anything else you need after we finished our food as he walked away to the new guests at the table next to us he acted like he did not hear our request for the bottomless fries. I dont know if that s how they re trained or not but I wo not be going there any time soon. I d much rather give my hard earned money to a restaurant that appreciates its guests and is willing to keep a pleasant atmosphere for all and that they hire quality people who are able to provide the utmost customer respect and service. I do not recommend this restaurant.
Ordered an iced coffee today from the drive through she hands me a regular coffee and I tell her sorry but I ordered and iced coffee. She then goes back to make the iced coffee comes back to the window and tell me she needs my card again to charge me another 70 cents. Obviously it s not about the 70 cents that makes me mad it s that doing that is HORRIBLE customer service. Wants to take my card and charge me an extra 70 cents because she messed up the order just bad customer service.
I STOPPED going to Cherry Lash because of the constant immediate fall out and I had a lot of lash damage. UNFORTUNATELY they do work on a timed basis which made the quality go all the way down because their artists are on a very tight schedule. The place smells great and they have nice merchandise but I WOULD NOT recommend anyone to them unless you wanna pay a lot of money to be un satisfied.
This is the worst Dunkin Donuts. We go through drive thru and they take our order. When we get to the window we are asked to repeat our order again for them. Later they come back to us saying they did not have part of it until tomorrow. So we then choose something else to substitute for the item. They asked us to pull up front while they make our order. We finally get our order and it was not complete. Which meant having to go in and get the rest of it.
Service was great. Dessert was great. That being said meh or blech is pretty much accurate for the rest. I tried the all you can eat dinner because I was craving sushi. I started with Unagi and Ama Ebi. Nothing too adventurous. I took one bite of each turned to my friend and said I m going to be sick tomorrow. And yes I do have an upset stomach. The shrimp was slimy and the unagi had been improperly thawed and or held. The teriyaki salmon was fine the potstickers were unremarkable the spider roll was fine the tempura would have been fine but again the shrimp was bad. I would have liked to try other sushi but I was not ready to take that risk. Dessert was excellent all around and I may go back just for that.
Mediocre at best. Been here on two separate occasions. I wo not want to come back. Its very pricey for what they give you. Ordered an apple crepe one time. It was very dry and no flavour. The apples were cooked very basic with some cinnamon and no sugar. The crepe itself was extremely dry and flavourless made of what seemed like whole wheat flour. Tiny bit of caramel sauce drizzled over it and I mean a tiny bit. I was thinking I paid how much for this? .. I could have made better at home. Another time I ordered an omelette. Again it was really basic with vegetables no flavour. The toast they gave with it was whole wheat very stale. It came with a fruit cup and chocolate sauce. Again nothing special stuff you can make yourself buy some fruit and melt some milk chocolate over it. The chocolate was nothing special honestly. Overall very disappointing quality of food for the price they charge it is not worth it in my opinion.
Sometimes I eat at a chain and wonder how it even got past the original restaurant. Jimmy Johns joins that list. Went today and got a number 11 which is off of the deluxe or some such side of the menu the hook being twice the meat and so on. What I got if twice anything well glad I did not get the regular. It was mostly a bread and lettuce sandwich. The french roll was good but that was it. Really an unremarkable sandwich. I ca not see ever going back. I do not even care that much for Port o Subs and Subway but either of those is way better than this.
I personally think the quality of the wedding dresses at David s Bridal is extremely poor. My mother found her mother of the bride dress here. I will say the dress is pretty but if you buy a dress here DO NOT get alterations done by their staff. They do the worst work I have ever seen and then when you call them on it they are rude and refuse to take ownership of it. They also called me honey over and over again as they told me they would not refund my mother s money which made me want to jump out of my skin. There are much better places around the city to find bridal wear. I would go elsewhere.
Upon entering we were impressed with the beautiful upscale decor. The food however did not live up to the surroundings or the prices. The Octopus appetizer was tasty but such a tiny portion for 14.00 may have been over a dollar per bite. The Moussaka was terrible runny under cooked and had to be sent back.
Take some advice people I mean its basically on the sign Jet out of here. Of all the clubs I ve been to in Vegas this is one of my least favorite. The club itself is a square shrouded in darkness thank god for the two guys who go down the walkways with flashlights so you can actually walk places . The music when I went was awful a mixture of techno with no hip hop that might be some people s type of music but I dont carry around a glow stick. On top of it all there s one bathroom in the corner of the bar. Basically where our table was the bathroom was about a half mile I had half a mine to just pee in the corner it was dark enough who would ve noticed? In the city of sin there are many clubs who soar about this one visit those skip this one.
Absolutely horrible! They do not even try to make sure what their serving good! Same as service.
Stay clear of this dead beat company. I bought about 41.00 worth of MOLLE pouches in January. I had bought from Desert Deuce in the past with out a problem. However like others on this post I received no response from several inquiries. I did contact the Arizona Attorney General. I filled out their complaint form with all supporting documents. I received a letter saying they were unable to get a response either and I am basically S.O.L. Unlike others I am out only 41.00.
Its chipotle so the food is good but this location seems to be managed poorly. Start is always really slow and not helpful at all. Just get it to go.
Average Italian food nothing special. It is in a nice location near the fountain inside the mall though.
Service The ladies taking our orders did not speak English. No napkins or utensils were given to us as well.
Worst food I ve had from and IHOP ever. I got half the amount of toast the hash browns were not even remotely the size in the picture and the eggs were over cooked. I ve gotten better food at a Waffle House on a bad day.
Would not be surprised if this location closes. Terribly managed. The only reason I ve came to this location is because I live nearby but I now go to a location that is 5 miles further just because I do not want to deal with the hassle of the poor service.
A very poor experience. Bad food . Who likes cold poutine? Cheese curds not melted? Really this is Montreal. Bad service. I am not apologizing for not speaking French. I am a tourist. I would not ignore you if you came to visit me and did not speak my language I would welcome you and treat you like a guest. Bad hospitality. Excessively slow and inattentive. Wow. The worst of the night was when the bartender chased me down outside to complain about the size of the tip. This sense of entitlement should get him fired. I am a chef. I have worked in the business for over 3 decades. I have my own catering business so I know what good food is and I most certainly know what good service is. I also know about the value of hospitality with new guests. Helm and the bartender flirting with the waitstaff while we waited for a simple drink order represented nothing good in any of the above areas. Chasing me down outside to bellyache about your little tip well that just adds insult to injury. Your lucky I paid the bill!!
Can I give you no stars? So we were a group of seven we all ordered drinks except two people our designated drivers of the night. One our server extremely rude. My friend stated the drink was so bitter he could not taste it she stated she d have to charge anyways for another one. So sure no worries. All our drinks were poorly made then she gave us a little cup of syrup to mix in and sweeten it ourselves. Sure. Then we re about to leave we re drinking our drinks and the server goes are you done your drink? We go back to ask her why she s rude she says she s not paid to smile and does not care. We ask to speak manager he goes quote on quote I instructed her to behave that way with your guys because we usually do not serve people where everyone does not order. Rushed to clear our drinks and pushed us out. Great job guys no line outside but yes feel free to push us out. Never again. Just for the service.
Cheap but the food is very low quality. Comparable to a golden corral or hometown buffet with a bigger selection. Personally i would rank this buffet below anything on the strip but its popular with locals for obvious reasons. Bottom line if you want to eat like a slob for cheap and dont mind 3 10 quality food eat here.
HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE! Bought a new phone from them had it 2 months and the thing went wonky. Brought it in and everyone was aghast with wonder. So they shipped me a new phone or so I thought. Get the new phone and after 2 days it started acting wonky. Brought that back in and was told I was given a REFURBISHED phone. Well knock me over with a feather when I spent darn near a grand for a new phone and paid cash for it I sure was not expecting to wind up owning a used phone. Only having it for 2 months and the problem was not a human oops but rather defective. I say run....do not walk and find another provider or just go to another store and try your luck. Either way Verizon just is bad. I ve heard and had better customer service at T Mobile where they go above and beyond to make things right. I must have been body snatched to think it was all greener pastures at Verizon when it s just a field full of manure.
We picked this restaurant based off reviews and were extremely disappointed. Food was mediocre but the service and experience that follows is why I will not be returning. At one point they brought out another pot of fondue and set it on the table along with bread and olives which we began to eat... 60 seconds later the waiter came back laughed apologized and said that was not meant for us then walked three steps before giving it to another table!! The other waitress then came out and keeled over laughing. We had already begun to eat the fondue!! For context we ordered the entre appetizer two person size and a raclette and shared with 3. We were just discussing whether to get more when the second pot came out so we erroneously thought that maybe the portions were large and they served each separately. In hindsight it was a bad assumption but we received the same dish and there s no reference point for portion size. Aside from taking food away somewhat rudely giving it to someone else was extremely gross and the fact that they laughed openly is rather indicative of their general standards.
So sad we chose this for dinner. It was the third strike should have known better shame on us. Ugh where to start my better 2 3 rds wanted curry we opted to try something different and went with pineapple beef curry. Spice level he wanted low so we went with a level that was supposed to be a two. It was a twelve. The only flavor we could get from it was heat and we love and can tolerate heat but this was supposed to be a two if there was no heat however there would have been zero flavor so angry butthole it is. It was full and over populated with onions never had this in description on menu and he hates onions we literally got out a strainer and strained the curry sauce over the under cooked rice so my poor love could at least not whither away. The beef well wheres the beef? There was supposed to be some beef there was two small corn flakes of beef. At this point I wish we had just done Corn Flakes and milk for dinner because it would have been better waaaaay better and more flavorful. He ate two tablespoons of curry and made a darn frozen dinner from freezer that bad. The spring rolls oh the spring rolls there was no dignity nor pride in manufacturing theses monstrosities that were wrapped looser than a two buck whore. Absolutely terrible. Even the peanut sauce sucked and lacked flavor. I actually asked for fish sauce instead as a substitute but they apparently do not listen so horrible prideless peanut sauce it was. Oh for the grand finale of this horrible tasteless lackluster dinner....picking up the order. Gosh I walk in there is five other individuals waiting for their orders to deliver. Yes Door Dash Grub Hub Uber Eats etc...you get the picture. They are all pissed because they had been standing waiting there so long to deliver completed meals that were just chilling yeah getting cold on one of the tables waiting to be handed over so they could be delivered for over twenty minutes. Sorry to the ones that had to endure the wait and the poor delivery drivers sorry to the ones that may or may not have ingested this poor excuse of Thai and Viet food it sucks
I ve been to better much better pubs in my lifetime with much better atmosphere and attitudes but... It s good when you need what they have. I have to agree that it has certainly lost a little of something in the past few years but Rula Bula still seems to make decent fish and chips shepherd s pie and boxty their self proclaimed specialty . It s on Mill so if you re there during the weekend afternoons expect kids. Lots and lots of kids. I like kids. I teach kids. I do not want to see kids when I go to a pub or bar. I especially do not want to see kids when I m in Tempe sitting on the patio enjoying a smoke and a beer. But hey it s Tempe. It s Mill on a Saturday afternoon what the heck should I be expecting right? Pretty much the only reason I care to come here anymore is the food or because my mom still loves it and wants to meet up for lunch . It could use a new coat of paint so to speak though. And by that I mean they should try to rough up their image a little lower their prices and stock more better beers.
Helped my parents purchase a 2015 Audi Q7 TDI from this dealership 2.5 weeks ago. The AdBlue levels were low so they took it to the Audi dealership for a refill and were told all brakes and rotors front and rear need immediate replacement due to being at dangerous levels. Tried to contact their salesman Mark with no response. Ended up paying 1900 to replace. Do not recommend buying a used vehicle from this location if you decide to do so proceed with caution and use an independent mechanic. You would think on a vehicle this expensive they would have the decency to refill AdBlue and at least disclose the brake issue.
Tea is never served hot. Lukewarm at best. Pastries and other foods that are served are dried out. Some of the staff is courteous and polite others certainly are neither.
Pretty bummed and disappointed tonight. Family orders food spending around 50 bucks. The sampler was not what we ordered. The sliders were just plain meat cheese and bun. But these wings... There s barely even meat on it. Looks like someone took a bit out of one of them. Not sure if I will return to this location.
Way too expensive. I went in for a press and trim and was charged 65!!! Mind you a wash WAS NOT included. I went in on a Saturday which is supposedly walk in day where no appointments are needed on that day. Well I wish someone would have told me when I booked an appointment earlier that week to get my hair done that Saturday. Even though I made an appointment for 9am Saturday I had to wait a whole 3 hrs just to get service. I figured the stylist would do a price adjustment for me at the end being that I patiently waited so long for such a simple task to get done to head and especially since all she did was flat iron my hair and clip my ends but noooo. I still was charged 65. Never again will I go back.
The worst tasting everything bagel. I took some to work and everyone said the same thing it had a nasty taste that to lingered in your mouth. No chewiness that you expect from a bagel. Skimpy on the topping. Had to throw the rest away. The other pastries are Costco croissants. No Thanks I have a Costco card. I was looking forward to a real boiled bagel like you get in New York. I have 1 Star because it was warm.
We ordered 22 burritos for our office for lunch and only 4 burrito wrappers were labeled no sauce came with our order either. Upsetting to have to open up every burrito to find out whose it was 3 burritos were wrong as well. The food is good however not a good place to order from for your business.
I spend a lot of time at the Convention Center because I work as a temp through a couple different agencies and often end up here to do registration etc. I think this place is in dire need of a makeover. The carpets are whacked out with ugly designs and the place is just boring and bland. There s just nothing here that makes you say Wow besides the fact that it is huge. Here are some tips about the convention center though whether you re attending a conference or working there Cabs will always take longer than you suspect so always leave a little early. This goes the same for the monorail. The layout of the convention center makes for long hikes to and fro. Expect to be walking a lot. So ladies just leave the heels at home. The food choices are blah Nathan s Hot Dogs and the over priced Banners place will have you spending about 10 for a meal with a drink included. Oh there s also a bunch of Starbucks set up offering half of what a typical Starbucks offers with a pricier price tag of course! It can go from freezing to stifling hot so bring differing types of clothing. Parking is ridiculous. Especially if you re working here you do not want to spend 10 to park! No siree! On smaller conventions try the Hilton Sports Book off of Joe W. Brown runs behind the convention center but not for bigger conventions they will be charging for parking. Also try parking lots by the Riviera sometimes you ll be able to get free parking. OR for big conventions try the street parking to the West of the Convention Center up Paradise Road. There are a few streets where on street parking is available. Believe me walking a little bit is worth not getting hit with a parking ticket! Lastly I always say be safe when leaving the Convention Center. I do not think it is in the best part of town. Do pairs go in groups just do not walk by yourself. That s it I ca not think of anything else to say.
I bought a refrigerator from them on Saturday delivery on Sunday broke on Wednesday. Would not do a thing for me. Called conns service they finally came on on Friday. Zack and Shelley was amazing they said if can be replaced because it broke with in 72 hours. They filled out paper work that day and on Monday replacement was approved on Monday and Shelley personally called and told me. Went in store to get replacement they was out of what I bought. They replaced it with a similar fridge but delivery the next day. Replacement refrigerator shows up damaged and was returned. No one at this company even cared I ve been without a fridge for a week. Had to wait another day plus was lied about it being delivered between 3 and 6. They showed up at 1pm which is nice but does not make up for the lies and the total uncaring of this company. Their 100 of all customers will be 100 satisfied is a pure lie. They gave me a big 50 off another purchase like I would ever buy something from them.. The manager Will at the Chandler store lied to me on that Wednesday that the fridge could not be replaced which the service department had done.. Buyer beware!! Get unlucky and get a bad appliance and they will turn their backs on you with no regards for you..
Wish I could give this place a negative rating the whole experience was a disaster from the very beginning. Should have went to the food court instead. Entrance is roped off like a buffet line had to wait 1 hour for 2 party s of 2 in front of me to be seated. Very limited space 4 small Denny s style tables. Rest of the seating was cramped bar seats. Took 15 minutes to place order 45 minutes for arrival. Elderly couple next to us waited 1 hour for fish and chips. Lobster Roll was bland. Dozen oysters were shucked incorrectly presented on a bowl of ice as if they were an ice sculpture. Poor taste ultra sandy and gritty. House Gumbo was crap. Monkey bread pudding tasted like doughy microwave batter. Overpriced and over hyped. Will not return buyer beware. Service and food is terrible.
I wish I could give zero stars to this so called business . This is two people braiding hair out of an apartment. Since I ve been struggling to find a decent salon to braid my hair I decided to give these girls a try after reading all the rave reviews. So I called and set my appointment for 1pm on a Tuesday. It was about 35 minutes drive from my home. I arrived about 20 minutes early and was surprised to find it was an apartment building from the reviews I knew it was a home but was expecting a private house is it even legal to advertise an apartment building as your place of business?? Anyway I parked on the street and gave them a call since they never gave me an apartment . The person that answered Louise sounded surprised and asked who is this after I announced that I was there for my appointment and just needed the apartment . She abruptly said she would call me back never gave me the apartment . I started to have a sinking feeling. I sat there in my car outside the building waiting for a call back that never came. Instead I received a text message saying the sister is sick and cannot do my hair do I want to reschedule????? Really??? how unprofessional?? A TEXT????? First of all the lady that answered my call was the same voice I booked the appointment with that said she would be doing my hair. From my deduction I believe they totally forgot to write me in on their schedule and came up with the lame excuse and did not even have the professional courtesy to call me instead sending a TEXT!!!! Telling me one sister is sick and the other conveniently out of town?
New to PHX. As many of us know finding a barber in a strange city is sometimes harder then finding a significant other LOL. First place I came to was 1st Choice as it is nearby my residence. I was seated right away by Juan who was awfully chatty but friendly none the less. The reason for the low score is because about 10 minutes into my haircut 2 people walked in selling Comedy packages in Scottsdale. Juan LITERALLY stopped cutting my hair as in put the scissors and comb down to sign up for this package ask the sales people questions etc. He stopped cutting my hair for about 10 minutes. Talk about the WORST customer service I have experienced. The correct thing he could have done is I am interested but I currently have a customer. Do you have a phone number I can contact you at? OR I am with a customer right now can you come back in about 30 minutes? Disappointingly the owner also signed up so clearly he did not think there was anything wrong with his worker stopping my haircut to sign up too. The sad part is Juan actually did a nice cut. But strictly for the reason that him signing up for a sales promotion at a comedy club was MORE IMPORTANT then the person paying HIM as his customer I will most likely not return. To finish this pretty bad experience the owner attempted signing me up for their membership program and then tried selling me a special gel. The whole experience seemed to be either getting sold something or watching THEM get sold something. IDK about everyone else but I get a haircut and I just want to get a haircut. Not listen to how their gel is the best gel in the world get sold a membership or wait 10 15 minutes for them to sign up for a comedy club. 2 stars for a good cut but will not likely return.
I have visited this Starbucks drive thru almost every morning for the last 2 years. It used to take 5 minutes to order and get through the drive thru today it took 20 and averages 15 minutes other mornings. I typically visit between 5 50am and 6 10am. The staff is friendly enough but too slow now for whatever reason. It is the most convenient coffee breakfast stop on my way to work otherwise I would go elsewhere. I m tempted to stop being lazy and make my own coffee breakfast simply to avoid the hassle!
I hate how at some Dr s offices they absolutely just need to condescend you the moment you ask a question. This place is the walking distance from my house so I decided to walk in and try to schedule an appointment about a problem I was suffering from. The moment I ask the question the lady answers back in a sarcastic and condescending way . I decided right there that this was not the place for me. I really hate how at like 50 of medical offices they got some receptionist woman who does that. I ll go to a place where they do not talk trash when I just try to ask a simple question. I will go ahead and give this place 2 stars because the waiting area was fancy and clean.
Very shady company. They lost my payment 3 times in a row but did not tell me until months later. The tech that came to my house was horribly rude when scheduling like it s my fault he does not come to maricopa often . And of course the time he was rude and I complained about it he lost my payment again. He was NEVER regular with service. Avoid this company at all costs
The food is as bad as the fake vibe which is as bad as the owners personalities. I cannot believe they are still in business.
I was sitting on dirty table and the burger did not taste like real meat the salad was not worth the high price.
I ordered five tons of one inch Apache pink Rock from this company. I think I recivrd 4 tons of rock and 1 ton of sand. Even the two young men that I hired to help me spread it made a comment about how much sand was in it. The sand was so thick I could not even wash it through the Rock. Called them and was told sorry that s how we get it deliver to us . Personally I would look elsewhere for your rock needs.
Dirty restroom and out of toilet paper before our meal. Did not stick around to see if they treat their kitchen the same way.
well still not to the bottom of this billing situation. The last resort is to write a letter to corporate explaining the mishaps of the finacial aspect of this dentist office. The billing person Billy as been billing the incorret dental insurance insists its our fault but we provided the insurance card do whoever keyed in the information is at fault. Billy blamed us so much my husband had to tell her that it was rude to keep blaming the customer. When my husband called he was placed on hold by the receptionist and she placed on a silent hold because he could hear Billy yelling and talking inappropriate talk about my husband and I. Well on a Saturday night he is writing to corperate. So we can get to the end of this rude behavior no one eill allow me to speak to the dentist he callled me twice but the receptionist keeps withholding the calls enough is enough.
Latte was average with Latte art leaving pa lot to be desired and 9.50 for a tiny steak sandwich seems a tad excessive to me!!
Decent burger cooked perfectly but not very juicy or seasoned. Fries were the kind of old limp shoe strings that you would find at the bottom of a bag of Mcdonalds. 40 for 2 waters 2 burgers and 1 fry. I Would not recommend this place to anyone who enjoys a good burger and fries Unless you ve got a lot of money and enjoy a decent burger with sub par fries. Also the wait staff and bussers would not stop bothering us. Kind of strange.
Wait time is ridiculous in the evening if you are just 2. Almost waited one hour after we got the seats. Staff need to learn hospitality. Wasted whole two hours on the strip.
This place is a waist of time and money. My Husband twisted his knee and could hardly walk and was in pain. The woman who called him into an office after an hour and a half wait said that the facility only had one wheel chair and it was in use. My Husband had to hobble from the waiting room to the office. I went down a hall to see that they did have more than one wheelchair. I rolled my Husband to the door and took him to the hospital emergency room where he was taken care of within 40 minutes. We thought the urgicare would be more convenient. WRONG!
olive garden again terrible sauce over cooked pasta dirty table what else busy place welcome to carolina no italian restaurants
Ugh do I have to add a star? There were two vehicles infront of me. All I ordered were two fries and a medium drink about 330 in the afternoon. It was my first time here and decided to go through the drive thru after picking my kids up from school and before we head to the grocery store. Any parent knows you need a calming agent before you take these gremlins anywhere....especially after a long day out to begin with. Lol. Okay so...there were only two vehicles infront of me. Please tell me why MY wait was already going on 26 minutes. Now one vehicle ahead of me...please tell me why that was another 10 minutes. No one came behind me so I reversed the heck out of that drive thru lane before 36 minutes turned into 37mins. Yes nearly 40mins in a drive thru. Mind boggling. I was contemplating doing it 20mins earlier but thought I d try to be patient enough. Pretty patient I d say especially as a toddler is whining most the time. The whole time I was waiting in the drive thru it felt like one of those waits when after ordering you wait and wait and wait...and you start to feel like you ve been forgotten. Why? Because after all that waiting...never ONCE did I see an employee open the window and perhaps apologize for the wait or touchbase on some kind of status. The ONLY time I saw that window open was when they FINALLY handed the food over to the first car in my two car infront of me position. Never...ever...ever...ever... ever...ever...will return. EVER. In fairness when they first opened...we wanted to try it out so we pulled into the drivethru. Same story except we were the ONLY vehicle in the drive thru. Awkward. We were so turned off to even wait a minute longer so we drove off. I m all about second chances. Do not do thirds. Do not care how good of a burger or sandwich they have to offer.
It s no wonder why there are so few of them left given the level and quality of service that is provided. When I ask for help I clearly need help and do not need to be told that I am wrong. Trying to operate a fax machine is not exactly rocket science I asked twice whether I needed to Dial 9 first and was told yes yes yes. And it did not work as you do not need to as I later found out . The fax machine kept on telling me to hang up and retry but at the same time it kept trying to refax my document three times. I kept trying to cancel the request and refax to another number but I kept on getting the recording. I asked for help a few times and everyone said later. I stood there for a good 5 minutes before someone came to help me. Instead of helping me he said I was wrong and the machine is right and walked away. So what should have been a 2 minute task became a 30 minute frustrating ordeal.
I really wanted to love this place especially with all the great reviews on here but I did not find much to rave about. I came in with my family for lunch and I ordered one of the specials that was posted on a board near the cash register. A turkey muenster and spinach panino that came with a side of fruit or a salad for 8.00. To wash it down I also ordered a mixed berry cooler because it was recommended by the cashier as being delicious and also because they could not tell me what a starlet cooler was ... so it seemed safe to order something that sounded like they knew how to make. I did not order any baked goods for one reason ... they were not labeled and the girls behind the counter did not offer to name them all out. There were over 7 baked goods to choose from but to have to point at glass and ask what s that .. for each item was not going to happen. I received my drink first and let me tell you this cooler was not cool .. it was just berries and sparkling water. Bland and boring. Then came my panino ... I was disappointed before I even took a bite because right away I noticed the cheese was not muenster but havarti. I m not one to make a fuss about food mess ups at an eatery unless there s like a bug in it so I just accepted the havarti. But I took it personally as if the girls behind the counter looked at me and decided I would have no idea that they used the wrong cheese. It would have been different if they said oh hey we ran out of muenster would you mind having havarti instead? And the reason I know they ran out of muenster and just did not mess up the cheese you ask? Well it s because while I was staring at the non muenster cheese a patron walked in and ordered the same sandwich but that patron was told they were out of muenster ... Moving on from the cheese ... I took a bite and dang it if the sandwich was not as bland and boring as my drink on top of dry. No dressing no flavor cold bread with meat and spinach. At that point I was sad at my decision to visit sugar happy. I most likely came in on an off day but I doubt I would be back.
girlfriend received rook piercing and placement was so superficial that after six days it ripped out of her ear. Tried to call shop to complain and got nowhere but asked to call back in an hour. Nothing can be physically done because we are from out of town except to complain and make sure it does not happen to somebody else.
Horrible service we waited 10 mins. before we had to ask for someone to take our order and we were the only two there besides 3 loud drunks at the bar!
TERRIBLE!! When we arrived we checked in and they gave us a room with not enough beds. We then went back downstairs and they had no rooms available to accommodate the four of us. We waited a while and they were able to find us a room with a pull out sofa. When we pulled out the sofa bed there were dirty sheets and dirty blankets on it. It took a while before they brought up clean sheets and blankets. We had to make the bed ourselves. The shower walls were stained yellow and there was mold in the corners. There are plenty of surrounding hotels so pick one of them.
My husband and I just spent 20 25 min walking through the entire store looking to refurnish our home. Not one person said hello asked if we needed any help or even made eye contact until we were leaving then they said have a great day . I understand if all associates are busy helping other customers but to disregard us is poor service. As a field leader in the retail business I am disappointed and ashamed for this location.
I miss the old original Warshaw s on St.Laurent. I remember going in there and practically decorating everything in my first apartment from the old store. They had it all. Great location great furniture great big gold framed Rococo mirrors giant plants floral papasan chairs at a fraction of what you would pay at Pier 1.Then you had all the knick knacks and odds and ends to look at. Now it s re located to the Atwater market area firmly ensconced among the gentrified factories turned condos along the Lachine canal. Now it s on one floor instead of two Ok 1 and 1 2 if you include the ramp in the back . Now the plants are majorly overpriced and so are the kitchen goods and gadgets probably in line with keeping up with their new yuppie clientele. Now the people who work the cash are pretty rude and abrupt when long ago they were friendly enough to even deliver bigger purchases. You know a situation is bad when you ve just bought a whole slew of plant potters and you need to ask for a bag and get a scowl in return. While it s true their kitchen selection has some neat one of a kind stuff it s not fun coming here anymore. It feels more like a chore. If you re looking for good healthy but affordable plants go to Canadian Tire at Alexis Nihon. Come here for your fridge magnets salad bowls and coffee mugs.
Service from manager Lilabeth was the worst ever. Did not care that Calimari was undercooked. Sooooo rude.
I only gave 2 stars because the tech who worked the ticket from Samsung seemed interested in helping me out. Otherwise 1 star was BEST zero would have been better. On July 7 2017 I received a call from NICOLE to advise me that the techs were ahead of schedule and would like to come out earlier to which I accepted. When she regurgitated her script about the service charge and that the unit was out of warranty I stopped her and told her that the ticket should have indicated that SAMSUNG was covering all parts and labor since the ticket was issued stemming from a BBB case. NICOLE demeanor was symbolic to a lazy bus station bathroom attendant in that she exhibited EXTREME verbal queues that really she could not give a shit and it was my problem . I asked to speak to someone else and the 2nd person woman I spoke to was very professional apologized that I have been inconvenienced and suggested a call to Samsung because they were not able to modify the ticket. So I did I reached an extremely professional customer service agent by the name of Haley NICOLE should follow her example and the ticket was updated with notes that the fee would be waived. I contacted SAMSUNG and had the ticket corrected. I spoke with an amazing rep by the name of Hailey who really knew how to do her job. I was happy that is until I called your business back to confirm the dispatch. Thinking that YOUR company would call me back to confirm which never happened I called and this time Nicole was SO RUDE that I felt it was important to speak to her manager. First she told me that she was the only one there everyone was at lunch. Then when I asked for a name she refused and get regurgitating is there anything else I can help you with ? When I demanded the name of her manager she told me that SHE was the manager and again refused to transfer the call to anyone else. Hell the janitor could have taken the call and I would have been more satisfied with that conversation than the one I was having with this woman who AGAIN hung up on me. DISGUSTING. Your tech showed up and he was very courteous. While he sounded like he knew what the problem was he relied on the diagnosis of the machine. While he was here I called back and spoke to Maria and explained what happened. She assured me that my complaint would be addressed. What was concerning though is that she did not know the names at least the first name only of the employees that work there. Your tech made his recommendations I thanked him for the visit and he left. To say that there is some validity regarding the complaints that are online about your business is to state this lightly. While I realize that ever know and then you will run across an employee who seemed like a good fit at the time of the interview but turns out to be a detriment sometimes COSTLY to the business there is still the responsibility of the management team to insure that the people who interact with your customers whether they are direct or from major entities like SAMSUNG should be treating those callers with respect and common courtesy. If they ca not handle doing that then perhaps that person is not a good fit. This is the case with NICOLE or whatever the hell her name is. Maria when I had the opportunity to speak with her which took 3 phone calls to your office remembering that of those 3 I was hung up on twice stated that she did not know anyone by the name of NICOLE or PATRICE. That s a pretty unbelievable statement considering that she works with these people everyday UNLESS your operation hires repeatedly because of the bad apples you bring into your workforce. At the end of the day I could care less if you choose to pay people who clearly have no interest whatsoever of helping you keep a solid customer base. Why not right? So easy to file bankruptcy these days and start new with a different DBA. Overall SAMSUNG heard an earful when I called them after dealing with NICOLE or PATRICE or whatever the hell her name is. I escalated the call and ripped into the supervisor that I spoke with about my experience and asked for the regional manager of vendor relations to contact me. NO you should not be doing the service calls for a company like SAMSUNG because your office maintains ZERO responsibility and professionalism. The reviews on YELP should have clued you in on this a long time ago. I will never recommend your company despite the fact that the tech was pleasant and seemed helpful. I plan on getting a second opinion about his solution but this is not uncommon. YELP is going to get a review from me as well and I plan on sharing my experience with that asshole who answers your phone when the employees who really want to be there are at lunch. Hopefully you will take this matter seriously as it DOES affect you and get rid of the dead weight in your office. I HIGHLY DOUBT that Nicole had the SPINE to give me her real name.
The reason I only rate Satori 2 stars is their lunch pricing is uneven reasonable for some things and outrageous for others. The hamachi sashimi portion is a good size for 13 as was the chirashi for 15. What seemed high for what you get was 3 for a green tea bag and 6 for seaweed salad. This restaurant is listed here at Yelp to be but these two lunch items as well as the miso soup were expensive for what you get. The service was slow and surly.
First off this appears to be a franchise of some sort... Locations all over including 3 in the valley. I read the other review just now and found myself saying that sounds familiar . We got on board with these guys following a special ad from AAA for a door tune up and quiet rollers. Within minutes of the service guys arrival out door was no longer functional. Hmm. 800 to fix it and conveniently he had the parts on the truck. Nope not falling for it. In short we called his manager and miraculously it was working again in a few minutes. Ironically we were talking with my inlaws who live here in the valley and they had almost the verbatim incident with the company at their house. We ve since has to replace our spring mechanism but not by precision and the cost was under 300 including everything including taxes. Versus 800 with Precision . Baed on what I have seen and read I would never refer anyone to this guys. It seems like a pretty organized scam. Shame!
The Brown Ale was delicious ca not remember the name but the alcohol is def. the best part about the place. But frankly put this place was way overhyped. I went here for an office get together and we ordered just about every appetizer and shared plates. Nothing stood out to me that would separate it from any other steak and fish place in the area.
I had been a loyal customer for several years until recently. In the last year they raised their monthly rate we were paying twice without telling me. In addition the technicians did not show up in the scheduled timeframe on several occasions. When I finally called to speak to someone about my issue with their pricing the manager I spoke to was not only rude but did not try to save me as a customer whatsoever. If that s how much they care about my business then they wo not be getting it. I will never recommend them to anyone. Find another company that values their customers!
The worse meal out in the five years I ve been in Phoenix. For starter I ordered pork bites and greens. with no meat at all just chunks of fat. Entree ordered was a hot chicken served with cornbread. I received a leg and thigh no white meat heavily greasy breading which tasted like Louisiana hot sauce and paprika There was a big hunk of dry cold inedible cornbread with some mystery white stuff drizzled on top....should never have been served. The side of mashed potatoes though cold had good flavor. Our server was fine and I felt sorry for him due to the awful food. Meal and tip was 50.00 .....needless to say I will never go back. Unless they get new chefs with high food standards this place wont last. Yuck
This place was great when they first opened but they have greatly declined in the last year. The food is cooked in what tastes like old oil and everything tastes the same. Spices and salt and butter is barely used resulting in a meal that s oily and bland. The sushi was dry and tasteless. The rice fell apart before you could even eat it. I think they ve tried way to hard to cut corners but have only lost customers.
The orders came out wrong and blame on customers. Not planning to go back. Food is standard service is so so
Cute truck but my treats tasted like they were a week old. Extremely dry and disappointing. I have to say the man working was very kind!
Out of all the Filiberto s this one has always been the one either messing orders up or food being cold and not fresh. For being always open it hardly is ever full with people inside or with cars in line at the drive thru. Definitely not coming back and not recommending to friends or others. Maybe consider driving to Bethany Home and I 17 or 43rd Ave and Camelback.
Do not under any circumstances rent from these people or use their management services unless you enjoy being scammed. They try every trick in the book to squeeze as much as possible from owners and tenants. A quick search online reveals quite a few disgruntled owners I m surprised they re still in business but that s Vegas for you. Do yourself a favor and stay far far away.
If you are a vegetarian then by all means order the pastrami. If you can find the meat or even taste it you are doing better than I did. Overpriced to be sure. I asked if the pastrami was hot the cashier said yes but it was not . When I took it back the manager asked them to put it on the grill for me. When I got it back still not hot. Later the manager came over and took our trays and said he was glad we enjoyed our dinner. He did not ask if we enjoyed our dinner and quite frankly I did not . Also the meal cost me twelve dollars for a sandwich chips and a drink! I wo not go back.
After telling my dad it was a part that needed to be changed and him paying to get it changed the same problem happened again with his car. So he took it back and they fixed something else for another 350 bucks... Seems like this problem should have been diagnosed originally. He spent over 600 on a part that should have only coated 350... This trumps my original post. You can be the friendliest person in the world if a error is made that makes me pay extra money my trust will go down. We ve started using another shop since this experience.
Visited this Tea Station for the first time in Vegas. Came here for an quick lunch before heading home. The food Microwave microwave and more microwave.. If they were not microwaved they must be really good making their food taste like microwaved food.... The drink is ok... Taste very watered down.... The service what service? We came in right after they opened NOBODY was in the store we still had to stand for aobut 5 min before anyone achnowledged us.... After seating the table and chairs are sticky.... The waitress spoke English which we could not undertand but the accent is obvious China ish. So we started speak Mandarin to her. Of course the service is still not better.. Obvious this store is run by people from China.. which has no service concept at all....When to go the cold drink they gave us a styrofoam cup...I asked why do not you guys use paper cup for more environmental friendly or plastic cup at least we can recycle... The answer is because it cost cheaper for them.... Not a good business practice.
I was invited to an event here for channeling meditation. I agree with all the other post the grounds emit a peaceful atmosphere and great energy abounds. But all that good feeling came crashing down when a woman from the church huffed into the area and very rudely let it be known that we were not welcome there. The funny thing I was the only one there! I was waiting for the group of people who had just arrived. Geez talk about being made to feel lke I somehow personally offended this person! The person coordinating the event told me she and others met on the grounds all the time and never had a problem. Who knows what this woman s problem was that day. All I know is I will never step foot in that place again.
Let me start by saying this place is WAY overpriced for what you re getting. I had the cod tacos which were good. However the tacos were pretty small and not tasty enough to be worth 9 by themselves. My wife got the carnitas tacos and those were not good at all. The meat had no flavor and the tacos were minuscule. The calamari fries were pretty good and the aioli sauce that came with it was tasty. So if you like Rubios I d suggest going there over this place or go to Mangos in Mesa. Your bill will be cheaper and the food will be better.
It s a mediocre faux Irish pub with a patio that looks out onto the concrete monoliths of the financial district. The food s okay the servers are fast the beer is fine but ultimately it s not someplace I d return. I almost feel bad for this review because Fionn MacCool s is a very fine example of it s kind but mediocre faux Irish pubs just are not my thing.
I ll keep it short and sweet for this one... 1 Be very careful of all the raw meats being SO close together! I think I saw some people only using one tong for all the meats... eee! 2 It s hard to gauge how much spices powders you put into your bowl... so be careful. Sometimes less is more. Service is alright you build your own plate they cook it and then they bring it to your table do not expect much but have fun with it I guess.
You had better check on your free 3 day pass SAM TRIED TO CHARGE A 20 DAY FEE EVEN THOUGH WE HAD PRINTED PASS. I would like to cancel my membership. This is the second time that I brought in a prospective member with a paper 3 day pass and when we arrived at the club they would not let us work out SAM told r that it was not reflected in the computer I offered to pull it up on the phone we obviously had our 3 day pass with the pass ID number HL8YEG printed on paper. this is beyond irritating and completely unnecessary horrible management skills can remember and paid full price for over 7 years.Sam is the manager.I will be taking my full price membership my kids club membership and my friend to a different gym that s more accommodating
I just heard back from my mechanic and he said that the engine was misfiring and not working because there was a spark plug that may have either been faulty or gapped improperly. I am still sticking with my opinion based on my experience. The only reason this update gets a star is because I have to give a star rating. When you re done being ripped off by these scheisters you can take your car to Lorne Park Car Centre and Roman will fix these show makers mess.
DO NOT TAKE YOUR VEHICLE HERE. They just want your money they do not actually care whether or not they fix your vehicle.
Found out their so called Complimentary Roadside assistance plan is not complimentary at all! Requires credit card to be held as deposit and reimbursement of up to 75 or less to be credited back to you which could take up to two weeks or more! You are better off with AAA or Costco roadside assistance as it is a major hassle with the towing company they use as they put the work of contacting the actual towing company on you! So basically their 800 is just a referral svc handing out phone numbers for towing companies. What a Joke!! As for the work not the greatest. Took my car in for a radiator flush and upper lower hose replacements. They advised hoses were still good so just did radiator flush. When they were done i asked if there were any leaks or problems as i just purchased the car and they stated No leaks no problems . Now every time i drive the car and come home and park it radiator fluid puddles up under the car....Definitely is a problem! Missed diagnosis incompetence or inexperience??? Not sure but will not be going back!
Worst food ever. I am a huge fan of crud essence and panthere verte was next door so I decided to try it. Worst food ever. I had the BBQ tofu sooooooooooo disgusting I left everything. And my husband had the falafels they were so greasy oil was leaky off. Terrible experience. Hated it. Will never go again!!
Atmosphere Cafeteria like but nicer. Right next to casino equals excellent people watching. Food Canned Nachos I call it that cause almost all the toppings came out of a can. Canned cheese canned chili and beans canned tomatoes. For being in the Wynn Encore hotels PLEASE make nachos with fresh ingredients!? Cobb salad Good. Service You stand in line to order and pay then food is brought to your numbered table. Overall There s A LOT more and better places to eat at in the hotel. This was sort of a last minute decision and our first day in the hotel so we did not know any better.
Arrived purchased my ticket and it took over a hour to get a shuttle. It was cold and had to wait outside for it. It is beyond unacceptable when they claim to run 254 7 365. If I did not purchase a round trip I would not use them to leave. I was already tired from traveling all day so it s beyond acceptable to make customers wait that long.
Low quality food all right place for a quick drink on the road. I ve tried the coconut cream pie shake
Ok so I ve been here before 3 years ago. Was very impressed since it was my first time to Las Vegas. I was not impressed with the check in staff. The ladies who answer the phone are rude and short. I m visiting Vegas again next week and I booked an appointment with a lady who was a bit rude or not so friendly and when I called today to ask a question the lady was so unpleasant again so I just canceled my appointment all together. Customer service is very important in the salon and spa industry. I would think the Bellagio would hire some more friendly staff to be the face of their Spa.
The food may be ok but the service is terrible and because of that only 1 star we tried to book a party here and the party manager aka daughter of the owner was rude did not want to accomodate us at all we want to change one of the entree options we were told no we wanted to add additional appetizers and PAY FOR THEM for the entire table and we were told no and that if we did that we could not have a set menu for our guests . Her attitude was very you do not like it do not have your party here and I know numerous people who have had the same experience. It s too bad there are not more greek places in the 905
Ehhhhhhhhh delivery was ehhhh...food decent..not bad....decent communication via online order..discounts arent great
We were out at the chocolate festival and parked in front of this place. It looked warm and inviting so we decided to give it a try. The cafe was neat clean and appears to seat 12 20 guests. However the owner looked unhappy to have us walk in as customers. She then pointed to a sign that stated cash only. She passed out the menus meanwhile there was a TV blaring in the background. She came to take drink orders I ordered milk off the menu for my son she informed us milk was a breakfast only item. So he had to take a water. I ordered a coffee asked if I wanted creamer it came with a light splash of creamer and no spoon and had been reheated in the microwave. Bathroom did not have paper towels. We ordered the Pulled Pork Sandwiches for the adults the kids each got a side since there was not a kids menu or kid friendly items on the dinner menu. The sides were Mac n Cheese and a side salad with ranch. The food came quickly. The pulled pork was moist and well seasoned. The sauce was a touch spicy for my taste and reminiscent of Manwich sauce. It was served on a small toasted bun with a side if coleslaw. The coleslaw was the star of the plate the cabbage was crunchy the sauce was perfectly tangy without too much vinegar it was simply perfect. The side of Mac had been reheated in a microwave crumb topping was stale and pasta stuck together and was dry and hard on edges. Side salad was fresh it consisted of iceberg lettuce and purple cabbage. The bill was 29 and change for two entrees two sides a coffee lemonade and 2 waters. We paid with 40 she brought back a 10 and change. Service was no where near deserving of a 30 tip so rather than getting a few dollars we had planned on with only large bills in our pockets we decided not to leave any. Half way through meal another family walked in and the owners demeanor remained the same. Very disappointing. Summary inconsistent food quality horrible service owner and son both very unhappy people. no refills offered or served after requesting refill.
If your looking for sushi go somewhere else... Sorry Shiki but my boyfriend and I were looking for some sushi! We had drove by the place we normally have sushi and there was a line out the door so I suggested we go have something at Shiki. They staff was welcoming but when we looked at the menu we were disappointed. The sushi selection was very lacking. Specialty rolls are pretty much non existent. All in all we did not stay for dinner.
Quick summary....burned funnel cake dry turkey leg soggy hot dogs that were literally grey old watery lemonade passed off as a lemon shake up overpriced items from Ecuador and Mexico for sale no desirable rides basically a complete waste of time and money. Can you make memories? Sure...but a better classification would be regrets.
I had the basic hotdog I think it s the 1 with various condiments and was unfortunately a bit disappointed. I was looking forward to finding out what the big deal was about a Vienna hotdog apparently made famous in Chicago. Frankly I could not see what all the hype was about. At 4.50 I thought it was way pricey for what it was. Not a bad dog just nothing thrilling. The dog did not have much flavor or snap at all. Buried under a lot of condiments it could have been any type of dog at all no different or better than the average dog out there. The bun was somewhat a cut above typical fast food it had poppy seeds and was okay but nothing particularly special. It came with fries which were good although a tad salty but still good with a somewhat different fuller flavor than fries I ve had elsewhere.. I liked the cute little brown bag they are served in and they never got limp so that s a plus. But getting back to the hotdog....I liked the neon green relish the best lol....but I did not go for the relish I went for the dog. At 4.50 I wo not be trying it again. I do not know what I was expecting but it did not send me to the moon or anything. Darn! Oh well maybe other people have a different opinion and to each their own. But the place is clean looks well run and I guess is popular for certain sandwiches which run upwards of 6 8 which again is too much for me unless it s amazingly outstanding. Judging from the hotdog which for me was meh I d have to be seriously convinced to make another stop in here.
Terribly rude staff. Had to go back and have nails redone. Tried to make me think it was all my fault. Would not recommend and will never go back.
Meh! I do not think this place is worth the hype. We had it at a dinner party and were all super excited after hearing about it from a friend living in Toronto. The cake comes in a cute box and is pretty to look at. We followed the instructions we were given on how to heat it up and I was excited to finally try it. Honestly it was just OK. Maybe I was expecting more of a cheesecake consistency. Regardless I did not find it to have that much flavour and the texture was not for me. It was bland to say the least.
I had a horrible experience at this place. I went in to get my power button fixed.A month or two later a technician called me saying they r still trying to get it and finally they got the part. When I got down there they could not find it and they asked if I could wait a bit and see if he can match it I said ok walked around and came back a hour later and they took it upon themselves to fix it. They tell me they can not fix it due to water damage. I asked why did y all work on it? So another employee sent me a picture of the release form allowing them to work on it that I did not sign but they had forged my signature. I know for sure there was no previous water damage. When I finally got my phone back it did not work at all and the owner only offered to give me a refund for the part and no extra compensation for destroying a perfectly good phone. I would not recommend taking your phone here.
Had the same experience as Mackenzie E. Called them in advance before I placed an order for a rockabilly blouse never received a call back. Against my better judgment I ordered the item anyway from their website. Received order conf. number but no tracking information for the item or anything. Two weeks passed no sign of the blouse. I have called 3 additional times and left messages no one ever answers. Also sent an email inquiring as to whether they are still in business and no sign of life. Very scary that these people have my credit card info! Absolutely the worst business I have ever dealt with. I am ready to report them to the BBB if they re even still in business .
Please go to this place if you want your order screwed up. Every. Time. You. Go. Seriously. My kids always ask for this dumb places food and every time we get home there s something missing. I guess I should know by now but I m paying them to make sure my food is there. Why do I have to do their job? Unless you order one item you ll be missing something. Mark my words. Enjoy!
This was my first visit to Eribertos. The restraunt is small with about 6 tables to dine at. The staff is friendly and accomdating and thats why I feel terriberible having to say the food just was not very good. On this visit we ordered chips salsa beef tacos a beef burrito and a carnitas burrito. The salsa chips were okay. I was disappointed with the carnitas burrito as I was with the beef burrito the meat was somewhat dry and slightly overcooked. The burritos are packed full of meat but lacked any other ingredients. I think the burrito would have been flavorful had it had a little more pico de gallo and seasoning as would the beef burrito. The pricing is very wallet friendly you can get a better Mexican meal but you ll have a hard time getting more food for the price.
Unfortunately I felt like the brunch was overrated. The quality of food was lacking for 29 a person not to mention the unlimited drinks for 10. You are not able to switch between beverages on the list so if one drinks mimosas you drink the mimosas the entire time. They tasted like Andre with a watered down juice mixture. The food was not unique or satisfying. We ordered sushi rolls which ended up being pretty much vegetarian with the minute slice of salmon in one piece. As for the entrees I can make better hollandaise sauce at home. The dessert was however satisfying a creamy uncaramelized creme brle wth fresh fruit. When looking at quality vs quantity SumoMaya fails in both areas. This is a place where they want you to think it s high class with the prices but do not waste your money.
BAD BAD BAD SERVICE. I absolutely agree with all past reviews this place needs to go out of business or to get a new team. I do not normally write reviews but this place Active Green Ross at Promenade Mall in Thornhill is the worst and deserves special efforts to inform others. Unfortunately I have not looked at the reviews of other customers before I came here for the first time. The customer service representative by name Chris Fedus so he called himself is an absolutely disaster... He is not only rude and dishonest but also very pathologically vindictive. They always overbooked they giving you appointment in 2 3 weeks and then have a regular practice to cancel your appointment at last minute with offer to reschedule it to another 2 3 weeks without guarantee that it will not be cancelled again etc. They never worried about your time even if you are lucky to get the appointment they wo not even touch your car for a minimum of two three hours. In my case my Friday s appointment was cancelled in last minute over the phone and I was offered a reservation to come at early morning on Saturday. I knew that in this day they are working on first come first serve basis but I was guaranteed to get a service. Like fun... when I arrived at 7 50 10 min. before opening I found a line of 8 10 people in process of registration. At 8 00 formal opening I counted 10 more people after me. At 8 00 when I got to the counter the clerk on a front desk announced a closure of the bookings for the day since they reached a daily limit. I had an appointment and was not worried... However the clerk rudely said that he has no idea who called me yesterday who cancel my yesterday s appointment and who promised me etc. He can only suggest me to make another appointment in 2 weeks. It was enough for me. I just asked to bring me my winter tires which they had in storage. The clerk responded that it will take around 30 to 60 minutes. To my question why not to ask one of his employees to bring them right now since they should be on production floor behind his door he said that he is short in staff. When I started discuss this issue with a people behind me on the line the clerk told me that now my tires will be ready in 2 hours.... When I asked his name he called himself Chris Fedus and then rudely added that now my tires will be ready in 3 hours....
Its a really sad night when you ve run out of shrimp steak and sashimi grade staples like yellowtail and albacore. BR needs to revamp its decor its aging and not trendy against the hotel. Pretty empty the night we went a Thursday at 9pm and then having run out of staples.
We were excited to try this restaurant but were unfortunately not impressed. The decor was wait there was not any decor. I ordered the French onion soup and I could not even finish it. It was salty not enough broth and way too much cheese. My husband ordered the octopus and did enjoy that. For the main I had the pacific shrimp with pasta. The pasta was soooo salty!! I did not eat much of this dish either. My husband ordered the New York strip but for 55 he had a better strip steak two days ago at a local place in Arizona. My husband ordered the Brussel sprouts which were good but some too salty as well. Unfortunately disappointed as a whole. The service however was excellent!
I know these kids are just learning but this was a joke. Actually left laughing about how bad it was. Summary Waiter spoke zero English and could comprehend nothing that did not involve pointing to the menu Said waiter spent most of the time hitting on another waitress which seems reasonable since they re in college I guess and sitting around giggling like schoolgirls for most of our dinner Food was bland poorly cooked and poorly presented Service if you have not guessed was awful to non existent Asked for a four course meal was charged for a four course meal but only received three. Language barrier came in huge here. Decided to just pay for the missing course in the interest of more expeditiously leaving and forgetting I had ever been.
Burgers. If you follow me you know I love them. You also know that I rarely leave a one star review. Today s trip to Red Robin was frustrating. I had Mom and Dad with me today out for a late valentines date. We were greeting only after my dad said hello to the Hostess. She was too busy blowing up balloons to say hello. Our server was quickly at our table and slow to bring the wrong drinks. My dads a diabetic and she brought him sweetened peach tea after he asked multiple times if it was unsweetened. Whatever. She eventually got it right. She takes our order from memory. She also forgot to introduce herself so she s fortunate that her name is not smeared throughout this review. I HATE when servers do that. You re not gonna remember everything. Our food comes out and dads fries are on moms plate mom does not have her spicy sauce on the side and my burger that was supposed to be pink is well done. There s also only five fries on my plate. So I placed a reorder. Ten minutes later no fries. Dads ready for more too. She s over at the bar on her phone. Sorry I use my phone a lot but never in front of the people I work with or does it deter me from doing my job. This girl was Candy Crushing something serious when I walked over to the bar and asked about the fries. Oh I did not know you wanted more! was her response. Again whatever. The manager comes out with the fries in what seems like a millisecond. He tosses them on the table ignores our empty drinks and goes away with no interaction. I always wonder why you wait for an eternity here. They re never busy. Their parking lot is basically just overflow for Mitchell s. I ll say it a third time as never go back to homestead whatever. Happy Eating Just not here!
this is located in a dingey tiny food court in a hidden plaza .... surprisingly the parking lot is always full and you will likely have to park underground. most of the people here are coming to either Maple Yip restaurant. or to one of the two dirty rub and tug places here... i drove to the back looking for parking and saw them fanning out their white towels. anyways the food is below average .. the roast pork skin was not crispy at all.. hard and chewy like it was a day old. The actual pork tasted good though.. but the skin was pure fail. the roast duck skin was once again a fail.. soggy and not crispy. and they charge 35 cents for green onion and ginger... this food court cost more than the one closer to agincourt across the street. i will likely never return.
The drive thru is a joke!! There are supposed to be two lanes and just because one lane has five cars and someone drives up to the other one the one car lane has to wait for the other five cars since they were first!! Are you serious?! And the service at the pharmacy is so slow inside. Truly disappointing!! So much for the neighborhood CVS! I made to need to make a change.
Terrible. The food is subpar at best and for 70.00 per person price point that s ridiculous. You do get a 6 course meal however after the first meal you ll be wondering why am I doing this the food is terrible. Hoping my meal would get better course after course it just got worse course after course. This is not a high class restaurant no matter how they try or how much they charge. The menu is all vegan also which I had no idea and no one told me. Wish I would checked yelp before even thinking about going to this place. I m literally eating McDonald s an hour after spending 167.00 at this place including tip. Completely unsatisfied the Big Mac is more gourmet then the food at Blackout. Now let me be fair and say something nice....... uh my server was cool. Bottom line do not go unless you enjoy wasting money.
I was so ready to love this place. I recommended to my friends that we go here after work to enjoy drinks and some dinner before the big Chandler Perry High School state semi final football game across the street at Hamilton High School. Big mistake. My husband and I showed up about a half hour after my friends. It took the waitress 20 minutes to come over to our table and take our drink order. We then had to wait 30 more minutes to be served a beer and a glass of wine. When she finally delivered the drinks we asked what the hold up was and her response was Our bartenders are really chatty tonight. Sorry. Seriously? That s what you tell us? We then wanted to order some food before heading to the game. We asked her if the wait for food would be the same as the wait for our drinks and she said that it probably would be worse and would take between 30 and 45 minutes to get some nachos and a burger. We decided not to order any food at that point settled our bill and left. Wo not be going back. Update 12 02 16 Well after tonight s CBS evening news dirty diners piece I saw The Ginger Monkey received the most health code violations 7 . It is unlikely that I will ever visit the restaurant again and would recommend that all diners stay away.
RIP OFF!!!! I tried making online reservations for my dog and was given an unavailable message so I took her someplace else. well after coming back from vacation I find a 42 charge from 4 paws pet resort! they did call while I was gone and left a voice mail trying to get my vet records then called the next day and hung up. I called them today and the staff passed me around a few times then said well our system does not have an unavailable message so NO...we are not going to refund your charge. GOTO PETSMART PetHotel instead!!!!
Worst experience ever in Sephora I ve been going to them for years and the one time I try to return something that has already made bad reviews they did not accept it. The product made me greasy and broke me out and I told them I was sticking with it to see if it would get better but it did not . I was talking to an older woman with glasses do not go to her. I will shop at ULTA from now on. Worst guest experience.
Okay saying that I love Asian food is darn near the understatement of the century. And I mean I love both the legit stuff I get when in Asia and the western versions sold most everywhere else. So after relocating to Charlotte I was excited when I first noticed an Asian restaurant on the way home from my office. As is my custom when trying any restaurant for the first time I pick something easy but not simple in this case it was Chicken Pad Thai. My theory is this if they can do that well then everything else should be good. Like getting a plain vanilla ice cream the first time you go to a local really local ice cream shop. If that is good it will all be good or at least some variation of acceptable. I am sad to report that I could not eat the Pad Thai. After two bites I tossed it in the trash. And you should understand that I was blessed with the intestinal fortitude of a billy goat and I do not believe in wasting food. That is not how I was raised no ma am. But I simply could not eat the dish. It was quite unfortunately horrible in so many ways. I wish I could try this place again but I wo not . And frankly I would not recommend it to anyone else either. To be honest I was a little concerned when I was exposed to their exceptionally lengthy menu that is always a warning sign.
This is one of the pathetic restaurant in the town. Worst Service I ordered chicken biryani for take away and they took my order over the phone. I went to pick up after 30 minutes of placing the order and yet I had to wait for another 40 45 minutes. My advice to Dakshin Staff If you did not had the Biryani you should not take order from customer. They accepted my order and after reaching only they said we have Dakshin Special Biryani at the same price 12.99. Dakshin will never say no to your order and offer you something weird just to make money. Terrible Taste About the Biryani I can only say it was one the worst Biryani s I ever had. For the name of Dakshin Special Biryani they mixed chicken curry and rice along with pickle spices. We were not able to eat even half box. Overcharge They said 12.99 per box but they charged me 14.99 and that s what appearing in my credit card statement. No tip was given by me as it was take away order. So basically they are cheating customer as well. This is not my first and last experience with terrible food quality of Dakshin. I went there for couple of times and experienced same bad quality food. Avoid this place.
Went on a Weds. night before a downtown show. Place is about 1 2 full. Took 30 minutes to receive glass of wine 45 minutes to receive appetizer. After an hour of waiting finally received meal which we had 5 minutes to gulp down before rushing out to catch show. Another couple that came in 5 minutes later never received their meal. This way everytime we go 3rd time . I will not give them another chance. Owner said well this place is bigger than it looks and we have a small kitchen. ??? Is this my problem?
Planned and executed a gathering of friends here because their reviews on another site were so good. This was not a good experience. We ordered a pizza and a calzone to start. The calzone had very little filling. We ordered a meat lovers pizza with mushrooms. They made us the wrong pizza. We also ordered barbecue wings which came out cold twice! At which point we asked for a refund. When we finally got the correct pizza it was actually very good. However overall it was a poor quality experience. Will not likely return.
I had the Farmer Boy burger. It looked awesome in the photos with the guacamole and those fat patties. I sad to report that the burger was really disappointing. Guac The guacamole portioning is so dismal that I could not see if from the outside of the burger. I had to open up the top to see it. Pickles Anyone? They had also put two pieces of pickles outside of the burger. I get it some people do not like pickles and you want to give customers the choice. But! there were also pickles inside the burger too! That was certainly interesting. Patty These were densely packed patties kind of what you get at McD s. For a 7 burger and the advertised 1 2 lbs I expected better. Buns The buns were big enough to span the whole burger but they were not adequate for actually holding the burger together. About half way through my buns ripped in half and the burger fell apart. I had mayo running down the side of my hand. Service ok so the only reason this gets more than one star is the staff. They were generally very friendly. I was about to clean up the table and take the tray to the trash when a staff member offered to take care of it for me. That was a nice touch.
Other than my first visit when I purchased my dress the customer service at Bowties was terrible. There s more to customer service than calling people sweetie . They do not keep their promises and make it well known that you are not the only bride. In addition I ordered the dress in the size they recommended after doing my measurements and it turned out the dress was too small for my chest. The owner told me my dress would fit a certain way and it did not. During my first fitting my seamstress continually shook her head in disbelief that I wanted my dress to be form fitting and fit a certain way. I almost walked out. I would not recommend any bride to buy her dress here.
Be warned they are open until 11 but wo not serve past 10 15. Took a cab all the way there knowing they closed at 11 just to be turned away at 10 15. Very disappointing! I thought this was Vegas? If you do not allow anyone in past 10 15 list that as closing time! Who turns away thirsty people? Update your information. Waste of time and cab ride.
They started out great! Went to them back in Oct 2011 to get my battery replaced and they did it without hesitation. So when my power steering pump gave out a few weeks ago I decided to go back to them. They special ordered my pump and got it in two days. Unfortunately the pump did not work properly so I went back a week later to get a replacement. Another order had to be placed and I was told it would arrive in two days. Two days later I call to see if it arrived and I was told my order had been cancelled due to a non payment! Say what?! So I decided to get a refund and tried to get the pump from another store. Unfortunately the other store s pump did not come with the sensor adapter so I decided to go back to Autozone and place yet another order 3 in 2weeks . This third attempt is what brought me to write this review. I was told by the Assistant Manager who took my special order that it would arrive either the next day by 3pm or the following morning. I decided to go with the latter and called in 845am that morning. They could not find it so they decided to give me the run around and tell me that it s scheduled to arrive that afternoon by 3pm. I call back 430pm that afternoon and they still could not find my pump. So the following morning I decide to go into the store and speak with the Store Manager to see what was going on. He informs me that their computer shows my special order pump did arrive but it was redirected to their warehouse which in turn got sent back to their distributor. I was so upset and livid that I could not even make complain about their poor service and communication with me.
If a customer chooses to wait for fresh pizza you should never charge them extra do so. I was there yesterday around 3 00pm and ordered the Italian Cheese Bread. Lady at the counter offered the hot and ready ICB in the warmer. I insisted it looked unappetizing and chose to wait for a fresh one. I stepped over to the side and waited 5 minutes. And then the lady at the counter approached me and demanded I paid an additional 1.00 more the fresh ICB THAT I ALREADY PAID FOR which made no sense to me. I asked for a manager and found out it was he who delegated to the associate I had no choice but to pay the dollar or take what s in the warmer. I called their corporate number and later found out the Silverado Ranch and Bermuda store is owned by a franchisee. I later visited the store on Durango and Warm Spring which was corporate owned and found out you do not have to pay an additional amount of money to have your pizza freshly prepared. Little Caesars on Silverado Ranch and Bermuda practices scamming their customers and not giving a cufk about it. All this for pizza right?
Meh. Conceptually fun. Executionally challenged. Room does not look old but was not properly cleaned. Big wad of black hair in toilet red wine stain on bath tub. V low water pressure for filling said amazing but dirty whirlpool tub. No bar soap no iron no ironing board no blow dryer no room service after 11 pm no gym. Two stars for good bed and sizable room. And friendliness of staff. Staff really above and beyond in the friendliness and ready to serve you dept. However unfortunately cannot make up for a host of ills in the serviceable hotel room category. I would NOT stay here again. It was not outrageously expensive but it was not cheap. We coulda had a V 8 stayed at the Wynn .
I want to like this place because of its location and the gluten free options but the bottom line is that it s just mediocre and way over priced.
Have been coming in a lot since it opened. Boy have they gone downhill! Phoned in an order and came in and paid and I waited for OVER ten minutes. When asked where my order was they forgot to make it. Clerk apologized and said it was on the house....ummmm I paid for it already! Came in again yesterday and they did not have brown rice. Seems like they just do not care anymore. I do not recommend this place anymore. New poke place is open in the Smiths shopping center on Eastern and Horizon Ridge that is so fresh and great service!!!
These people are awful! The company is run like Uber or Lyft without the professional service. The drivers use their own private vehicles. They stranded my 84 year old mother in Glendale Arizona in the summer heat until my mother agreed to pay 25 cash when her insurance company was supposed to pay and then refused to give her change for 40 after taking my mother to the ATM. Unethical unprofessional and unreliable. STAY AWAY!!!!!!
Pathetic is one word to describe this hotel. The rooms are dingy. The elevators are super slow. Most of the lights in your room will not work. They do not even have Showtime or HBO on your room TV. And the entire hotel smells like stale smoke. What else should I of expected from a hotel that prides itself on the number of beer pong tables it has? And do not get me started about Saturday night at the casino. The hotel basically turns into a whos whos of wanna be Las Vegas gangsters. I will give Las Vegas wanna Be s some credit. At least they keep their pants up above their ass unlike their California compatriots. Yuck!
NEVER eat here if there is no owner on site. When an owner is there it s great food. When there is no owner it is room temperature or cold both soup and sandwiches . I have been there alot and every time no owner is there it s horrible.
Just took my dog here and they charged me 400 to not even revive her... my dog had a heart attack and we rushed her to the hospital they tried reviving her and failed once they came out to tell me she had pass they handed me a 400 bill.. to try and revive her..with that I saw they charged me 100!!!! For the box they put her it.. 100 for a cardboard box.. if I knew that I would have had them just hand her back.. I m totally in disbelief... 400 bill for them to do nothing. So here I am with a dead dog and 400 vet bill they did not have payment plans for.. they only care about money here.
Yuck! The greasiest chicken I have ever had it made my stomach upset had to give it to the dog ! The mac and cheese was so nasty it was like soup.. more like slop ! The corn on the cob and the biscuit was the only thing eatable! Will never go here again... Sticking to Popeyes or KFC . Churches your chicken is NASTY !
First impression was the hostess telling us that we were the last reservation of the night 7PM on Saturday so feel free to sit wherever we liked. The restaurant was about 15 full so lots of places to choose from. We chose one of the unfortunately awkward booths long table so if you want to face each other you are far away because the chairs at the tables looked more trendy than comfy. Nice and quiet. Perused the drinks menu and almost choked at the wine prices they are literally charging 19 for a glass of a Sauv Blanc that does not even cost that much PER BOTTLE at the PLCB store. Server came for our drink orders and then vanished for 20 minutes. Given how empty and quiet the place was it was a mystery as to why it took so long. Drinks were ridiculous. My gin cocktail was almost certainly a virgin drink tasted of nothing but citrus and simple syrup and my husband s bourbon cocktail was one inch of drink before you removed the giant ice cube . He then ordered a martini figuring that would at least be a real drunk and that arrived as one third full of a small coupe. All three drinks totaled 50. COME ON. The food was fine not enough to make up for the rest of the oddness the lamb meatballs were actually pretty good but they were oddly shaped some were round and others were just pieces of meatballs so much for presentation. My husband got the cavatelli and the pesto had broken which led to the pasta sitting in a pool of green oil. I got the Po Boy which was impossible to eat as served because the clams were chewy and large and would just pull out of the sandwich when bitten into. My husband s plate was cleared I was about halfway through deconstructing my sandwich so I could eat the clams and our server came over and asked if we were ready for our check. Um what? Not asking if we wanted coffee or dessert was really odd to us but by that point we were one of only three parties remaining in the restaurant it was 8 30 and we thought maybe she really just wanted to leave. We went somewhere else for drinks after. We will not be back.
Worst contractor experience of my life. They had to be watched at every turn because of the half ss work and lack of respect for property. We got stuck with them by insurance company for roof repair. Where to start...left nails and trash everywhere. The roof was not done properly now the roof is bowing all over. Reported to supervisors owners even insurance company. Refused to fix it. they also repaired a couple walls with termite damage. Did not restore to it s original state. The dustboards do not even touch the floor! Again they refused to fix shoddy work. They were not even going to paint the new walls until we nagged them to. naively we had also contracted them to fix our back patio. They used cheap wood beams that oozed sap and they just painted over the sap! last they did stucco work on the house this was all contracted at the beginning because they were recommended by the insurance company . This was awful. They left spikes nails cigarettes ALL OVER our yard and the neighbors yard which they refused to clean up. We have a small dog which they all were told do not leave nails in the yard! We have a dog that could step on this stuff. They did not care. We were picking up their butts and trash for days. and the kicker. They told us this whole project would take 3 weeks. NOPE! more like 3 months! Excuse after excuse. No shows runaround. If you want to avoid pulling your hair out AVOID! For 6 months they continued to send invoices for imaginary expenses which were requested to be corrected over and over. The billing department must be run by monkeys. this is by far the absolute worst company to use. Trying to warn others because no one should have to go thru this stress. ZERO ZERO ZERO STARS!
Let me start by saying my family and I come here alot. Never had an issue. Til today the girl that is at the register to take your payment is so rude. Nasty human being. She complained in front of everyone about her co workers. She kept yelling at each person in line that she hopes they are paying in cash because to her it is faster than using debit or credit? As we were standing there she non stop complained about her three lazy managers because the line was too long for her to handle. I ve never met a more unprofessional person in my life. She should not be anywhere near customer service.
Yummy food and excellent service as always. However Beau and I have been scrupulous when evaluating restaurants hygiene it was unsettling to see them sweep the floor with raw food clean plates and prep bowls so very low to the floor. Most servers had their hair pulled back tightly or very short with one exception and her long loose hair stood out. It was disappointing that they charged extra for a broccoli substitute for pasta.
Came in here at a slow point on a Saturday Night... Asked for their signature cocktail that we had in the same spot the night before. The girl who was bartending was super rude and would not make us the cocktail saying we had to go downstairs to get it. The entire time we were there she acted fake and would not make eye contact when talking to us.. Overall she made our experience awkward and will gladly take our busineisselsware when coming back to Vegas.. Brutal!
Ok then. I reviewed many of the other reviews and thought I was in for a treat. What a disappointment. I have eaten here before when the restaurant was in a corner off of centennial parkway. I did not think it was that good then either but I thought I would give it another try I ordered the traditiomal gyro platter. It came with rice salad pita slices and dipping sauce and a gyro pita sandwich. I tried the rice first. It was bland and dry. The salad was good at least the lettuce was fresh. They gave me some little slices of pita bread and a little bit of dipping sauce. Once again bland. Then I tried the gyro. It looked great. Now I have eaten quite a few gyro sandwiches from different restaurants and am usually satisfied with the taste. The meat lamb in my case is what makes the sandwich. Oh my gosh what a surprise. The meat barely had any flavor at all! Additionally it did not look like it was completely cooked and was very light colored. It was so bland I did not even eat half of the gyro. Very disappointed. I ll give you that the place is nicely decorated and the service staff was good but the food just did not cut it. Prices could be better too but they were not that bad. Wo not be going back here not while Paymons and my favorite Yassou Grill on charleston buffalo are still open. The food at those two is much better than here.
I honestly feel like it is a sham. I feel like as pet owners we all love our pets and when something happens we panic a bit and reach out for help. I called to inquire about the options or what would be done in the case of my pug having a broken paw or upper leg. I was told that the doctor would access her and most likely need to do xrays. I asked how much xrays were and was told they could not answer that. I pressed a bit more and said like between 50 and 100 or 100 and 200 and was told anywhere from 100 to 250. I asked well what would you do for her if you find out her paw is fractured and was told well we would attend it....I asked if they put casts on dogs and was told only the doctor can access that situation. So in the end I brought my dog in they have a fancy lovely lobby almost better than my childrens doctors office and took my pet to the back...they told me they presume she has a fracture and could only determine that with xrays. I went through the same conversation and in the end I am told even if broken they do not really use casts or wraps on dogs but if broken a surgery would most likely be needed...well at 1am you can not get a surgery that is not life or death...so in the end I am going home with my dog and will go and see a regular vet in the morning only I will be 120 lighter in my wallet. I would highly suggest if it is not life or death to get to the morning and go see a regular vet not one that takes advantage of your love for your pet.
I spoke with Sales associate Marco yesterday about a car that was coming in within the next month or so. He insisted that I come in the same day to place a deposit because this was a rare car. So I went and told him I m ready to put the deposit down but first l wanted to see the one they had in stock I wanted to test drive it. He simply refused he would not even open the car in order for me to sit inside or look at it. This was mind boggling to me I told him that if he would not let me test drive it I would have to go somewhere else he said go somewhere else if you want . I could not believe what I was hearing! I asked him for the name of his manager and he refused to give it to me. I went to the reception desk and requested to speak with a manager and another sales associate. Anne had the car ready for me to test drive in 10 minutes. She was great but I would rate her 3 stars because she tried to justify the other guys actions. The manager never appeared. In the end it turns out the vehicle that Marco wanted me to put a deposit on was not even the one I wanted after I asked him twice if it was the color I wanted and he said yes. After this experience I do not even know if I want the Civic anymore but if I do get it it will definitely not be at this dealership. Stay away from Marco folks. Honda West Marco should not work for you.
I would not come here unless you intend to spend an extra 9 and thirty minutes trying to get out of the parking garage. Here s how it will go down pull into the lot. Take a ticket. Proceed to the theater and enjoy your movie I saw Terminator Genisys which I did enjoy despite the fact that the script appears to have been written by a bunch of thirteen year old fanboys immediately after they saw T2 locked in a vault for twenty years and then retouched with some stuff about Facebook being evil . After your movie walk to the parking ticket validator in the lobby. Follow the vague instructions as best you can. Note like Sarah Connor and Kyle Reese trying to destroy Skynet understand that there is nothing you can do at this point that will actually validate your parking . Take your mostly worthless ticket to your car. Where did you park? First floor? Third? It does not matter because everyone has to get in the same enormous line of cars. You ll ask yourself why there seems to be such a long line to get out of the Arizona Center at 11 pm on a Sunday when you ve never seen more than ten people there at any given time. Wait thirty minutes. Once you reach the bottom floor you see that there are at least five exits. All but one of them is closed. And since the validator machine in the AMC lobby seems to have already been infiltrated by Skynet it has not actually validated anyone s parking. Which means that every single person in the garage has to roll up to the only working exit and futz around with it for a few minutes until the disembodied voice takes pity on them and lets them out. Roll up to the exit. Insert your ticket. You will have been charged 9. You re flustered so you insert a credit card just so you can escape. Error. Take your card and try again. Hit the blinking red button. Tell the gentleman on the other end of the line wherever he may be that you tried to validate your parking but the machine is still trying to charge you 9. He will try to tell you how you SHOULD have worked the parking ticket validator next time you need to do the exact same goddamn thing you did this time in order to validate your parking ticket. FML. He takes pity on you at least and tells you to insert the ticket again. This time it spits out a receipt and the arm lifts up releasing you. But do not look at your receipt or you ll see that your card was indeed charged 9. Bet you did not know that you were going to see a porno. Or that you were the star. Because you just got screwed. And spoiler alert Sarah Connor ca not stop Skynet OR get her 9 back.
AMERICAN APPAREL MARKET MALL REVIEW The payment counter was messy and covered in clothing when I went in to make a purchase. The store clerk cashier had to ask me what items were in my order because of the mess of clothing on the counter. I repeated which items I brought to the counter and he placed them into a bag. I left the store and when I got home I saw that he had slipped another item into my shopping bag which was clearly among the mess on the counter and charged me for it. I reported this to American Apparel who would not refund me my money unless I attended a store in person to receive a refund. I live an hour drive outside the city. To drive for an hour to return a 20.00 item is unacceptable. This is a major inconvenience and they should just refund me based on principle. This is a mistake that is not my fault. The item he slipped in was buried in clothing at the bottom of the bag. This company and in particular Market Mall location American Apparel has horrible customer service and has charged me for something I did not purchase which is why I took the time to write this review. Its no wonder this is a struggling company. Buyer beware.
General Tso s chicken was soggy. Fried rice was oily and bland. Service was good but overall the food is overpriced and mediocre.
I purchased a vehicle from Bill Luke and this is by far the worst dealership I have ever been to.I dealt with they re sales specialist Charles White who was very courteous. His counterpart who was Robert Traslavina the business finance manager was the absolute worst. He was extremely rude disrespectful and condescending. He quoted the APR incorrect multiple times. He was extremely inconsiderate and told us multiple times he does not have to sell us a car. No matter how great of a deal you get I would never visit his dealership again. He left out and we back again and said the sales manager is busy and we have no choice but to deal with him. I was completely shocked and I still did go through with the deal but was very close to walking out just because of his attitude and disrespect. I would highly suggest the owner look into his treatment of customers because it can cost the company lot of money. One thing I can say is that I would not purchase a second vehicle or refer anyone due to Robert s treatment. Robert Traslavina is a disgrace to the dealership and Mr. Luke should be ashamed to have people like him representing the brand. Although Nick Nevels Sales manager tried to recover there was no coming back! If you have questions or concerns please call 623 492 3436.
TERRIBLE TERRIBLE TERRIBLE! I can spend 30 somewhere else and actually get some food!! I ordered three vegetarian salads and an order of tacos....what a disappointment in the quantity and quality of food! A bigger disappointment is this location does not offer the military discount they once offered and other locations still offer! I was told do to new management. Perhaps they need new management again because we were disappointed and will not return!!!
The moment I walked in with my husband and step daughter I was uncomfortable. He stared at my 12 year old and was just watching us. So creepy and will never go back.
STAY FAR AWAY!!! The Front Office Manager is the WORST business person on earth! He is down right mean to the employees and to the patients. He is rude and acts like a complete A H !!! I ve been a Botox patient for many years and they used to be good when Alicia was doing it but now it s terrible! I am going to a different place to have them fix my face! I look 50 years older after my last Botox appointment. If I could give zero stars I would. They have a bunch of very young inexperienced staff who are completely afraid of the manager. He yells at them and at the patients!!
I ordered the orange chicken and teriyaki chicken for delivery. Delivery was fast. Service was not bad. Chicken was weird. Super weird. I would not feed it to my son. Only things edible were the veggies that came with the teriyaki egg rolls and steamed rice. Panda would have been a million times better. Miss my old Chinese place in CA. Is there any good Chinese food in Vegas ?
I used to come here back in 2012 and I had great experiences very fitting for big groups to hang out. Things now are drastically different! I came here a couple of weeks ago expecting the same quality drinks. The tapioca was HARD and unsweetened. Their homo milk tea was overly sweet even though I asked for half sugar. Also the price per drink comes to 7 and definitely not worth the price. Do not waste your time here there are plenty of other bubble tea places close by.
1st i love circle k but this is the very worst location I ve ever visited. I would not post a review except I ve been here multiple times and every time it s worse. They are understaffed only one cashier ever and lines out the doors other employees doing nothing but watching as customers waiting way to long to purchase anything. They are always out of the fountain drinks. At one point i tried to fill my cup with three different drinks and after each one they were all bad.
Update ordered pick up and the lady on the phone was rude af! Started with her asking which location are you ordering from?? I need to here it from you! We have 4 locations! Then just straight monotone and no help to my questions. Like are you just a lonely lady with a stick up her butt 24 7?? Go work at a place that requires no customer service like a janitor or something. Just got my food. Ordered a 0 for spicy. Butgot like a 3... wtf I ve been to this location twice. Ordered the same thing both times. 1 to go and for dine in. The portion for the pad Thai was the same. The portion for the deep fried calamari is half of what it looks like on the menu. The pad see eu was a huge difference. When I got it to go my box was filled. When I received my food for dine in the portion was only half of what I go for dine in. It only took up half the plate. Keep in mind the box is a lot bigger than than plate. Overall the food is good. Just keep in mind that the portions here are inconsistent. I ll give it a 3 for now
I will run in here for milk and bread now...but not much of anything else. I have purchased two packs of rotten meat and the butchers have no clue. They are not at all helpful and it looks dirty. I can not waste my money here anymore.
Warning this company has move to 6205 N 23rd Ave Phoenix Arizona. This is the worst rental agency ever. The managers will show apartment nasty and dirty and say they will paint and clean and will do nothing after you sign papers. This company should be close down. They fix nothing only the office they work out of. And the maintenance man does nothing he a devil from hell. They are so evil to take money from good citizens and cheat them. Every dog has it day!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Do not rent form them I give a zero!!!!!!!!!!
Its been a couple years since we visited this local nail spa and this will be our last. So this last weekend was my daughters homecoming and me being me had to get a pedicure while my wife and daughter got their nails done. I tagged along and got seated right away. My wife sat next to me while my daughter was on the other side of the shop getting a manicure. As my wife and I sat there we realized their massage chairs no longer work... This sucked since I love getting a crappy chair massage while I get a pedicure. No worries. I popped in my headphones and let the lady go to town. My lady did a great job and spent about a hour on my pedicure. As I was finishing up I realized.... No one has started on my wife who had been soaking her feet for a hour already then as I finished up a lady showed up and got started on my wife. I left to get some stuff done and left my wife and daughter there. Later on that day my wife was showing me her feet that were left super rough and the paint on her toe had bubbled. She told me that lady had spent 1.75 hrs on her and did not seem to know what she was doing. I called the manager to tell him what was going on. I mean seriously we dropped 100 bucks on this all I ask is its done right. The owner started questioning me wanting me to tell him who did the pedicure never had a nail tech ever introduced herself to me including this time and questioning if we even went there. He told me to come in and show them and prove it was done wrong. At this point we will not be going back there at all.. like ever. They are not consistent and sadly its gone downhill.
Nice beer selection. Over priced. Been there several times. Last time the beer was flat. When I mentioned this to server the owner and beer specialist looked at me like I had 3 heads. Only mentioned it because I cared. Hope they make it a year. Too many other great beer bars with equal selection better beer and better .
I was like the many excited people to have a cleaners nearby and a name brand no less. Yet this is all just an annoying bad joke I felt they pulled because I am in Law Enforcement and I dropped off more than several uniforms and to my surprise when I received my uniforms back half of them were wrinkled out and had a stain on the middle of the back. I came back to show the store and they took the 4 of my 5 uniforms back to redo them and the following day to come pick them up I before leaving jumped out of the car to double check and still two of the 4 uniforms were still useless to me because they were wrinkled. I asked the girl politely how can anyone hand me the very same uniform I gave to them to fix and yet hand me back the uniform with the same exact wrinkles. She apologized and said they will take it back again. After 3 times coming here and still receiving them wrinkled I went elsewhere. They lost my business and other Officers business because this was more or less not a hard uniform to literally iron.
Awful. I was craving some desi food and thought this would be ideal. Firstly when we walked in nobody really explained what was going on. They just stared at us. So we got our own table and found the menu on the counters. Ordered the samosa chaat chicken kathi roll and pav bhaji. None of the dishes we ordered tasted remotely authentic. Everything had a strong taste of SOME spice. I m not sure what. But it felt like they had over seasoned everything and it just tasted bitter. If I cooked food I d be able to point out what spice they used but as an eater...of food for the last 20 something years I can honestly say this is not Bombay street food. This is a scam to make people overpay for food that does NOT taste good.
Went there on 2 occasions and both were more BULL than fact. First time we saw a Pilot online and agreed to purchase it. Got there and they took our keys to trade in my car. Turned out they did not even have the car . They had sold it but still let me come all the way down there trying to sell me something else. Took me several hours to get my keys back as I told them I would call the police. About 3 years later I thought I would give them another try. Picked the car even put down a down payment and agreed to the price. I just got a call telling me they mis quoted me by 1000. I told them the deal was off... What a ripoff outfit. BUYER BEWARE!!!
I live here.... I really really really wish I had read these reviews before I moved in. This place is dirty and everything is broken from the gym equipment to the elevators and the staff has a combined IQ of 1.
Only giving two stars based on the way paint your pet used to be. My friends and I came about a year and a half ago to paint your pet and it was a paint by number picture of your animal that you sent in. It was terrific and all 8 of us were thrilled with the finished product none of us having any artistic ability. We were so excited to come back and paint our pets again. Unfortunately they changed the entire process and we were given an outline of our pet and told to paint them with no guidance at all. I asked for help 3 times and was told just paint the details of her fur . Needless to say my painting looks nothing like my dog and all of my friends were also disappointed with the results. Unless you have a good amount of artistic ability I would not recommend attending the paint your pet event here.
I am not quite sure how this establishment racked up so many positive reviews. Though I have not scrolled through and read many of the previous reviews I am wondering if the vast majority of reviewers were commenting on other services than the ones I purchased . In a nutshell this was my 2nd time receiving a botox treatment. My first time receiving botox it was done in a dermatology office.However a friend recommended Adv Aesthetics to me and after calling to get some pricing I decided to give them a try. Note that I was only having this done bc I was maid of honor in my sisters wedding and these services though I wish I could maintain them on a reg basis my budget prevents me from doing so . The first time I received botox NOT at this office I could not move my forehead AT ALL. No wrinkle was visible at all including in between my eyes. However at AA after my treatment I still can see and make manylines in my forehead and still can make a scowling face. To me this should NOT happen. Though it is better I do not feel I should be able to see ANY or not nearly as many as I am seeing just after having this done. Additionally I wanted to have my smile lines filled. However they told me a mid face filler would be better for me. They said not one but TWO syringes. I never had this done before and did not know what to expect. I was a little apprehensive because 2 syringes PLUS my botox was costing me over 1k. Yes it was a lot but I was curios to see the difference and wanted to look my best at my sisters wedding. They completed the service and the tech kept telling me how much better it looked though I did not see a difference. I felt this was my first mistake. I allowed them to get in my head and conviince me there was a difference when there was no obvious improvement. A few days later I called to express my concern. They told me to wait a few more days and if still no improvement on the filler come back in. So I did. They looked and acknowledged there was an imbalance from my left and right side and told me they would fix it as well as add more botox to take care of the lines in between my eyes. Again they told me it was a great improvement but this time the tech was much more rushed than my previous visit. Also and this was my SECOND big mistake when the tech left the room to get samples to fix the previous mistake they came back in with syringes that were drawn in another room. They did not OPEN any package box in front of me. I left the SECOND time now assuming there would be an improvement. However AGAIN there was no noticeable difference. I would have gone back AGAIN but I fly out to my sisters wedding and honestly after going back a second time and feeling like I was being over dramatic and doubting their services I just let go of it. Wrong of me? Possibly. To me I just decided I would NEVER go back here and hopefully help save some other first timer from going here. Save your money spend a little more and go to a dermatologist. I literally threw almost 1100 down the drain. If you ask me they water down their product. There should be NO WAY I should still be able to scrunch my forehead or scowl my eyes just 3 weeks after I had botox done and my lines around my mouth are COMPLETELY 100 percent the same. What is embarrassing is when you brag to your friends and coworkers that your getting it done and then they ask you when your getting it done when it was ALREADY done . Please do not make the same mistake I did. GO SOMEWHERE ELSE!
For being in Southern Highlands this place has no class! I went in today to utilize a gift card I received from 94.1 for 2 meal combos. The young lady working there rudely barked out instructions to all customers coming in that because of the local National Guard base coming in they were out of everything. When I asked what she could offer meal wise after standing in line for 5min she rudely said nothing I m only doing drinks ! Pretty pathetic to blame our local National Guard base for your managements poor planning ability at four casting supply on demand is a joke! It s no secret that the base comes to that shopping center to shop and for lunch outings. Shame on Tropical Smoothie Cafe for employing and allowing their staff to disrespect not only the patronage of our service men and women but being a complete female dog to the all the customers that came in after! ISupportOurLocalNationalGuard
Well I wo not be going back to the Vig ever. On my previous visit I asked the server if the Pad Thai was vegan if ordered with out egg and was told it was. On my most recent visit when I ordered it the same way and remarked that I was vegan the server told me it has fish sauce in it. I appreciated her candor but after asking for another recommendation I learned that the other options that can be made vegan are just overpriced salads and 11 hummus. So if you re vegan avoid the Vig!
Terrible and grossly overpriced! Like the Globe and Mail said Taco Bell for the jet set the globe writer also caught the owner lying about sourcing everything locally when the Sysco truck pulled up in the middle of their interview. Ha!!
99 of the reviews here are not for the Spadina clinic. They re for the school I guess they were written before the school had their own page. For those referencing this page they should know that you re never getting an hour long massage for anywhere near 20 or 40 at the Spadina clinic try 5x that.
Do not even walk in the door. Very unproffesional dental office. Waited one hour to be seen. The girls taking the x rays had no clue how to use the machine. Took numerous x rays to find out they forgot to save them. Then I finally got fed up and asked to speak to the dentist on duty. When he heard my complaints he said I was reasonable to want to leave and he would let the owner know I did. This is a place you take your child for their first experience that will impact them on how they view dentist. Do not go here if you want an experienced staff.
I really do not like having to do this but as a semi conscientious part time blogger of restaurant reviews I feel it is my sworn duty to warn the public to avoid the Taverne of Richfield. A few weeks ago the venerable old Taverne re opened under new ownership. As much as I desire to see the old Taverne building alive and well again this new regime does not stand a chance. I have genuine sympathy for them but they do not have a clue what they are doing. I do not enjoy killing baby birds in their nest but believe me it must be done. The first thing that strikes you is the menu. It features all those meals your mother would make when she was pissed at you for refusing to clean your room. It is the dullest least creative menu I have seen since about 1986. They do not even TRY to make things sound better than they are which these days if half the battle of owning a restaurant. Fried shrimp. Broiled salmon. Orange roughy has anyone ever actually ordered that? Steak and potatoes. Veal parmesan. I m not much of cook but I felt like the next Iron Chef by comparison to what I saw on this menu....and you will too. And they re not trying to be kitchy or ironic either. I m pretty sure they are serious about this. Prior to my visit someone told me they have a southwestern flair to their menu. What? Because they serve chicken quesadillas? So already wary of my circumstances I played it safe and ordered the special prime rib. I figured at least a big chunk of red meat would take the gnarly edge off my wine which was recommended by the manager as good stuff I had exactly three 3 bites of the prime rib then begged for a box. It tasted as if it had been boiled in luke warm water. It was rubbery and wet like a dog toy. No sear. No seasoning. Medieval serfs would have turned their noses up at this offering. Wife had scallops. Same result. No sear. No seasoning. Just drowned in butter oil and an awkward coating of paprika then cooked up with Easy Bake Oven sophistication. I could go on and on about this as I usually am prone to do but the simple act of re living this meal for the sake of this review is making my stomach upset. The staff were friendly and enthusiastic but they were very young and seemed inexperienced. We retreated from this place as quickly and politely as we could. The good thing is that my tab only came to 40 bucks so I m not angry just profoundly sad. Poor clueless people. Good luck to you. You ll need plenty of it.
We had high hopes because there is not much nearby in this vein of restaurant but were really disappointed in the service and food quality. We went on a Friday it was moderately busy maybe half full . It took 20 minutes to get our drinks and the total wait from time of order to the food reaching out table was over an hour. It took an additional 30 minutes to get our check after I had to get up and track down our waitress who would never make eye contact with us. During this time the 2 tables next to us were seated and never served so the people gave up and left. About the food. We have the pork belly appetizer far from the melt in your mouth pork belly I have had elsewhere they must use a very low quality I guess the Roasted Garlic Tomato Bisque strangely thick and grainy we ate it with a fork I swear it doubles as pizza sauce it was terrible the Hickory Smoked BBQ Short Rib it tasted like it came from Tom s BBQ I have never had a short rib where I could not taste the short rib and the polenta was like a sponge and the Farm to table salad not terrible the goat cheese on it was not the kind you would usually find on a salad it was large sticky clumps . The table next to us were smart and sent back their tomato soup another table to the right of us sent back their whole dinner and when asked if they wanted something else instead they said no thank you. We did not finish any of the food we ordered and halfway through the meal the bartender came out from behind the bar and acted like he was helping bus tables but in reality they ran out of Martini glasses with maybe 20 people in the restaurant. I do not think this place will survive unless they get their act together.
This company does installs for Home Depot...or excuse me they claim to do installs for Home Depot but when they do not show up for a job it s kind of impossible to finish an install job. I get told that someone would be coming between 10 2 on a Friday but my general experience tells me to check by calling first thing in the morning by calling them around 8am. Of course I get told that everything is still on track. I call at 1 15pm bc no one has contacted me yet and still I get reassured that someone s coming. 3 30 rolls around and still NO FREAKIN CALL from Delta. I call a third time and this time I get told that my tech had to go to urgent care and that they wo not be able to get someone else out here till Monday. Ok 1. I m not heartless if he really had to go to urgent care which I do not believe for a second hope he s ok. BUT this company does not work with just one tech on its payroll why could not someone have called me earlier to get another tech out here? 2. If he did have to go to urgent care should not he tell someone at his company that he has customers that someone has to cover that day? AT THE VERY LEAST SOMEONE SHOULD CALL THOSE CUSTOMERS NO?!?! F DELTA MECHANICAL I m lugging my 90lb toilet back to Home Depot and returning it and will NEVER use Home Depot when something requires installation nor this pathetic excuse of a company for any install jobs. GD I ca not express how f ing INFURIATING it is to have wasted an entire f ing day and have no one from this company call me.
The most positive to say about IMS AZ and the best I can come up with is that it s on the same campus as Paradise Valley Hospital. However seeing that PV Hospital is itself a shambles all that does is set the scene for IMS. In theory IMS could work out well it s a large network with many disciplines on site or nearby. However that s part of the problem. It s a large practice and it s a practice in disarray. The internal medicine area looks and feels like a bus waiting station they are always behind the staff are not that pleasant some are even rude. You ca not blame them it s not a pretty place to work. Referrals can and you re told they will take weeks to process which is fine is it s not that urgent but when your PCP tells you that you need to see a specialist and you re going to have to wait two weeks for the referral and then a couple of weeks for an appointment well you should know that referrals only take a matter of minutes to process. The problem at IMS is that they are so large that all referrals are processed at a corporate location by a group of overworked staff. The other difficulty is that most referrals will be to in house physicians and the quality is rather poor. The bottom line is that if your needs are modest it s convenient and you do not mind feeling like you are sitting in the waiting area of a free clinic then by all means IMS is the place for you. If you have standards above that you might want to look elsewhere.
If I could give 0 stars I would waited 40 minutes in photo for none to come out finally I walked out service there is garbage I would not ever recommend anyone to go waste their time or money there.
We went later in the evening. Place was pretty empty at least 10 servers and it took over 45 minutes before our food was brought out. No apologies no excuses nothing. All we had was wings.... Ridiculous! And the food itself was not even that good. Especially for the wait. We will never go back. Horrible experience.
Made my appointment and immediately got a phone call that they had switched my time and from a female to a male. The next morning they called saying the first therapist had fallen sick and had to reschedule. No problem rescheduled. Then they called again claiming the second therapist had also fallen sick and there was no longer an appointment for that night. Still not a big deal and glad they let me know but definitely a bit of a run around.
Not sure what happened to this place. It seems like it is extremely hit or miss. I ve been here and had an absolutely fantastic meal but when I cam here last night things were definitely off. To start with I had made a reservation for 2 initially but called the staff that day and asked if it could be changed to 4 people. The host said that was not a problem and it would be for 4 when we came in....when we showed up they had not changed the reservation and we had to wait for them to adjust the table seating. Once we sat down we ordered some drinks. The girls had wine and the guys had beers. Our wines showed up but the server forgot our beers. By the time the pizzas came out and we still did not have our beers the server finally realized she forgot to bring them. We even had to grab our own chili oil since our pizzas were getting cold. TL DR REALLY awful service tonight. The pizzas themselves were actually really disappointing this time around too...which is a huge shame because I ve had some lovely pizzas here. We ordered the Emilia the Bob special and the Buca supreme. The Emilia had too much sauce so the pizza was extremely soggy the Buca was nice but a bit overdone and the bob special was very good but felt like it was missing some buffala. This was my 3rd time coming to Gema but it was absolutely not up to the standards of the restaurant sadly. It s a shame they have a hard time with consistency here because when it s good...it s a great pizza. But at the price I m paying for a pie 18 25 each it s not worth running the risk of whether I ll get a consistent pizza or not Especially with such poor service.
Nice atmosphere and a good place to pass the time while waiting for a flight. Unfortunately the breakfast is not very good. I ordered the traditional breakfast with scrambled eggs potatoes bacon and English muffin. Portions were generous. I watched the woman who took my order put it together and items were premade and were lukewarm. The bacon was a huge pile of extremely soggy and sad precooked bacon from a pot. Eggs were old and hard. I had asked for cheese with the eggs and even though it s on the menu the women did not understand me and offered me a tub a cream cheese instead. The English muffin was from a pile under the toaster and was not toasted. The potatoes were the frozen seasoned kind and were probably the best thing on the plate. Since most of this ended up being inedible I went back for a cinnamon roll that was dry and burnt on the bottom. I would recommend eating elsewhere for breakfast.
Found a 2010 Hyundai Genesis Coupe for a great deal online at Nick Mayer. It was priced at 19 100 and had low mileage 31K . My boyfriend and I went down last Wednesday 12 26 and after test driving the car I fell in love with it. We worked out a good deal of 309 mo at a 4.5 interest rate. The only obstacle for me was that this was my first time financing a car and I do not have previous loan history so when they ran my credit nothing came up. Luckily my dad offered to co sign but he was not with us that night we made the deal and wanted me to wait until Saturday to come back and buy the car. Christopher was our salesman and he said I could put down a 500 refundable deposit to ensure that my car would still be there for me on Saturday and that he d put a SOLD sign on it so no one else would make any offers. They ran my debit card for 500 that night and I felt assured and excited that my genesis coupe would be waiting for me 3 days later. UNFORTUNATELY on Saturday afternoon my boyfriend called Christopher to let him know we were on our way over and he told us that they had sold the car that same morning. I was very disappointed and asked for my refund which I still have not received from them yet. This review is to let anyone that s interested in this place to know NOT to put down any sort of deposit because it wo not matter. Eff you Nick Mayer!
One of the managers there named Stepahnie i think? got an attitude because i asked for a girl toy and she wanted me to support her gay rights and pronounce the name of the girl toy cause maybe a girl might want a boy toy or the other way around. any who when i got to the front to get my food she told me a rush rude manner and told me pull up and wait for my food to come out. then moments later cause take so lonnnnnng she came out and i said thank you and her excact words were If you cant respect my team stop coming to my store. and im like excuse me? and she kept going back. dead silence. first off i didnt know mcdonalds is a store lol...but she was rude and needs help. BAD SERVICE. TERRIBLE MANAGER!
The 2nd star is for the convenience of the location if you re attending exhibiting at the las vegas convention center you can walk right into the center in minutes. That s the only plus. I do not know where to begin. I m sitting here in a 19 dollar office chair i ca not hear the tv over the noise of the minifridge sounds like a helicopter is about to crash into the room and i just paid 20 dollars and waited an hour for a room service pizza that was served on the plastic tray that they microwaved it on. I went down to meet someone for dinner and a girl tried to steal my phone near the exit to the street. There has been a room service cart down the hall with old food on it for 32 hours. 3 6 lights in my room are operational. I bumped into a wall and dust came out of the ceiling. There s that number of cops that makes you feel like something is wrong instead of feeling safer. The water pressure in the shower is so low it feels like someone is just sweating on you. The mattress looks like a mountain range. The staff have all been very helpful and friendly.
So we went to OMEI restaurant on Highway 7 after hearing lots of good things about this place. Went in around 5pm no customers. Got seated for 2 people in total. Got our menu in both english and chinese. Manager came to us and said you want to eat crab? We told him we will be ordering from the english menu since we ca not read chinese........after 5mins we made our order from the english menu the manager said.....do not order from the english menu as it is for white people eat the crab 4 course meal recommended for TWO people......so we went with the flow and agreed. Afterwards he brought out a Alaskan crab and said if this one is ok we nodded. So the food came out 2 big plates of crab legs and sorts 1 big plate of fried crabs and 1 plate of fried rice with crab meat......we noticed that this was way too much food for only 2 of us this is more for 4 6 people. Anyways bill came 388!!!!!!!!!! Not including taxes or tips. So I complained to the manager saying that why would he recommend a group meal fit for 4 6 people when we only have TWO people.....he said sorry and willing to give me a discount tax free. I paid with 10 tips since it was not the waiters fault. Total damage was 426 down the drain. Yea I know was my fault as well for not asking the price in the beginning........but cmon! Recommending a 4 course meal for 2 people and turning out to be a feast for a group of people....that is just shady business.
I have looked around at at least 10 furniture stores around the valley for a sectional that had the color and comfort that I wanted. One day I went to Big s furniture after looking at about 5 other stores that day with nothing that really caught my eye. It was around 7pm when I walked in back on March 1st. I liked that there was a huge selection of furniture to look at and only one sales associate walking the floor while the other associate was doing computer work at the desk in the middle. The sales associate was very helpful and nice and answered all of our questions. He did not constantly follow our every move and let us browse on our own as he helped other customers. I liked the fact that I was able to choose my fabric for my couch and pillows from a wide variety of swatches with no extra cost. I ended up purchasing the sectional I wanted with the colors and fabrics and paid half down and the other half on delivery. The reason I rated Big s a 2 is that I ordered my couch on March 1st and it is now MAY 16th and I have yet to have a couch. After my paperwork said delivery around 6 to 8 weeks for a custom couch it is well over that time period and I was told that the couch has not even made it to the store yet. I was told by an associate that this was a priority but my living room is still couchless and a delivery date has not even been set. It should not take almost 3 months to get a couch.
I do not know what the problem is with them recently but they totally suck. I placed an order got a confirmation and they did not even deliver it. Ca not get any worse than that.
This location is very slow always have to double check my order. Customer service really stinks. Drive thru only has one working window. Very disappointed.
Never deal with this place. I have 2004 Hyundai accent with transmission problems. They replaced the transmission and gave me warranty on the job. They asked me to pay cash and they gave me good deal. So when I got my car back I went for test drive the transmission was not fix so I called the manager told him about the problem the manager asked to take the car back and he will have the mechanic guy fix for me. He called 2 hours later and told the transmission can not be fix I told him I need my money back the manager refused to give my money back or fix the car
The taco salad was terrible so I had to pay for something else which is the chicken salad this time...better than the chicken salad but still not that good... I told the manager about it instead of fixing the salad she gave me a coupon for free shake or chicken tenders with a purchase of something... Jack in the box has better salad The burger was good as well as the zucchini fries a little difficult to mess up the this one ... I would not recommend PDQ
Tough call here great location by a lake good coffee and tea but a poor customer service experience can kill the deal for me. Here is my story I have actually been here several times and had good experiences but this week caught my off guard. I had ordered a couple drinks for myself and a friend I always like to get out of the way of the people behind me so I already had a bill out and set it on the counter while the barista was ringing it up and I was stuffing the rest back in my wallet mine is the slim type where I have to take ALL the bills out each time and put back what I do not use this requires two hands . As I did this I looked up and saw that the barista had finished ringing up the order and had his hand out just above the money I placed on the counter. Both my hands were full trying to jam the other money back in my wallet so I said Oh it s right there like maybe he did not see it he looked at the money then looked back and me and made no motion to pick it up. I eventually got my wallet put away picked up the bill and raised it two inches to lay it in his hand at which point he took it and then gave me my change. I was surprised and said I did not realize there was a protocol and he just gave me a bad look. sigh I can understand not liking people THROWING money down on the counter and making the cashier chase it all over the place I find that completely disrespectful as well. In this case however I PLACED it there and it was before he was even done ringing it up. I was a bartender in college and so I get it but the attitude is really unnecessary considering my point was just to get out of the way of the person behind me more quickly. I live in downtown Phoenix home of Lola Cartel Lux Fair Trade Royal Toast Copper Star etc and have never had this kind of attitude from anyone at any of those places. Part of what makes a coffeehouse a place to go is the sense of community and acting that way toward customers is not the way to foster it. I guess I ll stay out of the burbs.
Tonight my brother in law went to get our family dinner from here and I must say it was a big disappointment.. Normally we eat there and have really good service but tonight we decided to order and take out. To start off the charges us for the bread when I thought it came free with the meals but I m not sure about that one. Also we ordered tacos and the side we decided on was rice and corn NO BEANS and they gave us rice and beans. On that note it was also cold.. And then my dad ordered fish and chips and instead of coleslaw he asked for double fries and they did not give him that they gave him coleslaw... And the last thing was my mom ordered steak medallions on the skinnylicious menu and they re was literally barely anything on that plate. This entire experience was just so upsetting and I hope you tell your location staff to next listen to what we ask for next time. Thank you for your time.
Food was not good greens are out of a can serving portion are small food was cold will not be going back at all meat was over powered by smoking
THe absolute worst experience I have ever had with customer service. The assistant manager Tyler was absolutely rude and disrespectful! We had a confirmed reservation and got there and was told it would be an hour before a car would be ready! She never apologized or attempted to call another store.... And this was thanksgiving eve. She also lied and said my phone number was not attached to the reservation even though every other enterprise and customer service said it was on my reservation! I will never be back she also refused to give me her managers number! I will never rent from enterprise again and I will be contacting cooperate about this rude horrible associate manager! Thanks to Alamo we were on the road in no time!!! Never again enterprise!
Bad service. The ladies are rude and are not professional. They like to talk very loud and not have privacy with the clients
It s so sad that I have to give this place two stars because of the service. I have never been or even heard of this place till I Googled family friendly restaurants. I saw that you can enter the restaurant on a slide and knew it was a go because the kids would dig that. We walk up and pass a huge stinky cow or ginormous something in the front. Kids were loving it. We walk up to the hostess stand and there are 3 hostesses and a manager standing there. One of them is blowing her nose into a napkin very loudly the whole time we stand there. Um.....are not there bathrooms for that? My stomach did tiny somersaults of protest. We sit down and our server just sucked. She completely ruined my experience. The view is freaking amazing . You can see the whole valley. It could have been my little hidden date gem but even that is not enough to lure me back. The server was rude to both my mother and I. She never told us about the specials she never asked if I wanted my soft drink refilled she never asked if I wanted dessert....she just plain sucked. Bland slow no personality. Then I had to hear her complain that the manager would not give her Christmas off and how some other guy got it off claiming he was visiting family but his family is here etc................Dude! Take it to the kitchen! The food was good......I had the Fillet mom T Bone. The steaks were cooked perfectly.....the bread was good with the pumpkin butter not a big fan of the green beans and beans. After the nose blowing and attitude I ca not see any super compelling reason to return even the sparkly city views.
When you go to Las Vegas you expect to pay a premium but at Border Grill you can expect both to pay a premium AND get poor service! Nothing special about the ambience either. The Good The chips and salsa are good. The food quality is decent. The Bad Food Portions Very small portions. 19 for 3 small street tacos. 26 for the Poblano Enchiladas 3 small enchiladas and no sides of beans rice . Tap Water Charge We found out when we got the bill that they charged us 1.00 for tap water?!! We did not dispute the water charge but what restaurant does that?! Receipt The receipt did not reflect the name of our service. His name definitely was not Sarah . Cold Coffee We order a cup of coffee and we did not order ice coffee and it came out luke warm with spoiled milk. Sent it back. Menu Misrepresented When ordering I asked the server if the tacos were street tacos or full size tacos. He very clearly said they were full size and made a gesture with his hands that they were big. When the tacos came out they were street tacos. The employee who delivered the meal confirmed they were street tacos. When I asked the server he wanted to argue that the tacos were not street tacos. One of the managers came over to discuss our concerns and she wanted to make sure she pointed out the tacos were bigger than regular street tacos but stated they were still street tacos. The taco quality was good but definitely misrepresented by the restaurant staff. The misrepresentation on the front end was the real issue. Would I go back? I would not go back. Management After we left the restaurant I noticed that the manager had discounted the meal by 6. We did not ask for a discount and no one said they were sorry for our service or the misrepresentation. The discount for 6 just showed up on the ticket without a comment.
Wife and I had one of the worst meals ever. Blackened mahi mahi tacos were so salty I thought someone was playing a joke. And the Chesseburger was nothing great either. Dennys serves a better one and for half the price. The perfect margurita was ok but i definately would of expected a wow from the home of the margurita. It was not even close. Sorry I wish I could recommend it but just ca not . Overpriced I know its Vegas but if the food was good I would not of minded the tourist prices. BTW Very loud too. Maybe I m just getting old.
The food was great but the service was deplorable. Not once did the waitress ask us if we wanted another drink once our drinks were empty she did not come to see us and ask if everything was ok or if we needed anything. As an ex waitress this was extremely irritating. When it came time to pay it took the waitress 15 minutes to get us our cheques and the cook had to come and make us pay cause he was noticing that she was simply avoiding us. Sadly because of that I will probably never go again.
Horrible service I m so disappointed with my service went in to drop off my comforter and it was 23.50 after my discount went in to pick up when ready and they said the left me a voice message saying that the price was now 45 when I was never called I will never come here again across the street does it for 20 dollars cheaper
I am never impressed with the more Disneyfied aspects of Las Vegas. You wo not find me lugging a 6 foot long cocktail down the street or in the audience of Thunder From Down Under or ... staying at Caesars ever again. I ca not recall what tower we stayed in but the only plus was the jets in the tub. Otherwise it was just uneventful and tired. I hate the glass door in the bathroom. Please gimme a real door so I can do mah business in peace. The customer service also left a lot to be desired. My friend is a pretty high roller there and we were still kinda brushed off. Plus I found the entire casino difficult to navigate. Easy to get lost. The shopping is great and we were treated very well at Spago and Boa but it s back to Bellagio and the like for me.
I went to Nacho Daddy for a Paint Nite event with a friend and got there a 1 2 hour early so we could grab a quick bite and drink before the event. We went straight to the bar and Kimmy was working. We ordered two beers and I told her that we were there for the event after she had offered us menus. I said If you do not see us we ll be in the other room for PaintNite. To that she answered with a not so nice tone You have to close out with me. My friend and I were super hungry and we still had 20mins before the event so I asked her if I could order food and pay her for it at the bar. She replied rudely If you want to order anything you ll have to do it with the server in the room. I do not know where you ll be sitting and I ca not take the food to you and leave the bar. I rolled my eyes at her because the solution was extremely simple let me order and pay for the food at the bar and give my food to the server to run when she took drink food orders or deliveries to the event room. I did not leave a tip ordered any more drinks or food the rest of the night. By the time the event ended the restaurant was closing and we left without eating or drinking anything else. We only spent 10 where we could have spent more. This was a really bad first impression and I do not think I want to go back for another bad experience.
Playing the course and the people in the Pro Shop were great! However the starter I believe his name was Frank was a complete jerk to our party. At most golf courses the starter marshall is at the first tee box. in this case Frank was hanging out on the driving range with a sign pointed away from the normal cart path that said starter. When we drove past to get to the first tee and reach our tee time Frank caught up to us and demanded that we return back to his station and that he had paperwork and rules to tell us we politely asked if he could explain here so we could keep our tee time rudely he said no and demanded us to come back. There he collected the receipts we would have been happy to give him at the first tee and simply explained that carts needed to stay on path on Par 3 s a rule EVERYONE knows already and that 2 other holes were cart path only information he easily could have shared with us at the first tee. It seemed like he was just on a power trip. It really ruined the entire experience for us.
Been a fan of BT for a long time. This was our first time visiting the newer location in Gilbert. THE GOOD The building is big bright and beautiful. So much more elbow room. Service was fast and everyone in our party of 5 enjoyed the taste of the tacos particularly the chicken and al pastor. THE BAD Steak quesadilla was basically a ton of grease and bland meat inside a tortilla. It dripped a giant puddle of grease onto my plate and I did not really taste anything like cheese. They also got one of my tacos wrong but quickly and happily replaced it no problem. MUY MALO It was a Saturday night so expected it to be busy and hectic but the table we found was a total wreck. Food trash on the seats and on the floor underneath. I saw a cleaning person and asked excuse me to get her attention. She turned around in full snarl mode and answered me with a loud WHAT??? . I was shocked. Rude. I asked her if she could clean our table and after about 5 minutes she came over and wiped the top off. She was already starting to walk away when I pointed out there was still food and trash on the floor. She went for a broom swept one side then just walked off. Is it so hard to get a clean table? The owner lady I believe came over right after and finished cleaning the area herself which was very nice of her. So all in all we would have had an ok time if it was not for Miss Sassy pants who could not be bothered to tidy up a bit. That and my girlfriend ended up getting pretty sick from the food. Think we will stick to the original location from now on. Never have had a problem there.
These guys SUCK!!! Please people take your business elsewhere....I started a claim almost 3 months ago and sure as shit they responded the same day as soon as they got their deduct..since then It s been a lot of NON Comunication on their part with me sending email after email and phone calls that no one ever responds too!! Finally left a complaint with the BBB and would not you know I received an email saying it was in process with the underwriters...oh and that they sent me 2 letters asking for more info.. which I never got btw.....super fricken frustrated and too boot I m paying for a line I ca not ducking USE!!!! Ugh never again!! this company
Yelp showed them open now at 10 15am... They are not . Even though the door was open and we walked up to the bar. Bummer it smelled good. Rating based upon inaccurate times and their grumpy we do not accept any Groupon or similar promotions sign in the window. We did not have a Groupon btw. We were just hungry.
Dear Tilly s employee who greeted me with 20 questions... Mind you the answer to every question you ask me is No I m just browsing thanks. And the questions I was asked were.....in chronological order... Can I help you find anything? Are you looking for anything specific? Are you shopping for like a nephew or something? So like do you know how the store is laid out? Are you sure I ca not help you find anything? No I m just browsing thanks. Sorry I was dressed improperly for the occasion of going to Tilly s to look for a sugar skull t shirt. Next time I ll leave my RL oxford and brown loafers at home. The funny thing is after this visit to the store at Meadows I went home took a nap got hot and put on shorts took off the oxford changed to barefoot boat shoes and was only asked one question at the next Tilly s I went to at Arroyo.....coincidence? You tell me...
Horrible company. You can never reach them. They never call you back. I referred a customer to them. They never payed me the full amount agreed upon. They give me lie after lie. Money in the mail. Money sent to rep. Umm why? I gave the referral. Never will I recommend this company. And I ll be sure to make sure no one I know uses them.
Sleeping out front circle k omg heroin everywhere that s the place to go for hero in and prostitution of young girl with back packs everywhere
Really sub par. This must do good business b c of the diners drive... show. I had their basic fish taco. Cabbage not crunchy cut too small breading on fish not crunchy fish fishy no lime sides boring flour tortilla yuck. Margaritas were good as was service.
I wanted to love this place.I had just had some delicious Churros last month and really wanted one.I came late so this may be why the Churros i received were dried out and a little hard to chew. I ordered the filled ones and the filling made it edible and the flavor delicious.I will come back earlier to catch the fresher batch.
Went to early dinner there last night before going to concert. When we were seated a waiter put 2 glasses of water on the table without saying a word. We kept looking around for someone to take our order but nobody seemed interested. There was maybe 6 other couples in the place so they were not all that busy. The Thursday night football game was on which may have diverted the wait staffs attention. We waited at least 5 minutes for someone to take our food or at least a drink order with no success. We got up and left the place and spent our money a block away where they wanted our business. Do not waste your time going there with several other restaurants within easy walking distance.
I was hoping that the food and service matched the decor. They occupied the space where Cold Beers and Cheeseburgers used to be. They did a good job redecorating the space. It s now light and open with a really good feel. I looked around and noticed for a Friday dinner service the restaurant was fairly empty. I could not figure out why. After a while I began to realize why there was no one there. Our server was pleasant and throughout the meal it was clear she was trying but she ca not control the kitchen. My husband s order was wrong the kids Mac and cheese was made with beer cheese which my child disliked the tator tots tasted like they had been cooked in old oil and the lettuce in my salad was browned on the edges. The server was only made aware of the wrong order and bad Mac and cheese. She removed that charge which was appreciated but even at that the bill total was high. For the quality of food it was not worth it. I wo not be going here again.
Obviously I did not have a great experience. The positive side is Ms. de Broff does solid work. I found a teddy bear in an abandoned lot and my niece begged me to clean it up. The work done was very good. And I respect that sewing by hand is a skill set that should be rewarded. The down side is that her billing rate is 82 an hour. Yes you read that right. She quoted me that it would tke about an hour s work. More than I wanted to spend but fine. It s a gift why not? Imagine my surprise when I get an email from her saying the total due is 231. Unlike my mechanic who calls and checks with me if things are going over estimate Ms. de Broff steams boldly ahead. She keeps erratic hours and in my experience was not a great listener. I also felt like she was talking down to me when I stopped in the first time. I went against my instincts to just leave and was rewarded with a hassle after. My take? If you ve got money to burn and a deeply patient nature go for it. Otherwise be warned.
Some of the worst wings i ve ever had in my life! If you do not believe me the proof is in the pictures see pictures posted . Ordered the wings to go. Most places i know they mix the wings in the sauce. Not this place...they took the short cut and put the sauce on the side so that you can do it yourself at home...WTF? What s even worse is that the wings were so undercooked. I m not sure how the other food is but this experience does not welcome me to even come back. Just a suggestion Cook the wings a little longer or higher heat. Mix it with the sauce but place it in a ventalated container poke some holes if needed so that it does not allow them to steam and get soggy.
Terrible experience. I would never buy a vehicle from these guys. If they owned the last vehicle on the planet I would not buy it. Alex the Boss is trying to refuse returning our deposit even though our contract clearly states a clause of major issues . After speaking with mastercard our money will be refunded but only after I jump through a bunch of hoops. What a joke. The owner started to bully me my wife and my two young children. My wife was very intimidated and would never step foot in this place. Please think twice about buying a vehicle from these guys. I know I never will.
This company has sent us through hell and back. They are extremely unprofessional and LAZY! I have never seen such lackluster employees in my life. We changed banks half way through our year in one of their homes and they were so quick to send over our eviction notice when WE WERE ONE DAY LATE ON RENT. But after we went over that hurdle and got it all figured out and moved out when our lease was up THE LAZY PEOPLE OF PARK AVENUE PROPERTIES STILL KEEP WITHDRAWING RENT OUT OF OUR ACCOUNTS! We have not gotten our security deposit back even though we left the home in IMMACULATE condition we vacuumed cleaned all the windows and got all the trash out . They are extremely difficult to get in touch with and their poor customer service girls are about as helpful as a box of rocks. You will never get your calls returned or any help if there is a problem. As an experienced mover I recommend staying VERY far away from this company.
Not sure if this is a prank by some members of the Yelp community but this place has not been open for ages... We went to this restaurant a couple of days ago based on all the great Yelp reviews and was greeted by an empty Korean house with cobwebs hanging down. This was a bit disappointing as we received notice that this location has been closed for weeks! Not sure how all the recent Yelp reviews say that they ve visited the restaurant because it has not been open. Do not be fooled by the parking spots at the back with indicate that the store is still open because it is not. The atmosphere was quite spooky and I definitely do not recommend this place unless you want to drive all the way to North York for an empty shop.
There s nothing worse than chinese food with absolutely no flavor. Can a real chinese food restaurant please find its way to this side of Paradise Valley. Tired of wasting good money on bad food.
NEVER AGAIN!!!! Just recently had my son s 1st birthday here. What we agreed upon was not honored. On the day of the party the waiters kept pushing items that was not authorized by us. They kept suggesting to reorder food saying that people were looking for them. There was a lot of food left that almost all my guests was able to get a to go food. The next day some of the guests called me saying that the food they took was already spoiled. I had to apologized and hope that they did not get sick. Lastly the server tried to hustle for extra tips knowing full well that they already charged us for gratuity. I will never again do an event here nor recommend this place to other family or friends.
Food 5 stars. I come here 2x sometimes 3x a months because the tonkotsu ramen is the best ramen joint in vegas.. Pork broth on point same with the pork and the eggs and the corn that was on there...always get extra noodles also.. 2 stars. why?? My server YURI was a total disappointment. Didnt smile at all what soever and we felt rushed actually. she dropped off my check and said here. Really? hmmm.. Never checked back on us to ask if everythinf was okay if we needed anything. The only time she came back was when she was dropping off the check and asked u want more water? hmmm.. Im a server too and it wasnt really that busy at the time. wait was dead already no need to rush us and make us feel unwanted. Since im a server of course i still left 20 despite of the poor service we received. When we come back next month i will make sure not to be served by yuri.
I have rented many cars in my life time however Fox Rental rates just below shitty. The long lines and waiting are just ridiculous and the rates are not what they seem. It is a better value to use a major car rental because Fox has so many add ons that by the time you see your final charges they are quite expensive. And by the way do not be late on your return or try to extend your rental they charge an extra 25 plus the price of the rental plus all the other add ons also I was quoted one price online and another price once I actually got there. I was renting a car for 11.99 per day plus insurance and after 3 days of rental my bill was 243.00 car was fully gassed cleaned and returned 1 hour late and that s because they charged me for the wait time I was actually in line waiting. The one good thing I can say is I accidentally left something in the car and I spoke with Jose 2943 or 2941 and he was very kind and extremely helpful he tracked my item and called within an hour. He should run Fox because other than Jose Fox is the most horrible bait and switch ugly tiresome and shitty experience I have ever had...ever.
Typical Hakka cuisine. It s not bad but the quality of ingredients is not the greatest. The chicken tends to be a little fatty and all the dishes are slightly oily which kind of makes you feel like you ve eaten a cannonball. That being said the food sure tastes good and there s quite a bit to choose from. The lunch specials are a pretty good deal but mostly rice. Not a bad place to get some Hakka food if you do not feel like venturing out of the neighborhood.
I ve played this course before and enjoyed it. Just booked another weekend stay there along with other family 3 units total planning to play another round here. While it was too early for us to book the teetime when we booked the stay the resort went ahead and booked a Saturday tournament so that none of the guests could play on that Saturday which is a primary reason we chose to book at the Legacy. They told me to book at a nearby golf course but the cost was over 20 more per player and not onsite! Keep this in mind when you re considering your options.
It s disappointing when a restaurant ca not put their money where their mouth is. Although in the case of Okada there s plenty of money...just not much worth eating for it. A beautiful setting to be sure and everyone will mention the pond out the window but if you re there to eat and granted not everyone is then I ll just make a few suggestions. Do not expect much from the fish. Miso black cod was over cooked just enough to lose its soul but still hold together enough to serve. Sashimi was priced well above its quality level. And why in god s name would anyone pair fois gras with barbecued eel? Here s what i d get if I was forced to go again and someone else was paying. Either the mushroom or cucumber salad. Pork short ribs from the grilled menu definitely . And a few sushi rolls with enough ingredients to compensate for the mediocre fish. We had a spicy scallop roll and finished it. We also had the king crab with some kind of Top Chef invention and could not give it away. So expensive. So not worth it. Do not say I did not warn you.
This might be a good place for diesel trucks but do not take an older car to it. They quoted 3 000 worth of work on a 10 year old car to make it run that only needed 600 to have it running beautifully. I will never have them work on one of my vehicles.
Take out should not be cold when it gets home. 3rd time here. Sad. Not not warm cold. Veggies chicken rice...everything. Cold Asian food is not ok. If I wanted to reheat my dinner I d go to the frozen section.
This place was super dirty. The toilets were clogged. The service sucked. I had a tune sandwich and it looked like crap. They got lazy and started doing a guacamole instead of just cutting up the avocado and putting pieces on the subs.
Man the service here is terrible! They act like they re doing you a favor by blessing you with their presence. AND their drinks are ridiculously overpriced. Makes me depressed that my best friend has to settle for their mediocre boba just because there s hardly any other places in Vegas.
This place is horrible I have tried to give it a chance because it s close to the house but I ve come to the conclusion that it s not any good! One thing I ve noticed is how cheap they are they dump 90 of vegetables in their orders I ve ordered multiple times thinking maybe it was just a miscalculation when you order for instance the Kung pao chicken there is like 5 6 little pieces of chicken mixed in with 10 000 vegetables the ratio is ridiculous!! Like I said this happens on most of their dishes..if you do not like to eat meat or if you are a vegetarian..EAT HERE! The food quality and taste are also not that good..there is a way better Chinese food restaurant that s not too far from this spot called New Grand China less than 2 miles away or you re better off going to Panda Express!!
Other workers in the nail place seemed very nice but the lady I had Vivian was very rude did not talk and she did not give me what I asked for and got attitude when I told her I did not want gel nail. She rushed thru the whole thing .
This now famous classic Vegas hotel hails from a heritage that goes deep into the beginnings of Sin City itself. But do not be fooled this hotel is no gem in the desert. Having been to Vegas MANY times I have stayed at the best brightest and flashiest hotels on the strip but had never gotten around to MGM so I decided to give it a try. As we neared the front desk for check in I already began to regret this decision. There was a line so long you would think they re giving away the freakin rooms. After spending 30 min to get only halfway through the line I remembered the mobile check in option. I have used this option at many hotels and all I have to do is pick up my key cards from guest services rather than stand in a long line. I guess that s just not how it works at MGM. We were told to wait for 3 4 hours because now that we had registered on the mobile check in we had to wait for a clean room which is not available at this time . Mind you it was 8pm at a hotel that guarantees 3pm check in. Further we were told we can no longer use the regular line. It took another 35 min of unpleasant reasoning with rude staff to get us checked in which brings me to travesty 2. ROOM TYPE SOLD OUT. Yes we made a reservation well in advance but rooms were sold out. Are these people aware of how many rooms they have? Luckily we were upgraded . The upgrade included hall entry through what looks like a broom closet or janitorial staff entryway. We also had been upgraded to a room with a view of generators dirty stained bathroom fixtures a broken shower head and the undeniable smell of weed. CLAAAAAASSSSYYYYY. It was also a handicap accessible room with a bench in the tub. Parking was luxurious as well. The front desk had failed to inquire about whether we were parking a car in the lot. Consequently we ended up spending 20 min getting our car out of the parking structure. We were lectures about how valet is a separate entity from self parking we had not requested valet and were treated like it was our fault parking had not been added to our room key. To round out our glamorous stay my sister was almost smashed in the parking lot elevator while trying to get me trapped in the elevator out. There is not one thing this hotel did right. For my money this sad establishment that banks on its past fame is no real option.
If i could give negative stars I would!!! I tried to add someone on the list and could not remember my number from 2 years ago and the Front Desk Milli told me you should have changed your number with us a long time ago so thats you fault and then kept hanging up on me! Never in life had i needed to deal with such a rude person!!! This place needs to be demolished!!! I am beyond offended! She would not even take the rest of my information!!!! WORST SERVICE EVER!!!!
Everyone always things Oh hooters great wings among other things hehe . There wings are frickin AWFUL! Breaded wings I think you would be better off soaking a bunch of bread crumbs in wing sauce and call it a day. Our waitress acted like she was afraid of us and look I m sure there are allot of disrespectful brutish men in the world that she has to deal with but my friends are super nice and she barely provided us with a poor excuse for service! Do not go here unless you just want to ogle women...seriously.
I ve eaten at both the Fox Chapel and Wexford locations but this review is for the Wexford one since we ve been there many times. While it s a reasonable choice it s not the best Thai food around despite the bold proclamation on their website claim to be One of the top 10 Thai restaurants in the Country which is so far from the truth that you have to wonder about anything else they say. Is it good? Sometimes. Is it ok? Yeah pretty much every time predictably ok. This used to be our go to place for Thai food before the nirvana of Nicky s took us to a much higher level. But there are some good things on the menu albeit just a little bit pricier than most other Thai restaurants. We do like the Emerald chicken which has fresh steamed spinach ca not go wrong with that! and a spicy peanut sauce. The seafood ginger curry is a good mix of seafood in a red curry base and is almost always good. I also like the curry bowls especially the panang curry as well as the garlic pork. In some ways I think they have an identity problem since a lot of the offerings look suspiciously like Chinese food and not Thai. I understand that they may actually be trying that intentionally to appeal to a broader market but when I want Thai I want THAI!! For a strip mall restaurant it s ok. Is it a destination? No unless you re there for takeout. We rarely even think to go here anymore even though it s close and convenient. Guess I m spoiled.
I do not know what all the hype is about this show. After hearing from people for many years you have to see the Blue Man Group I was so looking forward to it. We went last week on a trip to Vegas. To sum it up in a nutshell I thought the show was BORING. Most shows in Vegas hold my attention from beginning to end. With this show I kept asking my husband is it almost over? There were a couple of funny moments such as when some people arrived late to the show. The Blue Men stopped their skit and the screen flashed LATE ARRIVALS. The Blue Men put a spotlight on the people who were late embarrasing them. The whole audience laughed. Some of the skits the Blue Men did included catching Captain Crunch and paintballs in their mouth and bringing a person up on stage to participate in eating a meal with the Blue Men. In the video part of the show they included a picture of a colonoscopy. Yes a colonoscopy. They believe people are connected by pipes whatever that means. Some positive parts of the show were the music and drum skits. I think this show is good for people in their 20 s and early 30 s. It s geared for a younger crowd.
Worst service!! Food comes late... soggy and cold. They wo not make it right!! Really you ca not give me ranch that I asked for?! We keep giving changes to make it right and they just making excuses. Do not order here!
The thing that got me right away was that this place was smack dab in the middle of a sea of really good restaurants. So you would think that they were bringing their A game to the table. I was completely underwhelmed. Lunch for two with tax and tip came out to 75. So if you are going to charge that much with all that competition around you had better be the best. Sumo Shitake and even Spoon and Fork deliver much better food with much better service at a cheaper price. We asked for tea and carbonated water. We got back regular water and when I asked to get carbonated water or a Perier because the lady did not understand what I was asking for I was told they did not have that. Okay I did not want to press the point but what kind of place charging that much does not have some sort of bottled carbonated water solution on hand? When the food came it did so quickly no complaint there. Bottom line though we wont be going there again.
I went to see Dr. Okeke during a crisis. I had recently moved here from Los Angeles CA and had yet to establish care with anyone and we found this office so we decided to give it a try. Dr. Okeke is pleasant attentive and understanding. He was well versed in my condition and overall I feel he s a decent Dr. I also was able to get him to waive the silly fee they charge for providing a Dr s note on this visit. Now in regards to the office it s self. I did not like the setting in which they have their office. It s crowded overbooked and not what I was accustomed to having access to Dr s in Beverly Hills . The staff were pleasant enough but not overtly welcoming or friendly again not what I am accustomed to. Overall I have discovered that Las Vegas suffers from a lack of reputable mental health Dr s which put s the rest of us that need these services at a disadvantage or we have to end up settling for what s available. I would not discourage you from seeing Dr. Okeke but do not expect his office to be most aesthetically pleasing and be prepared to wait.
Hi I rented a car from Budget in Las Vegas for the first time on September 2017 as my company has agreement with you and Avis to rent our cars for business purposes and me and my team renting your cars almost everyday on that rental I had a small accident which was a bumper scratch and was claimed by Budget and fixes by my insurance company now I got a bill from Alternative claims management of around 850 dollars for fees and deductions I called Budget costumer service and been transferred to 4 departments and got same answer we ca not help !! and Las Vegas Budget is privately owned compared to Avis super service we are getting through past 9 years that s unacceptable and now I have no choice other that report this incident to my company with a negative feedback and encouraging my co workers to not consider Budget for business rentals. Rental agreement 525404670 Thanks Haider Saeed Field Service Engineer
It s not too expensive but the food is not good. I just had a take out order so I ca not speak to the ambiance of the dine in experience. The staff all seemed friendly.
Terrible service. Instead of seating us these two employees decided to argue in front of customers! Did not care what so ever.
So today November 30 2017 I went to shop at the forever 21 located at 3200 S Las Vegas Blvd Unit D200 Las Vegas NV 89109 2612 United States. I shopped for about 2 hours when I was ready check out the system was down I could not pay my items with my credit card. Then I asked if I could come back tomorrow after work the cashier told me they do not hold overnight like if it was my fault. Such a disappointment as a regular customer waist of time and horrible service!!!!
The real measure of a great business is not how they treat happy customers it s how they treat customers who have an issue. The employees of this business are nice cool and helpful but sadly they are led by an owner who does not understand how to treat customers. A group of friends and I flew to PHX for a four day ride on the Arizona Trail. We were hoping for good local advice and for good rental bikes that were equipped to handle the trail. We got the opposite. We were advised that we did not need slime in our inner tubes which ended up costing us our first trail day. Collectively we had 12 flats in our first hour on the trail because as we quickly learned the AZ trail is full of sharp hazards and slime is absolutely necessary to avoid flats. We had to abandon our first day and catch a ride into Tucson to buy slime tubes. Take my advice not theirs if you re riding the AZ trail buy several slime tubes or your trip will be ruined. Another issue is that two of the rental bikes from Cactus had split tire sidewalls. To send a bike out like that is amateur. Unfortunately by the time we discovered this we were about two hours from Cactus and ready to embark on the trail so we booted one tire and changed the other to a brand new tire we had purchased and which they now have on their rental bike courtesy of us . After the trip I called the manager about these issues and she immediately got defensive and turned everything back on me. She said it was my fault that we listened to her employee s advice about the slime. And she straight up said I could not be telling the truth about the split sidewalls because her shop would never make a mistake like sending out a bike like that. I think this shop must not have much nearby competition or maybe she just does not care about my business because I m from out of town. I got off the phone feeling beat up and I m the customer who spent hundreds in her store . I do not think it s unreasonable to count on a bike shop for good local biking advice and to count on that bike shop for a rental product that s checked out and ready to ride. But it s not even those issues that are most galling. Everyone makes mistakes that s just human. But my treatment on the back end was terrible and prompted this review.
Poutine. Canada s Pride and Joy. However I would not recommend getting Poutine from here. The reason why Poutine is so comforting is because of the combination of Potatoes Cheese and Hot Gravy. I decided to for go the Fancy Options and stick with the Traditional Poutine served with Fresh Cheese Curds and Beef Gravy. Boy oh Boy was I disappointed. I did t like the taste of the gravy or the potatoes. What got to me was the lack of squeak from the cheese. Cheese curds are supposed to be squeaky these curds were NOT. They also did not melt. A ski chalet has served me better poutine. I ve had the very best of poutine from Montreal and now I ve had the very worst. I would recommend going to Kitson and Co for good poutine.
I waited for this show for MONTHS. booked my ticket so long ago when they first went on sale for my birthday. Picked a specific seat because of the location and it was on the end because I am claustrophobic. Got to my seat delighted. It was perfect. I must have seemed to happy because I was tapped on the shoulder by an employee telling me to move over they wanted to seat someone next to me. I said but I paid for THIS specific seat The response I received was ma am the seats are all the same ummmm no. If that was the case why do we need to chose seats. So not only am I not on the end anymore we squish in another woman on the couch. Let me add I am 6 0 tall and not small. And they put someone double my size next to me. The man said she needed the seat because she was handicap . Yeah she was standing and dancing and climbed those stairs like a champ. I really wish I could contact someone for a refund as my whole birthday evening that I was so anticipating was turned to utter frustration.
Hands down one of the worst business I ve ever had to deal with. Terrible communicators as to what is exactly going on and not very accommodating as to what customer service actually is. It took two phone calls both times I was supposed to get a phone call back and never did and me physically driving the 20 minutes to ever get an answer to the original question I had. And the answer to my question just happened to be something that was never stated to me upon our agreement of doing business. Zero stars and will not do business with ever again. Even if they re preferred through my insurance company.
Extremely rude. Came in within minutes saying pipes and valves need to be replaced before he can replace my faucet. Not willing to work with me on time. Ended up have another handyman service come out 2 hours later and replaced my faucet just fine without replacing valves and pipes. I told this guy he could do the faucet by just shutting off the main water line and I think that pissed him off and his mood changed so quick and was just so rude sorry a woman tried to tell you how to do your job.
Really thought that this place was going to be good and it really need to change the way they make their food. That is not real carne asada. They need to learn from other restaurant that are authentic Mexican food like Gero Canelo!
We go here a lot but last night was terrible. The deviled crab was sour and when we told the waitress she said another customer just ordered it. She said the owner would take it off the bill but if I wanted to eat the baked potatoe I had to be charged Asked to speak to manager and only the owner was there and it would be 15 minutes before he could get to me. NEVER AGAIN.
I bought a 2015 GMC Sierra truck with only 50 miles on it. After only having it for 2 weeks and with only 700 miles on it I noticed that there was a loud popping noise every time I turned to the right and the motor had a loud ticking noise when it is idling it is louder than my 2004 Chevy truck. I took it to the dealership and they kept my truck overnight and said it would be ready to pick up the next day. They did not even have a rental car available for me to use meanwhile. The next day came around and they called and spoke to my husband and informed him that they would be replacing the steering gear . My husband is a GM and ford mechanic for the city of Tempe for five years and knew exactly what they were talking about and asked if they would be replacing the rack and pinion and he stated yes. This part is the whole steering system of the chasse. They stated that the truck would be fixed and ready for pick up by the end of the day. I had to call them at 5 30pm to check on the truck. After being placed on hold I was informed that it still was not ready that the parts came in late no one even called to let me know. My husband asked to speak to a manager as this is a very major part on a vehicle and it is already broken. When he spoke to the manager he expressed our concerns with just having spent 35 000 on a brand new truck that is already needing to be worked on. When my husband contacted the manager in service he informed him that we did not feel comfortable keeping this truck as it already has a major part that is broken on it. The manager asked if we were looking to trade it in and we said yes. Then we were directed to the sales manager who instantly began raising his voice and stated that we signed a contract that we can not return it and there was nothing he could do that we needed to contact the bank that we got the loan through. My husband informed him that that was a lie there has to be a way to fix this issue and he began raising his voice. His behavior was very rude and unprofessional!
The greeter at the Mirage flagged down a cab for me I was on my way to the airport to catch a returning flight. Car 2015 from Star Cabs pulls up and I jump in my driver is Ruperto R. Jr. and his licences indicated YCS transportation. So far so good. I m in a hurry the flight leaves in 90 minutes as he pulls out I see a handmade sign taped to the ceiling that says no credit or debit cash only . Damn I have no cash. Are all cabs cash only? I ask. Ruperto says no he does not have the credit card machine installed. I guess I ca not count that against him I made an assumption since it s 2012 and did not read the sign before jumping in. Lesson s learned ask before you jump in. He says he ll take me to US Bank so he takes a left and soon pull into the bank. There s an ATM at the door and an ATM in the parking lot for cars to drive up to. I tell him to just pull in the exit since I am sitting in the back adjacent to him and no one is there he opts to pull all the way around instead. I think there s a language barrier here but while I m quite rushed and looking to minimize time he s a bit more laid back. He pulls up and I ca not reach the ATM and the sun is shining on the screen so I cannot read it so I squeak out of the door and block the sun and eventually get my cash. Yay. Ruperto drives me to the airport when we arrive he pops the trunk and does not get out or offer to help. The bill 17.50. He did not want to give me change back when I placed it on the arm rest he just said thank you expecting the rest. I should have asked for 1.50 back but I was more concerned about making the flight so I just left it. There seems to be a grave lack of customer service and due diligence here I have yet have an exceptional experience with any of the transportation services offered in LV. Ruperto does not mind taking the extra time and drive I felt to run up the meter while I could have just jumped out of the car and got cash at the entrance. If I ever see Star Cab again I ll remember to just avoid them especially car 2015. I ll remember to ask about credit first before stepping into the cab.
It took twice as long for the driver to get there than was listed. Driver was distracted with texting. Driver called me honey and sweetheart and that I did not have to go with him. So I did not go. Then I uninstalled the Uber app there is no continuity. I have had good and bad drivers nice and aweful cars. This was the straw. No more. Installed Lyft as my best friend uses them. App is refreshingly nice.
This is the first time I have ever left a restaurant feeling scammed. My fianc and I were visiting lake Las Vegas and thought we d give this restaurant a try... BIG MISTAKE. I wish we had read the prior reviews more. The dinner started with my fianc ordering a 10 glass of wine from the menu when the waiter instead insisted he would bring him something special without telling us what it was. The most expensive wine glass on the menu is 12. When we got the check the waiter had charged us 14 for bringing us a wine we did not have a choice on. He had 2 glasses which ended up adding 8 on to the check. Next we order an appetizer and a meal to split. The waiter tells us he will bring us a small side of Pasta .. well the small side of pasta that WE DIDNT ASK FOR ended up costing us 20. He charged us 10 for each side that we never wanted without ever telling us it would be 10 a plate... we never would have ordered it if we knew it was. After dinner I asked for a dessert menu the waiter insisted he would bring us something special and never brought me the dessert menu I asked for... he ends up bringing us a dessert we hated and never would have ordered... another 10 added on to the bill without telling us what it would cost. We ended up paying an extra 8 for wine 20 for a side we never wanted and 10 for a terrible dessert. I run a food blog and have never once had an experience this bad. The food itself was subpar. Do not make the mistake we did.
Ok. We come here quite often....and see the same ppl workers I mean NO attempt to say to us hello again nice to see your back..nothing. I normally tip well just because it s part of my nature being a part of the service industry for so long. But this chain especially this location and Howe Ave really need to get it together. The service tonite was awful. First of all they had a new waitress training. I ve worked in my share of restaurants and the Normal policy is for the new server to shadow the trainer. For them to learn the ropes. They usually come around and tell the customers this is....so and so..and they will be training tonite. Nope. Not like that at all. She introduced herself and the lack of service began. I do not want to draw this out but come on ppl....show some class and at least act like you guys have a clue!!!!! We were there for almost 2 hours!!!!! I kid you not. A 3 top..... 2 for 20...with boneless wings and another order. Yes. Almost 2 hours later we finally checked out. I just do not get it. This location about a year and a half ago used to be so fun to go to. The servers rembrd you and were attentive. ...now they can really care less. And the food!!! Literally in the past 3 weeks we ve gone they have not had what I normally order. Lemon grilled chicken with the quinoa rice ...tonite it came out smaller than ever....the rice they gave me extended past my little chicken breast maybe an inch. So cheap. It is not even all quinoa. But mostly rice. Whatver. I m just so done. It does not take a rocket scientist to wait tables. But with the staff they have here now.....apparently it does. And I m writing corporate about them. Because we choose to go here to spend money. Every single week. The least we can get is good service and the food we order. Smh. ....
This was an horrible location and had an overall awful experience. The staff was ill mannered and rude from the time we walked through the door. When asked to be seated the server told us they were busy and walked off without asking if we would like to wait. The lady serving us threw down our food on the table spilling our drink everywhere! The cup was broken and the waffles were cold and stale. The server did not apologize and continued to serve us with a horrible attitude. I m very disappointed in how we were treated at this location. I would NOT recommend this place to anyone.
Wish i could give less than one star. We went in with a large group and were they would not seat us even if we broke into smaller groups. There were multiple empty tables open that we could see and the manager very rudely told us we could not eat there period because we had too many people. What kind of a restaurant turns away customers! Awful. Will not be going back.
This Coach store is located in CF Markville formerly known as Markville Shopping Centre or Markville Mall. I ve been a fan of Coach and their stuff for many years now. I bought a beautiful wallet at this store when they first opened and they seemed like they did not really care all they wanted was the sale. Later I bought a belt online and it came without a box by accident I had the paperwork and asked the girl if she could cut the belt in store for me as it was a cut to size belt. She said yeah we do not really do that but okay sure. I told her about the box and she replied with an attitude like I ca not give you a box if they did not give you a box you must ve went to an outlet store. I said no I bought it online and I have the receipt and everything. In the end Coach sent me a brand new box and an apology but I got nothing in store. Worst experience in a Coach store EVER. The one at Promenade is amazing though . 1 5.
I was craving cupcakes when I recently came to visit my boyfriend in Toronto so I thought we could give this place a shot. We came here and were greeted kindly and offered multiple box combinations. We ended up going for 12 mini cupcakes. When I ate my first cupcake cookies and cream I thought this is not bad as the frosting was not overwhelmingly sweet however the frosting to cupcake ratio was off. As I went for a different cupcake peanut butter and ate it I noticed it taste exactly the same as the cupcake I just had. There is not any difference between the cupcakes whether you have a hazelnut or peanut butter they all taste the same. Shame because they look so beautiful. Wo not be going back because it s not worth the price I paid for 12 mini cupcakes for 22.
My home warranty company HSA sent them to repair a gas leak. I found the service tech to be unhelpful and rude. He told me he could not fix it and to call the gas company back. When I called SW Gas they suggested I use someone on their approved vendor list. I reached 5 Star Home Services Inc. who responded quickly and fixed the problem for the same price A and R Complete Service charged for the worthless visit. See my 5 Star Home Services review.
Terrible service and food. Ordered the Hennessys giant burger and would have rathered eat a macdonalds burger. Not normally one to leave reviews however this place left me feeling extremely underwhelmed and disappointed. Such a let down for an Irish bar as normally they are great. Tables were dirty and waitress came over several times and wiped the food off with her hand and the same situation for all surrounding tables. 1 2 hour delay waiting for drinks and food was an hours wait
Coffee in this place is always cold. I ve let them know so many times but again today coffee was cold. I m going to change where I get my food and coffee from now on. I ve heard the owner for this place is from California he may need to come here once in awhile and check on his investment and service.
PLEASE SAVE YOURSELVES DONT GO HERE OR BRING YOUR KIDS HERE.. HERE IS MY STORY This is what happened to me at a Next Care Urgent care center or at least that is what the sign on the building said . I do not think it s a real urgent care and needs to be looked into I had injured my Wrist and was up all night in so much pain never went to sleep so I went first thing in the morning at 8am to Nextcare at 6343 S Higley Rd Gilbert AZ 85298 4339 on 4 14 ph 480 748 2712 . They took me back to a room did ex rays and then Tara Mahoney FNP examined my wrist but seem to focused on if the wrist was broken. I had asked her about the ligaments but she had no comment. I asked her what I should do about the pain she stated to take Tylenol as she was sending me home with a prescription the lowest of dosages of steroids and not to mix Advil with the steroids. She never referred me to a specialist she did not seem experienced in ligaments and never brought up Tendinitis. I understand this was not in her field but thought if she did not have answers for me to why my wrist was so swollen and in so much pain why she would of not thought to referred me out. She told me to make sure I wear the split that I bought at walgreens during the day but take if off at night when I go to bed so that the swelling would not go up. She also stated that she was not an expert in reading x rays so she was sending over the x rays to the radiologist to review and I would get a call back from her either way on the results. I went home and did as instructed which I should not have and took the split off when I went to bed to wake up at about 2am in unbearable pain that I reached out a 24 hour hot line nurse within my insurance co. The nurse was more helpful on the phone than this urgent care when I was actually in the office. I was in so much pain I did not sleep the rest of the night and my wrist was so swollen. I put the split back on although at this point could not strap it as my wrist was so enlarged. I reached out to urgent care when they opened on Sunday morning 4 15 when the receptionist answered I asked to speak with the nurse and she asked me to explain to her what was going on as the nurse was with patients and when I explained the situation I was told that they do not give out narcotics. Keep in mind I never asked for narcotics I was just asking what is wrong with my wrist? Why is it so swollen and causing me so much pain? Once we had the reason we could move on to how we can make my wrist more comfortable. The receptionist lead me to believe they did not believe my pain was real and that I just wanted narcotics which is very unprofessional something you do not want to hear when you are in consistent pain and have not slept now for 2 nights. The receptionist did give me the results of the radiology report that they received the day prior keep in mind they did not call me when they got it back that there was no broken bones which I already knew. Finally the receptionist stated they would have someone call me back. I received a call back about an hour later from the X ray tech Daisy stating they could no longer assist me that if I needed I could go to the hospital for more testing. I asked her if she had a recommendation on what facility would have a hand wrist specialist that could assist me she put me on hold and came back and stated she checked with the staff and its not their job to refer me I have to call my insurance or my primary dr on Monday for assistance. When I asked to speak with Tara Mahoney FNP the nurse who examined me I was told she has too many patients to take a minute to talk to me and to wait to talk to my primary on Monday. It was all about getting as many insurance claims in as possible before the end of the day.. Is this a new thing the Drs and nurses no longer consult you and they gave me to a person who never examined me just took my x rays as well as the receptionist gives you the results. They did not offer me any medical assistance even the brace I have on is from Walgreens. I do not feel this NP is a real nurse as she had no clue what she was doing or was qualified to be in that urgent care unless its true she just there to bring you into a room enough to file an insurance claim because she really does not know her job Sorry I know my frustration is still upsetting I did eventually go to a REAL dr and he did find the issue and gave me the correct dosage and of mediation to bring the swelling down and found out I had Tendinitis. If you google it you will see this is very painful. I know that we have an epidemic of drug addicts which is very sad in our country today. If you have a patient with a very swollen wrist there is a great possibility there is a problem before you accuse someone of not really being in pain and as you see the real dr was able to get the swelling down without the use of Narcotics and the swelling is what caused the pain. Please do not go here save yourselves
i ordered the chicken super bowl with extra avacado with no onions and there was one avacado slice not even kidding there were onions and my rice was unbelievably undercooked making it feel like i m biting into BONES and there was no citrus sauce on my salad very disappointed
Horrible customer service. Employees dressed poorly and inexcusable lack of integrity. Beth shoukd be fired for sure. I do not care if they make their own furniture its not worth a 10th of the sale prices. One couch had a hole in it and they said its fine that part goes up against the wall . Not all couches go against the wall you ignorant trash. take my advice go to RC willey or Ashley....hell even big lots
This airline exists because they fly to small towns few airlines go to.They have OLD junkie narrow planes with the most cramped seating imaginable. When you call them it takes them 45 minutes or more to pick up so you have to use their terrible internet site .Initial rates low but they have plenty of added on charges all bags are an extra charge.If you cancel you lose all your money unless you insure your flight. I had an upfront seat but all the overhead compartments were filled so I had to put my bag in back so I had to wait till the airline emptied to get my bag I paid extra for my seat which had zero leg room. They run a food cart down the isle 3 times each time the overweight flight member elbowed me going down the isle.All food and beverage are expensive so bring your own.One time I paid 22 for a front row seat but had the door pressing against my leg so it did not really offer extra legroom. This airline is truly rock bottom.There is often delays it is nothing to run a half hour late twice they had AC problems.What is really shocking is how rude or short tempered some of the employees are they work for the worst airline in the country YET THEY HAVE A LOT OF ATTITUDE.What a joke. I keep praying someone will buy this airline to bring it up to the standards of other airlines ! Anyone who rates this airline higher than 2 stars obviously does not fly much.I have flown out of several cities with Allegiant it is always the same.
Terrible experience. Last Saturday we had scheduled a technician to come to our house for a simple rejuvenation for 79. Within minutes of the technician arriving he breaks our service disconnect and immediately hands over an iPad and says it s 500 to fix and that because he broke the service disconnect he cannot complete the service he came here to do. We were not ready to make an unexpected 500 decision within moments so we rescheduled for the following week while we researched the repair. My boyfriend made a couple calls ran to Home Depot spent 13 on parts and came home and rewired and installed it himself. Good thing we did not hand over the 500. Our appt was for rescheduled for today with a window between 4 6. We received a call that they were cancelling on us because the technician was too busy were asked if we wanted to reschedule and the next available was next week! At this point the answer is HECK NO. Your company broke our equipment and as far as you know we could have been without AC for the last week and you have the nerve to cancel on us? Do not fall for their we do it right commercials. Obviously if this is how you take care of customers then your doing it wrong.
Save Your Money Go Some Where Else!! I must say I want to like this place... we have gone a few times in the past but today was just an awful visit . Start off by the price I am okay with paying 10.00 for my 4 year old. He can do everything there and he loves doing the pumpkins. My 1 year old.. I should not have to pay 10.00. why because she CAN T DO ANYTHING THERE. No one watches the bounce house to ensure that small kids do not get stepped on.. yeah there is a sign but no parents of large kids watch their child. So the web maze and slide... three other things my one year old she can not do those too. Second My son was bit by the small donkey. I know it says feed at your own risk but two other kids we bit too. You would think they would not have such animals out when Small kids are expected to be feeding them. Again another thing my 1 year old can not do. So you want me to pay 10 for her pumpkin? of which you have been around the pumpkins so she ca not even pick it out? She ca not even undo a sticker yet is expected to decorate a pumpkin? Such a waste for 10.00. At no point will I recommend this place to anyone who asks where to go. Vertuccio Farms seems to be the go to spot now.
Stayed here last night worst casino hotel I ve ever stayed in. They upgraded my room for a small fee toilet does not even work. Went out drinking and gambling got back at 3 am to my room. Card does not work to open the door. Go back down to the front desk they said it should be working now. Still did not work so I had to bang on the door to wake up my girlfriend. Took me 2 hours to get a beer so when she finally came by with my drink I had to order 3 at once so that I would not have to wait.
Called to inquire about a floor model Weber grill that I d previously seen on the floor but had not been in stock for at least 2 weeks. Clerk said they still had the floor model but could not sell it. I asked for the item number so I could check other locations but what he gave me turned out to be incorrect. Drove 12 miles out of my way to look at the not for sale grill again and get the correct item number myself but the grill was not there and there was no help to be found. Went to customer service so she d call for assistance. Waited 10 and no one came but there were no less than 8 clerks milling around doing nothing or chit chatting with one another. And the customer service gal? She was chattering away on her cell phone. Too bad Lowes. This customer is headed to the Depot.
Too much fakeness... Not Mexican all! All raspados are made out of syrup and they add a little fruit to make it seem natural. Corn is too hard. Very disappointed.
Have been driving past the Old School Pizzeria for months and keep telling myself I have to try that place! So last night was the night while the ambience in the restaurant is nice and you can watch them make your pizza their menu was ala carte only. No family meal deals or pizza wing specials. I ordered a large pepperoni sausage pizza and rosemary garlic knots. I was not impressed with their homemade sausage and pizza crust was tough to chew. The garlic knots were hard around the edges and equally tough to chew not enough garlic and way TOO much rosemary. For 10 knots they put an entire sprig of rosemary on top which made a few impossible to eat. Was very disappointed!
My friend had to go to the ER on a Thursday night. The place is very run down and the sheets were stained. They messed up his IV dropped his blood samples and his morphine! If it s not an emergency go somewhere else
The food is very very fake. When most of the fried products get to room temperature they melt into a goo rather than just getting soggy. . . Need I say more? Everything has additives and yes eating there often will make you fat. It s impossible to avoid with food of that quality. The service is going to depend on who the manager is at the time. If there s someone running the store poorly people are going to be waiting on food. When people wait on food they tend to complain... but my problem is its mcdonalds... you get what you pay for. I know they add something to the fries to make them addicting that s why I still frequent this chain store.
Why does this place still exist? This place has the worst sushi ever! I m not sure about the other food but if your called sushi tei then you should definitely get the sushi right.
Whenever a friend suggests Mexican food in our area El Jalapenos is never brought up as a possible option. I ve eaten there numerous times maybe i was ordering the wrong thing. It seems like most of the items on the menu are the wrong thing. The food quality is like Chi Chi s or something.
I ate at Nonno s or no! no! as we now refer to it and it was just okay. I do not get the rave reviews. Two of our dishes were decent and two were not good. The pesto sauce on one of our dishes seriously tasted like it was made with dried basil.
Went here for a Happy Hour with a friend. The drinks were amazing but the male server in the lounge has off putting. I asked if they had Happy Hour specials and he said Yes and just stood there. I had to kind of guide him into getting me a Happy Hour menu. As a Guest that is not what I expect from a place like Tanzy. Probably wo not be back and wo not suggest it to anyone as a good HH spot.
There could be more fruit variety and they should constantly switch yogurt flavors ..staff should be a little friendlier too
Went Sat Mar 3rd for lunch was not busy but got a crummy table anyway. Almost 8 for a pint of beer. Italian panini was not very good. Bread had too much seasoning and the meats were nothing special. Good location on Stephen Ave.
It s Friday and I wanted sushi!! I came here based on yelp and it is so close to me. I ve never experienced a revolving sushi bar before so I was excited to head down here and try it out! Lots of parking so no problems there.When we walk in the place is pretty big they can use a decorator and the service let s just say they can improve on it. We were seated next to the revolver cool concept especially if you are a visual person. The prices were extremely reasonable so you do not have to worry about breaking the bank. We tried four different rolls do not ask me what because I just took the ones that look good. The flavors were not bad no problems there. We ordered two drinks a wine and a beer. Guess what? They do not do happy hour prices on a Friday. Stupid right? Anyway we ordered the drinks anyway. Our server did not even go over how this whole concept works how the color of the plate determines the price and how they give you a check when you say you are done. We kind of just asked whichever employee who passed by these questions. It was quite irritating. So while I am looking at this conveyor belt full of sushi all these questions come to my mind 1 How do they know how long a sushi plate has been on the conveyor belt? 2 How do they know if a plate is no good anymore since we are in room temperature 3 What do they do with all their inventory at the end of the night and how do they control spoilage? All these questions going through my mind did not stop me from eating. The pinot noir I had was a little too warm for me. We paid our bill less than 30 for four plates two alcoholic beverages not bad. We were in and out of there in half an hour so this would be a great place to go for a quick lunch. After the experience I was ready to give this place three stars. However half an hour later I was not feeling all that well. I would not necessarily say I had food poisoning but I may have eaten a few things that my stomach did not agree with.
I would give this Home Depot zero stars if I could. The paint department is so freaking slow it s laughable. One of the employees in the paint department is so mean and disrespectful to his customers. Stood in line for 10 minutes with one person ahead of me waiting for one gallon of paint while contractors are waiting... one guy working just helping customers and not making paint. Now have been waiting an additional 15 minutes and no paint is still being made. Save yourself the time drive completely out of your way and visit any other Home Depot in the metropolitan Phoenix area.
What a scam this place is. The most blah and salty food I ve ever had. Ridiculously over priced for what you get. The only positive was the staff attentive and gracious. Plenty better Italian restaurants within walking distance.
This was ok but I would never go back here. I got one of their pre made bowls and it was a very gross combination of flavors. Tuna tomato red onion sweet sauce. Really gross. Also the tuna itself did not have the freshest flavor. 2 stars since this place is fine if you re in a hurry and the help was nice enough. But their portions are not as big as other poke places I ve been to either.
Eddie V s let me down this past Wednesday. When we arrived at 6 pm the restaurant was not full during the summer season. I had requested a quiet table. My date perhaps feeling a bit more lively wanted to sit at a table in in the bar area. I informed the hostess who firmly insisted we take the table I reserved just a couple hours prior. We complied. The waitress was prompt however I soon became impatient with her because it was clear she was pushing the wine. We purchased a bottle informed them we would be having a leisurely dinner my companion is European and yet she kept rushing the drinks although ironically she would not pour the San Pelligrino. The oysters were fresh although the waitress could not tell us where they came from only the west coast. The Caesar salads were unsatisfactory. My sea bass was properly cooked but the pickled ginger in the Hong Kong style dish later caused some gastric distress. My date s scallops were fine. The wait staff began to push forcing my date to finish her dinner much sooner than she would have. We decided to skip the deserts and went elsewhere where we could take our time. I attempted to contact the restaurant the next day left messages for the GM however they never bothered to followup. I feel they should have easily accommodated our request for a different table they had plenty of tables over the 3 hours we were there and the one we were seeking was not reserved when I asked for it. The wait staff needs training in proper handling of plates when picking them up without stacking them chest high as well as working with the customer s pace rather than their own. At one point I firmly insisted the waitress stop pouring more wine into my already 2 3 full glass. A good Chablis needs to be chilled especially in Phoenix. The sale seemed more important to her than my ultimate satisfaction. At this point I m not inclined to return I would consider the several other options for fine dining at Kierland before going back to Eddie V s.
Not overly impressed by this location. We checked in and staff were not friendly. There was no greeting offer to assist with bags help with parking or recommendations on where to eat. A couple of hours after I checked in I realized I did not link my reservation with my account. I went downstairs to get assistance and the person behind the counter had no interest in trying to help me and told me to come back later. I just IM d Hyatt on the mobile app instead. The rooms were ok. What you would expect from a Hyatt Place separate living room except that the flooring had a lot of stains on it. This hotel is beginning to show age. The offer parking with nearby businesses. I believe it s 12 a night. While the location is nice near the capitol university and restaurants I would recommend staying somewhere else.
BED BUGS!!! Need I say more? Well I will. First of all my husband and I stayed at the Aria last year and had a fantastic time. This time however Oct 18 20 was a very different story. We went to Liquid to repeat our great time from last year and the place was nearly empty which was fine with us. We got two lounge chairs 300! and there was an empty umbrella stand right behind us. No matter what we did or who we tipped we could not get them to move one of the numerous unused umbrellas over to us. It was absolutely ridiculous. We had planned on going to Liquid for both days but needless to say we did not. Instead we actually went over to the Cosmopolitan where we will be staying next time and they let us use their pool which was awesome and had no minimum charge and great music. Anyways we were so unhappy with our experience at the Aria after one day and they tried to make it right by upgrading us to a suite for our second night which we appreciated. That being said in the morning when we woke up I found a tiny bed bug on top of the mattress. GROSS!!!! My husband always checks the mattress of our hotel room and we did not see any evidence of an infestation. However where there is one there must be more. We immediately informed the front desk and they sent up someone who had no idea what she was talking about. She was very dodgy about answering our questions about what they do to deal with bed bugs. She offered to have the mattress replaced which is NOT a good idea. Dragging a mattress through the hallway will only spread the infestation. We went down to talk to a manager and they said they would send in a third party inspector. We had to catch a plane so they took our number. They later informed us they found no evidence of an infestation which is not surprising since we did not see any either but they obviously had a room that was in the beginning stages. Since they did not find any evidence they refuse to compensate us for our luggage which we promptly threw in the trash when we got home. We decontaminated all of our stuff just to be on the safe side. Waaay easier to prevent bed bugs than treat them. We lost a few pairs of shoes and had a huge dry cleaning bill. It would have been really easy for the Aria to make things right but they did not come through. Customer service is no longer a priority for them and it is painfully obvious. No way we are staying there again. Cosmopolitan here we come. Do not stay in room 31118 or the first room we stayed in 12014 !! Also someone else posted about bed bugs in their room at the Aria during the same time period
We got frustrated with traffic trying to look for Leticia s Mexican Cucina with patience running thin we opted to go to Zabas instead. Ordered 2 steak Zaba bowls they were ok mediocre really a kids meal quesadilla which my son did not even eat although he loves quesadilla that should have been a sign and chips and guac. So there sign for chips and guac is 2.99 but if you order a large guac it is 3.79 and chips stale and probably the worst is 1.79 which the cashier failed to mentioned that I have to pay for chips if I wanted a larger size guac? What does the regular serving comes in then a spoonful? I mean what am I going to eat the guacamole with? Seriously a total rip off 35 for two and a half on a fast food Mexican place NOT WORTH IT. I d go to cafe Rio anyday than this place. Or should have stayed with the original plan...
This doctor is very sweet and I loved when she was located at A Womans Place. The experience I had with her receptionist today was less than pleasant. I called to make an appointment for my yearly. I know about when it is because a lot of girls in our office use Dr. Docasar. I called and the receptionist said I had made an apt a year ago when I went in for the yearly in 2014 February 2014. I said well I should have received a call or email reminder. That is a year out so I was instructed at that time if I made an apt I could move it around if need be and that I would receive a call. A call was never made. The receptionist states My notes show a call was made so the fee is owed . I said I could bring my phone records and my call logs and that said call was indeed never made. I also said I will like to come in and make an apt and she said well at that time you will owe the 50 and I said again please let me bring in my records or lets discuss this at my arrive. She then says she is going to call billing and let me know what they can do then says thanks and hang up. No apt was ever made even though that was the reason I called Just like no call was made even though the notes state one was.
this Lee s has a new manager which is a definite improvement from the previous one they had. That being said all of Lee s locations are just not up to par with Total Wine and More or South Points Gift shop when it comes to price and customer service...which to me are the 2 most important markers of a business. Before wasting hard earned money at Lee s do some comparisons eg Blue Moon Belgium White 8.99 at Lee s .... 6.99 Total wine and South Point. The convenience store across the street has Blue moon cheaper than Lee s....explain that one
Awful. Did not even finish the job that was asked of them. Asked for a full service and to fix my rear view can and driver side headlight. The only thing that was done was the service and my truck was in their for 2 full days. When I went in no one offered to help me I just say their watching 4 people stand around and talk to each other until I went and asked their for some help. What makes this all worse is I told them I needed my head light fixed as I was getting ready to drive to Texas a few days later which is not a short drive . Overall it was just painfully bad and I will never take my truck their again
Went to restaurant week dinner there tonight. The food was good about what you would expect during restaurant week. The problem was the heat and the service. After 45 minutes I asked if the air could be turned down and was told there was a problem with the air conditioner. No comment from staff until I asked. By the time we left at best it was the same temperature as outside mid to upper 80s. A C problems happen but we should have been told when we arrived and given the option to reschedule. The heat was compounded by how long we had to be in it. They had 11 total items on their menu. 3 were desserts of the type that would definitely be made ahead of time. Why did it take 2 and a half hours to serve us when they only had 8 different items to prepare for the whole restaurant? It was 30 minutes before we got drinks at least another 15 before the first course at least 20 minutes AFTER finishing each course before the next was served and 20 minutes after finishing dessert before we got the bill. There was never any apology about the heat or slow service.
I have been looking forward to trying BurgerFi for quite some time now and today we finally did and I have to say I am really disappointed about the whole experience I ordered the Conflicted burger the sauce was pretty non existent but my biggest problem was that both burgers were definitely overcooked and tough. The veggie burger was not even close to resembling a patty and was just ugh! tough dark and just did not taste good. My husband had the CEO and we also ordered the kids meal which did not come with the fries that we ordered and we did not realize it until after we were done . All of our burgers were overcooked especially the kids burger and it was very tough for a kid to eat. Overall I m sad to say it was not a good experience.
I would never eat at any establishment that allowed their employees to smoke RIGHT IN FRONT OF THE RESTAURANT! With their uniform and apron on! Not only is that gross but it s disgusting and unprofessional. I ve also seen an employee use the restroom and not wash their hands. That speaks volumes on what could happen in the kitchen. My boyfriend and I play poker in that room next to it and he is completely grossed out by the employees that go in the slots to check their phone with their gloves on. YUCK! No thanks.
I ve tried to be a fan of this place but it is really hard... On the plus side it s got great outdoor seating and I can easily walk there from where I live. On the negatives The toppings are really expensive like Artichoke Hearts and I find like 5 pieces on a large pizza. I am always finding ground up pits in the Kalamata Olives onion skins in the onions and unchewable bits of carmelized garlic. The service is ridiculously slow. I tried to go last night with a friend there were a ton of empty tables and the hostess told us They were understaffed... so we could not be seated for 20 minutes. And even after 20 minutes I still see the hostess rushing around but not actually seating us. We went somewhere else. I ordered for takeout on the weekend once when I got there they told me that my pie had been burnt which is food service code for We did not make it yet and they rushed to make another one. Despite my urging to not rush the pizza had unmelted globs of cheese and random toppings I did not even ask for which as a vegetarian finding bits of Sausage in your mouth is pretty gross . All in all I ve tried really hard to love having a pizza place in the neighborhood but Revolution just does not cut it.
I m having surgery this Monday for a hysterectomy. I have endometriosis and polycystic ovaries but i stayed my period which is sky rocket hell pain for me and you ca not take ibuprofen before a surgery so my doctor gave me a prescription for oxycodone. Now i had just picked up my prescriptions for my surgery a few days ago which my doctor told me to get them not because i will not be able to do it after my surgery. Well one of those prescriptions was also a narcotic. So coming in today to fill that oxycodone to get me by till my hysterectomy Monday they refuse to fill out. He says you just picked up something like this to days ago. So i tried to explain what i just wrote here but he would only half listen to me. I kept telling him and he said fine I ll have to call the doctor to make sure it s okay. So around and around on the phone they go. FINALLY he s gets the understanding from the doctor. Sort of. Then he proceeds to tell me how i was supposed to pick up those surgery meds after my surgery. How the h... ! Ugh I m having surgery and no. Anyway i finally got through that. I do not care to be treated like I m scamming the system or something! Jumping to conclusions instead of trying to understand and help. People seem to be more incline to be negative then helpful even professionals while doing their job they get paid for!
The food is great but it takes way to long to get your order. I ve waited over a half an hour for my sandwich. If you have limited time to get your lunch do not go here.
Hmm how do I begin? Well for one they did not try to even get in contact with my insurance company now I have to call them and this is where the review comes in to play. I have been on hold for 40 minutes! Do you have only one person answering the calls?! But oh they can help you pay your bill RIGHT AWAY. It turns out it s the health insurance part that they avoid. Then I hung up and called again I waited 35 minutes and thought well if they can make me wait over an hour then surely I can write. Review in the mean time. And on another note your call waiting music sucks.
We did not have to pay cover because a promoter got us in but if we did definitely not worth it. It was a Friday night pretty late and pretty dead. Went in grabbed a few drinks people watched then left to look for something with a bit more excitement. It s a cool place to grab some drinks possibly do some dancing and mingle but I would not spend my entire night here. There s really not much else to say about this place. I did not hate it but I m not a fan either.
The bed was so uncomfortable like sleeping on a king sized rock. The tv was positioned around a corner so that you ca not watch tv in bed. I called to see if there was a different room I could switch too and the desk clerk told me that s how all of their rooms are. Also the bathrooms are directly in front of the bed and not right by the door like almost all other hotel rooms. Will never stay again. Desk clerk was pleasant.
Its pretty difficult to find a terrible bar trivia place lets face it its just beer and pop culture questions. So to First Round Draft s defense their Tuesday night trivia is not bad at all. The bar is really spacious and has a pretty good crowd on Tuesdays.... but that s kinda where the good news end. The deal with FRD is the very very sub par bar food even for bar food. My Cajun Chicken salad was a bowl of lettuce with 2 giant pieces of tomatoes 2 thick ass pieces of cucumber a boiled egg and dry chicken. Hardly containing any taste and very reminiscent of airplane salad.. in coach I have no idea what First Class has to offer . To my horror the giant soft pretzel that my peers ordered came with a side of melted cheese dipping sauce CHEESE WIZ. No it did not taste like cheese wiz it literally WAS cheese wiz. The brownie dessert did have a fuggy and warm brownie which I appreciated but the vanilla was hard as ice and the fudge was Hershey s brand not even pretend home made. The service was mediocre as we had to hunt down the server pretty often. The bathrooms were pretty horrifying for such a large location it was not kept very clean or fresh smelling. No air spray fresheners do not count as fresh . If trivia here was not so damn easy I would probably never come back. Will definitely stop ordering food here though.
One star for service another for effort. Decent looking place. Ordered Bsil fried rice. The rice was under cooked and was hard to chew swallow.
First of all I hate writing bad reviews. Alright here it goes... This has been a long time coming since I ve been to Bevvy multiple times and have ALWAYS had BAD service so I figured my review was due. I know what you re thinking well why does she keep going back well the answer is my FRIENDS! We went on a SLOW Saturday afternoon sat on the patio with literally 5 other people besides our party of 3. Everything started fine until we received our food. All 3 food orders were wrong! We then waited 10 minutes until I finally got up to find our waitress to tell her that our food orders were wrong. She then blamed it on the cooks it s always a team effort take some responsibility. Then she refused to come to our table after our encounter. My friend had to get up again and find her to get our check after waiting 30 minutes after initially requesting it. It gets better... After we paid she rushed to see how much we tipped her. As I was walking out the door she asked if we had bad service probably because she saw her tip which I still tipped her 18 which is really low for me since I also work in the industry I admittedly said YES! She then says You obviously do not come around here cuz that s how it is. WHAT?!! My question is why do these servers in that area of Old Town think they deserve even 18 if they know that they are not doing their job? You re a server who gets paid off of tips so if you want a big tip DO your job! It s simple! Thanks for reading! I hope this place improves because it definitely has potential and the food WAS pretty good.
Nothing to write home about. This place will close soon. Pizza has been sitting out for hours hi how touched it to put into warmer bare handed. Not impressed. Would not go back ever even if we are hamm
Wanted to leave a good review as the food was very tasty. That said my wife and I got very ill during the meal and spend the rest of the night and next day in the bathroom. Witnessed some less than sanitary practices with gloves. That should have been the tip off.
They are advertising a 14oz NY Steak all over the hotel for 19.99. I order it and after about 25 minutes I get a T Bone. I tell our waiter I ordered the NY. He said so you do not want the T bone? Are you kidding me? He walks back to kitchen and comes back we do not have the NY. Ok but you have signs everywhere advertising it. So I have an option of a 10oz NY. No I want the prime rib actually 2 cheaper on menu . In all with the frozen vegetables and automatic order changes without notifying the customer this place had serious issues.
My first and my last I ordered extra meat and paid for it on both a pastrami burger and a Philly steak the cook argued with the cashier saying that the receipt had no extra meat on it but then looks up at me and says there s extra me on there how the f did it change without you even touching the burger or the Philly cheesesteak. Plus when I was like just give me back my money there girl get me 2.50 because she was so frazzled by the situation that she was just like oh no I just charge you for or I gave you back the money for a regular one first and last time definitely not a good spot
Is zero stars an option? I have been trying to formulate a long story short version of our experience but you need to know and be warned. My husband took his Honda Accord in for an inspection a routine oil change and was having an issue with his AC. He was told the AC issue was a relay and they needed a day to get it. Oh and by the way you need struts and some new gaskets so it will all be 1200. Well we knew struts and gaskets could wait a paycheck or two so said please take care of AC oil and inspection. Went back the next day and AC was fixed. 596.97. The next morning there was a pool of oil in the driveway. Car goes back and gets checked and we are told it s just residual oil from the work that was done. It s cleaned and ready to go. Later that night more oil in the driveway. Back again and told once again it s residual oil. Well with yet another trip we get a call that the oil pan actually has the wrong size oil plug and it damaged the seal and the whole oil pan needs to be replaced. Really? So the car that did not have any oil issues the first 4 times they had it suddenly needs a 490 repair?? And why would I trust anyone who missed it the first 4 times to repair it correctly OR pay them one more dime? I actually asked the rep I spoke to this question to which he had no answer. There is no way to prove that if we had spent the original 1200 they wanted our oil pan would have survived. I can however tell you that I brought the car directly to Goodyear who called and said that the original plug had probably been cross threaded and they tried to use the oversized one to fix it but it did not work. They said the oversized plug was brand new. So angry that a place that should be a great addition to our neighborhood has fulfilled every crooked cliche people share about mechanics. I thought the key word in Auto Repair was REPAIR. Unless you want your car back worse than when it went in do not fall for their comfy accommodations and Ballantyne worthy appearance. Go just about ANYWHERE else.
My wife and I stopped in to have lunch here The service was good but it was Over priced bar food in our opinion. A mixed greens with an iced tea and a bbq burger with loaded criss cuts and an iced tea was 53 plus tip. Everything seemed to be frozen and fried if your into this type of food hit a drive thru.
Like most of the Casinos on the strip now charging the self parking. 15 a night at Wynn starting in August of 2017. The buffet has the same menu as on the regular days but it was 59.99 during the labor day weekend. No holidays brunch was 45.99 and dinner was 42.99 starting at 3 30pm. Our room was on the 15th floor facing the strip the window was so dirty. It needs a wash. 5.35 for a small cup of latte.
Food and drinks were fine but service was horrible. The place was slow with plenty of staff yet it took 10 minutes for us to get menus after asking twice. On top of that the servers seemed incapable of cracking a smile and continued to provide poor service throughout the meal to the point that we had to get up and go to bar to ask for plates set ups etc.. The icing on the cake was that as we left we ran into one of the servers and they commented the service was that bad? as he pointed to the bill because apparently he thought the tip was too low. Frankly I did not even want to leave the 10 that I did after the poor service and if I could have changed it to 0 after that comment I would have. Here s a tip Tips are based on quality of service so if you find yourself recieiving a lower than expected amount reflect on how you can improve instead of chasing after customers... I now get why it was so dead there during happy hour and will never go back. Visit with caution...
Taken ber plenty of times and always happy and satisfied. Even impressed about their growth and branding. However once you get taken financially advantage of the taste has turned sour. Took a five minute ride down the street and was charged 70. I get the surge but 70 for five minutes. A 30 minute ride would ve been a car payment. Reached out to Uber and spoke with two different representatives and they stood behind this robbery. Horrible follow up. My first bad Yelp review. I could not let this settle until alerting future riders. Not good business.
Wait staff was amazing. We had the Hell s Kitchen tasting menu. Every single thing I put in my mouth was pretty much amazing. The food and service could not have been much better. Atmosphere definitely was not what we we re expecting. When you pay over 200 dollars on a meal you would not think the guy at the table next to you would be still wearing his shorts from the pool. My wife and I were expecting a fancy room for that price. We were way over dressed. Also was really loud. Kinda weird. It s worth a try to have the food. But probably never again.
Pastor Trav took a strong position on AZ politics during service. Whether or not I agree with his side he should keep his personal political opinions separate from the church. I go to church to hear God s word and not politics. I found it very inappropriate and will be checking out Gateway Church down the street.
Horrible service! We sat there for over an hour for French fries house salad and provolone wedges. There were only two other tables in the restaurant. This has happened on numerous occasions. It is very pricey for not that good of food. Will not be back.
This is not like the locations in California. Service is very slow food very mediocre. Overall go somewhere else if looking for a good night out
Went to rudys because I ve never been and once I saw the line I figured why not go next door. I used to go several years ago but I m pretty convinced that this place has gone done quite a bit. The meat was pretty decent but their sides are weak. It probably would have been worth waiting in line at rudys or drive a little further out to Joe s in Gilbert.
If you ever call them for an estimate get a second opinion they inflate prices and up sell solutions. I called them for a backed up toilet and slow draining tub. Their estimate was 450. On top of having to pay a 65 service call. I knew the price was outrageous so I did not let them do the work they still conned me out of the 65 service call. I day later me friend came out with an industrial plunger and cleared both in 2 minutes for free.
Slow service and way over priced. Sushi rolls are junior sized. Not worth it!!! Poop!!!
Plenty of Japanese and fusion options but limited sushi choices. Also no descriptions on the sushi so unless you know what you like you will be asking a lot of questions. I wanted to try the cornflake shrimp but they ran out of corn flakes. That happens I know but still. Sad sushi eater was sad. Also seriously please just print one menu.
The Pai Thai noodles were stuck together and mushy. The tofu tasted like rubber. I will never order from this place again. My other food was disgusting.
I have had three issues with delivery at this place. First time they made a mistake not that big of a deal second time they offered a replacement pizza third time nothing but attitude from Mary the manager all she kept on saying was that they are busy and made mistakes. I understand being busy but making a mistake on toppings three time I think is not understandable. Yes they offered a two free toppings on the next pizza. When I said I would not order again she just replied that we would experience the same thing somewhere else. Not happy at all not worth waiting an hour for delivery and getting wrong pizza.
I stopped at the truck tonight at Lincoln Park during the Farmers Market. I was looking to take home something sweet and thought I would give their cupcakes a try. I love the salted caramel cupcake from A Cookie and a Cupcake so I thought that I would try Sweet s for comparison. YUCK! Way too much salt in both the frosting and the cupcake. I spit it out. I am not a person who spits out sweets. It has to be BAD for me to be unable to eat it. It was disgusting. On the salted caramel alone I would give them one star. I did also get the buckeye cupcake and it was okay. I ve definitely had better. However it was edible and so that s why overall I m giving them two stars. I may try another flavor but I will be very careful in choosing and warn everyone to stay away from the salted caramel. It was gross.
That place smells like grease and they do not have sweet and sour sauce?!? I would not recommend this place. I would never sit inside there to eat so why would I want to order food from there.
I would give this location zero stars. We came with 4 families. They sat us late. It took 1.5 hours to get our food. One family left due to the time taking too long. We never got half our rolls. They were not willing to compensate for anything. For sure not somewhere we will return.
Racist garbage has lynching decorations for their disgusting selves and their patrons
I Spy Something Over With... THE UP SIDE Sort of a cool place. Sort of... THE DOWN SIDE This place used to be happening. Now it s pretty much over. The crowd has gotten a little rough around the edges and the place is looking over. THE SUM IT UP Not even worth the effort to wait in line to get in. Skip this has been.
Wanted some good ol starbucks coffee and the cashier kept sneezing and rubbing her nose. She never went to wash her hands!! Grabbed some canned drinks and used my phone bar code so she did not touch anything.
My family had dinner last Thursday night at Andora. We have liked the ambiance and location of this local historic restaurant in visits under previous ownership. We were disappointed with the food. My surf and turf was bland all around and the meat was rare not medium pink as requested my son s sauteed chicken breast with sherry gruyere sauce should have been much more flavorful and all of the food could have been presented better. My husband was not particularly impressed with his filet mignon and my daughter did not comment about her pork tenderloin but took most of her dinner home. The appetizers however were delicious flatbread calamari nice and light and not overdone zuccini ribbons and we all agreed that the best way to experience this restaurant is probably with drinks and appetizers in the cozy social room near the bar with a fireplace. The quality of the entrees did not live up to the price. The service was adequate. Our server was willing to take my steak back but I preferred to bring the rare portion home to heat up as leftovers. Also the hot tea served was an inexpensive bland brand rather than the Tazo or comparable better quality teas served at most restaurants of this level.
Somehow this company got my name and phone number and randomly decided that I needed an appointment. I called to make the correction but still got another text and call that I missed an appointment that I never made. Tried to called again to correct their error and was put on hold hell. Get it together Dre s Hair Salon.
I went in on a promotional offer that included a 60 minutes massage mani and pedi. The mani and pedi were ok however the massage was the WORST I have ever had in my life and I have had plenty. It was a young guy who never once used his fingers on my back. The entire 60 minutes was spent by him using his elbow and arms. It felt so painful that I debated telling him to stop. I usually get the deep tissue and this was ridiculous. I doubt he was even certified. I could not relax because during the massage he asked me to lift my arm move it around essentially work! How can you relax if the person is telling you to perform exercises??? Finally I was expecting a full massage with arms legs neck chest and back. He only worked on my back. Never again will I ever go back. Worst experience ever.
Once and done! Customer Service terrible only a hand full of people in BRFC and it took over 30 minutes for our food to get tabled and I had to stand over them at the counter to get them to get it out in that time!! Food was mediocre nothing special and not worth the cost. We will not be back.
I went here with a Teambuy voucher. 24 for 2 months. Since this place is pretty close to me I thought this would be a great way to get acquainted with the gym and possibly sign up for a membership. The sales guy of course put the pressure on to get a membership every time he saw me which was expected annoying but no big deal. For the price I was paying stuff like that is a minor inconvenience. The weight room floor is carpeted and it really smells like feet. Why they would carpet a weight room is beyond me although I have heard that the building used to be a movie theatre so maybe they just never bothered to take out the carpet. The weight room itself has a lot of equipment although some of it is definitely in need of replacement. I was excited to see that they have hot yoga so I went to one of the classes. Unfortunately for me the heater happened to be broken or missing that day so the room was quite cold the insulation must not be good up there . It was a pretty miserable class since I was not dressed for the cold. I went to my first hip hop dance class which was fun and the instructor was fantastic. It was worth the 12 a month but definitely would not have been worth 100 which is what the student membership would have cost at the regular rate.
The first time we went to Arrogant Butcher we sat at the bar.. We went in the middle of the week so it was not as busy. The food was good but not great. The second time we decided to go was on Friday night.. The place was packed and good for them . The service was spot on but I cant say the same for the food. The food was average nothing memorable about any of it.. At the end we spent 150.00 for the 2 of us. The food is not worth that price. Also they seem to skimp on the wine by the glass and spirit pours.. I so want to love this place.. but 2 x now and it still did not delight.
I brought my toddler with me and he tried a few ice cream flavors before deciding on which one we wanted in our sandwich. As I ordered i asked if he could place the ice cream in a bowl because my toddler s mouth was too tiny to take a bite of the tall sandwich. Unfortunately he said he d have to charge me for the individual items if he deconstructed the sandwich in any way. Normally it would not have bothered me but he watched me come in with a toddler and give him the samples. This was not some scheme to get an extra paper bowl or plate. He told me I d have to deconstruct it myself or pay an extra 1.40. So of course I opted to do it myself sans the proper scoop and spatula that he used. He did give me a small cup to use and i used the plastic spoon to make the sandwich edible for a tiny mouth instead of it being all over the floor attempting to eat it on his own. The cookies were mediocre and would ve garnered a 3 rating. It just went against common sense to not oblige my request when I got the exact same ingredients and just wanted to make a small adjustment. We were the only customers so i was not holding up the line.
We came last week to celebrate an anniversary. We ordered steak mashed potatoes spinach mushrooms foie gras drinks wine caprese salad. Steak came cold and tough. Potatoes were cold mushrooms were flavorless. Foie gras was served without any bread. The drinks all had an over powering lemon flavor with no alcohol. The manager fought with us telling us the food is supposed to come cold!! Amazing excuse. Really Tom Collicchio? Your name is in this restaurant your making money by serving food that s not TOP CHEF worthy!! Please hire a new chef for your restaurant. This is a representation of you!! Thank you kindly for ruining our anniversary!!!
We went to Villa Antonio for Mother s Day. When I made the reservation we were not told that there was only a buffet available. There were no signs in the restaurant regarding the price of the buffet except the normal Monday Friday buffet that is 9.99. We were told to go ahead and serve ourselves. We had expected to order off the menu but when we realized that was not an option being as it was the first time we had gone to this restaurant we did not expect it to be outrageous. When the bill came the charge was 30.00 a plate and 15.00 for a child s plate. There was also an automatic 18 gratuity of 30.00 added to the bill for a party of 6. When my husband talked to the manager regarding there being no information regarding the price the manager s response was we ve been here 27 years and everyone in Charlotte knows we have a buffet on Mother s Day. So for those of you like us who are part of the 1 that do not know be warned. We will not be returning to this restaurant again.
Disclaimer can a vegetarian really appreciate a Greek restaurant? Methinks not but this one tried. I popped in here with my mum this week for lunch. The Decor? Pure cheese but I was fine with that. It was a little tricky to order for myself being a vegetarian altho my mum was not terribly impressed either. Service was attentive. The appetizers we had were pretty good Hummus with toasted pita and the flaming cheese. They each get a star My mum had a lunch special of the calamari fries and salad. All three were fine but absolutely nothing to write home about. The calamari was a bit chewy for my tastes. The fries tasted a bit ..... calamari ish as well. I had the salad a version of Greek without the lettuce and here is where major pointage was lost. There was about half an inch of oil poured over the whole thing and so for every bite I had to lift my vegetable out of the bowl and wait for the oil to slide off. To make matters worse I also had to salt the tomatoes since slathering them in low quality EVOO does not really add to them. The salad was gross. Seriously. Other people around me who had the souvlaki plates looked like they were enjoying them so I would not rule this place out but I personally will not come back here because even the salad was too oily for me!
Avis de mon amie Manucure et pdicure habitue faire du gel sans faux ongles en Europe tous les 2 mois. Celui ci n aura dure que 1 jour ! Effectivement ultra fin limite inexistant c est ce que jappelle l arnaque du sicle ! Produit non toxique vegans etc. Je veux bien je cautionne mais la faut pas exagrer. a a dur 1 seul jour alors qu on m avait dit 15 jrs! Et j ai pay 40 dollars pour a je trouve a inadmissible ! Je n y retournerai pas et ne le conseille pas aux clientes qui veulent quelque chose de solide. Le gel saut comme un vernis classique le lendemain par petits morceaux un peu partout ... bref esthticienne peu bavarde mauvais franais et anglais avec rictus suspect par moment genre pfff bref NEXT ! !
Came here for lunch on a Saturday Afternoon the restaurant looks very inviting with plenty of seating. Decided to order the Margaritas which were very tasty but not 14 tasty. I started off with their Yucca Fries for 8 here I am expecting a plate full of Brazilian Potato fries like the waiter explained. Nope it was a tin can with about 4 or 5 REGULAR steak fries Lol Anyways I ordered the 3 cheese Quesadillas with green sauce and handmade tortillas I think they were just decent. Also ordered a torta that did not compare to the taco trucks in East LA. Sigh Overall the food here is your typical Mexican dishes that honestly my mom would probably cook better. Although I did hear the enchiladas were decent 28 . I would probably not come back here it just did not wow me enough and if I do I would probably hit the bar. Restaurant should really consider revising their menu and prices. The staff is friendly but you could notice some are brand new and have never worked at a restaurant before. The bartenders are very friendly and make pretty good drinks. Probably because I am Mexican I expected more out of this place but I guess nothing beats Mom s cooking. If your in the mood for tacos head down the strip to Tacos El Gordo and save yourself some money.
Both times I have eaten here I arrived right at 11 am when they opened. Both times we were either the first or second party seated. Both times we ordered almost immediately. Both times we did not get our food until 11 45. That s a long wait for a burger. Nobody ordered anything unusual. The first time I chalked it up to them just opening. So I decided to try them again. Same issue the second time. The food was pretty good but it s not worth the long wait. It would have been more understandable if we were not the first ones in the restaurant yet many other tables got their food ahead of us. Also when I asked the waitress about it she said a big party was seated right before us however that was entirely untrue. No apologies just excuses. Also the water in the bathroom was scalding hot with no way to adjust it because it is an automatic sensor. I doubt I will eat here again.
The woman at the register was rude. There is no sign indicating they charge a 1 to use a card. I was not notified of that until I asked why the charge was more than my order. Their sign also says they take American Express...they do not . I got a salad so it s tough to mess that up. It tasted fine nothing spectacular but they did a design with the meat and cheese. I guess that gets them one of the stars.
The quality of the wings has deteriorated over the past few years and they are way overpriced. Paid 34 for 50 wings and they were well below average in taste. Wish I would not have spent the money.
I have been going to Hamburger Hut N Market for years. However on Saturday September 29 2018 around 1 15pm I placed an order right after my son placed his order and I received my food about 20 25 minutes after my son. I asked the cashier about my order and I was rudely told that it s 3 4 people ahead of me! Why am I behind 3 4 people when I placed my order after my son? Several customers that came way after me received their order before me. Needless to say this was my last time visiting this place!
my bad i wasted my time and breath here AGAIN! nope. im done. not worth it id rather go to the bar and ask for coffee then here. D O N E WITH THIS LOCATION
The spinach chicken Alfredo Chicken not cooked all the way and had spinach outside not inside pasta. Caesar was made with carrots and hot green peppers not a true Caesar at all. Service awful
I really wanted to like this place ... Like in my previous reviews for coffee shops and the like I look for good coffee and a great studying atmosphere. Upon my visit I came in grabbed a cold brew and tried studying. Was not very busy in the shop so sound was not an issue. I found my cold brew to be just alright but a more watered down than I would have liked. I also that it was odd to watch them make cold brew steep tea right on the counter in an industrial container swirling the bag around the water. Talk about fresh though right? I did not find the environment that great I thought it lacked outlets for those using laptops. The table was wobbly and the chairs were not that comfortable. Like the rest of the shops and cafes in downtown that are quirky and cool I found JoBot kind of dingy. Perhaps cold brew was a bad option as well as staying in here. From the looks of it JoBot looks like a grab and go kind of place. As for what other reviewers are saying looks like Chai and the Crepes are a big hit here.
The absolute worst piece of garbage in Las Vegas and that includes the trash on the sidewalks. Anybody who wastes their money on this gets what they deserve. Saw the original Cirque and dancers version when it opened then walked out of the revamped version two years later. From awful to no excuse for continuing to exist this is the most pathetic thing I will ever see.
I was in on a Tuesday morning right when Danny s opened and I was going in for an oil change and car wash. I asked about how long it would be to the man I first spoke to. He told me oh less than an hour you re the first one in. I also wanted to get the backseat just the back seat shampooed. So I thought to myself okay an hour. I went inside and sat down to wait. About 25 minutes later another man called my name and told me the oil change was done but had a couple recommendations for my car. I needed a new air filter and my engine fluid to be flushed. Something going to cost over 200. No thank you. So I payed for what I was getting done then went outside cause all that was left was to get the car wash. I thought to myself wow I m actually going to get out of here in less than an hour. Great cause I was heading out of town. Well I was wrong. It took over an hour for my car to be washed. Yes an hour for a car wash. I could see that happening on a Saturday morning when it was busy but there was only two other cars there! What were they doing?!? Then when I spoke up asking how much longer because I was quoted less than an hour... no one knew what was going on. My car had been sitting! And it had not been dried off nor had the seats been shampooed! Awesome! At this point in time I just wanted to take my car and leave because I did not have the time to wait any longer. I finally get my car finished and there s spots everywhere! A five year old could of washed it better... And faster for that matter. I tried to call and speak with the manager and was put on hold for five minutes. Then was told he s with a customer and would call me back. I m still waiting for my call back... And I m never going back to Danny s AGAIN!!!
CLOSED DOWN! Out of business. Done. Today s date is November 3rd 2018. Too bad. Over expansion? Kierland location closed also some time ago.
Not impressed! Over priced for the quality of food and the lack of selection. We went for lunch and all I can say is I wish we did not . The only good thing we found here was the desserts. Do yourself a favor and get a nice meal for the same price.
I do not see what the draw is here. It s just nothing special. In my opinion this place is just a larger portion of dennys. If you ve read any previous reviews you ll know that we tried to go to hhagg at the linq and never got to eat because of the atrocious service. I personally would have never tried it again but my brother in law suggested going here while we were in town and we obliged. So there was that experience as the underlay of this visit. I upgraded the rating for this location because the service was very good this time. We were seated promptly drinks were refilled orders were correct wait staff were very good. And I m pretty sure that the kitchen also prepared the food according to hhagg recipes. My problem is now that I actually tried the food this type of food just is not for me. It s too much bread and potato I know farm food... . The food is just rich and starchy with nothing there to cut through. We ordered the chorizo scramble which was probably the best thing on the table. Potatoes of course covered in chorizo and jalapenos with a side od scrambled eggs and biscuit with a very hood strawberry jam. We also ordered the fried chicken Benedict NOTE no runny egg on the benedict???? It consisted of mashed potatoes topped with biscuits why???? topped with one raw tomato round and some raw spinach topped with scrambled eggse then fried chicken the some kind of gravy and chipotle cream sauce. We also ordered the chicken fried steak which was unfortunately tasteless and served with more potatoes and biscuits seeing a theme here? . Also the chicken and waffles. Waffles are not crisp at all totally floppy waffles then the chicken which was just there nothing special less seasoning then say a Popeyes restaurant. Again it s not for me. If biscuits topped with mashed potatoes sounds good to you then I highly recommend this restaurant. I wo not return.
We went here last night for my mothers birthday. We went at 5 and were seated right away. As it was in Surprise I was shocked that we were seated so promptly because it was prime dining time. They also were able to set up for the 2 kids so that was nice. Everything seemed to start out fine. The service was good and our server was pleasant and able to get the food to the kiddos fast. I just wish the food was better. This was one of the worst meals I have had in a long time. First off my mom and I ordered margaritas. We should have just ordered lime juice. There was no alcohol in it. My mom even ordered a double and could not taste it. Since I had the baby I rarely drink and am a cheap date after 1 drink. Even after ordering 2 margaritas I felt no buzz. It was sad for my one night with cocktails in a long time. My husband and my mom both ordered steak and lobster. The lobster was so chewy and tasteless. The meat was grizzly and had no flavor or the promised rub. I had mahi mahi and it was so rubbery and flavorless. The toppings on it added nothing. It was so disappointing. We have not been to an outback in many years. I am not sure if the quality has gone downhill in the overall chain or just this location but I will not be back for such mediocre food.
This is not the restaurant that is so hyped on tv! I came here with much excitement based on what I ve read and heard I was completely let down! Service? We came today at lunch about 12 30 to a very empty restaurant which I now understand. We ordered the pork rinds which were great and that s where it ends! When our food came out my order was wrong but when I called it to the servers attention he started arguing with me telling me that I ordered what he brought out. He even went as far as pulling out his iPad and showing me his mistake and telling me that I ordered it. Food? Meh!! As I said the fresh made pork rinds are great! The BBQ however was pretty unexciting! I ve actually had better bbq from Albertson s deli. I understand that the rent is probably pretty high at Town Square but their prices are ridiculously high! If you want good bbq do not waste your time or money here Vegas has a lot better bbq offerings than this place! Such a let down!
Pathetic..closes on super bowl Sunday....what restaurant is closed on super bowl Sunday? That s the day you make the most money! I will never go to Goodcents again...I was a loyal customer till I wanted a sub on super bowl Sunday at 6pm...they were closed!! Never going againn to this location normally bad ingredients anyways but it s quick and easy...never again will I pay to eat here! Not customer friendly! Old ingredients!
The waiter threatened to slap my friend I had to fill up my own drink the server Janet I did not have her but love her!!!
Called to book pool cabana for me and my client in town for a trade show outside of pool hours 9pm local time tonight I was told to call back during pool hours. The pirate show was closed but not listed on the website. Put this back on me...this town has plenty of business too much business and they do not know what to do with it. In my opinion. Have not stayed here for a while for a show quite surprising.
HORRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE! Very rude purple in there! They forgot to put something in my bag then have me an attitude when I went inside and asked for it. The last practically threw the bag at me. Never again.
I purchased an engagement wedding ring and another ring from LouisXV a few years back. We spent roughly 5k on the wedding ring alone and it has been nothing but problems. They have altered the ring to try and fix it many times it is now unrecognizable from what we originally purchased...and it is now broken again. The level of frustration is beyond measure and these folks Ethan are impossible to deal or communicate with. Below is a letter I sent Ethan back on 1.6.14. After this letter it took us 3 months to get the ring back and it broke again within 2 months. Since mid December 2014 I ve called 13 times and had one quick voicemail back after the 5th of 13 calls. Louis XV is not responding at this point. The experience has caused my wife years of frustration and now we are beyond that. She is a great mom and wife and a total up beat positive person..this experience with Ethan and Louis XV has caused more problems than it s worth. We have a broken ring it s been broken 12 15 times in the past 6 years..starting months after purchase. She has not been able to wear it 3 of the 6 years. I wish there was a rating less than 1 of 5 stars. Hi Ethan I purchased this and another ring at the same time several years back. The other ring has been great no problems at all. The attached ring has been a disaster. After wearing it for a month my wife had non stop issues with the stone coming loose little stones coming out along with other issues. I immediately brought it back to Brian who tried to help..but nothing more than tightening and cleaning. We d come back again and again with the same stuff every couple months. Within the first year we grew very tired of this ring always having issues and being without it for days to weeks at a time. I asked about getting our money back or another ring because it simply did not seem to be of the quality that we originally thought it would be. He said he d make it right so we did not have to keep returning for the same problem. But nothing different tighten clean then send us the ring. This occurred many more times. We moved from Phoenix to Seattle...so it was becoming a pain to keep sending and waiting for it. We then moved from Seattle to San Diego and the same thing repeated. When we came to San Diego a few years ago Brain finally admitted the problem was there from the beginning the stone was too big and or the wrong size for the setting. I did not like what I heard because years had now passed and we ve been on this journey of chasing our tail and communicating with Brian for years about this problem ring. He suggested that we send it again and you guys would grind down the stone to make it fit once and for all no more issues. My wife and I really did not like this option we bought it for exactly the way it looked originally not a poor man s version of it. He said if it did not look exactly how we thought it should or if it came loose to send it back and we could all go a different direction..either refund or another ring. I said we wanted this ring to work and hopefully we did not have to cross that path...and we d just be happy. He sent the ring back and it looked totally different not in a good way. The main stone looked tiny and it changed the whole feel of the ring. But...we told him we d give it a shot and if it stayed in place we d try to roll with it. Well 2 months went by and it was loose again more loose than it had been in previous go arounds. He pleaded with us to send it back and he d fix it again. If you are counting how many times we ve had this conversation you got me because I ve even lost track . He sent it back again and it lasted for about 4 months. From what I gather this is probably about the time he left Louis XV . It rattled but my wife did not even tell me because she was too embarrassed to again come back to me and let me know...after all we had been through with Louis XV. Finally the stone fell out and she stopped wearing it. Mind you this is her everyday wedding ring . We have left it on the counter out of frustration until my call on 12 23 13. I can see that 2 of the 4 brackets are broken as I m sure you can see and the ring has just been a total burden. Please put an end to the madness and keep the ring this time and issue us a refund like should have been done years ago. I know this may not sound ideal but I m asking you to really take a good look at this history and be understanding to what we ve dealt with on something that should have never come to this point. Like I started with the other ring and other jewelry for gifts we ve purchased at Louis XV has been great. I m not one to take things to the BBB or bad mouth to contacts that I know spend money at your store...it s not my style. That s why I ve given Brian many many opportunities to make it right. I think it s a better way to do business. However this has come too far and I m asking for actual help...not just a band aid.
The worst had Sonoran home services a horrible lil wanna be co come for simple ac fix...My home was flooded ceilings and walls damaged...SHS could care less if AHG keeps these horrible people you should AVOID AHG! I am so very sorry I used this service they are the WORST!
I just left the line up at this Swiss Chalet because I was asked 18 for a chicken wrap!!! It s outrageous and I spent my money elsewhere. Ridiculous.
Oh the Rebel Lounge... Where to begin? This small venue is in a questionable area I had two homeless people ask me for change while waiting for my friends. It s whatever but uncomfortable if you re by yourself like I was so be mindful. The door is tucked away and it basically looks like a back door with no one around it. Weird. No signs no funky lighting no welcoming atmosphere. Every venue I ve been to there has been people standing around with security at the door at the least. Seems like a place where no one goes to much due to the size? I did go on a Tuesday night so I could be wrong. I pay 5 at the door. Cool right? When asked I told security that I m 20. My birthday is less than a month away and I get the X s on my hands. That s expected I m not trying to drink as it is. I respect policies I understand them. However this is where the total BS starts. Past the bouncer there is this long metal gate SEPARATING 21 from underage. What the f ? I ve never seen anything like this in all of my days at shows. I mean REALLY separated. It s not even split down the middle of the stage you have to stand on the very side of it like a loner. Guess how old all of my friends are? 21 . I could not stand with them on their side nor could they bring drinks to mine. We had to vibe with this gate between us. Dumb. I get it but that s just overkill. There s not enough people in this place to be so cutthroat strict about it. I stepped over the gate for about half of a song and got a warning about being kicked out. I m not upset with security as they re just doing their jobs they were actually fairly nice about it. However I could not even go outside to smoke a cigarette with my friends. They do not let you past the gate for that nor do they let you leave and come back if you want to smoke. It s our policy they say. Is this a joke? Well at least they give out iced tap water... ha. As for the sound... Meh. There needs to be more equipment. The acoustics sucked and the speakers were mediocre at best with reverb that jacks up your ears. Nothing interesting about the set up. Just a little turn table on a little stage. Even though my birthday is right around the corner I wo not waste my time here. I ll support my musician friends elsewhere. The only saving grace was that it s 5 hence the two stars. Oh well you get what you pay for. There s nothing rebellious about this place it should be renamed to The NO FUN Lounge .
Restaurant was completely empty and one meal took almost half an hour. Very unfriendly staff with bad customer service. NOT COMING BACK
It s always a long wait but my biggest pet peeve with this office is their billing department which I have had several issues with since they like to make up their own protocols. Just make a mental note to NOT believe billing when they tell you a balance amount because you ll most likely have an additional balance several weeks later. They told me my delivery fee would be a certain amount little did they tell me that this amount they were charging is the amount that they think we will owe if deductible is not met. They should ve just given me an option to pay the amount but never had that option. Other than that love Dr Christina Nguyen
Well it was not a good experience! After reading the reviews I was leary and actually cancelled one groupon I had gotten from my husband as a gift. I also had one from a friend for my birthday and after holding for groupon to answer for 30 minutes I did not want to put her through that to cancel hers. I made my first appointment showed up at 12 40 to find no one there and then after waiting 10 minutes someone showed up and said they had cancelled my appointment. I told her I did not get a call to cancel. Then the receptionist pulled up and she asked her about my appointment. She said she did call me and left a message three days ago because the nurse was sick. I found it interesting that they knew three days ago the nurse was going to be sick. They then rescheduled me for the next Tuesday at 2 40. I showed up then to find the door locked again with the receptionist inside at the desk on the phone. She came to the door and said the nurse had gone home because they did not have any appointments. I said I had an appointment and she said no there was no appointments. She checked again and said my appointment is the next day Wednesday. I told her you said Tuesday. Needless to say I left VERY upset. I really feel that they do not want to pay for the nurse to be there if there is not a full schedule so they keep on rescheduling people if they do not have enough clients. Definitely not a way to run a business! I had my friend get her money back after holding on with groupon for 3 hrs. Needless to say I would never go there again and hope nobody else gets scammed!
What a disappointment! Should have figured that since they were not real busy at lunch that there was a reason. The fish and chips was supposed to have a tempura batter...not crispy at all! The fries were flavorful but had no crunch. My husbands water glass was dirty and when I told the server she said it s just cloudy. No... it was gross and you should have at least apologized!!!!! The server Jesika also never came to check to see if our food was ever to our liking. We will not be back...ever! I d be happy if a restaurant with better food and service took over the location. My advice...do not go!
One server on Sunday night is a bad idea who is really nice and doing his best. Mean owner who insisted on us paying more tips in addition to yelling at the poor server. Outright robbery. Cash only. It s 2015. Let alone the strict rules you have to follow for the buffet price you pay. Amazing how greed can drive people to such indecency.
As a frequent visit this has been our worse experience ever on a Tuesday night. The only thing I appreciated was the urgency the night manager took in trying to rectify the incorrect meals to include food ordered not arriving . Unfortunately at the point when you have to speak with a manager the evening is ruined and appetites are gone. To 30 mins before first drinks house salads coming after the meals after repeated request incorrect appetizer and plate comes out with no ribs and a burnt steak. For a birthday dinner at a well established restaurant we regret this decision.
Wow we decided to check this place out on our last day in Montreal because of great poutine reviews from Yelp and a Montreal blogger and had such a horrible experience. Only one member of the staff seemed to be trying to pay attention to everyone the restaurant was not even busy at 3 o clock on a Monday and made excuses that the kitchen was understaffed. They were horribly disorganized and brought complicated grilled sandwiches and eggs to people who had arrived after us and continually ignored us. After 40 minutes of only being served a cup of coffee and water and being repeatedly ignored we asked about our ONE order of poutine and were told it was coming. 20 minutes later and having to remind the waiter we were still there it finally arrived and the burt fries were definitely NOT worth the 1 hour wait. The food was average but the service was horrendous. Do not waste your time or money on this place. Everyone was waiting a very long time for a mediocre meal and the whole restaurant was completely disgruntled and unsatisfied. I have no idea what the blogger was thinking or how anyone has had a good experience at this place. If you want great poutine check out La Banquise the servers actually acknowledge your presence and the food is fresh and tasty. tldr version 1 hour wait mediocre poutine burnt fries clueless staff
This review is regarding our move from Arizona to Washington in October November 2011. Mountain Moving Co part of National Van Lines are great friendly people to work with. However we were promised that if we edited our belongings we would see 1000 knocked off of our estimate. We got rid of 3 couches an ottoman 3 bookshelves a heavy television numerous books office furniture including desks and chairs and more... our actual price INCREASED by 1000 from the estimated cost. We discovered this as our stuff was en route. So they basically held our belongings hostage if we did not pay. We did not see our belongings for 2 1 2 weeks... it took that long for delivery. I do not do business like this with our clients. And I do not appreciate that I have to be savvy and watch out for scams or moving companies with a terrible sales process. I hate the fact that I needed to be suspicious of these people when they seemed so kind and friendly. They are kind and friendly. And terrible at doing business. I do not like writing reviews like this. However please use caution when approaching this company.
DO NOT USE this company to transfer title. We refinanced on 10 18 2011 and they still owe us almost 2000. Apparently they d forgotten to refund our property tax payment which was double paid and that it will now take another month before we get that money back. So that will make it a minimum of 3 1 2 months from close to refund time. Oh and that s only if they get the check to us in a month s time like they just told me on the phone. What re the chances of that happening? A title company has exactly one job To manage the equitable and secure transfer of funds during a purchase sale. If they forget about a little thing like 2000 what else are they forgetting? Stay away stay far away from this company.
The store was absolutely filthy and the staff was rude. One would expect management to be polite but the man I spoke to was even worse than the cashier he was short with me and questioned my reasons for seeking the product I was in a condescending manner.
Do not use their beauty salon. Worst customer service skills ever!!! I recently went there to get a haircut and color on Wednesday senior day and discovered that the discount does not apply to all hairstyle personnel. I discovered the managing hair stylist who I had booked with is more expensive and does not honor senior day. So to get a haircut and color it is twice as expensive so I opted to just get my color done. What a mistake. I wanted a darker brown red but my hair turned out black... It looks terrible and my husband hates the color. Before I left the store I told the stylist I was not happy with the color and she opted to say I could come back the next day for some highlights but would have to pay another 75 to try and fix it. I was confused that since I was not satisfied with my color that I would have to pay additional. do not go....
My husband and I rented a car from this location on 2 20 2018 at approximately 1931 hrs. Bruce was the employee who helped me at the counter. First and foremost he did not greet me smile and was not very welcoming. Looked like a grumpy old man! He told me my reservation was canceled however I never canceled it. He began to act very rude while insisting that I canceled the reservation. After further examination into the computer he found out that it was not canceled after all. I spoke to the manager at the location forgot his name but he was a young Caucasian male who was very helpful unlike Bruce who needs a refresher course in Customer Service Skills 101. I always rent from Thrifty and Bruce gives this company a VERY bad name. He needs to clean cars and restrooms instead of having one on one contact with customers!!!!
If there was a lower star rating I would have chosen it. This is the worst magic show I have ever seen and I am so disappointed in the money we spent on tickets. We left 40 minutes into the show. It was seriously that BAD. Criss Angel has been doing magic for 18 years and we physically saw him pulling pigeons from his coat. He looked strung out tired and disinterested in his own show. He should not be allowed total creative control over this train wreck.
Rula has one of the most incoherent door staff ever they are all career door guys. Pushing 40 s door down. Get a life. Seconded of all I had one of the most impersonal bartenders I think I have ever met. I m assuming its because I did not have a huge set of tits flopping around while drinking my blacksmith. Anyhow I will give it to Rula that they have some good live music but if you make your way past the swarm of bros and hoes you might just enjoy yourself a smidgen All n all not a fan.
One star because no star as far as I can tell was not an option. Ordered food on line at 4 44 on line for delivery at 7 30. Food did not cone until 8 30. Manager owner said orders on line are delayed 45 minutes. Would have been nice to know. Horrible management organization. Food is a solid OK .
After booking this hotel months in advance for my grandparents 50th wedding anniversary and while the rooms are stellar I was horrified by the lack of customer service offered at a resort of this supposed caliber. HOSTELS I stayed at in college had more courteous and customer oriented staff than this mess of a disorganized zoo! Upon arrival we decided to have the valet take our bags to our room. I let them know we would need the bags quickly as we had medications in them for my grandfather they said no problem. After checking in at 3 35 the front desk let us know our bags would arrive in 15 minutes. At 4 42 still no bags. I called the front desk pressed 0 and a woman let me know there had been a delay with our bags. I explained the urgency and she said they would be there shortly. Another 10 minutes passed and I redialed. I mistakenly said I had called 15 minutes earlier to which the woman rudely snapped verbatim you actually called ten minutes ago and I told you there was a delay and they would not be there for a few minutes. Excuse me? I paid quite a bit of money for a 3 night stay and this is no way to speak to a guest who is trying to resolve a matter of urgency regarding medication for another elderly guest! I asked where the bags were and if I could come get them myself. She said they would be waiting for me at guest services. I made the trek from the 36th floor through the casino to guest services. Where get this THEY HAD NO CLUE what I was talking about. A manager named Greg I think said no one had sent a request for our baggage until 4 42. By this point it s been an hour and 30 minutes and my grandfather is still waiting. Greg let me know our bags were now somewhere in the hotel on the way to our room. WHY did the Palazzo staff tell me to come here then? By this point I m appalled and totally frustrated. Almost 2 hours later he tried to resolve the situation hopelessly. But to no avail by an awful guest services manager... As most in vegas know time is money and the Palazzo stole the first two hours of my vacation or time I could have been working from our office in Vegas. The guest services manager calls someone who brings our bags back down to follow me to our room. He says he would be happy to provide a bottle of wine and chocolates and a late checkout as well as a 25 room service credit. I just wanted the bags or I would never have accepted this apology. He said he had no clue and could not find out who the woman on the phone was. He sent a 7.00 bottle of wine and 4 chocolates as consolation to my grandparents. ANYONE who has stayed here before knows that a 25 credit would barely cover the 5.00 delivery fee and 18 gratuity included in all room service orders and the late checkout was provided complimentary at ALL my previous stays at the Palazzo. When I did try to order a bottle of wine from room service they explained the menu was filled with misprints and the bottle I wanted was 50 more then listed. No thanks. Thanks for a horrid start to what could have been a great stay at your hotel. Give your business to the Bellagio or Wynn where they are actually concerned with the happiness of their patrons!
I have had it a few times and it was fine. But I went yesterday and asked for a 1 spicy and it was so spicy I could not even eat it. Wasted my money
I fortunately stayed only 1 night 07 30 2016 .The hotel conditions were the bottom of any expectation. The elevators were ruined and vandalized only two apparently working . The carpets stained beginning from the halls. The room was completely unclean worn old and dirty sheets pillows and towels .The bathroom had disgusting corners full of hair and dirtiness. The bathroom tub and floors full of hair beside the absolute ruined condition. The sink and tube were clogged. My room for 4 people had only 3 towels I waited for more than 3 hours for somebody to bring me 1 more towel. Now the Resort... the pool for kids opens 11 am 4pm summer schedule? . However the pool for 21 opens 10 6 pm weird? .Same situation in the Resort bad conditions dirty floors balls of hair running around and very rude staff searching for something inside your purse. The lack apologize of the Hotel s Manager was reduced to 50 in food which I should spent prior the reimbursement which I proudly refused to accept and the refund of the Resort s fee of 32. I paid 396.48 for one night. I have awesome pictures to share but I do not have the option to upload them.
Went there with a friend from out of town for the first time. Only a couple customers already there when we walked in at about 6 30PM on a Wednesday. Greeted and seated promptly and served water along with a very small bowl of chips and salsa. As a vegetarian I really did not see anything on the menu that I could eat though my 50 year old eyes and the dim lighting made the menu a little hard for me to read. When the server came to take out orders I asked if I could just get some cheese and onion enchiladas though I did not see that listed in the menu. With the option of several sauces red green or mole I chose mole. Expecting rice and beans to come with it I asked for black beans since refried beans are normally cooked in lard and was informed that the meals come with rice and pinto beans. During the 15 minutes or so between our order being taken and being served we ate about half of the chips and all of the salsa. There was never an effort on the staff s part to see if we d like more of either and yes I would have or if we d liked a spicier salsa which I would have what they served was good but sweet . Eating at a variety of Mexican restaurants pretty regularly I was immediately surprised by the small portion of food on my plate and that of my friend. A small quantity of Mexican rice and pinto beans were brought to us on one separate plate I guess we were supposed to share it though the quantity was really just enough for one normal person. The flavor of my food was good and my friend loved his meal living in the mid west he admitted that he ca not find decent Mexican food near his home . However I left the place hungry. I do not know how much the bill was as my friend paid it as a business expense but the quantity of food was poor and I will avoid this place in the future going to numerous other Mexican places in the area that are better deals.
I bought my daughter a ticket to ride the bus July 21 at 12 30am from Las Vegas NV.On this day the bus had some mechanical problems so the trip was going to be delayed. At around 1am the Mega Bus employee made an announcement that the bus was not leaving till 3 am so he took the boarding pass from my daughters hand who is disabled and said sorry folks! I asked him what do you suggest he said come back at 3am or call customer service. So we came back at 3am and nobody was at the stop. So I called in the morning and dispatch informed me that the bus left I want to say around 1 20 not exactly sure. So I called customer service and they stated they would re issue me a ticket for a 5.00 fee I said this was MEGA BUS fault she missed the bus! Then they said sorry lets get you over to CS at that point I wanted a refund and explained the situation that my daughters grandmother passed away and she missed the funeral. Well the lady said in this case we can give you a refund. Well today I decided not to get a refund and get another ticket and the customer service Rep did not care what the situation she implied this was my fault and I need to send the obituary even if I just want a new ticket! I told her but this is not the reason we missed the bus your employee turned her away at boarding! She refused the help me I told her I would file BBB complaint and she said it was nice talking to you bye! I feel mega bus pretty much stole money from me and they are refusing to return it! I did not realize this was how they did business. FYI Yesterday evening I went to the bus stop and spoke with the mega bus employee and he remembered clearly and said yea I m sorry that day was a nightmare. I filed a BBB complaint over a month ago and they are still investigating this. HORRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE!!!!! I m going to travel with BOLT BUS from now on they offer the same deals 1. and up!!. The stop is at the LINK check it out boltbus.com
I would have left a higher review because to be honest I received about what I was after. For the price given to me to have my truck painted I m happy with the job and it was what I was expecting. Other than couple of spots that were missed but once again for the price I was not expecting a perfect done job. My biggest complaint is with the customer relations that is lacking. When first talking I was told it would take a week to finish painting my truck. After dropping it off it became one to one and a half weeks. Three weeks later I came to pick up the truck I was told was done. I showed up to find out that some of things I had asked for were never done. So I gave him another day to finish up. I picked up my truck the next day and as I stated before it was what I was expecting. However a day later I realized that a couple of spots were still the original color and had been missed. So I messaged him about getting me the paint info so I could get some touch up paint and fix it myself no time or money out of his pocket. As we are both iPhone users I saw that he read it but did not reply. I waited a little over a week Incase he was just busy and asked again. Again he read but ignored me. These are the things that went wrong First pick up did not fully paint all spots on truck did not do bedliner did not paint all chrome to black as all deceived on drop off. After pick up spots where missed being painted so still white interior such as door inserts were hit with the paint so have blue on them and seats. And mostly ignoring the customer after getting his money. I had originally planned on leaving a good review however but after receiving his money I have became someone to just ignore and treat as nothing.
Do not bother eating here. We finally have a local team and want to bring the kids to watch the game and they turn off the Golden Knights game for football??? I think they call that bait and switch. Promote that you can bring your family and watch the Knights game then turn it off once you place your order. If you ca not support your local team why would locals support eating at your restaurant?? Very disappointed!!
Please do not think I like writing bad reviews. In fact I would rather not. But here it is plain and simple. Bought Groupon for dermaplaning. Exchanged texts to set up date and time. I arrived 15 minutes early for my 2 00 pm appointment. Was told she had me down for 1 00 and had another client booked for 2 00. She took me back to her room in a hurry and rapidly applied ivory liquid makeup to one side of my face. Had me go look in bathroom to mirror to see that I looked like I had pancake makeup which covered up everything. She then asked if the color was good and if I wanted to order it because she was placing product orders that day! Then her 2 00 client arrived. She asked if I could come back later two hours later which I said I could not. She said we could reschedule and I asked if she was going to remove what she had put on one side of face or make them look the same before I left. She rapidly applied the liquid make up to the other side of my face. I hate liquid make up as I am 62 years old and would rather not look like I have troweled on makeup. I left not wanting to come back. My face felt thick with the make up got in my eye and caused tearing. Had to use three make up remover towelettes to get the stuff off! I use Jane Iredale pressed powder and love it. This was an awful experience. Have contacted Groupon for a refund. I have had dermaplaning done at many spas and have never had anyone put make up on my face first.
When you walk in be prepared to wade through a sea of Macbooks to the MacRegister . Pretty sure the term hipster originated as a password for PC users to get through the door here. Atmosphere is half of the experience for the coffee shop lounger and though this place has zero personality it s definitely neck deep in trying too hard . As far as the coffee goes it was nothing exceptional. However I will give them credit for not burning the hell out of the espresso which seems to be a popular trend these days. The staff was also friendly which brings a 1 star rating up to a 2 because friendliness is just as important as quality when I m giving my money to an establishment. Peeking through the reviews I saw free range organic only vodka marinated all natural american spirits only thank you smoked people to eat so if someone could cue me in on that I might reconsider this place yeah cannibalism since there was nothing else spectacular enough to make me willing open that door again.
What a nightmare. Unless you are a drug dealer drug addict or a prostitute I would not recommend staying here. My wife and I stayed there as a last resort and I was stressed out the whole time. I would not feel comfortable leaving a dog there alone let alone my wife and son. I m so happy to be out of there after two very long weeks. Very sketchy.
I bought three 10 cheesecakes for Christmas Eve. After standing around for almost 30 minutes the cheesecakes were mercifully extracted from the refrigerator freezer and I made my escape. But not before paying 165 for 3 cheesecakes. BTW that were not busy...at all! I was told that they were still a bit frozen but if I left them out for 2 3 hours then they would be fine ready to serve. Not wanting to leave anything to chance we waited SIX hours and after SIX hours the cheesecakes were STILL rock hard! Our children took their children home the expensive dessert still intact. Perhaps we ll try to chisel some free at midnight. What a waste of 165.00!
Used to love love love Mimis but the food quality has really taken a dump during the past couple of years. So sad. They always had very innovative entrees made with high quality ingredients. The past few times that I have eaten there the food was so disappointing. Crepes were filled mostly with scrambled eggs instead of savory turkey mushrooms bacon and brie. No mention of eggs in the dish description at all. If I wanted scrambled eggs I would have ordered them. Did not complain to the manager since this is the second time it has happened wanted to give them another chance. And do not get me started on the dry little half sized muffins that use to be big soft and lucious. Do not plan on returning. This is not a location problem. Ran into the same type of issues at other locations. Again so sad.
Absolute worst service ever. I have been using both National and Enterprise for 2 months straight for business and I have been all over the country and this has been the worst experience I ve Ever had. In Nashville they were EXTREMELY professional organized and over the top friendly but completely opposite here. The saddest part is it was in my own home town! So when my friends fly in as they often do and rent a car I will steer them away from this car service. From the lie I was told when I rented the car to the lack of professionalism to get TO the car to the lack of staffing when returning the car and the over charge to top it off. I m taken aback quite frankly. Never again.
JD Campbell s formally called LW s Hide A Way used to be an Old Country Store and was converted into a restaurant back in 2013. The atmosphere is Wild West with wood and trophies. The grub is not fancy but they have been known to serve up some killer specials that were priced right and they are well known for a special burger menu. It kills me to lower my rating for this restaurant since I enjoyed some killer specials here. I note that I am not lowering the stars after one not so good visit and am lowering the stars after a couple not so good visits. On my last visit I tried a special that tasted awful. I just figured they screwed that one up. My last dinner here was the Blackened Salmon. I ve had this dinner on the menu before. Last time I had the same dinner the fish had a great texture could have passed for fresh tasted great and the sides were prepared nicely. This time when I had it I can tell a different story. The fish had a crumbly weird texture and did not have the same taste. Last time the vegetables were pretty good but this time if you take the time to look at my current photo you can see the vegetables might have came out of the microwave without seasoning or anything. Nobody likes zucchini just warmed up from the microwave. The macaroni and cheese really was awful. It was so overcooked it was gooey pasta. The sauce tasted like blue box thined down with a smokey bbq sauce that was added or possibly just fell into the pot. The food was so bad I almost started to cry. I asked if they have a different cook and was told nothing has changed. ??????????? I did not give one star because my husband wants to try them again since we had many nice meals here. You might do best ordering breakfast or a sandwich here.
This company is a joke! First they do not flight but hire third party company. Second they tell you to arrive 1 5 hour earlier which is a complete lie. When we arrived the third party company was shocked and said that we could go now but because that flynyon has fooled us we needed to WASTE 1 5 hour of our time in vegas waiting on a couch. One more thing there is no customer service nobody sent us directions how to get to the place nobody replies phone calls etc. THIS IS COMPLETE DISASTER! NEVER TAKE FLYNYON. I recommend direct booking with third party company 702 helicopters. Were very nice guys.
This Subway is absolutely terrible. I like subway and it s food in general but this branch is completely ruined by absolutely terrible service and quite possibly the worst employees I ve ever seen at a food establishment. Now I ve been here about 20 25 times since it s only a block away from my work and it s one of the healthiest things to grab nearby and the same damn issues are present every single time. I ve now stopped going completely since I ca not stand this branch. First off they are always out of ingredients or bread. I usually get the chicken breast foot long sub. There had to be at least 10 occasions I went and they had no chicken breasts. It s also not uncommon for them to be out of bread and common ones too. No wheat no Italian? There s been a few instances where all they had left was something obscure like Monterery Cheddar and this is not some off hour. Its usually right during lunch! I can understand once or twice but you think they would take action to stop this from happening since it seems to happen ALL THE TIME? Anybody ever think to make more bread??? They have been out of tomatoes out of peppers onions out of cucumbers... It s ridiculous. The worst part is they act rude instead of apologetic. WE DONT HAVE THAT... ok.... no need to yell at me there.... Honestly though the worst part are the employees. It s been the same 4 people every time I go. The least worse of the bunch is the manager. She is an older lady and while generally nice there have been days where she has been outwardly disgruntled and talked to customers rudely looking as she was almost ready to snap but usually she is able to keep it shelled in... The other employees sigh... There s two younger girls who work there. They have never been rude but they work extremely lethargically. They often keep asking what you want and take a long time to put your sub together. They really need to pep up because they just act like it s killing them to be there... Maybe it is killing them but you work a customer service job you got to perk up! The last employee that works there is a young male and he appalls me every single time with his actions. I really have no idea how he still has a job. His behavior is ridiculous. He is probably and consistently the most disgruntled employee in the entire world... He throws sandwiches together like they were no better than mush. He does not change his gloves often so I have had far too many sandwiches with buffalo chicken sauce oriental sauce etc etc on my sandwich.... Yea big no no. Thank god I do not have allergies but hot buffalo chicken sauce definitely does not taste any what appetizing smeared all over my cold cut either... It does not stop there. He rants about his job to every single customer. No one even asks him yet he is constantly letting you know how badly his job sucks and how he ca not handle it. It s like sheesh man we all worked crappy jobs at some point but that attitude sure is not going to get you anywhere.... It s not even something like a dreary Man I m having a rough day... It s more like a resentful God! why do so many damn people have to come in I ca not believe this shit... AGHH KILLLLL MEEEE PLEASE. No lie people.... that is what he does and that is why I get so bothered by it. In some ways he acts like so much of a trainwreck it s almost amusing to watch his anger grow. I ve had my fair share of watching him throw stuff bang his head off a wall and even once scream F my life!!!! during the middle of making a sub after he dropped the bun on the floor. Still for as funny as it could be it s just plain rude. He has made fun of customers several times and his constant whining gets on one s nerves way too easily. He acts like he is the only one with problems in his life... All and all I love the Subway chain in general but this branch has serious issues. The service is terrible and the staff is rude and downright horrendous with the way they act. I still love Subway but I will never go to this branch again.
Portions are always too small food is always bland always busy and unclean. There are WAY better chipotles to go to this one sucks.
Do not waist you time. They pressure you into signing up for their 3 day seminar for 2000. Not to mention their other paid seminars. And if you still do not bite you can get a DVD for 20. If you do not buy anything the FREE MP3 player is a voucher that you have to go online to get WHICH YOU CANT and the Laptop is IN THE MAIL. Not to mention their disclaimer of not responsible for incorrect address or shipping errors I would guarantee that there is no laptop. The free dinner is a boxed lunch and water which you have to eat on your lap. Oh almost forgot....the 90 minute seminar is 4 hours long. They talk a good talk and make it sound too good to be true. They must have all been used car salesmen before doing the seminar scene. They rank up there with Timeshare pitches.
If I could give this place 0 stars I would. First off it s my birthday and I m in a different state so we decided before we head back to Vegas let s get some breakfast..... well we went to Denny s and it was really slow in there. We were sat 3 adults 1 child waited for 10 minutes and no one even came by to give us a drink. Needless to say I was not waiting any longer. We walked out and went across the street to Village Inn instead to get my birthday breakfast.
The absolute worst scam artist of a dentist. Receptionist is the rudest person I ve ever come across the owner is horrible and customer service is the worst I ve ever seen. Charges way over and above for services lies about what services they are giving you surprises you with a huge bill after you have already been told a different amount! For example an initial visit was over 600! One cleaning for only half of a mouth was 500! They charge outrageous fees for cancellations we were charged 75 to cancel an appointment when we gave more than 24 hours notice!! AVOID THIS PLACE!
Ca not say much good about this place except for the staff. If you are used to the common Aloft you wo not find it here. This place has a just plain weird layout small lobby no food service and rooms with tiny windows. In addition it is very close to MANY local watering holes and therefore you will see less than desirables walking around other guests talking about their narcotic use in the elevator and the NOISE is obnoxious. We were on the 5th floor and the pounding bass did not stop until 3 AM every night. There is also lots of construction next door but I was there on a weekend so they were not working. Your best bet is to stay somewhere else.
My partner and I tried this place out for the first time and left extremely disappointed. We came here because of all the great reviews however that was not our case. The only thing that had any sort of flavor was the chicken and fish the chicken was over seasoned at that. All the other sides had no flavor chipotle has more flavor. 20 not well spent definitely will not be a 2nd time customer.
I ordered a machaca burrito with little beans cheese. What I got was almost egg burrito. Tortilla falling apart. I am Hispanic and know what I am ordering. A shredded beef w onions green peppers and with scramble egg. The burrito was gross. If you do not know how to cook a tortilla you do not belong in the kitchen. Never again will I come back. Cashier with an attitude. Probably not even legal.
I heard the raving reviews about this place. So I decided to try it. The service was terrible. There were two couples that came into the restaurant after us thay received their food before us. I know it does not take a long time to make sushi or the edamames. The sushi was delicious but that does not entirely make up for the horrible service. Also the restaurant is too tiny not to have a conversation that could not be overheard by another table. I definitely wo not be going there again.
Nothing worse than having security give you a 5 second warning no exaggeration that you are sitting in a reserved space for a super bowl party. We not only bought a bottle but several drinks and food on top of that. I could understand giving us a 5 10 minute warning that the table is reserved but he was an absolute prick in the way he handled it. He told us to get up and close our tab at the bar or find bar seating inside despite just ordering another round. Our server was extremely friendly and did not even know the space was reserved. Security really needs to chill out. The lack of professionalism was baffling.
I heard of the Mac shack from some friends so I decided to try it out. Nice design inside but the food is overpriced for what u get 8 dollars for elbow macaroni? Sorry not buying what you are selling
2.5 hours for basic oil change and inspection...with an appointment!! Next time I m going to Jiffy Lube this is ridiculous! By the way I still waiting 2.5 hours Plus!
Place full of security guards who talks to everyone like they re second class citizens. When ppl are not drunk at your dead ass bar you do not need to yell at them. You can simply tell them hey it s this way actually. This location has been renamed at least 3 times. This place will close down too like the others
I saw another review this place as great so I had to weigh in. It s crap. I wish I liked it but I ca not imagine have any worse Italian food. I would rather just have a bowl or cereal at home. If you want food without flavor this is your place. I guess the building is cool looking from the outside...just do not venture in! I hate being such a downer but we all need fair warning.
I am so frustrated with Courtesy Chevrolet service. I called to make an appointment on a Friday when I was off work which is not often and they said I was all set. When I came in I was told that service does not make appointments by a service advisor named Flip Vranesevic and was proceeded to be told that my wait time would be over 3 hours. I was so frustrated and had other plans I had to leave. Tried to call service later that day to give constructive feedback but was transferred to a voicemail which no one ever returned my call. Called service again a couple weeks later to see if they are busy on Thursdays in the morning at had to leave a message with my name phone number and why I was calling. The voice mail said I would get a call back same day and guess what? No call back. Called service 3 days later and asked if I showed up in an hour if they are busy. The person on the phone said come on in we are not busy at all. Drive up to service and when the employee stepped up to my truck he asked if I had an appointment! I said what!? I was told you ca not make appointments by Flip Vranesevic. He skirtted around the subject and told me than since I do not have an appointment he ca not promise anything earlier than 1.5 hours. At this point if I did not already have a couple free oil changes with Courtesy Chevrolet for buying my vehicle here I would never come back here again. Even if I am in the market for a new vehicle service has discouraged me from coming back here. For a business that makes money off sales and referrals I feel they should treat people that they interact with with more courtesy. My time is important even though you do not think so.
I would give them a zero if that were an option. This company is AWFUL! Every month they bump our date back and we have to go out and buy bottled water. They are the absolute WORST!
Not a great experience at this location food was tasteless over cooked seemed like it was microwaved service was rushed and for no reason as there was not a line of cars or people. Outside the picnic tables were dirty
Did not care for this place. Came here for my ultrasound today for my first pregnancy and my first ultrasound. The sonographer was fifteen minutes late and completely disinterested. She d give me one word answers to my questions and other than that did not talk. She called my husband in and said here s your baby here s the heart rate. That s it then told me to go get dressed because we were done. I will never go back here. She took what was supposed to be a happy time and ruined my experience. Awful.
Avoid this place. Food was disgusting. And made us sick. Its dirty and not very good customer service.
After ordering online for an in store pick. I got here one minute before my order was due to come out instead no order then five minutes after they employees are back there laughing n having a good ol time do they come to ask me if I m waiting for my food. Why yes I am! Oh we are out of what you order. So you have not even started my food 15 minutes after it was supposed to be done. Then long story short I get it it was made wrong and I ve had warmer ice cubes in my day. Terrible costumes service!
Twice we have flown with Allegiant and both times the outgoing flight was delayed 5 or more hours! The 1st time June 2013 the flight was scheduled to leave ABE for PIE at 7 30PM and we finally left at 1 15AM. No apologies no reason for the delay. There was plentiful gossip amongst the passengers as to the nature of the delay but nothing official from Allegiant. Thankfully the Enterprise rental car desk was still open at PIE when we arrived after 3 30AM. It took FOREVER for the bags to be taken off the plane. We ended up at our hotel 20 min from the airport at 5 30AM. Since it was impossible to sleep on this most uncomfortable and noisy plane we wasted Day 1 of our vacation trying to catch a few zzzzs Our 2nd attempt at flying with Allegiant was on 3 12 14 again from ABE to PIE. Our flight was scheduled to leave at 9 30AM. Considering our prior experience I made sure to sign up for text alerts I checked the website before we left home at 5 AM and the flight was on time . We were about 15 min from the airport when I received a text that the flight was delayed by 1 hour.. Ok no big deal its only an hour. We continued to the airport and were in line to check a bag when I received another text saying the fight was now delayed 3 hours. The time between the texts was less than 45 minutes. Reaching the check in desk a very nice young man told us the reason the delay Allegiant frequently contracts out many of their flights This flight was contracted to Falcon . He said the pilot called in sick right before the flight was scheduled to leave what? so now Allegiant had to scramble to find another crew . He said they were however having some trouble getting a pilot! So they finally found one just moments before and he was driving up from Punta Gorda to PIE where the plane leaves to get to ABE to take passengers to PIE . While waiting at the gate I overheard someone mention seat assignments were messed up for anyone pre selecting their seats as the seats were assigned on a Falcon plane not an Allegiant plane. My husband who is 6 5 needs an exit row for the additional leg room and that is why we book early and pay extra for the seats. He asked at the gate desk to make sure we were still in an exit row seat and was curtly told NO.. this is a different plane there is nothing we can do about that! He demanded a refund of the seat assignment cost and she said ok sure.. next person in line . So you tell me if you think we will get any kind of refund! The incoming plane from PIE to ABE arrived about 1 15PM. They did not clean up the plane thankfully as who cares at this point! just immediately started to board the southbound passengers as soon as the baggage was taken off the plane. We boarded at 2 15PM. The pilot made 2 announcements apologizing for the delay and saying he would have us in Punta Gorda as soon as possible! Wait we arent going to Punta Gorda! I heard a few passengers say something to one of the flight attendants who just laughed it off. I must say the plane left in quite a hurry as there was no jockeying around on the runaway once we started moving we never stopped...directly into the air. We never had the seatbelt oxygen mask seat floatation device demo which was ok with us but I would think was in violation of some airline requirement. The flight left at 2 25PM arriving at PIE at 4 45PM. We got our rental car and bag and left the airport at 5 30PM trashing our tickets for the Yankees spring training game that afternoon! Funny thing leaving PIE for ABE on the return flight..The girl taking the boarding passes stopped my husband and said his carryon bag was too big. This was the same bag we used on the flight into PIE so that was a little confusing...especially since the bag 1. is within carryon measurements and 2. was actually smaller than on the departing flight since we dumped all our toiletries at the hotel. It is an older bag where the wheels do not pivot so when he placed the bag in the holder he had to push to get it to fit but it did fit.. She said NO it has to be checked.. Are you kidding?? She pulled him aside and made him wait until other passengers boarded and told him he needed to pay an additional 50 for the bag to be checked. Keep in mind we already paid 26 for the carryon!. As we stood there I watched her waive other passengers through whose bags were larger than ours! I ADAMANTLY pointed this out to her along with the above story edited for time of course and she said ok just go ahead! Our bag fit easily in the overhead compartment.. not so for those other passengers we saw with larger bags. We chatted with many people during these delays they all said the same thing. the airline totally SUCKS but is the only direct flight from ABE to Florida. Too bad another airline would make a mint if they added these direct flights. Next time we will use a reputable airline from PHL.
My mother in law was looking for a place to eat. We just came from the airport so we came to this side of town to explore our options. California Crab is where we stumbled upon. Its a cajun joint owned by the previous store owners turned restaurant. California crab it even has a filipino buffet inside. So yup cajun style seafood AND an option for Filipino buffet. They split the restaurant with those that eat buffet and those that eat cajun. Today we did both. My mother in law had the buffet and my other half split a sisig burrito. I am not reviewing for their seafood. We did come in pretty early so their options at the buffet looked nice and fresh. My MIL said that their pansit and pinakbet were tasty. Sisig burrito sounded a whole lot better than it tasted. It got served with fries. It was a pretty big portion so I did get full off of half of it. It was sisig garlic rice and egg wrapped in a tortilla. Something I would spruce up with left overs haha. It was not anything out of this world in that style but I still would like to try their sizzling platter and other things on the menu too. Our server was friendly but for not having anyone else in the restaurant he sounded a bit flustered when we were requesting for certain things. Hot tea came out warm not hot I do not think the hot pot boiled the water long enough. As other previous yelpers stated its a fairly new restaurant. I will probably come back to give other things a try and until I get the wow factor is when I will change my rating. I do hope they perfect their business. It has potential.
This review is for my Aunt this Dr. Never calls you back! I ve been in pain for two months and no help from him. I call to make an appt and they tell me we will have to call you to make an appt. When the Dr. Is available . Wtf??? What kind of Dr does that. Its absolutely absurd! The last appt. I went to with him he promised me that he would make sure I was taken care of and I would never be without my pain medication again. I am going to die soon and he does not care!! This was is a terrible Doctor!
Very dissapointing meal compared ro orher times we ve been there. Started with hostess ignoring us completely while talking to a server. Once we were seated our server was attentative and came rather quickly after we were seated to get our drink order. Catfish appetizer was not cooked the whole way through and had to be sent back to be re done. No apology from the manager that brought the 2nd one. And no offer to comp it. Med Rare filet I ordered as my meal was dry....quality of the meat seemed to be lacking. Overall do not think I will be going back.
Purchased a 400 special order ottoman from the store and when it arrived it would rock from one corner to the other. I measured all the legs and found them to be equal height. So I knew the problem was in the construction of the frame. I called the store and they said they would send new legs. Told them it did not need it. Sent them anyway. Swapped them out to satisfy the warranty and still did the same thing. Called again and asked what now? . Took almost a month to send someone to the house to inspect the ottoman. He said I can fix this and put felt pads on the bottom of the legs with 2 legs getting more of the pads. That s what I paid for? Not for me.
Not impressed. Food was alright but do not go here on game day to eat and drink. Took almost two hours to get 1 salad a burger and waffles and chicken. When asked what was going on we were told it is busy and they have a small kitchen. Food then came out cold to which we were told they had been really backed up. I understand things busy but mgmt should anticipate a crowd on game days and be ready to provide service in a decent time frame not lame excuses.
Fui el 15 de Agosto del 2018 en mi cumpleaos Y tuve una muy mala experencia para empesar los cockteles estan agrios no tenian nada de sabor y el servicio bastante mal tambien primero nos dieron la comida a nosotros los adultos y tardaron bastante en darle al nio y cualquier persona que a trabajado o conoce de la industria de los restaurantes sabe que primero se le sirven a los nios y despues a los adultos despues vino la manejadora y solo nos dijo ah ya se y se llevo los cockteles de camaron sin sustituir o nada creo que no habia mucha comunicacion entre los travajadores por que tiempo despues me trajieron el cheque cuando nunca lo pedi una mala experencia desgraciadamente lo tuve que pasar en mi cumple .
For being a quaint old fashioned mom and pop ice cream parlor I give The Sugar Bowl about 3 stars. In this age of Baskin Robbins and Cold Stone it s nice to see a real ice cream parlor with two full menu pages dedicated to delicious ice cream creations. Thats about the best I can say about the place tho. The general decor is old and run down the attentiveness of the wait staff is mediocre at best and the place just has a generally dirty feel to it. It is fairly clean in actuality but has that musty pine sol and windex smell throughout that makes it completely unappetizing. They advertise their Family Circus history all over the place but that is hardly enough to sustain a restaurant like this. My real frustration however is the Game Room which at first glace appears to be their miniaturized immitation of Chuck E. Cheese only it falls way short. The change machine that is supposed to dispense 4 tokens for 1 regularly gives only 3 tokens per dollar. Games that only cost 1 token at CEC cost as much as 4 tokens here but quite regularly you will put a token in and not get credit for it so they wind up costing even more. The Candy Claw game that used to be Play til you win is now two tokens for one try whether you win or not and the claw does not even close until it s halfway back up to the top of the machine!! Oh and if you feel the need to complain to someone you ll have to walk back into the restaurant to find someone because there is never anyone in the game room to help you. When someone finally does come in to help you they ll put on their well rehearsed perplexed look and say Hmm it s never done that before ... except my 4 year old and I experience these exact same problems every time we go in. Tonight however was the final straw. I m tired of being ripped off by these people. The ice cream is great the food is mediocre for what they charge the water tastes like filtered sewer water and the staff looks like they wished they worked at Wal Mart. The game room is a waste of time energy and money. The owners obviously know about these problems and have no intention of fixing them as there is no way to contact them on the Sugar Bowl website. They ve lost my business for no other reason than they simply do not give a damn about their customers. Maybe if things change drastically for the better I ll consider going back but not until then.
Came here twice the first time I lucked out with the owner the pedicures are good. The second time my sister in law and I came here for two gel Manis and two pedicures. I got a man who kept messing up and blaming my nails! Who does that?? And kept telling me how I looked like I was a high schooler I m 25 By the time he finished my sil was done with both of her services. I canceled the pedicure two and half hours is tooooooo long!
Horrible unscrupulous people. Took my deposit and said they would show up at a certain day for installation at 9 11 am. They keep postponing later and later that day. Then they just change the day. The guy was rude and just hung up on me after saying they ca not make it. Not only unprofessional but just plain rude assholes! NEVER TRUST THESE GUYS! Had to cancel my deposit check through the bank
This place just does not do it for me. The food is not bad but it s definitely forgettable. I just do not like being there either.
If you read my other review on Carl s you would probably wonder why I would return. I was in a jam and needed to get a trim fast. This choice turned into a total nightmare. This guy chewed my hair off so bad. After asking him to fix it twice I realized there was no hope. I left and went to another barber shop to get it all cleaned up. It was the worst haricut I ever had. I have an idea. How about the workers stop trying to act like mafia Italians and learn to cut hair?
The guys working at this store are complete d bags. Do not talk to you when you walk in condescending when you ask a question they make you feel like somehow you re inconveniencing them. They do not let you try on clothes. So after I bought a shirt that ended up being too small I returned the next day to exchange it and the person working accused me of wearing the shirt. I get the whole boutique thing and exclusivity being part of the appeal but the quality of these clothes is sub par something I would expect at a hotel gift shop. Thick coarse cotton. With high end boutiques there has to be more than a made up brand trying to make it exclusive. There had to be quality and customer appreciation. I ll go elsewhere and encourage my network to do the same based on how I was treated. Go suck it Las Vegas Undefeated you should rename yourself Over Rated.
Prices are good on about anything. Citrus looked dicey. I didnt purchase grapefruit due to whatever they cake on it to keep the bugs and birds from eating it. Speaking of birds...I saw a bird flying in the store tonight 7 11 2016. No lie I pushed my cart pass the produce and saw the bird flying from the stacks of Pepsi to the produce. I kept going to the bulk area to get my organic oatmeal and organic coffee. Next I compared the prices of paper towels and trash bags. Got my Brawny and taking a chance on winco trash bags. A nice selection of beers but not at sale prices like local grocery stores. Checked out and bagged my own bags. See you next time Winn Dixie ..I mean Winco!
I really wanted this place to be good. The first time we went there right after the opening it really was. But our second trip was a total disappointment. They served us stale bagels the whitefish was totally bony and the food in general was mediocre. If they want to compete with Chompie s and NY s Best they need to do a quick re boot or they will become part of Scottsdale restaurant history.
Tried this buffet because of the buffet of buffet deals. In my opinion this is probably the smallest of all the buffets. I ve tried the majority on the list but I could be wrong. The lines for the crepes were long the food was okay and the selection was small. I like to get lost at the buffet like at the Wynn buffet. The line was insanely long for this teeny tiny buffet. If you have the patience then you should at least try it once. Otherwise go to the Wynn or M resort. Their selection and food is so much better.
I had the worst experience ever at this hotel. I was woken in the middle of the night by a man from security standing at the foot of my bed. He said he was from hotel security and was there to check on an alarm that was supposidly going off. There was no alarm going off. He then saw that my son had woken up in the other bed and turned around and left. Hotel management confirmed he was with security but why was he standing in my room? He did not knock or anything. At first the only thing they offered was to comp the resort fees. I had to ask to get the night comped too. What I told one of the managers was that I understood he might had gone to the wrong room but when he opened the door and saw all of the lights were off and no alarm was going off why did he enter? Per their policy a phone call was supposed to be made to the room first which was not . I will never stay there again. Hotel security has no respect for privacy. And I have not heard a thing from the hotel regarding the matter.
Waited at the counter for a few good minutes before I was finally acknowledged the man was pacing back and forth so I m positive he knew I was there. Anyway decided to stop by just because I was already inside grocery shopping. Ordered the avocado boba and again waited and waited. The whole ordeal was about 20 minutes. Finally got my drink and definitely tasted like some cheap a artificial stuff. You could tell that they did not use real avocado. What a waste of money. I feel bad for the people trying boba for the first time at this joint. Please try bomboba! It s in the same plaza by subway.
My husband and I had a gift card and decided to try Montana s Newmarket after approx 3 years of swerving it. Let me explain. Our last 2 visits we experienced a plastic piece in a dessert to which the managers comment was oh its just out of the dessert packaging so it s not been on the floor or anything. So it s OK to choke to death on clean plastic? and ordering a steak dinner for 2 not cheap and they forgot the extra sides we ordered. So we tried again. I have to say the food was very good. The service was very good. The end of the evening was the most atrocious customer service ever and it took some digesting what just happened. Starters we shared potato skins and kapow shrimp. Both were excellent and I would recommend. We ordered the same entree of jambalaya with rice and it was delicious. Again I would recommend. However when we got the bill we were musing over it while our waitress walked past us and we re wondering about why we had 15 discounted. Somewhere in the region of 5 10 minutes later the waitress came back and apologised that she had given us a discount that should have been applied to the next table. And took away our 64.80 bill and replaced it with a new one of 81.85. I was not very happy and had I been with a friend would have questioned it complete with attitude. My husband being a typical Canadian did not want to fuss and much to my disgrace actually tipped. Of course knowing they have a survey I let that ride and will definitely tell us how we did today This spoilt a good evening. My son is a restaurant manager at another place we were tied with the gift card to go to Cara group and he said that was a bad move. Also only a manager can discount so the blame for that is with the manager. Rachael who served us was dressed differently so I did wonder if she was a manager? Either way I felt their integrity was not sufficient. When we spent what we did they will not suffer for their mistake. Does not make me want to either rush back or recommend.ur review helps others learn about great local businesses.
The bench machine has had an out of order sign on it for a week now. Fix it before I need a man bra. Also more than half the paper towel machines are empty and there are also used paper towels discarded by many of the machines. Seems like the cleaning service can improve.
This really was a waste of time. Cool concept and all.. but there is really no challenge. They give you all the answers and you spend most of your time clicking on the computer to give you the answer and then you walk out and get your diploma . Would not do it again.
Horrible customer service! I went in there and there was only one person working and he was talking to another customer. The employee did not acknowledge me at all while I walked around for five minutes and then I left. While walking out the door the employee said have a nice day. The sad thing is I am a customer looking for R C car parts and batteries. I guess I wo not be purchasing anything from this store.
Two words Rip Off. If I want to buy over priced cosmetics which truthfully I m plenty guilty of I love my make up and products thing is I rather go to the department store counters or even Sephora. Much more knowledgeable professional staff. Nothing here is really on sale they have little bottles and trial size things and a few clearance items...that s all you can get for less here but how is that any different from anywhere else? Even Marshall s right next door has better cosmetics marked down then Ulta does.... The other day I got my eyebrow wax done here and that made my feelings about ulta that much more solidified. My appointment was with Jennifer who once I came in the store had to go looking for and asking around to find. Once in the back not really a back or private area in Ulta ... It took less then 5 min. which she acted rushed even though she told me they booked entirely too much time before her next appointment. She missed spots not very warm or friendly and it cost way more then I ve paid anywhere else 28.00 which really at least if it would have been good service or she had done a nicer job I would not care quite as much. I asked her how much for a men s haircut for my boyfriend she said 40.00 again I do not think I will be coming here again. It s one thing to pay for overpriced things as long as you feel you got your money s worth. There are so many great places to shop in Las Vegas for the exact same products and services offered here I think I ll go with one of them instead.
We went during restaurant week due to the quality of the menu options. We were greeted by the nice hostess but we were taken to the restaurant week section with 9 other tables and one server. He took everyone s order at the same time and we literally were there two hours to eat lack luster food. The bread was cold and the lobster was over cooked. The best thing they have is the she crab soup. I will never go there again . I have had a better at chili s.
Not the greatest. Found a great add on groupon and thought I d give them a shot previous reviews were accurate. I enjoyed my meal and the service was not bad but some of the other dishes were not the greatest. Also the inconsiderate service charge rumor is true. I m glad I got that groupon deal or it would not have been worth it at all. I recommend spending your elsewhere honestly. Oh well worth a shot.
I know they have been busy tonight and that is understandable for February 14th but I do expect my food to be good when it comes out. I should have know because we have had problems the last 3 times that we have come to this location. I had to ask for lemon 3 times to go in my water. My husband and I ordered a pick 3 to share. The ribs were very good but the grilled chicken breast was chewy and dry. I did not even attempt it after 2 bites. Oh yeah... we got the chicken tortilla soup that should be called chicken flavored thickened broth because it was a stretch to find chicken or tortillas in it. We ordered green beans as a side and we got seasoned vegetables. The waiter went to get the green beans and brought out a plate of dried whatever. See the pic and judge for yourself. I have never had brown green beans. This is it for me. I will make the hike and go to another location because it s apparent that this location does not want to do better. Yes they are aware of my past disappointments because the last time we came they emailed us a survey to fill out and I was very detailed about our experience. I would not recommend anyone come to this location unless you want to roll the dice on service and the quality of food.
WARNING!!! This place is a dump. Guaranteed a motel would be a better option. It s dirty!! Carpets are so disgusting. The alarm clock was just sitting on the nightstand because there was no place to plug it in. We took COLD showers and could barely get the water warm. Shitty way to start the day. The toilet seat had a big crack in it. There is water damage all along the ceiling. The sleep number bed are a joke and basically the beds are terrible. The walls and ceilings are so thin you can hear even the quietest conversations and footsteps. Do yourself a favor stay somewhere else!!
Ca not believe the poor service. Got home and there s NO biscuits. Tried calling and NO one answers the phone
They layout is not great but I do not know why yelpers all seriously hate on this particular feature. Prices are not higher they are averaging Metro Loblaws prices the quality of the store however are not at the same level as metro or loblaws. In a bit of a food desert it s difficult to complain because I m just happy this place exists. although not the greatest The service is kind of lacklustre but I d hate working in the basement of the manulife centre too. I come here occasionally for cooked food..but honestly I d rather go to the Rabbas for groceries across the street on Charles . It s 24 hours nicer and better prices. Skip if you can on this place.
I am not an employee but I know a lot of people that work for this company for many many years...this company is horrible to their employees...they pay salary and expect that their workers devote night and day to them...bring work home and do it on their own time...work 16 or more hour days...and when they are up for promotion they have them do the job send them for training build the persons hopes and make them think they have the job and then they bring in someone off the street to take the job...this company is horrible. as for the job they do...well lets just say the employees are nice but they could not get a bill correct if their life depended on it.
Not a good greek restaurant! Souvlaki was dry and cold...and the salad..ew! Just do not even make the effort to try this place... lol
Alright so I rarely ever post reviews but I just had to after getting such a simple order wrong. I decided to stop by this McDonald s since it was on the way to my work. I just ordered a large iced mocha a large fries and a 10pc chicken McNuggets. I paid at the first window then got my food at the second window. First off I ordered a 10pc they gave me a 20pc thus charging me extra. Then they screwed up on my drink I ordered a iced mocha and she handed me an iced coffee. Like what the?? Really disappointed..
I go here on a regular basis to get my car washed which is always great! Today however I went in to get a quote for removing water stains from my vehicle. The man I spoke to told me they would charge 550 for that service. Excuse me!! I m not paying someone over 100 an hour to do such a thing. What a rip off! I had gotten quotes befor going here ranging from 120 to 200 . The man I spoke with had the nerve to say that other places wouldnt do as good a job.
I went in based on a Google search and wanting to avoid the strip. I wanted the tat today Now! Know now if I want a tat worth taking a photo of Painless Wayne s Tattoo is not your spot! I m a resident living here you know damn well strip prices are ridiculous! Thought it was crazy when Wayne stated he opened the Diversity Tattoo Shop where we had our neck tats done at 15 years ago. Same year too! As it turns out you should NOT Visit this shop! I want to share my response the night of my tat. Sent via FB to PWT Painless Wayne s Tattoo Typos were edited. We walked into the shop asking for my pups to be Melded into a yin yang design after that request we were then approached by Wayne and then repeated our idea! While learning PWT only accepts cash my hubby left to get that! Perhaps us rolling up in a brand new Caddy influenced your decision on how to handle us! Idk! During my tattoo you Wayne ridiculed your son which was unforgiving and out of line to be quite frank! There is a time and place for that and In front of me as a Mom paying customer was out of line! Period! You spoke of who you tatted repeatedly folks who have accomplished more do not toot their own horn ! Sorry on first greeting you were cool as all get out! Stop talking about who you tatted 30 yrs ago. Changed the minute I sat in your chair! You had me sitting leaning on my hip who does that? Do Not Visit here will be my comment and believe me when I comment EVERY WHERE! Our lobby experience was far removed from our actual experience. Disappointed in my result and your overall behavior! After I reached out privately via Facebook he blocked me. Guaranteed the work now this?! It s not done you can see my old tat underneath. If you want a tat you can be proud of and share photos of GO TO ANOTHER SHOP!!!!
One the slowest most incompetent McDonald s I have ever stopped at. Once every month or so my family makes the mistake of wanting biscuits for breakfast. Does not matter what I order every time I go there I sit in line for 20mins
They need to change their name to Rudefu ers! Employees we re rude and the restaurant was filthy. We could only imagine how dirty the kitchen is where you ca not see. We decided that we did not want to get sick and walked out. Clean the place up before you go out of business!
Terrible service and food. Then hostess kicked us out for having cotton candy from the chocolate festival across the street. Never go there again
The owner of the restaurant and his wife were very rude and not accommodating. The wife handed us the bill immediately after we finished our meal and did not inquire whether we desired anything else. The waiter was puzzled as to the behavior of the owner s wife.
Pizza was good but really expensive. I also got a 6 pack that cost 14 dollars. The same 6 pack cost 7.50 back in my hometown. When it was all said and done our pizza wings soup and 6 pack cost 50 .
I came here because people told me they had better burgers than In N Out and I had to try it for myself. Boy were they wrong! The wait time to get your burger at this fast food joint is not so fast. We waited a long time to get our order and to try to find an empty table. Very busy spot but definitely not worth all the hype. The place is actually pretty clean for a fast food place that does that much business.
Its a crappy place cowboy thugs and wAnna bees 6 bucks to get in to a country bar that plays hip hop. No go.
This restaurant closed sold ownership and reopened appearing exactly the same no renos and even using the exact same old menus . Unaware of the change we ordered takeout last weekend and ordered our usual order Chicken Tikka Butter Fish Masala and Sweet Naan. All were edible but very disappointing. The butter fish had only 4 very small pieces of fish and was overly sweet. The naan were thick like a pita bread not the previous thin large soft but outwardly crispy ones we were used to. They said the order would be ready for pickup after 1 hour. I drove to pick it up an hour and 15mins later and it was not ready. Had to wait an additional 25mins at the store.
Food is okay but definitely not authentic indian food.. One thali and one fresh bowl took thirty mins to come. It is also well overpriced comparing to other indian places. Not worth a second visit.
Stay away! I took a pair of jeans in to be mended and I did not want a patch behind the tear. I asked for it just to be sewn. The lady started yelling at me that they could not do that. I asked why she was so angry and yelling and she then switched personalities and calmed down. We discussed options for 15 seconds and then she started yelling again. I guess they are used to rich clientele from PV that are at their mercy? Or maybe my request was not going to make them enough money? Just really angry people!
I stayed here since they offered shuttle service to the airport even though the price 175 night was well over what I usually pay for a room. When I arrived at about 9 PM I found the that the parking spaces were unusually small. Not wanting more dings in my car doors I parked as far as I could from the front of the hotel. After I checked in I was informed that it would cost another 10 night to leave my car at the hotel while I was traveling. This brought the total cost of the hotel to about 250. When I woke up for my early flight I found there was no breakfast bar and no coffee in the lobby. The coffee in the room was unusually good but the 4 tiny creamers they provided did not really stretch for that second cup of Joe. Upon returning to the hotel after the trip I found my car was covered with a massive about of dust and dirt apparently kicked up by traffic from the nearby interstate. Needless to say I ll never stay at this place again. I think it is time to think about dumping my Hilton honors program and finding another hotel chain to use. Too many disappointments for the prices they charge.
Ok steak expensive really poorly trained staff and inedible vegetables. Ordered veg trio. The asparagus was cold tough and coarse the half of a baked potato had been dried out under a heat lamp. My glass of wine came from a bottle that had been opened for at least a day and was off but the bartender stated it was vacuum sealed so it was fine.
Not bad I would eat there again but I find it pricey for what you get. Typically restaurants where you pay about 30 or more for an entree there is some bread as you wait for you food. Grilled calamari was okay but it was served on a tomato marinara sauce which really overpowered the dish and took away from the typical fresh flavours of grilled calamari. Not bad just not worth the prices.
DISGUSTING..... This place used to have a location on 19ave and Glendale and they were decent and the service was good. That location closed but I think they made the wrong choice. This place has been around for years maybe they were good back in the day but not today. YUCK!
Pretty plain. Only six types of bagels unless you re going on a Saturday or Sunday then the rainbow bagel is available. As for toppings you can choose between PB and J plain cream cheese and butter. Just was not what I was expecting based on the previous reviews. No drinks or sandwich type bagels available.
This was the second time we have went to this location and the service was bad. Cooks in the back where cussing loudly and repeatedly with children in the proximity meanwhile Daisy which was the lady that took our order was very rude rolling her eyes and saying slick things under her breathe. Although she repeated our order twice she still managed to put it in wrong. I had to step in and the talk too the cooks about the specialization on our order because Daisy stood there laughing. This was our second time being there and receiving bad service. I will be calling corporate office tomorrow and not returning to this location.
Paid for a more expensive Car detail they called me 6 hours later to tell me it was ready and when I got there none of the interior was even cleaned except the carpets. It looks worse than a basic car wash package. I seriously doubt they even did any of the waxing on the exterior but how would you even know unless you stayed and watched them the whole time? I wish I had checked out the reviews of this place before I purchased a detail. I hope this will help somebody else in the future.
They have some knowledgeable people about their product but they also have many who are unaware of their products policies. Timeline quotes for repairs and replacements have been consistently off. Warranty and replacement policies have differed by a lot from what their regional Apple Care Representatives have told me. I had to have a watch replaced and had to deal with Reps in Tennessee who bashed the store managers here who offered to replace it and my phone to help correct the issue. I had to make 3 trips in one day to get the issue resolved and I m hoping when I do get my watch back the issue is corrected. I was told I would receive the watch back in 3 5 days and it s going on 8 now and it still has not come in yet. Again I hope it s the watch that was the issue and not the phone as I might have to make even more trips back to the store in an attempt to correct the issue s . The Genius Bar techs are informative and patient. The managers are difficult to get a hold of when in store and when you re told one thing they seem to do something different. This has happened twice now in this situation. I would recommend you go to a different Apple location as this one is just too inconsistent
Everything to do with the flying experience is a headache when you fly with this airline. Because I was flying with a small puppy I could book my flight online but had to call the airline within 24 hours to add her to my flight. Check in cannot be done at the kiosk because of said puppy. Waited in a line of over 30 passengers for more than 15 minutes before any agents showed up to check us in. There were two. Finally get to check in and I had a second bag to pay for as well as over weight charges for the first. You cannot pay the check in agent. You now have to get in line for the cashier. In this instance there was not one. Trying to ascertain who to pay I was confronted by indifferent and unhelpful staff. After 25 minutes of waiting I was called to a different counter and told the cashier called in sick and they would give me my boarding pass and waive the baggage fees because the fill in cashier could not be there before I had to board my flight. Terrible customer service.
We came here today for lunch for my brother James Bday. The lighting is very dim inside which I liked. The decor is modern cowboy not my style but the chairs we sat in were comfy. There were 6 of us at the table and we all ordered the iced tea expect my mom who always orders a sprite. We all agreed their iced tea was delicious. For our entrees 3 ordered the Famous French Dip Au Jus 2 ordered the Fresh Fish Sandwich and I ordered the Club Sandwich. All came with a side of shoestring cut fries. The French Dip was overall liked except one said his was a bit dry. The Fish Sandwich was the favorite among the entrees. My Club Sandwich was mediocre at best nothing special. I m not sure what the others thought well besides my mom but I loved the fries. I ate all of mine! Overall this place is nice but the food is way over priced. I think I would have enjoyed my meal more if I had ordered a steak or even a burger but I do not think I will be coming back to find out.
The Turkish food is tasty but not here at this place and the portions are deplorable and does not make you feel satiated I asked for Burek and wine leaves and got only 1 of Burek and 2 wine leaves after waiting for a long time besides no diversification in the menu it is really for passers by on Saint Catherine who get trapped into trying it !
I would never go back! The service was horrible... Sat with empty drinks for half the night even after asking. The food was very average and way overpriced. I honestly would have rather eaten at Olive Garden which I compare even their food to microwaved tasting entrees. The sauce was not good and the shrimp was chewy. I thought the seating was too close felt crowded. Do not waste your time and money.
The only reason to go here was cold tea . And the decision to go normally hinged on the level of alcohol already in your system. If you re actually looking to eat there are at least 4 5 better places in Chinatown at any hour of the night. If you want some recommendations I can name names
We had called for a repair on our oven microwave. I can say one thing positive that Raman diagnosis the problem but from there forward this repair was a complete nightmare and took one month to complete the job. We had to wait for approximately 10 day s for the part to come in and when they scheduled the appointment to repair they came with the wrong part. It now took another 10 day s to come back to repair. I was also accused of threatening the service technician which was not the case. I was upset due to the fact that it took so long to repair. This firm is not customer oriented and very unprofessional. I would move forward with extreme caution on hiring for any repairs. In addition to all this it took over a week to send me a correct invoice.
This used to be one of our favorite spots to grab dinner. Customer service slides down and so does our frequency. Paid for ginger ale with dinner and requested a refill waitress said they charge for refill. This would have been fine if the second glass was not considerably smaller. Waitress brought regular coke instead of diet and seemed put off at request to correct the error.
This unit of a national chain has been in Madison for a couple years now and still has not gotten its act together. The food is usually good but very inconsistent. Order the same thing twice and it is hit or miss if it will be prepared properly. My biggest irritation however is their total inability to handle carry out car delivery orders. Supposedly you call in your order let them know when you arrive and they bring the food to your car. Sounds simple right? I have used this service seven times and it never goes right. Tonight I called and after 20 or so rings someone picked up but did not know how to take an order. Waited on hold and finally ordered the food although the person had no clue how to use CakePay their Apple Pay system. After calling twice upon arrival I gave up and went inside. The order was sitting on the bakery counter getting cold for at least 15 minutes. This time I asked for a manager and found the manager was the person that handed me the food. He agreed they needed to get better at this and said to talk to the manager next time I order and they will make sure it is handled right. That statement alone should say something about management. My recommendation is do not go on a busy night and NEVER use their take out service. Go inside where a member of the wait staff can take care of you. Oh the cheesecakes are always very good!!
DO NOT RENT. HORRIBLE Experience. From Day 1 I felt harassed by the building and the company. They did inspections almost monthly making me feel like it was not a home but a hotel. The apartment fell apart in front of me with closets coming off the tracks even though I barely touched them. I had ZERO heat all winter and had to call the maintenance almost nightly with no result. After moving we found significant water damage from the pipes which explains why we had no heat. The worst though is the money they try to scam from you. After moving they tried to say I did not give enough notice so they charged 2500 dollars. 1250 for one months rent and 1250 for Late notice charge . This is not in the lease so they made it up after. They are also charging me another 1250 because they lost the record of my payment for December. So they are attempting to get more than my original rent for a month I lived there FOUR MONTHS LATER. They never made me aware of any of this until a month after I moved out. STAY AWAY I should have listened to all the friends who had similar experiences with this company.
I really really wanted to love the Saw escape room but unfortunately it fell short on so many aspects. We had major customer service failures and the games were poorly designed. It felt more like a tourist attraction than an actual escape room. We had booked for a group of 5 people. About an hour before our time another friend wanted to join us but the room was fully booked 10 is max . I saw that the next time slot 20 minutes later was wide open. Awesome! I called and asked if it was possible for us to take the next slot. For some reason it took them 7 minutes to check and then gave me a flat out no. I said but there s no one booked! They said that it s just not possible to move your time once you re booked. However they did let us add one person to our booking making it 6 of us and 5 strangers. If you ve ever played an escape room you ll know that is way too many people. The arrival experience was very interesting. It s located in a really seedy area of town. There s even those remote police cameras in the area. Yea that bad. There s purposely no sign that says Saw escape room but that s part of the experience. I would not park at a distance and walk... probably safer to loop around until you find the place. That s all I ll say without giving it away. Our group of 6 arrived about 10 minutes before our start time. The other group was running really late so they made us wait and did not allow us to start on time. We actually waited until the next start time 20 mins later to start the game. They could have let our group start on time and let the late group start at the next time slot which did not have anyone still . The only one star that they earned was the awesome set design. It s authentic and feels like you are actually in the movie. Super cool. That s really where the good things end. I did not enjoy it from an escape room perspective. Most of the puzzles involved finding codes and punching them into a keypad. If you ve done other rooms where it was just combo locks... this is basically that same lack of creativity except on a keypad. They also give you a black light to find codes. However the black light is remotely controlled by the game and has this on off cycle every 10 seconds or so. The rooms were also so bright that it was difficult to use the black light. Simply put the game design was poor. I m not sure if I would recommend people going to Saw escape room. On one hand it IS Saw.. which is basically THE ultimate escape room movie. The artistic design of the place is top notch. On the other hand service is terrible it s really expensive and the challenges are simply not interesting. I walked out feeling pretty disappointed. If you do go I hope you have a better experience than we did.
TL DR crowd served MOLDY grilled cheese sub par service and still paid for 70 even though everyone lost their appetites and did not eat half their food. We ve been to the GVR location of Lucille s before and had a lovely time with great food and fantastic service. No brainer when we wanted a great place to go for a birthday! The Red Rock Casino Lucille s was much closer to where we are staying this time so we chose that location. We called about 2 hours in advance for an 8 30 seating for 8 people. We were seated around 8 45. We watched them clean the tables and then stay empty 5 minutes so we begged them to seat us as the 3 younger kids were taking up space in the super small indoor entrance and causing some traffic flow issues. The waiter took our order about 10 minutes later. Drinks arrived and our shoestring onions tasty!! arrived 15 minutes after that. Our food trailed in 20 minutes later in shifts. We got 3 plates and a salad that was an appetizer added to a meal and then a few minutes later 4 more trickled in. The birthday girl was last to receive her food a good 5 minutes after the rest of us. She had only taken a few bites when we realized one of the kids was chowing down on a MOLDY grilled cheese sandwich. We asked the bartender for a manager. She took 10 minutes to arrive. She listened to us then said she wanted to take the bread back to have the kitchen manager check it. Five or so minutes later she came back stating she gave us a sizable discount and took the kid s grilled cheese off. The birthday girl ate two bites and the rest of us had half the food on their plates and did not want to eat another bite. 30 off. Our bill went from around 160 to 99 and we have 8 people half full and one very angry kid who got a sandwich taken away from him. The manager did not show us a receipt or tell us an amount. She had the waiter deliver it a few minutes later and we never saw her again. Subpar service and terrible quality control. Do not know if we will return because that thought will always be lingering. What a sad birthday dinner!
So I booked a reservation here and was told it was confirmed. I went to see a movie before my reservation and when I got out I had four missed calls and several messages from the restaurant trying to get in touch with me. The final message stated that my reservation was to be canceled despite us walking there. When I finally got a chance to call I was told there would be no problem but when I arrived I was lectured by the man there who told me he tried to call and that I should ve called back . I explained the situation but he barely listened. They then seated us at a table with a couple who just sat down. We left at that point so I have no comment on the food just crappy service. Be aware that if you make a reservation here you re expected to answer their calls within hours of your reservation or it ll be canceled.
I would give a zero to this Dr if I could. I had to see him as part of a Workman s Comp case for an Independent Medical Exam. I knew going in he was going to be biased as the other side referred him to me. I had undergone two back surgeries from a different Orthopedic Dr and he was supposed to evaluate my condition from the date of injury. He brought in his PA into the exam room to sit and stair at me the entire time as part of an intimidation tactic. He basically stated in his report that I was fine and that I could return to work. I had a physical job at the time requiring climbing stairs driving long distances and sitting for long periods of time. He even had the audacity to falsify statements I made to him by using quotes in his report that I never told him. This is beyond the pail. My only regret was not taping the exam so I could ve busted him outright. I found it pretty telling that upon leaving his office I overheard another patient asking if he could bring his wife into the exam room with him and he was told that was not office policy . My second opinion Orthopedic is now telling me the spinal fusion that the first Orthopedic performed did not take and that a screw to stabilize the cage in my spine went all the way through and is close to piercing a major artery which will require reconstructive back surgery. Dr. McLean did not see this nor did he seem to care about my pain level. He even got the injury date incorrect in his report after I corrected him at the time of the exam. He s a hack for Workman s Comp and I think he is biased towards who pays him. I can only hope that Karma finds him.
Overall this club sucked! I ordered a vodka with cranberry and it was nasty so I went back to the bar and ordered another drink and it was equally gross. When I first got there the music was okay some old songs mixed in with new pop songs but then they had a female singer take the stage and she was awful. After two songs I could not take it and left. Even the go go dancers were not that good. The whole vibe was a drag!
So I m going to start by saying the food was good when we got it. The one star is due to my servers blatant disregard for my table. I came here on 5 8 17 for lunch with my two kids. It s not overly nice or somewhere I would think they would be unwelcome. We were sat very promptly and then our server did not show up for at least ten minutes while two tables around us were sat and had their different servers show up. Mind you I m sitting with a 7 and 2 year old. I do not expect special treatment but I do expect the server to have a brain and realize when kids are at a table that maybe put the kids food in first and keep their drinks coming. The server ignored us finally took our order and then every table around us who was sat AFTER us all got their food. I stopped a manager and they apologized but did nothing to correct the situation. The server then continued to ignore us some more. My husband served through college and always makes me give them the benefit of the doubt but this particular day was not overly busy and he literally avoided us every time he came that way. I m glad I only ordered a sandwich and did not give them anymore of my money. Good food but horrid service. Apparently the managers are good with their staff ignoring people as nobody ever checked on us again. I will not be back.
The food was good the tables were dirty and the service was sub par. The counter help did not seem to want to be there. We were charged 2 each for drinks and they did not have iced tea neither of us drink soda or sugary drinks so we each had a 2 tap water oh boy! The food was good though and made just like we asked. I still wont go back after this visit though there are many other way better places to visit in this area.
Wow where to begin? I guess first as a former Henderson restaurant owner it breaks my heart to have to Yelp my poor experience at a long established Italian restaurant. We have been going to the Pasta Shop since their Tropicana days. We have been to the newer Horizon Ridge location at least 10 times since they opened. Unfortunately the last couple of times that we have been here since the Chef owner passed away the service has been lacking. We have stayed away for most of the last year. Tonight we figured lets try it again with some friends. Well tonight sealed the deal for us to never I mean NEVER come back! We were a party of 5 tonight. 3 guys and 2 gals. The meal started with the salads being served to the 3 guys and not the gals the gals salads took at least 5 minutes later???? Ok so we think maybe just a mix up or something. But still serve the ladies first! Nope. So 4 of the group finished the salads but I am still working on mine. The waitress tries 3 separate times to take my salad. Wow. Can I finish it? Then they serve 2 of us guys the main course but nothing for the ladies and my friend??? Then 5 minutes later our lady friend gets her entree? Ok where is my wife s entree and my friends??? Well then my wife gets her entree 5 minutes later! Ok by now we are thinking the Twilight zone has arrived. So we ask about our friend s lasagna where is it??? The waitress says that is being made mean while 5 minutes later the table next to us that got sat after us gets a lasagna. Nice. By this point we are just thinking that this place is not worth coming back. Then the waitress brings my friend another glass of wine and said that there was no charge for it. 20 minutes later the lasagna shows up! The rest of us have waited to eat our meals as our friends did not show up. Well as you can imagine our entree s have now gotten cold. The ownership manager never came over to our table to apologize and offer to remake our cold food? Then the waitress shows up to the table with a tiramisu and 2 small bags of pasta to take home with an apology. I ask for the check. The waitress brings our check and my wife asks if they removed the charge for the lasagna. No is the answer seriously wow??? At this point my wife gets up and asks for the owner manager. The owner talks to my wife and is puzzled as to what happened and does not apologize but asks my wife if she should come to the table and apologize? Wow crazy you are operating a restaurant and you do not already know that you should have come to the table and apologized at least 20 minutes ago and offered a free bottle of wine or something else for the table while you took 20 minutes to bake the the missing lasagna that you gave to the other table and should have removed the lasagna from the check??? All of the aforementioned happened after we spent an hour telling our friends how good the food is at the Pasta Shop and convinced them to try it!
For 2 people dinner was 30.00 and mediocre to say the least. Seafood salad had all the seafood picked out food looked aged. The rotisserie chicken was very dry. The desserts were old looking as well. The brownie was crunchy. The only think that seemed good was the chocolate milk. Lots of food choices. I however wo not be back. I d rather spend my money on a good fresh meal.
My aunt recommended this place to me because she said this was her favorite place to get fries. I guess I should have realized that the fries probably just impressed her more than the actual seafood. I ordered the jumbo fried shrimp plate and got the fries with it. The shrimp was good but not great the fries were really nothing special. The waitress I had was kind of weird and a bit rude even if she was not trying to be. The whole experience was just kind of odd.
The Stand is conveniently located by work so I decided to try it today. Right off the bat I m yelling as close as I can to the drive thru speaker because the girl taking my order ca not hear me. But clearly I can hear all the noise coming from inside which is making it hard for her to hear me. The speaker box is up high how am I suppose to get close? I drive up to the window and I get no salutation and do not even get noticed for almost 10 minutes. There were no other cars in line. And it was just after 12pm. Finally get my order. Tacos not too bad. They re suppose to come with salsa neither one of my tacos had any salsa. I also ordered chips and salsa on the side the tiny containers are ridiculous. These containers are the kind you see at other places where you pack salsa to go. In my opinion the salsa was not enough. The chips are tasty but a little hard to chew. First few were nice and crunchy then they started getting dull and greasy. I like supporting local businesses but not sure I ll return. Good luck.
This was the filthiest restaurant that I have ever been in. The salsa bar was caked in old product. There had been there had been an old salad type items that had been there overnight. When I complained that it was filthy she said oh yeah I was just going to clean But she just wiped around it and left the old food in the containers. I was horrified. In addition the floor and tables and garbage containers were also filthy. We should ve left but had ordered already
I scheduled an appointment a little over a week in advance. I arrived about five minutes early informed the person at the counter who I was and when I had an appointment and then took my seat until they called me back. About 30 minutes passed before anyone even made eye contact with me. They did not even bother to let me know the staff was behind schedule. I informed the person at the front desk that I was no longer interested I had arrived on time and I felt that my time was not appreciated. A little while later the manager of the location called me and offered to do my taxes personally and give me a discount. I m giving them two stars only because the manager attempted to make it right. This is the most disorganized circus of an office you will ever find. I chose to save my money and do my taxes myself I recommend you do the same.
The only reason this place gets two stars is because of their guacamole and cilantro rice. Otherwise BOOOOOO! I was seated with a table of 12 of my coworkers for a team dinner.The waiter had already served drinks to the first arrivals but when the rest of us got there it was literally about 20 minutes before he came back again. From there it was just a service nightmare. I think this guy figured that it was a party of more than 8 so his gratuity would be just automatic. After that he phoned it in. I asked for a veggie quesadilla simple request take your cheese one and add some peppers and onions. The server literally said We wo not have any veggies up any time soon other than potatoes. Most bizarre comment ever. I got an entree salad that had a few beans and tomatoes but other than that was a snooze fest. It took about 45 minutes to get our entrees and by the time it was all said and done the entire ordeal was nearly 3 hours long. That was from seating to the completion of the meal and believe me it s not because all my coworkers felt like hanging out all night. Skip it!
Went there this morning for a Memorial Day breakfast with my friend. I had eggs link sausage hash browns and two strawberry crepes. He had chicken fried steak eggs and hash browns. The crepes were so hard that they had a the texture of a corn tortilla. By the time we got to the car I was experiencing stomach cramping and I felt dizzy when I got home I barely made it to the toilet and I have been sitting on the throne the whole day! My friend called me 1.5 hours later and he was sick with the same symptoms. Obviously we have gotten some kind of food poisoning! I will be writing the company!
I just wanted to share the email that I received after canceling my account with Gilbert Pool Service. To review the repair guy did not call or show up in the morning as was agreed. When he did finally arrive he turned off the house water without telling anyone then he pumped chlorinated water onto my lawn and shrubs then over my property line washing out drip lines for some other shrubs. When I called the office to tell them about it the office called him back and he proceeded to complain about me within earshot. I finally forcibly extracted him. I m not sure which disturbs me the most the gross negligence of the technician or the thinly veiled threats of the field manager Here is the link to check their website and file a complaint Our license number is 203666 if you would like to check our complaint status. We have no complaints due to the fact the they are a government agency. A business is innocent until proving guilty. Unlike the BBB where a business is guilty until they prove they are innocent. With the BBB they take complaints and once the business proves to be innocent they mark it as a resolved complaint. We have several complaints with the BBB but customers always regret taking that route. The BBB is a private organization funded by businesses by selling advertising and membership fees to businesses. They have absolutely no authority as far as law in concerned. For a consumer its free easy and gives the consumer a shoulder to cry on. The very last complaint from a customer was quite humorous. He complained because we sent him to a collection agency. He did not pay for 3 months of pool service. We do advertise a 50 no show guarantee so he thought by locking his gate every other week he could pay his bill because no one signed the card therefor no one showed up. Wrong all of our cell phone have GPS recording devices. We could prove we were there so we took him to Highland Justice Court keep in mind a real courtroom supersedes the BBB so the BBB has to drop any complaint that has a court record number . This customer paid his bill once he seen court papers with attached exhibits proving our innocence. He probably did not want a court Judgment on his credit report. Those take about 100 points off a FICO score for a period of 6 years. I do have a question for you. Where is one suppose to pump backwash waste water if you do not use the lawn? I have owned a homes with pools since 1990 and have always back washed into my lawn. Since chlorine is actually a gas it does not have a chance to absorb into the ground hurting any plant life. When in fact the mineral build up from the pools evaporation rate acts as a fertilizer to the plant life. On my current house the backwash line is hard plumbed underground and it discharges into the lawn on the west side of my driveway. The grass on the west side of my driveway is much healthier then the grass on the east side that only gets city water to maintain it. As to your request your account will be closed once the above repair is paid in full. From your explanation I am not really sure why. Sincerely Rick Crissman Field Manager
It seems like this location is constantly understaffed. The staff is clearly stressed out and therefore not friendly at all. This is a management problem that they can easily fix with hiring and proper leadership.
The worst service! Inconvenient location and incompetent staff that will make you wait in line for hours! Do not rent from them!!
I live here for a while now this apts used to be pretty good until it became the commons the staffand manager Im sorry but they lack professionalism and yes they can be rude sometimes and get attitude when you have a question or an issues maintance there rude to oh to make it better how is it a tenant has two parking spots hmm yeah a lot of preference and noisy people who kiss the butt oh yeah and do not ask to talk to corporate number cuz they wo not do anything do not get me wrong i like it here but idk this stuff I m sorry they have a lot to work on
Without a doubt this is the dumbest set up for a restaurant I have ever seen. We tried to make reservations but we re told they do not accept reservations so just show up and we will be fine. Not quite. After trying several times to outrun other people to tables being vacated we finally got lucky. Only to be told that table was reserved???? Eating out should not feel like the hunger games in trying to find a seat. Stand in line to order food and a separate line for drinks. After 15 mins in line for a drink our food was ready......one problem. Nowhere to eat it. When we finally found a spot it was cold. Avoid like the plague.
I like Fuel s pizza however they have lost our business. We wanted to get one of their meal deals pizza and garlic knots and asked for two slices of pizza with everything on it. They said we could not get that as they were not making specialty pizzas today so we could only choose from the five they had out. Why they ca not have customer service and give people the type of pizza on their menu is beyond me. They could have easily taken the cheese pizza and added toppings to that. We left and forever said goodbye to Fuel. Customer service goes a long way and when you do not have it we will go somewhere else.
More interested in filling tables over servicing customers. Will never step foot in here again. Better to go a little east to Wild Wings where the service is great.
I usually do not write reviews...but I seriously have to for this piece of trash. Let s set the scene...we come in and the bouncer gives us a bunch of nonsense about how our 22 year old friend ca not come in because he s Mexican. We proceed to tell this KKK weirdo that we re gonna report him and he tells us to f off. Never ever come to this shitty ass racist white trash bar.
Worst ever! If you were able to give 0 stars they qualify. Filthy. Used old dirty rags to wipe stone after mixing ice cream and when the young man working there was asked how often the rags were changed and cleaned he said he ca not remember! GROSS! Asked for my money back and left. Poor customer service as well.
I arrived around 10AM so I understand the place is busy but not one server came to assist with seating. I was asked if I wanted to sit at the bar after about 10 minutes. I agreed. Waited a good 15 minutes after about 3 be right with you ... no water nothing. I order coffee and it was horrible and super hot. I order eggs benedict salty salty salty and for no reason came in a to go bag. Bill comes way overpriced. Much better choices than this establishment. I suggest to avoid.
There s a reason people call it crappy tire. Shitty service cranky and unfriendly staff very unhelpful.
While Beijing boasts the work of an incredible interior design team four massive tanks completely filled with goldfish contemporary furniture etc. the actual food and service are subpar on a nuclear level. As someone who considers herself an expert on true Chinese Vietnamese cuisine Beijing Noodle No. 9 embarrassed me! I ordered the cold noodles with cucumber beansprouts and beef. What I got was half cooked starchy udon like noodles doused in spicy watery mock szechuan sauce dehydrated shreds of cucumber and beef jerky. YES they gave me beef jerky. They actually gave me beef jerky with my noodles. My family ordered variations of the wonton soup because hey how could you ever mess up wonton soup? Surprise! This place managed to! The soup was obviously made from cheap starch and the noodles had a little more flavor than computer paper. Also the price range is ridiculous a bowl of noodles goes from 12 22 which is a jaw dropping difference with authentic places that stay below the 10 mark. It s depressing. And that is where I will end my review on this one. In the words of my dear father and his experience with Beijing Noodle No. 9 I hate white people noodles. I want Asian people noodles. Just no. Never again. I would rather eat paper towels than return to this wretched place.
Terrible terrible terrible. Waited an hour and a half for food and it was not good at all. Manager offered a free desert we did not want and then charged us for it that needed to be taken off the tab. Took 30 minutes to get the check stay clear of this place you have been warned.
Blu Sushi the new Sam s Club quantity over quality. I used to eat at Blu Sushi 3 4 times a week for the past year. This was unequivocally the best sushi spot in the Valley not just the West Valley. The fish was of the highest quality the rolls contained no filler ingredients and the atmosphere was very laid back yet upscale at the same time. Blu went under new ownership recently and the place has lapsed into mediocrity as a result. Following the transition to new ownership I dined at Blu 5 6 times giving the new owners ample time to orient themselves to the restaurant. Each time however was very clear that Blu Sushi is no longer the high quality sushi it was under the old guard. The new owners promptly fired all of the previous chefs wait staff and bartenders. The owners brought in their relatives as replacements for all employees. Truly this is not an exaggeration all of the new staff are either children or close relatives of the owners. Which would not be a problem except all personnel are highly inexperienced and definitely a cost saving mechanism for the new ownership. Cutting corners to save cost is the cornerstone of Blu s new business model. Where quality knowledge and classiness used to be status quo the rolls are now filled with krab mayo and rice as opposed to fresh fish and quality ingredients. Other reviewers mention how big the rolls are and how they left with a full stomach which they found to be a positive attribute of Blu. People are impressed with the size of Blu s rolls because the food indeed fills your stomach. However the roll consists entirely of filler ingredients rather than quality fish. The corner cutting is apparent in other areas as well. The upscale decor has been replaced by tacky blinking neon signs and the chefs and waitstaff have no idea what they are doing. Sushi rolls are rolled so loosely they fall apart at the first touch. Most orders come out of the kitchen incorrectly but the waitresses have no idea how to fix it and always have to summon the owner to your table in order to answer a question. Normally I would applaud the owner s presence as a commitment to customer service and excellence but in this case it is just another cost saving mechanism meant to replace experience. The new owners clearly have no idea how to run a restaurant and seem highly confused. I have 2 recommendations one for potential customers and one for the new owners. To potential customers If you are thinking of dining here do yourself a favor and make the drive to another place. Unless you are easily distracted by large portion portion volume and think that quantity replaces quality you will be disappointed. To to those individuals who are impressed by large quantities of bad food you can save yourself the money and visit McDonalds and answer yes when asked if you would like to Super Size It. To the new owners hire back everyone you just fired to include the chef and the waitstaff. It should be a clue to you how bad your restaurant is when none of the loyal regular customers have continued to frequent your establishment. You turned the best sushi place into a low quality dump whose only mission is to cut corners and pander to tourists.
I visited this place with expectations like all the other places in Scottsdale. Their kitchen was closed on a Sunday 7 pm. Secondly the bartenders was inexperienced. Anything beyond your standard jack and coke will be difficult to get made. Thirdly culturally I ve have not been able to understand the underline racist tones of the dress code in Scottsdale. This place just like the others will give you the fifth degree about your shoes if they are Jordan s or Nike shoes worn by the very men that are playing on there TV s during basketball games. Open minded critic. Hopefully they will improve as the new kids on the block.
Horrible horrible HORRIBLE I would not recommend this hotel to anyone! There was some sort of incident with another guest which caused all of our room to get soaked by sprinklers with a lot of expensive things and everything was ruined ! They offered me a 50 comp and somewhat of an upgrade this place is horrible in customer service and obsurd excuse for a hotel!
If I could give this place zero stars I would. Some of the worst service I ever had. The bartender was not only rude but was also on her phone the entire time I was trying to talk to her. My vodka mixer tasted like it had less than 1 3 of a shot in it and when I politely went up to her she got an attitude. I m in the service industry and understand that sometimes you re overwhelmed but this girl was hands down RUDE. When I asked her why my drink was so light on vodka it tasted like just lemonade she responded that maybe I should tip more next time I tipped her 30 on the previous drink . Latino night was also supposed to start at 10 and they did not open up the upstairs until 11 20. Will not be coming back here again.
I am from Los Angles and was really looking forward to being able to celebrate my favorite holiday here in Phoenix. This event was a huge disappointment. It looked more like a swap meet than a cultural event. There was limited opportunities for learning anything about the culture no parade no traditional New Years food no pasteries or candies. There were windows doors for sale time shares the Republican Party SRP and the water company. The lack of fireworks filled with confetti for children was another disappointment. A store in the Mekong market place supplied about half the Chinese themed booths. The children s pavilion had crafts that did not teach about the cultural and were preschool level at best. The people running the children s area packed up about 30 minutes before the scheduled time to end the children s pavilion did not even stay open for half the time the festival was occurring. The people in that ran the children s area in L.A. and San Francisco seemed to enjoy teaching the children these women could not wait for them to leave. The food was the same Asian themed food that was at the Ahola festival. There was no traditional food offered. I attended both Friday and Saturday in hopes of seeing improvement but there was none. The attitude observed on Friday was also observed on Saturday. I understand the need to make money but teach people about your cultural and give them an appreciation for why the holiday is celebrated the way it is. There were no lanterns to signify the end of the holiday. It was only about selling trinkets. The photo booth was empty on Friday and had a few backdrops hanging. As with almost every post I was going to take a photo of Alley to go along with the review. Alley was a tad too short for the backdrops but we were trying. A lady came up as I was taking my last shot and was upset I was using he backdrops. I asked why and she replied I could have ruined them. Puzzled I walked away...how could I ruin a backdrop by using it as a backdrop? They were already outside. Today I went back and the photo booth was up and running with costumes and they charge was 3. The issue was not that I let Alley stand near the backdrop even though she was too short for it to be used it was because I did not pay. The aloha festival and the Japanese festival were far better.
This review is for carryout which used to be decent when you could order online. Now you have to call it in and accuracy was atrocious. I got a box of lemon cookies for all the mistakes instead of getting items comp d. I am not one to complain but thought I d let others know not to waste your money. In addition food was sub par and mediocre at best. I would definitely not recommend this and would consider it above Olive Garden in quality.
2 hr wait for an appointment then more waiting only to be told after 3 min that there was nothing they could do. People were friendly but they should have taken the 3 min before the wait..very disappointing. .again.
I decided to go in and get my eyebrows waxed left eyebrow looks great.. do not know what happened to the right side lol
I am a new to the Las Vegas Area I order out several times a week. Never would I have imagined that I could make Chinese food better than the native Chinese. The rice and noodles are not done the Orange chicken horrible. The only reason they got 1 star the Egg Foo young was a 2 1 2 stars. Please do not order from this resturant is you like good food!!
I would not recommend this company based on my experience. I rent a home and my AC was having a problem keeping up with the summer heat. Set it to 76 and between 2 6 pm the AC runs without pause and the temp continues to rise to 83 84. This continued and was documented via my Ecobee 3 smart thermostat. I called my owner who called Maxon. He did this because they had serviced his AC during a Home Warranty call a few years back. Upon arrival the Maxon Air rep looked at smart thermostat and immediately began blaming it for the issues and stating he did not understand computers. I showed him basic line graphs that show desired temp and actual measured internal temps demonstrating that the AC could not keep up . He refused to even try and understand them. Additionally he showed up in the morning and said it was cool of course it was the outside temp was 79 as opposed to 115. The Maxon Air rep tested the AC and said everything was fine. When it came time to look at the air handler in the attic he told me he hated those ladders that fold down they make him feel unsafe. At this point I honestly did not expect much. He departed after telling my owner that nothing was wrong. To my owners credit he called AZ Eddy s AC. Bob Eddy arrived and in the span of 60 minutes diagnosed a problem using the same tests that Maxon had used. He fixed it and it is working great months later. I have no idea why Maxon could not identify the issue. To prevent from a warrantied repair? Lack of training? Stupidity? Who knows. Call AZ Eddy instead.
I ve been to Royal Nails and Spa twice. The first time I went I had an acrylic square full set done with polish. This took a lengthy hour in a half.The male artist that was doing my nails was very nice and on point though so I decided I would be going back again. The second time I went I called and made an appointment for my friend and I and made it known before hand that we would be coming in over our lunch breaks at work and only had 50 minutes I was told that this was doable and not a problem. When we arrived only one artist was open. After 10 minutes passed by I asked the new guy that was doing my nails how long it would be until someone could work on my friends nails as she had to be back to work in 40 minutes he told me 5 more minutes. He repeated his prior answer 6 more times until we ran out of time which was extremely rude and irritating since I made us both appointments and my friend had to just sit there for 50 minutes waiting. When we were leaving the artist explained to my friend that one of the other artists called out in the morning right after I had called and this is why the appointment was off set... So why did not he just say this in the beginning when we arrived?! In addition I went in for a full set almond shape and polish and came out looking like I had clubbing of the hands... The almond shape I requested was weird and round and had an over sized oval top point to them and every single nail was literally crooked! When he glued the nails on to my nail bed the acrylic nails were over sized and folding onto my skin? Every time he asked me if I liked them I asked him to please reshape them and file down the width of the nail bed as it did not match my natural nail size and he seemed quite irritated at my request. He cut me several times and did not properly groom my nails or even pay attention to the cuticle area. After 45 minutes of this shit I told him I had to leave and go back to work and I left with an unfinished nail job. He did not even buff the nails out and file them down or polish them and did not even seem concerned that I was unhappy with the experience. Not only all of this but he was constantly on his phone and had placed it on top volume speaker next to us. Upon leaving I still paid 28.00 for the unfinished full set since and he had the audacity to then ask if I wanted to leave a tip on my card before running it! I always tip all customer service s but if you ask me for a tip....on top of not being customer friendly and doing a poor job not happening buddy. Needless to say I did not return to have this place even fix my nails. I will not be returning here or recommending this salon.
The ice cream is great! Even though it is very pricey The reason I give it a low rating is because this Hispanic young girl gave me attitude because I had a free ice cream and I needed to pay extra for coconut milk. When I received my ice cream there were no spoons left so I politely asked for spoon since there were none there. The girl set the spoons in front of me still wrapped in plastic and walked away. This is terrible!!!!!! Even if I was having a horrible day I would not treat reoccurring customers like this when I come here AT LEAST once a week
Associates are CLUELESS! If you re looking for help they will only bring you HELL.. If you want to waste 2 hours of your life give them a call. I was transferred 8 times still no help. Website is not updated. The information you see on there is all incorrect. They did not even say they are going to fix it after I pointed this out. Is this even a real business? I get better service and help at a circle k. Thanks for nothing Mayo Wo not be surprised when this business gets shut down. No quality no car again CLUELESS.
I should put this review on all of their pages. Long story short I called each location ahead of time to find out the best time to come in to sell clothes if I had to make an appointment and which store takes men s clothing. They all told me to go this specific location and anytime is good. I travelled here from York university only to get denied when I got to this sink hole of a store. Apparently they do not look at clothes 30 min before closing. Which is understandable.... But a VITAL piece of information to leave out of a conversation. When I told them that I m the one who called the low based animal there proceeded to talk on its phone and roll its eyes. Kind? Yeah right. Just another store that tries to mask themselves by trying to be for people but are really just bottom feeding parasites that smell like the arm pits of Lebron James after being traded to the heat clammy cowardly and really really just not cool...just not cool dude yeah that s a crazy old reference so? . Ah... this was fun and therapeutic this place still sucks though.
Terrible service!!! Do not ever go there. You might be greeted by the door so you think it s a good place until you actually purchase something and want them to stand by their product! My husband and I have iPhones and the cord shorted out at the plug in point so we could not charge our phones. I called and they said it was under the one year warranty and to bring them in and exchange them. When I arrived at the store the manager told me that there was physical damage to the cords and that is why they would not exchange them. I told him the cords are handled with care. One cord stays by my bed nightstand and the other by our couch end table. He claimed the end must have gotten pitched and I said that was not possible then he said a cat chewed on it however we do not own any pets. Long story short he would not give us new cords. I got home and called the Apple Store and they said they get a lot of people with the same problem with the cords and it s a problem with how they make them. It s the outer casing that buckles. They said they would give us new cords! Thanks apple!! Great customer service too bad Verizon did not show that kind of service! What harm would it have been to them to exchange the cords that were still under warranty and receive a good review and make customers happy? I guess I wo not be going back and we are looking at changing our phone service. I do not want to stay with a company that treats people like that. Good luck to you if you choose to go with them. Hope nothing happens to your electronics.
I hire beehive cleaning sep 2016 to do biweekly cleaning they did fine . March of 2017 I moved out from one location and ask to do move out cleaning which is they did and did awful work . I called and nicely ask to come back to clean things they missed they did it and destroyed blinds not only break them took valence off some how and never told us about it . The company owner nick not returning calls my landlord left voicemail to talk about it this situation they ignore our calls. That s not how professionals handle business. I would not recommend this company to anyone.
I would never review a McDonald s normally but I have to review this one because its so disgusting. Every single time I go its dirty every time. Tables benches whatever it is dirty. The food is usually below average and the workers barely speak English. Go somewhere else PLEASE!! instead and skip this place.
LVAC please tell your front desk staff that this morning included two staff members a trainer and a manager to please be slightly friendly upon members entering. Would a smile or a hello kill you?! Not one word or even eye contact from anybody even after checking in...C mon guys I know Trump is President but life is not that bad. Perk it up a bit!!
I was so excited to try this place as I had heard great things! A girlfriend and I went on a Saturday afternoon 2pm ish and it was nearly empty. We sat for ten minutes with no sign of a server. I asked a waitress if she could please send over our server and with an eye roll went and found Andy the waiter . He came over with an annoyed attitude took our order and left. When the same waitress who rolled her eyes earlier brought my salad it had bacon on it I asked that be kept off as I am a vegetarian .. I told her and she was visually annoyed. She told Andy who came over and mumbled I must have not heard you say no bacon insinuating I did not tell him. He ended up bringing me out a new one but it was after he passively aggressively tried to call me a liar. Basically the servers acted like they did not want to be there and were BEYOND rude. Food was fine .. But I would never return. I do not pay to go to a restaurant to be treated poorly and eat OK good.
I called Arizona Pool Fence to set up a free quote. The person was super helpful and informative so I was looking forward to our meeting. Meeting day rolls around I rearrange my schedule so that I can be available when Rob I believe that was his name gets here. My appointment window was 3 5pm. At 5 30 still no sign of him no call to let me know what is going on. At 5 45 he shows up when I answer the door he is unapologetic and says Boy.... you re a sight for sore eyes ..... really hitting on me? Anyways I let him know that my appointment window was between 3 and 5 and that it is now 5 45 I had rearranged my schedule and that now is no longer a good time. He was still unapologetic said This happens sometimes usually people just wait .... um... no. He asked if I wanted to reschedule at no point did he apologize for being late or for not calling. I will not be calling Arizona Pool Fence again.
Came here with my bf since it was the closest nail place for us. Huge mistake. Service was awful. I convinced my bf to get a pedicure and the lady doing his pedicure would look at his feet and then make a comment to the other guy next to her. So rude. The guy who did my gel pedicure is obviously new since he could not paint my nails evenly. The price was too high for the service and quality we received. Definitely wo not be coming back here.
The lackluster service began when I walked in the door. I was unenthusiastically shown to the end of a number of community tables near the kitchen entrance which I unknowingly accepted. The few tables on the outskirts were taken so I got up to select from an average offering of items at the lunch buffet still excited for the new experience. Sitting back down with my recent selections and preparing to attempt to enjoy lunch my unbeknownst to me arch nemesis entered the dining room an older Indian? Woman in a lovely golden dress whom my server greeted with a bow arrived. I thought how nice a person with an ownership or familial interest in the restaurant is here... little did I know. I attempted to enjoy my mediocre selection from the buffet when I was jostled almost knocked from my chair by above mentioned lady with a large pan of silverware. Working in a restaurant were I to bump into let alone almost dislodge a patron from their seat I would offer an apology... Yet nothing was said. Suddenly a cacophony erupts from behind me as the lady in gold begins polishing silverware with gusto picking up forks and knives from one metal bin wiping them with a napkin only to THROW them into another metal bin at maximum velocity at 12 15 during the Friday lunch rush maybe 15 20 occupancy I requested to be moved from sitting 3 feet from an audition for a heavy literal metal band to a table far away. I was still well within earshot more so as a second individual began to compete for the loudest silverware polishing championship. I was cut off by an employee rushing to the kitchen as I attempted to return to the buffet never offered a beverage and as Naan was tossed on my table the manager could not be bothered to even meet my eye let alone smile. I predict that the recent influx of new restaurants in this complex will slowly strangle this thoroughly unimpressive culinary disaster to death even as they wonder why they are failing and eventually close. Three options for success exist 1. burn the restaurant and collect the insurance. 2. Funnel money for organized crime. 3. advertise to future restauranteurs how not to run a restaurant and show how to succeed by doing the opposite of this miserable excuse for a dining experience.
Service was ok! Waitress was very nice but absent most of the time They definitely pay more attention to the bigger table and never get back to you if you are a smaller table which is crap. Prices were too high for what I tasted I ca not justify the quantity nor the quality for what I paid. Waitress was overwhelmed with a large table which made our wait longer. Manager was pea coking around knowing we were waiting for our food for a while and never bothered to help her. Beer was expensive It s honestly not that great of a place besides the furniture but I m not eating the furniture. Food was not that great honestly we could of went to any burger joint or wing joint and got the same thing for a cheaper price if not half and immediate service. The music that played in the background was loud and more like a diner or a breakfast place music then it was punk rock honestly it was annoying. With the ok service and the little food and the high bill I definitely would not tempt myself to come here again. Few years ago Claim Jumper had huge portions of great tasting food and great prices I do not feel it is the same place Took a good wait to get her to come back and bring the check god what a hassle. Paper bill came without even a folder and was wet and crappy. They do deserve zero star and I paid for what I got and there is nothing else to say. Point blank.
My long time technician moved out of state so I have visited a few salons to find my new nail home . Yes the salon itself is decorated very tastefully it does smell pleasant but it also has the feel of an assembly line. I arrived door was opened and was told not only yet but to pick out my polish. I signed in I was second the first was an appointment left and returned before OPEN time only to find two handsful of people in line. I was again three times to pick out my color it was on the receptionist s desk each time asked! My tech had no good personality at all. I attempted several times with her to have cheerful small talk but it was difficult. I had a snack with me during my pedi which she kept staring at. I took two bites and put it away. Very non gentle treatment with feet legs hands. Grabbing pushing shoving out of the way. Good pedi except for sharp corners left on toenails. On to mani I wanted a gel job just like I walked in with. She had time to look and see what I had. She complained about the condition of my hands nails. I thought that is what keeps nail salons in business to make hands feet pretty a again . She said I use my hands too much!?!?!?! Then trouble began she could not or did not want to shape my nails. I wanted oval. She had them square sharp corners. I attempted by words and hand motions to show her oval smooth corners. She kept filing the ends and not the corners. After 3 4 attempts she became very agitated talking in her language to another tech. The 2nd tech came over asking me how I wanted the nails done. As I was trying to explain tech one started speaking in her language very angrily. I told the tech 2 that even know I did not understand the la gauge I knew tech 1 was speaking very harshly about me and I did not appreciate it. Tech 2 took over as tech 1 left still speaking angrily through the salon. The 2nd tech did a fantastic job on my nails but because she was pulled away from her client to take over for tech 1 she was not happy and very rushed. Again just like an assembly line!! We ladies go to get our nails done to have them to look nice but at the same time it is our little oasis of time to feel pampered and relaxed!! Sadly this was not the case during my PAID visit to this salon.
Every time I go there they forget something or mess something up. This time I was not given the nachos I ordered and paid for... And no receipt. Great. Thanks for charging me for the lunch I did not get to eat.
My husband and I had a couples message .. we just moved into the area and trying out different places. Receptionist is not very likable. The essential oil message was more of a rub and the energy felt frazzled. they shorted our time and it felt rushed. I do not think they give the therapists enough time in between to set up.
Each and every time I go to this particular location it is never a good experience. My number one complaint is the waiting time. Even if I am just ordering a coffee I am waiting a long period of time. I always see young people working behind the counter and it does not seem to be very organized. I also see that friends of the employees tend to hang out by the order counter and it looks like the employees are giving away free food while a paying customer has to wait. The order counter is always dirty and the McFlurry machine is ALWAYS BROKEN. ALWAYS ALWAYS ALWAYS! I would NOT recommend going to this location. Their staff has no respect and I never see a manger around and if I do they do not look very clean.
Had lunch here with a client. Both of our meals were cold and service was horrific. This location is going straight to the gutter. Time for a mangament change and maybe actually clean the restrooms.. Not coming back until they get this zoo back to how it operated when they first opened
Unprofessional Owner Disappointing Customer Service False Advertising Poor Communication
I hope the hour and half wait for the food is well worth it since we are sitting next to the kitchen door watching the group getting served as plates after plates come scrolling by.... Not even busy. Not much seafood options unless it s drenched in coconut...... Still waiting still waiting. .... The kids meal finally came. Waiting. ... waiting. ... that looks good! Waiting. ..... For the price of what you get and the taste this place is not worth a second try.
Terrible gym bathrooms always stink and the refrishment machine is always out of gaterade. Like for real bro? I need like electrolytes when I m working out. These are some hard core workouts that I do and I always got approached by some trainer trying to sell me personal training. I told him I was not interested but he was pretty persistent. I came back a week later and was approached by another trainer and told that the previous trainer that approached me had been fired for being inappropiate with customers. Good because I was gonna tell him to F off! When I come to the gym I come to work out not to talk! Like Arnold Schwarzenegger says when you come to the gym you come to lift not to talk and type on your little cell phones! Got my own freeweights and elliptical at home now thankfully I ll never be coming back to this LA fitness!
Went to this doctor 4 years ago. He kept me on a drug that my new nero said I should have been on for 8 weeks max. The last appointment with this doctor after they told me they took my insurance found out they did not . Charged me 350.00 for new patient. Yeah I was not a new patient but I needed to know what was going on. Then he barely did anything but move my head around and book another appointment. BY the way another doctor told me I was being over medicated. I was a walking Zombie. So I changed the dosage to what that doctor said and she was right!
Waited for an hour and our food still was not served Two of us waited an hour and had to leave because our food had still not arrived. It s probably a pretty good place to while away an afternoon drinking and finally eating we did see two of the six tables in our area served food over the hour we were there but as a restaurant I would recommend avoiding it for now.
Still bad. Next to no tuna in the spicy tuna roll which consisted of only 5 pieces.
TJ Hibachi and Sushi Bar is the latest addition to the revamped food court at Great Northern Mall. The basic idea appears to be to offer the same chicken beef and shrimp all with rice offerings as mall staple Sarku Japan with the addition of a sushi bar. The store itself has an interesting setup lots of space a clean layout and even a couple of chairs in front of the sushi bar. I went with Combo A an Eel and Avocado Roll with Hibachi Chicken on White Rice 6.99 . The sushi was below supermarket quality. Have no delusions that you ll get traditional grilled eel particularly after you see the sushi chef pop the 6 pre cooked pieces of eel in the microwave before putting them on the roll. The roll itself was far too light on the eel sauce which would have been at least a decent attempt to mask how mediocre everything tasted. Amazingly the hibachi chicken managed to be even worse. Low quality bits of chicken covered in a tiny bit of brown sauce the dish managed to be utterly devoid of taste. The only worse Japanese mall food chicken I ve had was at Silver Wok in the basement of the Halle Building but only by a shockingly small margin . The chicken came served on top of about 2 cups of white rice. Vegetables which I did not get are 1 extra. On a whim I also got a cup of the Miso Soup 2.49 . This was about at mall food quality wise maybe straying a bit on the side of being too watery. Ironically the miso soup could have used some time in the microwave along with eel. The total damage not including intestinal and spiritual damage with a large Diet Pepsi 1.59 came to 11.20 including tax. Subtracting out the Miso Soup the one redeeming factor that TJ Hibachi and Sushi Bar may have going for it is that it is a lot of food at a relatively low price particularly for sushi. It might not be a bad value if you were really hungry or were willing to split the combo with a friend preferably one who had lost his or her sense of taste . In the end though this place had me yearning for mall neighbor Sarku Japan which is a truly scary thought.
I agree with this comment What is this place thinking? we customers travel around the world we are a multicultural and diverse city we know what Mexican food is not this!! Also again tapas come from Spain and Torontonians always confuse this its the politically correct way of saying tiny portions! Wo not come back horrible.. waaaay expensive bad service!! and not Mexican at all... These owners of the distillery just do not get it. I feel sorry for them...
Dropped in for summerlicious appetizers were almost inedible due to how salty they were fried artichokes salmon d. The mussels were good but the Gnocchi while tasty was a fairly small portion. The catalana was far too sweet and neither of us finished it. I m sure their normal menu is better than this but for summerlicious it was pretty bad.
Ordered the roast pork menehune. Looked like TV dinner. Not coming back. The Siamin was horrible.
Not nearly as good as Barrio Cafe. Had the Pollo burrito w Chorizo. Simply average. Chips were great. If you have the time go to Barrio Cafe in Phoenix. It s awesome. If you are from out of town definitely be sure to get to the one in Phoenix it s the original..
Walked in. No employees. Waited. Waited. Waited. Finally walked around the corner and they re in the back playing on their phones. Asked for help and they were extremely short with their answers. Not helpful. Walked away without food
I m sitting in a suite right now that has not seen anything new except the advent of digital tv since the Reagan era. The wallpaper is peeling the ceiling is water stained as is the carpet and furniture. The toilet tank is leaking. What is not ? There is no real handicap friendly features including the staff. Each one also has the same answer to every question I do not live out here I drive here for work. The ONLY bright spot so far has been the Starbucks in the lobby. They are the go to people for caffeine and assistance. Everything here is also pay per use even local calls. I m past the point of dealing with Expedia since I m here due to their stellar ability to underwhelm. I guess it was the cherry on top. No more. Expedia and this supposed 3 to 4 star hotel they are both jokes played on me.
To start with the only good thing about this doctor office is that Dr. Garcia and the male nurse whose name I never got were so awesome and took their time and truly cared. However the office staff is rude and not helpful. even as checking in and they need to talk to me. they basically told me to hold on while finishing a text message on their cell phone. I arrive early to all appointments about 30 15 mins and still wait in the lobby for about an hour after the scheduled appointment then to wait in the room for another 30 40 mins as well. Even the office staff told me that I needed to call my insurance company to ask a question which they should have done. I had to call the insurance company for the office staff or my kid would not be seen remind you he was there for a severe sick symptom as well. I only gave a 1 star rating only due to the male nurse and dr. Garcia!!!!
The doctors are good but the waiting times are horrible. The nurses say they double book which results in 2 to 3 hour waits. How can a place like that do that but profit is the main motive behind this. You feel horrible after leaving your appointment because of the wait as well as not being able to eat and attend other errands or going back to work. And once they call you back there you feel like you are at a cattle ranch where they are just trying to push you through. Booked your appointments early and or start sending them a bill for your waiting time. Shame on this office for double booking. Also start complaining to the office staff every 5 minutes when you do not get seen right away. Change can happen when you and others start complaining and making a scene.
One person working cashier....8 people in front of me. By far the worst Sheetz location. Thanks for making me late to work.
If you re going for ice cream or a Julius .. you are probably ok ... but in my view .. not the place to grab a quick lunch. Ordered BLT ... and the meat tasted old. All food selections are pretty unhealthy. No salad to substitute for chips... as with McDonald s Wendy s Arby s or Chick Filet. Pretty sub par sandwich. Nothing to get excited about ... and as long as I do not get sick .. I guess I m ok ... just not going back. For the money ... Chipotle is probably a better fresher and healthier choice depending upon what you choose .. in the San Tan mall ...or even Paradise Bakery.
One star only because there is not any less. I had a very rude experience with her when she told me she was going to concierge. Basically it was take it or leave it attitude. I left and should have left a long time ago.
Ordered a frittata it was like eating a plastic frisby the potatoes tasted like they had been cooked the day before the condiments on the table where dirty toke close to twinty minutes to get our food and the prices are way to high for breakfast food go to Stacks better price and good quality I do not understand the hype
I keep going back to this location for lack of anywhere else to go that is close by... Not anymore I must stay away I must! Jack s has always been one of those places where everything either goes really well or everything goes completely wrong... I stayed away from Jack s when I found out they removed the steak fajita which on my last visit I discovered they brought it back more on that later Over the years most of my favourite items have been removed including the delicious sweet chilli chicken fingers! Yes they still have chicken fingers but it just is not the same without the sweet chilli sauce... I will hopefully never return to this location but again sometimes life happen and it is what it is... This location when it first opened seemed to have their shit together not so much anymore. I believe everyone who was originally here is no longer and things have taken a spiral. I always find especially with Jack s that unless they write your order down it will not come out correctly. The server on my most recent visit seemed rather lost but even if she was amazing it would not have changed what happened next ... Now back to that steak fajita after eating one fajita and onto making a second one I noticed a big long black strand of hair right in the middle of the fajita that I was currently in the process of making its way to my mouth. I m so thankful I noticed before closing the wrap and entering my mouth. I was so grossed out as I already ate from that skillet and when I looked down I noticed MORE HAIR in the skillet! The whole steak fajita was filled with hair! Sometimes you end up with hair unfortunately in your food but someone s whole head of hair in my food? Wtf? ... The manager could have cared less which made matters worse and actually said that she checked and made sure the hair was not mine? Seriously? It was like a scene from a nightmare or something. Usually Jack s has pretty cool managers but I guess because of where this location is this is not the case. Take the extra few minutes and go to the location at Don Mills. Unless hair is your thing...
Got there at 350 pm. Asian guy who takes orders and delivers them outside smoking. Go inside he does not wash hands GROSS.... IVE eating there many times. This guy just do not give a shit. Gal who works there usually at lunch PLEASANT and grateful for your business So the question is did I eat there today FUCK NO.
Condescending associate when asked if shoes were new he rhetorically said yes despite the obvious scuffs and marks on the sole. Do not let the 4 stars fool you just peep their not recommended reviews. Garbage store trash associates Not only were the shoes filthy it came up to 230. Take your money to snow city cycle instead.
Believe it or not the customs process I experienced during the exit from Canada into the United States here was worse than what I experienced traveling to from Mexico. Chaotic unbelievably long lines and an inadequate number of staff. I arrive two and a half hours early before my flight and was so glad I did because it took over an hour to get through the process. As an able bodied young woman I was exhausted standing in line for so long so I can only imagine how unpleasant the experience must ve been for the older folks waiting.
Go for the golf not the food or customer service they automatically add 20 gratuity to your bill for what I have no idea. There s no incentive for ok service just lack of service and bad food promise food really sucks! Save the agony money and time go elsewhere promise you ll be disappointed if you spend a dime TPC grill food flavorles over priced believe me it s not worth the troubles. Try Marriot or near by casino s.
Jan 1 we took advantage of the cheap rates to test out this hotel. The room is nice but not anything to write home about. The bed was comfortable but the pillows were anything but desireable. My husband had two small ones and I got the huge lumpy pillow. Next time I will bring my own. The tub was mediocre with a seperate shower stall. We enjoy taking hot baths together when we are travelling and this tub was difficult for the two of us to enjoy and relax with some champagne. I was hoping for the price of these rooms that we d get a tub with jets !!! NO SUCH LUCK. The hotel staff was great I did like the oatmeal soap as it s not so harsh on the skin but body lotion is not something offered to guests. Plenty of towels although one of ours had some kind of stains on it and that s unacceptable to me in a resort hotel. Sewing kit and the usual amenities in the bathroom were offered. At anytime during the day if the people in the next room were using the water the pipes banged. This got really old when we were trying to sleep!!! We did eat at the breakfast buffet and were not too impressed. Sorry but we wo not be staying here again.
Junk food everywhere with the promise of a Dylan s candy store coming soon. What a stereotype of horrible food at the airport that has miles of terminals to walk construction everywhere. Lesson learned NEVER come through Charlotte as a job! Eat before you come. Burger King and Wendy s are the high end options...ironically the Uptown restaurant has cheeseburgers for their special. Nothing uptown about that.
Did not really enjoy the burger. Tasted very generic like something I would cook at home from a frozen box of patties. The poutine was good but since this place is known for its burgers according to its name I have to give it below average for taste. Another complaint I have is that the seating area was really crammed.. It was hard to fit the 4 of us comfortably at lunch time. I wo not be going back here.
It is sad to see the denial and the accusation. The thought of a new air handler did not come up until Tom mentioned it I gave specifics in my first review this is a pathetic attempt at trying to save face instead of admitting the problem. I am glad to have online reviews. They put a transparency on to companies that forces a higher level of customer service. I still would not recommend morehart. Just one thing more to say in closing. If the air handler did not need to be replaced then why would another company come out find the problem recommend it be replaced get the approval and are now about to finish the job? I left a message for the owner and he never returned my call either but I am not surprised.
Food Quality and Price Standard pricing for a Fish and Chips place. 1 halibut and chips are 10.99. We opted for the 2 can dine special for 28.99 comes with 4 deep fried shrimp 8 deep fried scallops a halibut and chips per person 2 coleslaw and 2 drinks. For the value it s a decent price but I was very disappointed in the quality. The halibut was okay chips were bland coleslaw came in a small half cup. When we got the dishes I glanced at the special s menu and laughed because it looked better in the photo. The scallops and shrimp were cooked from frozen scallops were minuscule in size . Facility Quiet and homey kind of like you re eating in Grandma s kitchen. Washrooms are okay only 1 for men 1 for women . Located off Holland St convenient but hard to spot. The sign by the street says Cook s Bay but the sign over the door says English Fish and Chips . Service Service... was well service. Nothing extraordinary. Asian run if that matters to anyone . Overall Okay probably would not come back. The experiences was underwhelming but not bad.
I have used this Dentist provider in the past and had a terrible experience here. First they traumatized my son by causing him unwanted severe pain. I kid you not I could here my kid screaming in pain from the waiting area and he has a high pain tolerance. The dentist will recommend work that is not needed...they must make commission here? Also the billing department is a freaking joke. I have two insurance company s and they took almost a year of constant billing to finally realize I did not owe them a dime. Every time I called they constantly blamed my insurance companies for the error...Customer service is non existent. If you want to save yourself some serious aggregation avoid this place like the plague. This place should really be looked into!
We went there today...very disappointed!!! The AYCE menu has changed from last week and is limited to about 12 meats mostly bland and spicy meats but they did have bulgogi which was delish. The kalbi and other premium meats are an extra charge of 3 PER PLATE 2 kalbi with 3 bones each per plate . They limit your table to 5 items to start with which includes appetizers. Service was just okay...there was a long pause from our first 5 items to receiving more meet cooking it and then consuming it. There were only 7 occupied tables when we were there...imagine if it got busy our wait for more meat would have been even longer. Music was loud and inappropriate for dining...rap music and loud banging type of music. They have updated the place but still could benefit from more improvement. If you do go I suggest the kalbi bento for 10...unless they change the price for that next week.
I m surprised by the previous review. I found this location mediocre at best. The service is just ok. They pre cut their fruit for their juices and keep them in a plastic container filled with a mysterious liquid that I know other locations do not do. Instead they cut the fruit in front of you. Last time I ordered a juice here it had chunks in it. I had to go home and put it through my blender in order to drink it!
You have been WARNED! The staff at this organize is disfunctional at best. Ignorance is bliss for the Customer Service reps and Shop Manager. We received a quote from Auto Body World recently and it was a bad indicator from the start. Like Lindsey M they did not provide an 100 accurate quote unbeknown to us. After the work was done the Shop Manager admitted we could not quote PDR because they are not experts so why do a quote? They also admitted that no matter what their quote they will just do what ever the insurance kicks out higher or lower then their quote. Unless you pay out of pocket... Long Story short and a synopsis of the poor service 1. They will NOT call to tell you the vehicle is done. 2. They will NOT call you to tell you they are now 3 000 over their quote. They could not even find the original quote we provided it to them and they were shocked. Not one leg to stand on. 3. They will damage your vehicle beyond what the vehicle was in for. 4. The customer service does not exist and they will blame you for not calling in and knowing the vehicle damage exceeded their quote. If you have ever asked yourself why are insurance premiums so high? It is because of companies like Auto Body World that far exceed their cash quote and insurance quotes by a drastic amount.
Started going there in 2007. Initially I had Heidi. Loved the placed. When Heidi went on maternity leave I transitioned to Sarah. Loved Sarah at first. But then she became inconsistent and I felt completely rushed. The phone is NEVER manned. I would call several times throughout the week and it would go to voice mail. I did leave voice mails asking to schedule an appointment and no one returned my calls. They offer free bang trims to regular customers. I tried to make an appointment for that and the receptionist in a very snotty tone told me they do not schedule for that. She told me any stylist could cut my bangs. I beg to differ!!!! Tried that and came out with 1 in bangs. HORRIBLE. Second time I tried this I insisted my stylist did this because she knows my style and my hair. They gave me a lot of flack. Final straw was last summer when over the course of 5 days could not get a hold of anyone to schedule an appointment. What happened to this salon?!?!?!?
Worst experience EVER. Here s my story an excerpt from my letter to San Tan Ford I bought a 2009 Ford Focus from your company on February 13 2013. I was very happy with the car. You also bought my old car from me. On February 15th my Cavalier was towed from my work. I was told that I would be getting a call from the tow company when they were on their way because I had left multiple possessions in the car as I was not intending on selling it that day . I never received a call and I just happened to notice my car was gone. I immediately called my salesperson Jim Griffin to ask him if there was a way I could retrieve my items. There was no answer to my repeated calls and he never returned my calls either. So that night I drove back down to the dealership to get them myself. That is when I found out that my car had been taken directly to the auction which makes sense and that they would get my stuff from them and call me the following Monday. Later that night I am driving down the freeway and my tire blows out and I smashed into the side barrier. I am not accusing you of not putting brand new tires on the car but TWO DAYS after buying my car my tire blows out? Maybe it is a manufacturer issue. I had purchased that extended service agreement which gives me a towing allowance. I called them and they were closed. So I called the dealership again and they said there was nothing that could be done about the towing until the following Tuesday as it was President s day weekend. So I get it towed to my nearest friend s house on my own accord. That Tuesday I had a friend drive me to the dealership to discuss the issues because again I can never get a hold of Jim or get any return calls from him. While we were there he basically tells me that there is nothing that they can do to help me or fix the problem. Even though I had the car for less than 48 hours and something that was not my fault put my safety in danger and severely damaged my car and even though I am paying 2 000 for a service agreement that covers absolutely NOTHING. Not to mention they never got my stuff out of my Cavalier for me like they had promised or call to let me know either. At this point my frustration level is growing. I feel taken advantage of and cheated. If it stopped there that would be one thing but it does not. I went through the insurance company to cover the damage. I chose to let the dealership do the mechanical repairs and asked them to tow my car from my friend s house to the dealership. Jim told me that they would be picking it up that day Tuesday . THREE days go by before the bother to get my car. All the while I am calling multiple times a day and no one can give me any information or tell me that the tow company was on its way when it was not . Then that Friday mind you an entire week has gone by since the incident and zero progress has been made I see that my car is gone. Did anyone from San Tan bother to call me and let me know? Nope. Not that I am shocked at this point. From there we wait on Geico. Meanwhile I receive a letter in the mail. From you! Which also had another customer s letter glued to it by the way so I can see you really value each customer personally. I open it up and read about how you promise to maintain my complete satisfaction and that I should refer my friends so you can treat them with the same courtesy and respect you received. That letter just about drives me up a wall. The thing is I did have two people talk to me about buying a used car through you guys and I would have happily referred them but instead I have been warning every one of my horrible experience and the lack of trust you have earned from me. It does not stop there. I get a call from my Geico adjuster saying that she was ready to examine my car but that you guys did not have it at the dealership. She says she will figure it out and call me when you guys can locate it. So guess what you stalled the process another day. I get a call from her the following day telling me that it was there all along but they just did not keep a record of it or something. I am livid at this point. I do not have any transportation and stuff like this keeps happening pushing it back even more.
If I could give this zero stars I would. I went there for the first time the other day and got the worst service possible. Not only that I also got sick from their food. I tried to contact that Kelsey lady and asked for the reason why it was horrible service and if they were made fresh. She preceded to tell me she wants nothing to do with my business and that if I got sick then it was my fault for eating there. I asked for the corporate number and was again received a big no. This place is horrible. Especially the people running.
Was with a friend and we wanted takeout. I was in my optimistic well not all Asian delivery places in AZ can be bad phase and went along with this idea to try Rice King. Holy f king crap. The tip I gave the driver was more than this food was worth. So embarrassed to have ordered so embarrassed to be professing this online but I m taking one for the team so you DON T EVER EAT HERE. This review is my good deed for the day. Um yeah...this no longer a phase. All such takeout delivery is bad in AZ. I d love to be wrong but chances are I m not.
Surprised at the rating. Got there and it took 15min for them to figure out who was serving me. They took my order finally. The oysters were great though my shrimp was over cooked. The person dropped the bag and ran. I did not see a person my whole meal. I was finished and waited for someone to come nobody came. I thought well I will get up and just say bye to the hostesses at the front door to see if they would ask me to pay. They were happy to say bye as I almost walked out without paying!!!! I turned back and asked for my bill WTF people. Get a minor part of your shit together. Lucky for some honesty still in the world.
Picked up Generals Chicken with noodles and Ti Chicken with fried rice. One of the worse meals I ever paid nearly 20.00 for. I m really irritated this place used to be really good. Both dishes were so dry having hardly no sauce on them. We threw the Generals Chicken out. Not going back. They know they have no competition in this area. Sad!!!
This place used to be amazing but ever since they opened the second location it has gone completely downhill. Having been a chef at a sushi bar I can guarantee you NONE of the fish was fresh. In fact not a single piece of food I ate was fresh. Everything from the crab mix to the baked mussels reeked of fishiness. Even the Mochi ice cream was so old the soft outer shell had become hard and disintegrated into a rough powder in my mouth. They recently fired most of the chefs staff and you can definitely tell. The service was slow but it s really not the servers fault because the new chefs do not have proper training or ingredients. I m honestly not one to write bad reviews but I feel their food is a legitimate safety concern I myself had stomach pain the entire day after. I would highly recommend not going to Jjanga until they have figured things out once again. I m definitely rooting for them.
I ll be honest. I am gluten free. They did not really help me find good options that would be safe for me on their menu. I have tried to eat there a couple of times as I m a huge supporter of local restaurants. But they turn me away every time.
Unfortunately not my favorite subway experience. Ordered my go to sub...foot long tuna with American spinach olives green peppers and cucumbers with mustard. I got little spinach tomatoes and provolone along with the rest. Manager was gracious and offered to refund or re make after work since I was on lunch . I opted for refund and returned sandwich.
First let s talk exterior because obviously this is the first thing you see. It looks like a Home Decor Pinterest fan s wet dream. Everything about it is cute warm and welcoming definitely a step away from the chic haute couture esque vibes that other Light Group places like Yellowtail and Stack aim for. This review is only for the beverage and such service but I do not think it s going to be too far from home. I was meeting a girlfriend at the bar for some drinks after a long workweek and we settled on Citizens because neither of us had been. The restaurant was pretty much empty save for the bartop which was close to being full. Next to us were a group of what looked like A V or production guys that were just out from a gig at the House of Blues. With no seats my friend and I posted up at the bar and were quickly provided bar stools by two observant servers. The bartender was nice but it was hard to get a hold of her when we needed the check. I am usually a fan of Light Group venues for the most part but this one just did not quite seem to hit the mark. It seems like it could be something really great but maybe it was just too much hype too soon?
I walked in and ordered a mango bowl. Take it home and there s no mango or pineapple. Bring it back and the guy says we do not have mangos. Well then why did u let me order 1? Make me something you do have. Half a sed makes it and sends me on my way.
The worst experience and lack of service I have ever encountered in the food industry!!! If there were zero stars to give THATS what this place deserves! I heard this place has great food and decided to check it out. My mistake had no idea that they close at 8 00 and we literally walked in at 7 59 and we re behind people ordering and when they were done ordering we thought we were next! We approached the counter and the young girl behind the counter told us she cannot take our order because they close at 8 00! I looked at the time and it was 8 02 ARE YOU KIDDING? She told us the people before us were the last order even though we were in line behind them and That s coming from the chef is what she told us! I cannot believe that they would turn us away and not even offer to make our food to go! As good as they may be I cannot see myself supporting an establishment with this type of culture! We drove out of our way and were turned away! We will go to our usual burger joint with EXCELLENT service called Hopdoddy!
Went to this store today to see if we could get a different internet package or reduce our cost and have never dealt with the worst customer service ever !!!! The guy that help us who s last name was Gardener said basically there was nothing he could do to help us and our cost was going up again . When I asked if we could get on a different plan he said nope ca not help you with that either. My wife and I left the store very upset. We then called the customer service department and they were great and helped us keep our plan and reduce our price. I guess at the end of the day DO NOT go to the store they could care less . I called the store to talk to the manager but of course they did not answer I left a message and have not received a call back. If your in the business of providing a service to a customer you should do what you can to give them the best customer service you can .
Ridiculous. You pay Manhattan Jewish deli prices for about one third of the sandwich portions. And the place is not even near downtown and paying the higher rents of State St or Capitol Square. The service is pretty slow for deli as well. I am struggling to think of a bigger rip off in Madison.
I live less than 2 miles away total drive time 4 minutes yet I ca not get delivery?? Same location delivered to a friends house 3 miles away. With a longer drive time. If I have to go pickup my sandwich I ll go somewhere else.
My step sons had fun playing but their food was horrible. The pizza was days old and the pretzel was hard as a rock.
I cannot recommend strongly enough against going to this practice particularly to see Emily Tarazi. I called to make my first appointment back in October. I was told that both Dr. Rachel Dern and CNM Emily Tarazi had availability for pregnancy patients. No offense to those who prefer midwife care and not knowing the scope of my insurance given the choice between an MD and a CNM I of course told them I wanted to see Dr. Dern. My first appointment comes around. I am not seen by Dr. Dern as requested but instead by CNM Emily Tarazi. The office itself is pretty scary looking which is surprising as this is apparently their new location chipped paint whiteboards that had not been updated fast food cups and bags on the reception counter. The reception desk is in a back room so you could walk in and not even be noticed. All of the patient rooms open directly into the waiting room as well with nothing but an accordion of cardboard to block your nudity from view. Their method of collecting urine samples is completely unhygienic. You enter the restroom grab what looks like a fast food water cup clear plastic no lid and leave it in a cabinet that s fully inside the restroom no external access . You then sit and watch as several more patients file in after you leaving their own samples and no one comes to collect them in the 20 minutes you sit there waiting making it increasingly likely that someone can tamper with your sample. Finally I go to see the doctor who is of course the midwife instead . Very quick and perfunctory visit. No real discussion or efforts to make you comfortable. I had been experiencing excessive nausea and she would only prescribe a very expensive new medication not covered by any insurances but no worries she had samples and a coupon. Oh. Sorry. Just the coupon she had given away the last of the samples My next visit rolls around. Same office same sample collection. Except this time I wait for nearly 2 hours totally naked mind you . They had informed me that Emily was on a delivery which is fine I know that s the name of the game so I could reschedule or see the other CNM. Setting up appointments around childcare for my 18 month old is no picnic so I opt to see the other CNM. After an hour and a half of waiting naked I dressed myself and asked how much longer it would be since I had another appointment to get to across town. They said it would be right away and to just get undressed and wait. So I wait another half hour naked and am finally about to give up and go to my other appointment when she comes in. It ends up not even being a vaginal exam so I did not need to be undressed. She s a bit more personable than Emily and makes it obvious there were a lot of things Emily was supposed to discuss with me and have me sign at my last visit including discussion about birth defect testing that needs to be done you know that week . I give a bunch of blood samples in full view of the rest of the office no privacy at all and end up late for my other appointment. At the end of the appointment I received a goodie bag that I was supposed to get after the first visit. It contains a bottle of prenatal vitamins with the seal broken and pills missing as well as a ton of formula samples and general pregnancy pamphlets. I do not even schedule my next appointment because I know I m never coming back. That night coincidentally the insurance claim goes through for the first visit and though my prenatal care is covered 100 they billed it incorrectly shocking right considering the rest of their inadequacies and I owe hundreds of dollars in co insurance. The next day I switch doctors. A month later CPOBGYN still had not my transferred records so I had to call again. After months of run arounds and misinformation I m essentially told they wo not be fixing their error because that s what all doctors offices do funny since the other two OBGYNs I ve visited for pregnancy have not . It s clear their office is penny pinching to the degree that they re willing to pass costs along to their patients since they know insurance pays out less. My second visit still has not been submitted to my insurance so who knows what that ll be. From the sounds of it they re planning on billing that out incorrectly as well to recoup the losses from me switching to a new doctor. In the meantime I ve received multiple bills from Sonora Quest Laboratories for nearly 1000 because they have not submitted the claim for my second visit and they gave Sonora Quest incorrect insurance information how is that even possible? They photocopy your insurance card for heaven s sake . I ve since cleared all that up by talking to Sonora Quest no thanks to Central Phoenix OBGYN. Overall it was just a horrifying stressful experience that no pregnant woman should have to go through. I switched to Maricopa OBGYN after my experience there and can highly recommend them instead.
It is so difficult to give a good review of a company that has been trying to screw your over for 8 months now all because they have a flaw in their system that we uncovered. For example we made a payment over the phone and our bank records show the payment however they do no see the payment they are still asking to receive it. The bank sends them the electronic records of such payment and they do not believe the bank. What more does one person need to do????? Never again will I step foot in a Home Depot again! Contacting the media and everyone one else I can about this issue.
Update on previous review it s Monday. They ve had my car since Tuesday to repair it. Today is the 7th day without the car I drove off the lot 13 days ago. The shop is waiting for the transmission to arrive from Drivetime. A transmission takes 8 labor hours. Per the terms of the warranty this entitles me to one day of rental reimbursement at 25 day. It s costing me 40 day for 7 days and counting. You can see from the lack of response to my previous review how much they care. Do not do business with this company.
The food here is Amazing!!! We ordered wings a cheeseburger and fingers it was cooked to perfection! The service NOT so much We came in at 9 15pm because online It says they close at 11pm so we started eating and decided we wanted more wings at 945pm we tried getting Ashley our servers attention and she showed up to the table until 9 58pm we said we would like more wings because we heard the bartender ask his customers for last call.. she said oh no our kitchen is closed. I politely asked why did not she come give us refills check if our food was good not gives us a heads up they are now closed 1 hour early. She said oh we do not do last calls and our hours have recently changed..i mean It would be nice to let your customers know tho. For being our first time eating here based on a referral I m very disappointed in the customer service you can tell they were in a rush ready to close. But that should not affect there customers!!!
Wow American Airlines...first time and only time we will use this airlines. 5 delays equaling about 9 hours. Only to tell us it s because the pilots ca not fly due to their flight contract. I get the contract I do not get how a mistake like this happens. The desk agents essentially said over the loud speaker deal with it ! If customers do not choose AA in the future they also will be dealing with it.
The menu is very limited here. I guess I m a variety kind of person. The servers were nice so I cant complain about that. When I first walked up to the hosts at Mr. Luckys they were chit chattering away totally ignoring me. It was some asian looking girl and a white girl with blonde hair. Being a former hostess myself I get annoyed at stuff like this. I m standing there with look on my face like Hi Im here to be seated. Soo....lets get a move on people. Finally after a few seconds they decided to turn around and acknowledge me. GOOD JOB! So we sat down and looked through the menu... Tuna Poki Horrible. Had no flavor. The crackers it came with can dry out the Atlantic Ocean. The menu description boasted and said it was amazing. I was disappointed. Batola Pasta Was pretty good I guess. Nothing amazing. I specifically told the waitress that I do not eat spicy food so she offered to tell them not to put pepper flakes in it. I get my plate and LOOK whats in it! PEPPER FLAKES! Awesome! ....ugh... Steak The steak was just like any other steak the mashed potatoes was just like any other mashed potatoes ...eh moving on. The Sliders Not bad Nothing amazing but not bad. Jack In The Box sliders were better to be honest. Nachos Pretty much the saving grace of this place. It was actually pretty good. HUGE! So yeah sorry this place doesnt do it for me. But I got comped here by a friend so THANKS FOR THE MEAL BRO!
Horrible customer service. We placed an order for delivery. They deliver humus with no pita or cucumber to even eat it with and blamed it on delivery company. They put the order together. Pita was standard not optional. Own your mistakes. Did not even try to resolve. So I was asked to discuss this offline for obvious reasons. So I contacted them and now they are not responding!!! Ok update. Pita Jungle responded and is taking responsibility which is great. I only wish they had done it right away. I do not like posting negative items.
When I tried to get to the hotel room granted I did not have my key that I paid nearly 300 dollars for Robert at the desk next to the rooms questioned me as if I was a criminal and instead of calling MY room to get a hold of the other person there he called the check in desk and asked them about me with such a condescending tone. He treated me as if I was garbage and like I did not belong here and that is entirely unacceptable. Will not return and I ll make sure everyone I know hears about this.
I tried this place on a Saturday night and it was packed. I got a seat at the bar first come pretty quickly. The staff was very nice and attentive. The restaurant was sooooo hot inside that I could barely think of what I wanted and actually ordered so quickly just to get something to eat and leave. The food came out promptly. I had a spicy burger which was cooked medium. The bacon wrapped around the pepper inside was a little disappointing. It was not crispy and was in fact pretty undercooked and soggy. The idea of the burger was pretty good it just did not come out the way I had hoped. I finished really fast and got out of there because of the heat. It was really miserable to sit on the inside of a restaurant and feel so hot and sweaty. Uncomfortable and it def gave me a headache. I may try this place again NOT recommended for summertime. PS I do not even remember the beer list or selection because I was too hot.
I get that this place gets busy and when I walked in there was a large group that was still waiting for their orders but wow...three people that ordered AFTER ME GOT THEIR ORDERS BEFORE I DID????! And the girl that was at the front did everything to NOT look at me while I tried to ask where my order was. I was two feet away from the cashier and she did not think it was odd that I was still waiting for a soft serve for over 30 minutes???? I ve worked customer service and food industry jobs and this was ridiculous. This is the first time I ve actually been annoyed enough to make a 1 star review.
Not good at all. The young staff basically ignores you if you have any grey hair. The food was just OK but I wo not be back. The Good Egg is much better.
If I could give zero stars I would. Dr. Huish is arrogant insensitive and does not listen to his patients concerns. Throughout my entire first pregnancy I was measuring a lot smaller than normal. Dr huish was negligent and never referred me to get a specialized ultrasound done to make sure everything was OK even though I had expressed my concerns to him several times. I was also worried because I had been experiencing a lot of fetal hiccuping. Almost every two hours to be exact. He assured me that that was normal when in fact it is not always normal. Especially when it is so frequent and can actually be an implication that there is an issue with the umbilical cord . On my 36th week check up I come in for an ultrasound and they tell me my baby is extremely small 3rd percentile and is not moving. When he comes in to examine me he measures my belly and says you re measuring small. The entire time I had been telling him this and he had always just ignored me! He would also write down inaccurate measurements to save his ass from getting sued. I know this because my measurements were always between 2 3 cm below his measurements. Looking back I now know that my measurements were in fact more accurate than his. Needless to say I had to have an emergency C section. Two weeks later my baby had to be put on an NG tube because she was aspirating on her milk. Which is unusual for a full term baby. My BIGGEST regret in life has been not switching doctors or getting a second opinion. As a first time mom I had no idea what to expect and trusted the professional . My baby now has delays that could have been avoided had he taken appropriate and urgent action. Instead he acted unethically and negligent. In sharing my experiences I hope to help others make the choices I wish I would have made.
My review covers Sunday brunch. Points for attentive service with personality and for cooking with butter instead of processed vegetable oils. The food Parmesan and Herb Biscuits I will preface this by saying I was fortunate enough to date a girl from the mid west once who was an amazing cook that made the best biscuits and sausage gravy I ve ever tasted to this day so I have high standards. The good Portion size somewhat in line with the price tag. Eggs and biscuits were well done. Did not skimp on the amount of sausage in the gravy. The bad Bland. Meh all over again. Despite all of that suasage the gravy was still surprisingly void of any flavor. More black pepper may have helped but would not have completely solved it. In the end after years of watching I can simply do better at home. Lastly as others have commented it gets LOUD in here not my cup of tea as far as atmosphere goes. Not likely to return. Meh. That about covers it.
Was not that happy when I decided to try this place just recently. I ask what they recommend and was told the French dip was really good so I decide to go with that and the total comes to over 10! I m thinking wow this must be a really good sandwich to be that much so why not I ll give it a try. Let s just say I did not even finish the other half that s how disappointing it was the meat was chewy and the taste was not worth the money spent.
The place is packed. Disorganization is rampant. The hot dogs were tasteless and cold.I honestly think they forgot to cook the hot dog as it was COLD not room temperature! I was nauseous later that day. They had another order mixed with ours so we had extra which we threw out. .Total chaos inside. There are several lines for ordering food paying the cashier and then everyone waits for the order to be called. It is like a cattle call. There is no orderly flow from one to another. People have to push there way through in order to pick up their order which bottle necks at one point I can not understand the hype.Positively there is not much to say except they have interesting menus and atmosphere signage etc . . In summary this place has built up an image from its past. Can people be so desperate to wait for mediocre food crowded conditions and total chaos? Perhaps not all Portillos are run the same? I would skip this joint. I give it an F! Unless they clean up their act I honestly do not see how this place can make it in the long run. I do not think Scottsdale people will in the long run tolerate this substandard establishment. I tried it out of curiosity and hype. Once was plenty. Thank goodness for alka seltzer! Argh!
So we wanted to check this place out for awhile cause it was recommended by friends of the owner. Went in tonight about 8 35 or 8 40 . The parking lot was full . A good sign. Went into the bar and the bar was fairly busy. We sat down at a table in the bar area. Was not sure if we had to approach the bar to order. We waited a few minutes and there did not seem to be anyone working behind the bar. All of a sudden we saw a customer leave who had a little dog with her. Then a couple employees went running out following her. We said ok something s not right here. So we waited a few more minutes and somebody decided to wait on the customers. Most were waiting to pay up on their bill. A couple got another drink and not once were we acknowledged. So after a total of 15 minutes we decided to leave. Will be a long time before we try this place again. Management or the owner needs to monitor this place to see what s going on. If that was the management there that night then we do not need to check out this place again. That s a shame cause we only live within a couple miles.
I ve been here four times. Visits 1 the food was tasty and quick. 2 This time I ordered carry out. When I got home food was missing from the order. 3 Ordered at the front desk. The food came out but was plated instead of to go. After waiting nearly 10 minutes for the food to be boxed as originally requested I went to the counter to ask them what s up. The shaved headed cook in the kitchen was not happy with his staff and was telling then it took too long. I appreciated his acknowledgement and could not have agreed more. 4 Tonight I sat at the bar to order a beer and place a carry out order for my family. I was ignored by the blonde chick behind the bar for nearly 10 minutes while she focused solely on making a single smoothie for another customer. Not even as much as a smile or a Hello I ll be right with you. I walked out and am now waiting at Vintner Grill for my carry out order to appear. Fix your staff and you ll have a good place. Until then I m done.
A much better option is right down the street within walking distance. I have used this shop multiple times. This used to be my go to destination for premium glass albeit at a premium price . My last 2 visits have been poor at best. Yes the shop is clean nice organized and seems like the place to be. Everything is incredibly expensive however and selection is limited but this is the only place to get some of the top brand name glass in Charlotte. This is easily one of the most expensive glass shops I have ever been inside in my life thus my expectations of good service. 2 visits ago I bought a vape pen and asked for a Micro G a specific type of vape pen . They told me they did not have a Micro G but they had the exact same thing from a different brand. I bought this one instead in a 2 pack but after going home one of the 2 burned out within a week of mild usage. I went on the website for this pen and it is a very sketchy website with only a small contact link. It seems like a dropped ship china knock off version of the micro G. I was disappointed that this shop would sell such a crappy product. The last time I came in I found a very nice pipe that I wanted to buy. I paid for it and never received a receipt for a several hundred dollar purchase. I then had a discrepancy with it afterwards and had only my word at this point due to the lack of a receipt. I then returned the next day trying to see if the shop would look into it at all. They stuck up for their employee and never even attempted to make any check as far as I could tell. No offer to show the camera and I mentioned checking the register for how much the pipe had been rung up for but he did not even bother. I would think that for a customer that buys top stuff from your shop you might make at least a little effort but there was none. And if he really trusted his employee why would he not make an effort to help an upset customer? I had not even asked for anything in return I was just trying to figure out what happened. Because of these experiences I will not be returning. There is a competing smoke shop literally less than a mile away with bigger selection lower prices and I feel better doing business with them. If I absolutely have to get brand name glass I will order online now instead of doing business with a place I ca not trust and that does not seem to care about customers once they have your money.
All I have to say is meh. It s okay I guess. The check in process took forever as the line was super long and the staff were slow. The pool area is nice as there are several pools including one that is perfect for young kids. The problem is that the pool closes early. The room was decent but not great. Our room had one small fridge with a coffee maker living area with sofa that has a pullout bed a desk with a chair and the beds. The bathroom was outdated and the tub was not clean. I m allergic to mold so that is a big no no. The gift shop was really overpriced. I mean 55 for a pair of swimming trunks is a little crazy. We got this room for a good price so it was not that bad but next time I m in Vegas I m definitely trying somewhere else.
I have eaten at Uncle Sam s periodically since 1991. Today was my last time. We attempted to use a discount card that was purchased from a high school fundraiser. I handed the server the card when I ordered. Only after we were done eating she came over with the check and informed us that we could not use the card as the single Pepsi did not count towards the food order. I had the manager come over and all he did was to argue and tell me that he would get fired if he gave the small discount as it was the owner s orders. I asked if they were willing to lose a customer over having the proper purchase amount but being just 2.00 short in the food cost. He essentially told me that if that was how I felt he could not do anything about it owner s orders. If they are so absurdly adamant the card should have been more legible as I could not read the fine print even with reading glasses and the server should have informed me of the fact when I ordered not after the meal was consumed. Any business that is willing to lose a customer over a few cents does not deserve to be in business. The soft drinks are a huge profit margin for them so the inflexible policy is inane. On another note the sandwiches are quite good although I can easily make a better Philly Cheesesteak at home. The pizza and wings are merely average. If you want far better wings go to Sardella s.
The room was booked through a friend with a platinum TR member card for a small girls trip. Was expecting a clean functional room with a friendly staff. MAN SHITTY !! CONS Creepy Beetle Juice themed room UN Requested room change to Handicapped Accessible The shower head was BARELY 5 4 feet high REALLY?! No coffee maker in standard rooms No MP3 jack connector Rude staff answering phones scoffed at me when I had questions PH sure knows how to show they appreciate valued guests Sanitation of room was mediocre Pool layout is awkward cannot supervise your stuff Cocktails at the pool bar more expensive than most clubs in LV PROS Location Convince to Miracle Mile Mall Bartender squirting me down with water drink discounts Bed to sleep on
I herd this long wongs was a good place to eat. We show up order take out they said 15 minutes ok fine . After 20 minutes later no one tells me anything. I go to the waitress and tells me it will take another 5 minutes. We wait 15 and still nothing. I decided to ask whats taking so long. They tell me they are really busy and the order will be out eta . I decide to ask for my money back and to speak with a manager. Waitress goes to the back comes back and says the owner is in the back cooking and will be right out. 10 minutes pass and nothing so decided to leave with my money. I hear it takes a long time to get your food even for dine in. I will never visit this long wongs again. i went to long wongs in glendale. Food took 15 minutes. Its way smaller than this one busy as hell and still managed to get my food on time.
Honestly this is the worst sushi I ve ever had And sushi is my absolute favourite food ever and I ve had a LOT of different sushi from Toronto restaurants and beyond. I can honestly say I was disgusted. It s awful tasting tastes super old and even the dynamite roll was AWFUL. Dynamite is myfavourite I ve never went to a place that messed up a simple dynamite roll. I have no idea why this place is still serving food... it surely ca not be good for you when it s that far from fresh. PS I am NOT picky about sushi because I love it all but this place is absolutely gross. The service was ok and they were very nice but please do not waste your money on such awful food ugh literally worst I ve ever had.
Terrible experience. Worst hotel I ve ever stayed. This hotel does nothing to accommodate guests. It is the no we ca not hotel. Reasonable requests such as removing the amenities bar because my 1.5 year old as all young children was constantly playing with the snacks and alcohol would be a 25 charge and an one hour late check out would be 25. A 25 charge to keep a young child from playing with alcohol is ridiculous! Do not stay here you ll have a horrible experience. Your money is better spent elsewhere.
What a bad joke this place is. We went there this evening and ordered Korean style chicken wings and they told us they were sold out of wings. So then we ordered some drums and a salad with chicken thighs. We were then told our orders would take about 20 minutes even though there were only 6 customers in the restaurant . But it gets worse. After patiently waiting for 10 minutes we were then told there was no salad left...People that know absolutely nothing about restaurants should not be opening them. A chicken restaurant running out of chicken? And then telling a customer the 2nd item is not available after waiting 10 minutes for it??? Terrible customer service rude manager and literally nothing available that was shown on the menu. Hands down this was the worst dining experience I ve ever had in my life. We did not even get an apology from them.
The truffle fries were decent! 3 5 The Blue burger was nothing special! 1 5 The American burger was a little better! 3 5 Overall....overpriced for the quality of the food I would have rather paid 40 to just have Gordon yell at me than to have spent that amount on the above listed items!
Sorry but besides my spinach salad which was wonderful and totally responsible for the two starts given! all else was greatly disappointing. My blue cheese filet came covered in overcooked dried out bread crumbs black on the bottom where the heck was the blue cheese???... the veggies on the plate which were suppose to include asparagus had numerous asparagus STALKS and I believe two asparagus tops all the veggies were undercooked nearly raw and tasteless. Horrible presentation for the price. Our waitress disappeared half way through the meal and we could not get any service had to walk up to another waitress to pay my bill. And what is it with those super tight super short waitress uniforms ??? That alone tells me where managements minds live Are we back in the 1970 s ? Nearly 200.00 with a 32.00 bottle of wine and tip and I ve had better meals at hamburger joints. Sorry Keg wo not be back.
The wait was so long. We ordered for mac and cheese and we did not even get it!!! There were only 3 of us?! Like what?!
I ve been to encore beach club several time and today was by far the WORST experience I had. We were at a table we PAID for and I accidentally knocked over an ICE bucket that we PAID FOR! And MULTIPLE men who work for EBC felt entitled to kick me out. IT does not take 5 MEN TO MANHANDLED a 4 foot 9 80 lbs girl out. I ve never felt so objectify in my life.
Exprience mitige. Nous savions que c tait une place avec de l attente pour les brunchs le weekend on s est dit go a vaut surement le coup . On nous a dit 30 45min d attente max pour attendre 1h30 et voir passer plusieuts groupes devant nous de 2 alors qu on tait 4 il fallait garder deux tables de 2 un moment non ?!! . Il semble qu il y ait un traitement VIP certaines personnes amies sont passes directement. Un peu amre de voir cela on est juste un client On lambda qui attend encore plus longtemps. Bref on a quand mme attendu tout ce temps pour voir le brunch qui en valait la peine. Nous sommes rentres excites quand mme. Au final la bouffe est correcte mais sans plus cela ne valait pas 15 le plat... 3 50 pour un th en sachet basique une musique trs forte pour parler et un service mdiocre. Trs peu d attention de la serveuse qui nous rpondait trs schement. Je comprends le rush du weekend mais cela n excuse en rien la qualit du service. J ai d demander deux fois un plat dessert la fin et peine un sourire ou une parole courtoise. Vraiment due je ne le recommanderais pas.
I have a crown that the Doctor filed to a flat surface with the metal showing. It was poorly fitted and now needs to be fully replaced. I do not need to be coddled but I certainly appreciate good work and a decent bedside manner. Get your teeth cleaned here sure. Anything else find another doctor.
Highly disappointed with the communication. Several meetings were canceled last minute and I even showed up to one that was scheduled several weeks in advance and Colleen was not there. I wasted time and energy while getting what I felt like was the run around. In the end the food was good and the place looked nice but I do not know that it was worth the stress. There were emails facebook messages and text messages all left un responded to. As a business in this day and age you have to make communication a top priority. I finally was compensated after letting it be known that something would have to change. Also there are no assistants or anyone else to talk with. My reception was in the fall and the answering machine message said that they were out of the office for 4th of July.
The disappointment and frustration I just experience was at its all time high. Decide to give Applebees Whitney way location one last chance considering it s so close to home. Should have just drove to the East Side of town matter of fact next time I will drive on the East Side of tow if I m craving Applebees ever again. Waited 15 min for my child and I to be seat to only wait 20 min for no one to take my drink order nor food order. I left especially after the hostess started taking people orders who came in after us. Hugh disappointment!!! I will not be going back because that place need major changes in how it s ran as a business!! My previous views was over a yr new staff that need a lot more training!!
I love El Cortez and have stayed there 4 times in the last 6 months however this restaurant is simply one of the worst managed I ve ever experienced. The hostesses will tell you there is a 15 20 minute wait only to seat you at a table that had been empty the entire time you were waiting. The service is slow and often incorrect with orders. The water servers often do not bring anything until after the food has arrived...sitting for 20 minutes waiting for food and drink. The waitresses are always behaving rushed as if understaffed and rarely check on you after the food server brings the food out. Worst of all however is the young care free lazy manager who spends more time looking at his phone than doing his job. I ve never seen him assist in any way. He will literally walk through the long line of customers who are frustrated at how long the wait time is and say absolutely nothing. Never checks on the tables. I actually heard him ask the hostess What does Maitre de mean?
I ordered a couple pizzas to go from here. When I got there to pick them up they had been sitting awhile as they were not hot at all. The service was terrible and the place was packed. No one was nice or helpful and I was squished in a small space while I waited for the pizzas. By the time I got home the pizzas were cold. Not sure if I ll try this place again. Grimaldi s seems to always be the best.
I think of myself as one who likes a good scare just slightly more than the next and I am highly fascinated with blood guts and gore however Eli Roth you failed to scare me! The sets were fashioned in typical Vegas style which is better than some scary sets I ve experienced and the actors were enthusiastic enough but I did not jump one time My heart did not race I was not afraid to enter the next room and I was bummed out by the DISCOUNTED rate of 25 bucks that I paid. I was more afraid walking through Downtown Vegas during the day than I was walking through the Goretorium. Oh... and the bar you exit into was quiet not happening at all. Took in the nice view for a second then was outta there. If you re a horror fan like to be scared fascinated or intrigued by death go on a ghost tour or something but do not spend your money here.
It was just ok... there were parts where I almost dozed off. For the cost of the tickets I do not think you get what you pay for.
Meh...as in meh xpensive and meh xican not very mexican ... I ve eaten there before. Had brunch there recently with the kids. There is a kids menu and while the staff new of its existence they did not know what was on it and what was on it was not quite available and the drinks that were supposed to be included in the kids menu were added to our bill until we asked that they be removed. Service was friendly although a tad clueless as I said already and they do not seem to know much about serving families. My eggs were ordered over easy and came sunny side up . Whatever. Ther were also fried in bacon fat a bit heavy and salty tasting but again whatever. Wife s scrambled eggs were disgusting brown and overcooked to total dryness also probably in bacon fat. GROSS. Also 2 half pieces of bacon is actually only 1 full piecs and 1 piece of bacon is not enough. The only absolutely inexcusable thing there is the guacamole which is all wrong both in texture and taste. Do you guys put mayo in there or something? 11 guac should be you know good. Let me tell you how to make it it ai not hard Avocado do not mash it too much! Lime tomato onion not too much! salt and cilantro. That s IT it s hard to do badly but you manage to blend it like it s a margarita. EW is all I could say. ON the other hand your fresh salsa was very good. Brunch for 2 adults and 2 kids wth a side of guac ended up being over 60. That s overpriced unless it s very good and it wasnt. Actually going over this review I realize 2 stars is too much so I m going back to change to 1 star and I m not coming back here unless it s for beers or margaritas and just chips and salsa. If you want good Mexican food there are more and more places opening up Milagro will have to step up it s game once Torontonians get exposed to good Mexican food. Try the breakfast at Tacos El Asador. No bacon but the BEST breakfast in town for less than 7.
El Encanto DOS has proven that Ugly Sisters are not only found in fairy tales and pantomimes. Where to begin my yelp!? Cobwebs around the window over our table food served wrapped in tacky tinfoal dried out limes missing important ingredients on the fish tacos pesto fish tacos with forgotten pesto it was all rather blah. We had read positive reviews on the original El Encantos in Cave Creek and it was not until we arrived that we found we had accidently asked The Ugly Sister out on our date. Ugh we could not get away fast enough...
I came here a little while ago on a first date. It was raining outside and right by my place. A coworker of mine told me it was a fun place to go on a date and thats how we ended up their. When we got their it was around 8pm on a Saturday night and the place was FILLED with people. The seating arrangements are horrible. We were squished elbow to elbow with the couple next to us..and every table was like this. And the chairs were EXTREMLY uncomfortable! The food was alright. The music they were playing was probably they best part. Service horrible. Atmosphere really nice.
To be honest the food was edible for a prison inmate. Service was just as good how do places like this stay open?
Not warm and fuzzy at all..female bartender kind of ignored us at first..menu VERY limited..bartenders are not familiar with menu..food so so...will not go back
Even after the mediocre reviews we decided to give this place a try. Sat night 8 45pm place was NOT BUSY. We waited waited and waited at the hostess stand...a waiter grabbed something from the hostess stand said hello. He did not even flag anyone down to seat us! ...Then we did more waiting. I saw what looked like the hostess arguing with someone at the sushi bar... She finally looked over but it was too late. We made up our mind to leave. We were out the door walking to our car when the hostess came out from the restaurant and asked if she could help us! By that time our mind was made up...This is not a place we want to dine at! First impressions are EVERYTHING and that was a BAD first impression. After reading all the other reviews Good Luck Sakura...I hope you work on your customer service or you wo not be around much longer.
I recently went into this location to look for a special wine for the evening as I was going out to dinner. At first after entering the store my hopes were high as there were nice wooden shelves throughout the place. Looking for a better quality wine more expensive I struggled at first with all the crappy wine they had stacked everywhere. I was kind of hoping for help finiding my selection as I walked up and down the aisles looking at what was available but after being there for 15 to 20 minutes without even a hello from any staff member I realized this was not going to happen. So I ended up leaving without a purchase and heading for an actual Wine Store instead. What a waste of time! I suppose if you are looking for wines like Copper Moon or something similar in that 8 dollar price point you might find this store useful. If you want quality and a bit of expertise from an employee I would say go somewhere else.
Burger was garbage! Thin over cooked and not worth 2.00 when I paid 10.00. Will never go back. Five Guys location is 100 meters away. Go there instead.
I have given Egg N Joe the benefit of the doubt and visited a few times before deciding today to NOT go again. I must say the consistency at this place is horrible. One day you can have a good german pancake and the following 4 times a bad experience. Today I ordered the German pancake to again hear them say sorry we ran out. So I switched to a crepe that was very dry and lacking any flavor. When I mentioned to the server she was what do you want me to do???? I guess when you serve a dry bad dish you might want to say sorry can I get you something else but when your server forgets to come back until she gives you the check what can you expect!! If you are looking for pancakes go someplace else.
Wow. Been here any number of times almost always good food service. This time not to much. Waited for half hour for table which was OK. Ordered food and watched as many other tables got their order before us. Finally gave up after 75 minutes. As we were leaving the food finally came. Unfortunately of the 4 meals 2 were cold. I will try again but I would advise giving it a few weeks to figure out how yo run a restaurant again.
If you re looking for donuts do not come here. I ordered half a dozen donuts a regular coffee and a toffee iced coffee. First the customer service was really bad...I had never been here or any Duck Donuts store so I did not know how the process goes. When I asked the cashier she was not friendly at all but just told us how it is. That s fine. I paid for my things and got the coffees. First of all the iced coffee was really disgusting it straight up tasted like toffee syrup. That s fine whatever. So I went to order a milk for the donuts...but the cashier did not know what she was talking about. The people in front of me got upset because she gave them the wrong information about MILK...I ignored it because I was super excited for the donuts but they got the order wrong. We ordered a strawberry spring edition vanilla with Oreo chocolate with peanut butter and salted caramel s mores blueberry with lemon glaze and a maple bacon. They put coconut flakes on the chocolate peanut butter...and asked if it was okay? No. Obviously not because we do not like coconut nor did we order it. But I ignored it again because I saw all the great reviews and I was still excited. When we got the donuts I was ecstatic! They were warm and they smelled good but oh...they were not donuts. They were cake like and so disappointing. More than a cake like donut they were just cake. The taste did not even compare to a donut and the entire experience was so underwhelming and disappointing. I was also sad because the spring edition just had sprinkles and the chocolate peanut butter was just chocolate with a bunch of peanuts. If you want REAL donuts and coffee do not come here.
I had perhaps the blandest boba milk tea I ve ever had here. No wonder they had it on take out special 1.99 small 2.99 large . The boba was totally flavorless....some places marinate them a bit. The milk tea itself was also shockingly flavorless. I mean it had the right color but I could taste neither milk nor tea nor sugar. I wonder if it comes from some weird powder? The girls OK young women that looked about 14 that were working behind the counter were quite friendly once I said something in Chinese. They re always amused by a laowei that can manage something. The decor looks kind of nice inside...nice wood. Rather dark. Overall I d like my boba tea to taste like something. I do not think I ll be back.
No No keep it moving!! My wife and I tried a few of the appetizers on the menu. The prawns on the crostini was very salty on its own. If you ate it with the small salad provided it was better still nothing special . The Spicey grasshopper oyster was pretty good different if you want that. The fried potato encrusted shrimp were probably the best thing but could have benefited from some salt. Crab cakes were salty and mushy. We are used to our crab cake with lumps of crab. Do not expect that here. The crab cake did have a good sear but that did not make up for the mushy. The New England clam chowder had good taste to it but there was some weird snotty looking things in it. We inquired of the waiter what it was. He got real bad attitude. He never really answered he just blurted out I ll take it off. Okay when you come to Vegas on vacation the last thing you want is a waiter with attitude. If you eat on the strip it s expensive. You should get an experience when you pay these prices to eat. In short I ve eaten in a lot of places but I wo not be going back. The food is just so so and I do not like the attitude.
No no and no. The service here is AWFUL. We ordered and nearly 45 minutes later food comes out over cooked dried out and cold. Place was not busy there is no excuse for this. Our server Bernard needs to find a new line of work. The service industry is not for him. He was no where to be found so my guess is he forgot to ring in our food then when he did ring it and it was ready he forgot again and it sat in the window to die. Being in this business I can be patient and understanding when there is reason there was no reason for this. We sat and watched people come in after us Order and eat then leave before we ever got our food. Needless to say we did not even stay for a remake I refuse to waste another hour watching pure incompetence and never getting a hot fresh meal. So my advice is to avoid this place unless you want to waste a whole day waiting for crappy food while dealing with bad service.
I visited Las Vegas last December and stopped by this bar because it was close to the Hard Rock casino where we were staying. I am Gay and I went to Office Bar with my boyfriend. While we were playing pool the bartender came over to us and stated I can tell you two are Gay. You need to leave. This is not a bar for you people. We left mostly because that s never happened to us and we had no idea how to respond. This incident has been bothering me for weeks so now I am going to start doing something about it and this post begins it. If management is reading this you will be receiving a letter with my contact information in it along with copies of letters I am sending out to people who hopefully will be concerned that your bar does not do business with Gay people.
Awful. My hair has been diced and chopped.... It looks like a 5 year old cut my hair. Yet another terrible haircut in Champaign. No one can style hair around here whether you pay 70 or 20.
Reserved a table here and when my friends and I arrived they only had half the seats I requested available and waited a long time. They had fake blood on the windows I leaned against it while I was waiting. I told the waitress she did not apologize I mean it s not her fault so it s fine I guess all she said was ohh okay awkwardly said it just food coloring it will wash off. And we all know food coloring stains are really really difficult to come off. So I spoke to the manager and he s like it s just fake blood. So they did nothing about it. After we got our table we saw at lease 3 more customers getting the fake blood on their clothes and purses. In my opinion they should have offered to pay for dry cleaning. the minimum they could have done was stick a warning sign saying wet paint blood do not lean. Especially after I complained about it they should have put a sign up to prevent more customers from getting their clothes stained. Also we asked for we asked for separate bills for a table of 5. They charged us 18 gratuity without telling us. We paid 15 on top of that because we were not informed . Terrible . Good food but terrible service
Honestly you should look elsewhere with the 1 TB data cap. You may not reach that now but as files get bigger you will in the future
All hype but did not really deliver. Very hipster not family friendly. Actually.... not that friendly at all. Their demographic is the early 20s crowd and was not very inviting with a family that has a 10yr old and a 63yr old. Went to brunch with the family and I was with my nephew niece and dad and they definitely did not treat us like the regular brunch going crowd that was hung over the day after partying. Food was ok but not that great. Keep it pushing... nothing special here.
NO SHOW. Nearly missed my flight to the airport. I even booked in advanced and got a confirmation email. Called twice while waiting no one answered.
Drove across town after I took the money out of the bank only to find out that the vehicle that was promised got sold the day before. Not cool Jason.
I ws not impressed. First of all very loud poor service and the poor health inmspections do not spell fun to me. Both times I went was on the insistance of others and nothing special ca not hear people at your table and again did I mention that they put their clients health at risk. I guess it s the whole lemming mentallity in Charlotte if someone tells them it s good it is
This hotel is very outdated! I placed a towel in the bath tub to take a shower only because I was way too tired to request another room. In addition to the rusted drain there were pieces of hair that remained in the tub from presumably the previous guest. The remote control for the television was gross oh and the tv did not work. There were no to go cups for tea and coffee in my room only lids. There was only one bulb in the standard double lamp combo. The light switch did not work upon entry into the room. I normally do not write reviews I mainly just read them but this was the exception.
The tacos here were good. I got the pollo taco and the chorizo taco and both were pretty tasty. My issue was the service was pretty terrible it was super hot in the location they put us in and it smelled like puke where we were sitting even though it was right by the window. I d recommend either take out or one of their other locations if you want to try this place out. There s so many great taco places so I likely wo not give this one another chance.
We typically do not go to Squirrel Hill too often and although we ve tried many Thai restaurants in various other locations around the city this was our first trip to Bangkok Balcony. We stopped in for lunch and only 1 other couple was in the restaurant. Service was great very attentive and timely. We ordered the lunch specials garlic pork for me and ginger pork for my husband. The starter was pretty good in the 3 star range tofu soup lettuce salad with peanut dressing and a spring roll with dipping sauce. Then the meals arrived. In spite of the beautiful veggies and tender pork on both dishes they had no flavor. We had ordered spice levels of 6 and 7 and there was zero spice in either dish. I expect a good Thai dish to wake up my taste buds with all the vibrant spices and sauces. These dishes put our taste buds to sleep.
Theater was nice but the manager looked as though he has just got done playing in the sandbox. Seriously if you re going to represent the company show up clean and dressed professionally and clean your glasses. There is a bar that serves movie patrons but only after 4pm. No sign inside or outside. The manager is under the impression that it s illegal for anyone but a bartender to serve alcohol.
Bought a tanning package here for my wife and I and have been customers for a year and a half. Refilled our package and bought a more expensive one. They told us they do not expire and we come in a couple months later and they had canceled our account and stolen our money. DO NOT TRUST THESE PEOPLE WITH YOUR MONEY. They ll do anything to make an extra buck. They claim that everyone signs off on it in the fine print. This is no way to treat loyal customers. Very unprofessional and borderline criminal. Zero Stars for a failing business with zero customer service skills. All they had to say was sorry you signed off on it . We were NEVER informed of an expiration date and did not expect them to change the dates in their computer system either. Shame on you elite tanning.
Had a reservation set up for Saturday at 10 00 and they called me at 9 55 after i was already heading up there to tell me they have no cars available.we will call you when one comes in.Waited till 12 00 to call them to find out about my rental and they said they were closed and I m basically out of luck...Ended up having to drive my own vehicle because they waited till the last minute on telling me they have no cars...the 1800 number was a joke.Lady told me to reschedule my trip...At this point I told her to just slap me across the face through the phone...never will use this company after this experience...
So I ordered the Pineapple Cheese Wontons and the Pork Gyoza. Let me first say this We this location first opened up I can once or twice a week for over a year at least and the food was great the food has gone down hill I Went to the location in Ahwatukee last week the food was great so not sure what they re doing at the location in mesa. Because the last few times I been here have been bad
Ordered the fisherman s bowl and got a bowl with mussels only. Asked our server and another server and waited about 10 minutes before our server told us that the kitchen is making a new bowl. In between that I asked to speak with the manager but he did not bother. My wife s veggie burger slopped out of her hands when she bit into it. When I pointed it out to our server he said that was normal. That dish was returned. Finally the manager serves me a complimentary fisherman s bowl claiming that the kitchen staff heard a different order there are no mussels only dish on the menu. Two pinkie sized pieces of salmon three shrimp two calamari rings and a few mussels is a fisherman s bowl here. It s good for the after work drink and patio but their lack of communication and sub par food warrants one star.
I dealt with Jeff Ro. He s a halfwitted pest. He gave me the impression that he was going to give me a 10 day trial than said he could not than did. When i wanted to cancel i called once he said he d email me a confirmation of my cancelation. I called a second time he asked several times why i was cancelling after i told him i ll answer afterwards. the third time i called he assured me he d be sending it right away. 30 minutes later no email. so i called again just now actually now he says 20 more minutes. lol we ll see. some shoddy business practices. if you ask me. avoid this place
I was very excited to see this place. It looked so great with many options but I wanted to start off simple so i ordered just a regular strawberry waffle. Sure the waffle was crispy but it had no flavor. I had the whip cream on the side and I had to eat it with each bite. So I did not even eat thecwhole waffle. They had many different flavors and options though like fruits and nuts. Candy toppings and waffle sandwiches. But I m not rushing back to try them.
I was excited to try this place on our side of town as we ve had takeout from another location and loved it. We came in and there was a wait for a two top. No biggie we both got a glass of wine and waited just a short while before our table opened up. We sat down having had maybe 4 sips of our wine. We waited. And waited. We had our wine.... But no menus. I joked that it was like Costa Rica and the slow service there. I was in a good mood and happy to sit down after a long day on my feet. Still with the waiting. No... STILL MORE with the waiting! Now it was not funny anymore and we were being completely ignored. I checked my clock and it was 7 57pm. Clearly not a closing time issue. I tried to assuage my companion by telling him how tired I used to get after a big rush and they were probably trying to catch their breath. Yeah... that argument only holds weight for so long before you realize you ve still been sitting there with a glass of wine from the bar and NO MENUS OR ANY ACKNOWLEDGEMENT FROM ANYONE. Seriously the guy who seated us was really nice. Where was he? A girl came around and put place settings out at 4 tables. ALL AROUND US. Still. No service. Fuck. Are you kidding me? I was seriously patient. I know what working in the service industry is like. This is ridiculous. If we finish our glasses of wine and no one has said a single word to us... we are leaving . But you are not allowed to chug your wine . Deal . insert witty conversation for 5 minutes Alright. All done. We have not sped up our drinking. We were very fair and patient... up we go. And we left. Would you have done anything different?
Walking into this place I knew it was not going to be the best visit. The ladies behind the counter were less than attentive to the people coming in and more concerned about talking to each other. The waiting room was very cramped and crowded. Got as many chairs in there as they could. Got there over 40 minutes before our appointment to fill out paperwork since it was my wife s first time here. After waiting 23 minutes after our scheduled appointment they called us back. The assistant gave little confidence sense she knew less than my wife as she told us about pregnancy phases while trying to read the information from a pamphlet. Telling us that the doctor suggestes these additional tests and speaking as someone who never went past elementary school. This coupled with her persistent cough had me looking for the door. The saving grace was when Shawna kneesel came in and started speaking to my wife and I about what we had to look forward to over the next 7 months and answering any questions we had. Still felt a little rushed but she did give us confidence in selecting her.
I ve been to this restaurant twice. I left disappointed both times and decided to never step a foot there again. There are so many good pizza spots in Montreal and this one just does not make the cut for me. I tried out 3 different pizzas and 2 different pastas. All of these plates where tasteless and badly executed in my opinion. The pizzas are never cooked properly and will often be soggy and soft in the middle which makes it super hard to eat and not so tasty either. The restaurant is packed every night and the service is extremely slow. The waiters I had last time I was there was super condescending to me when I mentioned I did not understand why my Caesar salad came in 20 min after the entres lol . The carbonara pasta is mediocre and the bolognese sauce tastes like something that would come out of a can. Sooooo yeah. Just save yourself the disappointment.
I ventured out to Haus Murphy s since it s not far from my office and I was looking for a good Reuben and a Yelp er had noted they had a good Reuben. The atmosphere at Haus Murphy s is very nice out on the patio i did not make it inside and down town Glendale adds to it s ambiance. So let s get to the Reuben. Average and over priced at 9.95. It came with German potato salad that i like but for the price and service I do not think I will be back for lunch. When you consider that wholesale corn beef cost 3.49 pound and they put less than a 1 4 pound on the sandwich it was very disappointing. And the German potato salad was good but come on potatoes are cheep. Is it just because Glendale is a high rent district? Well the Haus of Murphy may have a lot going for it but it s not going to win over the casual lunch crowed that s for sure.
As much as I like these cupcakes and daaaaamn are these delicious cupcakes I ll be buying mine at Grandma Campbell s at the WSM from now on whenever possible. I ve found the staff here to be generally lacking and even unfriendly which is exactly the opposite of what you expect at a place as fun and whimsical as a cupcake shop. To be fair I ve had the same girl ring me up all three times I ve been... maybe the other staffers are nicer?! The staff s general lack of giving a damn makes this otherwise fairly small matter feel like a bigger one but I also really dislike their 10 credit card minimum which means you have to buy at LEAST four cupcakes if you want to use a card. I know credit card fees are high these days but seriously? I ca not buy a singular cupcake? If Civilization down the road lets people put a 75 cent iced coffee refill on a card and it does! I would think that ACAC consistently rated the most popular cupcake shop in town could make it work so that customers can buy a standalone cupcake. We do not all need a dozen! In other words? Yes to the cupcakes but no the place which means no overall. Too bad because that cookie dough cupcake is sooooo darn delicious!
I got the half and half with the spicy sauce and the cheese They gave all white meat which some might prefer but I found it very dry and half to swallow. And the apps sent that great.. like how do u mess up pickled radish. Would not recommend there are any better KFC elsewhere
Horrible from the very moment I walked in. My check in was scheduled at 4pm I arrived at 7pm but the room was still occupied by the previous guests not cleaned up even though it was supposed to be vacated by 11am. I understand that the hotel may make money from late fees like that however they have an obligation to their incoming guests. The manager was hiding in her office the entire time and was trying to avoid giving us a refund for the first night. That was just check in. We finally received access to our rooms at 9 30pm. I was expecting it to not be prepared and an absolute mess and was surprised that it was clean...however it smelled like cigarettes and marijuana in the non smoking room. I used the room phone to dial the front desk but by the time they picked up 10 minutes the smell already disappeared. This place is a joke. It is too far from the strip and the price is not worth it. You can use reward points and stay on the strip cheaper. Even as a time share this place is terrible. DO NOT GO HERE!
Worst bar. I waited for a half hour for the cretin of a bartender to acknowledge my existence only to be told he would not make a drink for me because he did not want to. I have nothing more to say about this bar other than that if you re going here out of all the bars in Madison you re wasting your time.
Hakka food poisoning restaurant. Hope you like sweet and sour diarrhea. Poor service unsanitary and lack lustre food. Shut this place down asap.
I went in the other day and i did not see coffee milk tea on the menu so i asked if they had it they guy up front did not seem to know what i was talking about so he asked the man in the back the man said no but that he could make something just like it with mocha. I asked if it was similar and the man stated yes it s very similar i said okay that s fine and when he handed me my drink i was shocked because it just looked like a chocolate shake which definitely is not what i was wanting. I took a drink and it tasted like a watered down chocolate slush so i went up to the counter and asked if there was anyway i could just get regular milk tea because i did not realize how different it was going to be then man hesitated and said okay and a few minutes later gave me a small size milk tea when i initially ordered a medium. I did not say anything but i just think you should not say something is very similar when it s not and then give a customer half of what they ordered.
Yet again this apartment complex continues to surprise me. They responded to my previous Yelp review wanting to discuss my comments but they do not have the nerve to actually call me back whenever I call about serious issues. Interesting because I leave my name apartment number and callback number. They do not care about their residents. Once you move in they will forget you exist. You are just another number who pays them rent.
No air conditioner was on at all and it was over 105 outside. They Put my friends size 13 shoe in a bucket that was way too small. Tapped the feet instead doing any real massage or reflexology. Never again.
Worst drive thru service ever. Waited 10 minutes to order waited another 10 minutes to get to the pay window and they had no record of my order ordered again and paid waited another 5 minutes to get to the food window and then got my food. My burger was way too overcooked. When I asked if the slow serve was normal the response was Yes. To make matters worse the staff was very rude!! I will never return to this McDonalds!
These people are all talk when trying to get you to move in. The apartments are nice but the office is so unorganized and they do not talk to each other. Trying to get something done is like pulling teeth. If your AC is out which happened a lot you have to call 3 times before anyone comes to look at it. And we got approved for our deposit to be given back to us once we moved out and 2 months later and we still have not gotten it. We ve called multiple times and they have no idea where our money is. They sent a letter a while ago letting us know we should get our deposit back and still nothing.
I had an appointment for the technician to come out today and he did not show up during the given window of time for the second time nor did anyone call to tell me he was running late or not showing up. This is highly inconsiderate for people who take time off work to be available for the time slots given. I understand that things happen to slow the technician down but I should at least be notified that he was not coming. While talking to the customer service rep to schedule another appointment I asked if I could request the first appointment of the day so this would not happen for the third time. He could not grant me this request. I am highly disappointed in the customer service and consideration that this company provides and will not use them or recommend them in the future.
So rude. Had a Pretty Woman moment today...I asked what the highest end brand they carried and I m told Cartier by a supervisor and also if they worked on Mykita...I m told they will have to send to Dallas but they re not responsible if it breaks during the process. Really?? Why even work on it? You either know how to prevent breaking them or you do not . When I asked that Eye Med coverage is on Cartier I m abruptly told Insurance does not apply on Cartier. And that people that get Cartier do not typically need to use insurance when they buy Cartier as if it s too low brow. LOL Get a clue LensCrafters!! I wear Herms and Red Bottoms and I will use and inquire about insurance options when I can use it because I pay for that benefit. You need to calm down LensCrafters try not to make customers feel like they re silly for asking legit questions to save money.
We used to love this place until today. I tried the manicotti for the first time. It came with a tomato cream sauce that was not too good. They remade it for me with a traditional marinara. The marinara was way too acidic. Not every dish can be a signature dish but we were glad to come back again until the manager Renee stepped in and charged us full price for a dish we sent back. I gave her ample opportunity to correct the bill but she balked at the suggestion. The pizza is great just make sure you do not order anything you do not absolutely want because you will pay for it.
If you have a plain pallet you will like this place otherwise do not waste your time. My wife enjoyed the drinks but that is about it.
Did not eat....air conditioner not working. Wanted a half booth half table and guy doing seating acted like it was an imposition because the table had not been wiped off.....really? Your empty tables should always be ready to seat.
This place is horrible! What is anyone here even being paid for? I call you and you say you ll call me back and never do! They send these auto email job offers and when you reply with interest nothing happens! You apply for jobs on their website and nothing happen! No email at letting you know that they got your application or even if you did or did not get the job... Nothing! I see hundreds of jobs on their website and after applying and being ignored so many times I decided to call them. And they say sorry we do not have anything so are all these available jobs I m seeing on the website fake? So after being ignored for over a year I found a job all on my own. This is the most lazy neglectful staffing agency I ve ever seen! This is not even a staffing agency! It s a pure waste of time.
rogers.com Rogers Makes It Easy TO STEAL FROM YOU but are very slow in paying their debts and their staff will bold faced lie to you.. rogers gave unreliable service continually over charged me things like charging me by the gig for downloading even though i had paid for unlimited. and when I called to have the charges reversed they refused offering credit towards my next bill despite their overcharging I canceled service and was told it would take 2 to 3 weeks for a cheque to arrive in the mail with the money they owed me. 3 weeks later i call rogers and now they say it takes up to 6 weeks. I ca not even count the amount of lies i have been told and the time rogers has wasted not being helpful. it will be a cold day in hell before i ever have anything to do with this disgusting corporation again.
Chips started off great carne assada tacos were a major let down but the chili verde burrito made up for some of the lackluster taco failure.
I made a Yelp account to write this review. I have NEVER had such poor service. I do not know how this restaurant survives. I ve been twice and when I was there the waiter and cook acted annoyed that I existed. Most of the meal they whispered and looked at me. The sushi is decent. But do not expect to have a good meal due to lack of service.
I came here with a craving for banh xeo. I left wondering if I would ever love banh xeo ever again. If only other Viet places served up delicious banh xeo then I would not have had to suffer through my lackluster meal here... Banh xeo is essentially a crepe filled with bean sprouts and meat. Oh and p.s. I LOVE BEAN SPROUTS. I have been asked more than once Would you like some pho with those bean sprouts? . But anyways their banh xeo was just... limp and sad. Rather than nearly exploding my stomach with delicious bean sprouts it left an empty hole in my craving for banh xeo. Then my pho tai came. Personally I consider the broth the most important aspect of pho. This broth was... just no good. After I finished what I could I let the leftovers sit. Slowly but surely the broth began to separate. Yuck. This always makes me suspect that a broth flavoring packet has been used rather than the broth being made from scratch. What is my support for this reasoning? Absolutely nothing it s just a gut assumption. So anyways in the battle of Cleveland pho spots this place is low on my list. The only thing they ve got going on that Superior Pho which is right across the street does not is the fact that they are open later.
Prices keep going up and quality keeps dropping. I think they need to do a better job hiring people that do not lie when you ask what s in a dessert
If I could give this place 0 stars I would. I hate cigarette smoke so the fact that it s 2017 and the whole bar is still a smoking area is a bit of a turn off. I could overlook that and give this place a chance but their female bartender has to be the absolute rudest person I ever had the displeasure of dealing with. The place was busy but my friend and I tipped well with every drink while others did not tip at all . Then when ordering another round of drinks we watched as she went around the entire bar not once not twice but three times skipping over us each time. On the third time around my friend gasped in disbelief not on purpose that was just her involuntary reaction because that s how ridiculous it was. The bartender addressed that by saying go somewhere else and wait even longer then. So we grabbed our stuff walked down the street and were immediately served in the next bar we went to. We did not mind waiting we knew it was busy so we empathized with her but for her to purposely be skipping us and then make that remark instead of apologizing and serving us next was just unacceptable. For this very reason I will not be back here. There are so many better cleaner and overall nicer bars that you can go to. I suggest skipping over this one.
I always eat at pomos pizza and it was great I do not know what happened but the pizza comes out usually cool to lukewarm and tasteless so I do not know what s going on over there
Tried this place based on all of the reviews only had pizza . At that time there was only one or two negative review and they turned out to be spot on. It s amazing how so few people know pizza either that or something funny is going on . I guess if you re comparing it to chain pizzas it s passable. But it s also a lot more expensive. The crust is very similar to chain pizza. Bland not much flavor and too thick. I did not see the oven but definitely tastes and feels like it came out of a conveyor belt type oven such as the chains use as opposed to a real pizza oven. Likewise the cheese is bland. The sauce is too thick and not very plentiful. It s basically chain pizza at a premium price.
This location is slowly going downhill. I have been coming here regularly since they opened at least 15 occasions and this last visit will be my last. The trouble seems to be in how quickly the kitchen can get out orders. This past Saturday was busy but not so busy there was a wait for a table. We grabbed a seat at the bar since a cold beer was the first order of business. We ordered two burgers using the check box build you own form and we waited. And waited. For 80 min. No kidding. The bar tender was doing her best to avoid eye contact with anyone at the bar who had ordered food. She clearly knew the kitchen was in the weeds it happens but never once gave us an update or an apology for the wait. Did come by to pour another round but dashed off as soon as the glass hit the counter. She really missed an opportunity when a guy next to us had his onion rings finally come out only to have the plate bumped during the handoff from the runner to the bar tender. Several big rings hit the floor and she simply went on to deliver the remaining much smaller portion. No offer to fire another order. The poor guy turned to me and said what was all that? We d both seen the whole thing happen. Turned out to be his first time there too. Likely his last. Burgers were fine. Beer was cold. Fortunately there are better options in the area. 80 min. wait for a simple order is a pretty good sign the B Team was running the show that Saturday... Bummer.
Alright I was all set for a awesome burger experience in Vegas and this did not even come close to being one to remember I had done my research and BLT reviews suggested that the cooks here might know a thing or two about how to cook a burger. This was proven to not be the case Now I would have to say that I am a little bit of a burger snob. When it comes cooking a burger I will not tolerate a burger that is cooked past the point of medium and always want medium rare. Being that this place cooks hundreds of burgers a day I thought i would definitely get a MR burger. Evidently on the day I dined the cooked missed a very basic instruction that is necessary when cooking any juicy delicious burger. Do not press a spatula down on a burger to make flames! Overall I received a dry because of the pressing medium instead of MR burger on a very high quality bun with great Blue Veined Not even Maytag cheese and bacon along with a side of pretty cold fries. Not exactly what I thought I would be getting for 25 dollars. Now I have no problem paying 20.00 for a delicious well cooked high quality burger and this one was only high quality. Come if you want Overpriced Burgers Poorly Cooked Burgers A Nice looking Trendy Restaurant
Bill the manager was wonderful in the beginning until I had problems with the U Haul and then he turned very rude on the phone. I rented a U Haul to go from Arizona to Texas then the hurricane hit out here in Houston Texas so I had to make other arrangements for the U Haul to go back to U Haul in Arizona. Bill the manager was very nice I first offered me even a discount on my next rental from Arizona to Houston Texas. When my brother in law was coming back from California picking up my stuff in storage one of the tires blew it took roadside assistance two hours to get to him after the tire was fixed then the air conditioning went out they had a drive for 4 Hours with no air condition in the desert Arizona heat of 115. After my horrible experience with that I called Bill and told him what happened and ask if I can be reimbursed on the rental due the fact that the truck was not properly inspected. He got very rude with me tell me call customer service that it was not his problem. And then today I went on my American Express noticed that they charge me again. So basically I just paid for a tire because they charge me another 90. he said I went over the miles even though he gave me 100 miles extra. I would give no stars. If I were you I would find a different location to do business with do not let them scam you!!!
This place used to be awesome. Something has changed in the last few months and the prices have increased which I understand if the quality stays the same we ll pay more. We ordered our usual last night and were so disappointed to see and taste the terrible changes. The crust used to be soft and chewy and was like cardboard and the sausage is different definitely lower quality... maybe frozen or something? Also ordered and were charged for ranch dipping sauce and did not get it. ugh. What happened??? This use to be our go to pizza place...
It pains me to give the company I ve been loyal to for the past 3 years a one star rating but they absolutely deserve it in their current form. last minute pro call off Seriously? I absolutely needed the cleaning done today as I ll be guests over tomorrow and all they ve done is reschedule it to this coming MONDAY NIGHT? C MON why is that even okay when we customers get freaking charged if we need cancel appointments at the last minute? Get yourself together Handy.
I will start by saying that I love all the other Dunkin locations here in town. The franchisees do a good job at maintaining staff and putting out good product. However this one in the Fremont is TERRIBLE. There is NEVER enough staff. The few people they have working are surly and rude. I realize you have to deal with drunks and idiots on Fremont but I treat all service employees with respect and am courteous with them. Being I worked in a restaurant for five years I know how it is. Not to mention the prices are WAY higher at this location. I ll stick to my favorite stores on Tropicana Pecos and Gibson Rd. This location could take a few lessons in customer service from them.
Tortellini is disgusting...spit it out and refused to eat it. Tried a bite of the lasagna and also was not a fan. Did not want to risk wasting more food so I did not try ordering anything else off the menu. Dining partners were not terribly overwhelmed either...it was ok but did not blow them away. I wo not be back.
Had not ate at Melt for some time but had enjoyed it in the past. Placed a takeout order and was told it would be ready in 25 minutes. Arrived at the Lakewood location at the 25 minute mark and they had not even entered my order into the computer. Then I watched the staff lie to other take out customers about why their orders were not ready. My food finally came out an hour after they told me it would be ready. Food was poorly prepared when I finally got home to eat it. Terrible service terrible quality. This place has really fallen off from what I remember. Would not recommend.
Do not even try to make a massage appointment here. They cancelled me two Saturdays in a row.
Had high expectations for this place since I have heard so much hype. Received bland rolls at a pricy cost much better options on the strip try Social House sooo amazing only positive with the whole meal was the tempura appetizer. Wo not be returning here sadly.
Have stayed here for business each year in February for the last 7 years. Still one of the better Pittsburgh hotels but it s starting to show it s age. Arrived at 5pm and room was not ready. When I finally got a room the Ryan Suite it was very dirty with broken furniture. I was told by the maid there was a big wedding the day before the hotel was booked solid and the room had been trashed. Yet they saw fit to put me in it apparently. They were eventually able to move me. Also avoid anything from the mini bar. I never check those prices as these are business trips but surprised to see it show up on the bill at 16 for a 10oz ginger ale and 24 for a small amount of cashews. Lastly avoid the bacon as this hotel. I ve given up after trying the last few stays nasty oily greasy. Please remove the adjective crisp before it from the menu.
The positive Today s digital imaging equipment is so incredibly precise that it can spot irregularities as never before. The negative Today s digital imaging equipment is so incredibly precise that it can spot irregularities as never before. And that s why when an ultrasound came back as irregular Dr. Anne O Neill ordered me to undergo a needle biopsy. But a week later I was scheduled to fly to NJ for my usual month long March April visit. I asked if I could delay it but her assistant what actually talk to a doctor? checked with her and came back and told me it was stat. The radiology facility did not have any open appointments until after my scheduled flight but the doctor s office got me in. I did not want to cancel my flight if the results did not warrant it so the next day I called the office and asked the assistant to request that the doctor get the results expedited. I thought it was a reasonable request under the circumstances. Was it done? You be the judge. And so I set off for the east coast and waited. And waited some more paralyzingly unable to schedule any plans with friends or family until I knew for sure that I was not going to have to take the next plane back to Vegas. One week later I called the doctor s office. Still no results. While friends consoled me by saying No news is good news I ve had the experience in the past of lab results being overlooked so I was not buying it. Twelve days after the biopsy I called again. The assistant said that the report was on the doctor s desk and she would call me later. I did not hear from her. I called again this morning now 13 days after the procedure. The assistant said that the doctor was in surgery but that she would be holding a staff seminar this evening and she would be sure to talk to her and ask her to call me. Finally I got a call tonight not from the doctor but from the assistant who told me that the results were benign. This kind of treatment is unconscionable. To force me to sweat out almost two weeks of nerve wracking anxiety is simply not imo good medical practice. While Dr. O Neill is personable and seems very competent it s my belief that a doctor should treat the whole patient not merely a body part or a report on paper. I highly doubt that my request to expedite the results was ever honored. The office while not near my home is easy to get to. The front desk is pleasant and the wait to be seen is not excessive. But when I am unnecessarily put through the wringer as I have been in this case the positives matter much less.
I love trying new taco places but this restaurant was literally the worst taco restaurant i ve been too! First off we got 9 tacos al pastor carne asada and cactus a horchata and a soda. To each their own preference but this place has terrible service and food. Their instagram pictures looks NOTHING like their actual food as well. I recommend checking out real reviews and pictures on yelp first before going anywhere new. They also did not honor the tuesday tacos like advertised as well. 2 tacos Their lines to get the tacos are pretty cool you grab a tray and get in line for the workers to make your tacos in front of you. But for my opinion i highly dislike this because you have to wait 3 4 different lines to get your order which really takes more time and it gets confusing. I wish it was a simple ordering system order and pay. It s nice they have a good option of taco meat and vegetarian options as well. Cactus and Soyrizo The workers here were not the nicest but they were not bad so nothing to really complain. When we finished ordering it came out to like almost 30 for 9 tacos and 2 drinks which is not really cheap. I feel like for that price i could ve ordered from another place and had a more enjoyable experience and tacos. But that s the beauty of trying new restaurants. I REALLY wanted to try this taco restaurant because of their beautiful instagram pictures but to be honest that s probably just at the other location not tropicana because their tacos looks NOTHING like their pictures. This location is huge not many decor but they do have the classic bar with condiments. Almost empty though My tacos were mediocre but it s soooo OILY. My Al Pastor was dripping in oil and my tortilla was soaking wet. It made my stomach so upset after finishing only 2 of those tacos. We also had the Carne Asada tacos which was flavorful but def was not the best and those cactus taco is a NO GO. I think cactus is more of a acquired taste and it was so crunchy and slimy and flavorless.. i do not know how i feel about this. I think i just hated it because my taste buds probably expected meat not flavorless plants lol. But it s still nice they have veggie options for people! Lastly i wanted to talk about horchata because i LOVE it but the horchata here is SUPER SWEET like i barely could taste the drink and it was like drinking warm sugar.. it was also so unsanitary because i watched her scoop my drink with a ladle from a white dirty bucket.. yeah i m not sure if this is a place i d like to come back to. I do not like writing bad reviews because i feel all restaurant have their good and bad days but this place was not clean and the food was not good quality whatsoever. The service was passable but i m not coming back. I drove 30 mins to here and i wo not come back there s sooo many other amazing taco trucks and places out there to go to. Be safe about what you put into your stomach some places can cause food poisoning this place was just waaay too unsanitary and food quality was super low. Check some other taco places out on yelp!
Strictly based off of birthday cakes decorating staff is hit or miss. Had my daughters birthday party and inquired about a specific design with her party theme. They assured me they could do the design. Then a week later they asked for a picture of the design. Then a few days later they just said they would put the design on the cake I asked to make sure it was sized to the size of the cake. They said they would. I specifically requested that they make sure the random black text on the photo obviously NOT be on the cake. The day of my daughters birthday party what do you know? They did not use the picture to design it They printed the photo and just put it on the cake. They left the random black text on there. And they did not size it to the Size of the cake... But what you gonna to do? It s just a birthday cake. Just...disappointing...especially for the price you pay.
I used to eat here at least once a week but management did me dirty. They had a special barbecue family style cookout a few years ago. They advertised it on Facebook and said reservations are required limited to 20 people. I made my reservation when the post was one hour old. A month later the day of the event they called and said my reservation was canceled because they had overbooked. Shady. They lost a long term customer never ate there again.
There s a certain set of rules and etiquette that comes into play when a group of guys are good friends most commonly known as the Bro Code . Exact rules and regulations vary but the core values remain the same. Sometimes the code is employed to avoid disputes or to show proper respect and sometimes in the name of the code you end up doing something you would not normally do Taking one for the team as they say to help benefit a fellow Bro . In accordance with the code and the rules of Karma I found myself in just such a situation I set foot in the Dance Cave. Upon entrance you ll notice that cover is 6 or free with a student card. Needless to say from the onset it s clear that I do not represent Dance Cave s target demographic. We re at odds you might say because for several reasons they do not represent my ideal bar club either. First and perhaps most glaringly was the DJ. Either he was doing it for free or lost a flair for his work a number of years ago. We re in an age where DJing has become an art form a competent DJ with an ear for flow and seamless progressions can make all the difference. The job of a good DJ is to guide listeners around musical twists and turns interesting song selection can often take a backseat to creative song sequence. On this night there were many more what the fuck? s upon the start of a new song than excitement. The venue could have put an iPod on shuffle and got a more cohesive mix than what this guy was doing. If party rocking legend DJ Z Trip is a surgeon this guy is trying to preform ocular surgery with a tire iron. As someone born in the early 80s another interesting perk to the Dance Cave and their specific clientle most looking to have been born in the early 90s afford you the rare opportunity to feel like the old guy in the club. Nothing drives your own age home like being sandwiched between guys in Kanye sunglasses indoors and girls in kafia scarves and getting excited when a Nirvana song comes on only to realize the people around you see no difference between it and classic rock staples like Sweet Home Alabama in terms of cultural relevance. You feel like Donny Kerabatsos Out of your element. But alas kids will be kids the Dance Cave will surely continue to thrive and I m going to stop short of using the word Whippersnappers in my increasingly curmudgeonly sounding diatribe. So in conclusion Dance Cave is the club equivalent of those parody based movie comedies If you were born before 1990 have developed tastes and are not going into it ironically you will likely leave confused and irritated. Oh the things you do for friends in need...
I ca not say that I m impressed by this coffee shop s attitude nor their roasting ability. Back when they first opened in Tempe it was a totally different experience. I used to get Cartel Coffee whole beans regularly but then I moved away for a period of time. I thought I d give them a try again as they used to roast pretty good coffee. Well times have changed and they seem to be under the impression that under roasting coffee is a good thing. I purchased 2 12oz bags of beans at 19 for 12oz thinking it was a full 16oz. I guess 12oz is because they are ultra premium . I took the coffee home and made espresso. The beans gave off a good aroma as it brewed but the flavor was terrible. Overly sour and acidic in a bad way. The beans were under roasted and also had an inconsistent roast. some beans were almost a light tan color while others were a deeper tan but none were a full roast. I contacted the shop thru yelp prior to making this review and the owner responded with a diatribe on how I just did not understand how coffee is made and they d be happy to educate me the next time I was in. I was told that things I disliked were actually positives. Over all I was treated like I was stupid for even suggesting there was something wrong with their coffee. Not a positive experience and I wo not go back. I d recommend Coffee Rush for a much better customer experience.
I have gone to Unionville Arms Pub and Grill a number of times because I live around the corner and feel they have a decent patio. I was never that impressed with the food. Basic pub grub. The problem for me is that I found management to be rude. I think there are better food options and pub fair on the strip and will not be going back to this establishment again mostly because of the way I was treated even though its my favorite patio on Main St. Unionville.
The food quality has definitely gone down. The new sitting arrangement they have sucks! You now have to wait to be seated by the hostess problem is the wait time to be seated is always so long. Seems like they are always short staffed. As you look around all of the tables seem to be dirty. See pictures . The staff for the most part is pleasant. A fun place to go would just like to see faster service a cleaner environment and better food. They have added new things to the menu however they were out of chicken and waffles which is what I planned to try! There was 4 please in my party and everyone sent their food back for one reason or another!
I bought a 29 Groupon for this place. 30 minutes of the initial meeting was a consultant trying to get me to buy a hypnosis package worth THOUSANDS of dollars. I will not be returning. I was expecting a hypnosis session with an actual person. They put you in a dark room sit you in a reclining chair and put specialized glasses on you that emit blinking blue lights. They then play a CD with a creepy male voice for an hour. After getting up out of the chair I felt nauseous. The blinking lights created a motion sickness feeling. This did not work at all. I would not recommend this place to anyone.
Came across an extremely rude ABC Taxi driver on W. 25th today in car 6062. He cut me off while he changed lanes suddenly in the middle of an intersection. When I honked to let him know I was there he stuck his arm high out the window and flipped me off for four solid seconds. Someone doing that in their personal vehicle is soon forgotten but he was representing a company with the name right there on the van making purposfully offensive gestures and violating traffic laws.
This place is more expensive than other nail salons for mediocre work. I had to keep telling them to cut my nails shorter bc they are too long and they did not want to cut them when he finally did he did not cut them even. I cut my own nails all the time and I like them on the shorter side so if that s what I ask for then cut them. The massage was nice but only put one coat of polish on my nails. I ve been to this location years ago and was not happy then either but was in the area and thought I d go here for convenience but that was a mistake. Also they wo not accept tip on a card but I do not carry cash so it s either card or no tip.
I just returned from picking up our takeout with my son and I have to say the experience was some of the worst service I ve experienced in Madison. When I called to order the server was almost reluctant to give me the balance and then abruptly hung up. When my son and I arrived at the restaurant we had three servers pass us ignore us and then waited 2 minutes for a server to get off the phone before asking us what we wanted as if it was an inconvenience. I am a single mother and was trying to buy something as a Memorial Day indulgence but not break the bank. The amount of food we received for the 1 3 slab and pulled pork sandwich was laughable. If you are going to charge 15 for that then at least have the decency to provide good sides and in something larger than a condiment cup that the Mexican place down the road uses for their sour cream. I am not sure how people rate this place so highly my suspicion is that the meat is very well done while the rest of the business languishes. I have eaten all over the world and in any international city this business would fail. We will not be returning.
I ve got to downgrade my original review after today. We were seated in the bermuda triangle. We waited 15 minutes for a server to show up apologize profusely then disappeared for another 15 minutes. That was the theme for this meal. Sorry for the wait now wait some more. Glad they finally got a printed kids menu. Kids pizza was extra greasy came out 25 minutes before my entree salad. For almost 17 I was hard pressed to find any chicken or bacon in my chopped Cobb salad. Zero blue cheese. I would have told the server but he disappeared until it was time to flag him down for our bill which took him two passes by our table to drop off. Thank goodness I had correct change so I did not have to endure another 1 2 assed apology long wait. blah!
OK when this place was the Hilton I stayed and split the cost with my girls and it was fine fine fine. All we did was sleep in the room and it was perfection. Stayed a couple of times as the LVH enjoyed the hotel room again. Liked the restaurants that was open late. Not a fan of the quick service or the mediocre fare at the happy hour for Vince Neil s place. Just meh even for happy hour. Stayed once as the Westgate and got good front line service quick check in etc till we figured out the freebies offered were not good for the weekend. BUM MER. Also we were literally verbally accosted from the second we stepped away from the check in desk till the too good to be true additional freebies being offered were for a sort of Westgate time share deal....Ugh! We quickly said thanks but no thanks people and were verbally accosted each and every time we went to or left our room during the day... Just sad. They need to figure a way out of that. Just some low key sales or couple of people not an actual horde of these peeps standing at the elevators. The sadness that was our stay was not worth the good guy price we were getting to stay a stones throw off the strip. The hotel restaurants closed EARLY on the WEEKENDS. Vince Neil s happy hour was still meh. The room was clean however the handle on one of the drawers was hanging off but we did not say a peep. The housecleaning staff had it fixed without us saying a word so that was really nice. There was a resort fee and no resort feel what so ever. The clubs were not even open on the WEEKENDS I mean seriously this place needs an overhaul since Hilton stepped away folks. I had more issues but did not put them on Yelp previously or today. I put my issues straight to the resort . I got a super prompt email from Travis P the Guest Service Manager that told me if I would come back and give them a try I could have a suite. A suite anywhere is better than NO suite. So I thought about it and talked to the hubs and we decided to give it another shot. Travis did not give us any block out dates but I knew darn well that NYE would be a no brainer to getting the hubs on board but I knew that getting a suite out of the Westgate on NYE was not gonna happen either. Let s face it I m not a Rockefeller but I thought I d try. Travis P said he could not guarantee a suite on NYE because the promoters got first dibs on those. Which is fine and totally what I expected him to say.However he booked us standard room for free and promised that some of the issues I had were already fixed. Who knew? Well we ll see. I put A OK only because of Travis his efforts and multiple email s He s the only reason we re giving the Westgate another shot. Stay tuned and I ll report back after NYE 2015. Vegas here I come!
Horrible experiences. Twice I have gone to the restaurant and has been refused a table with the owner stating that there was no available seats when clearly there were. He said those were reserved for upcoming reservations. I was told both times by other patrons that he does not like to seat single people at the sushi bar. I will be definitely taking my business elsewhere. He is most definitely not the only sushi bar in town!
Service was alright but food was terrible. I m not sure what the queso is made of for the nachos but cheese certainly is not a top ingredient. Tastes more like flour and water with a dash of salt. I m glad I asked for the side of jalapeos because that was the only flavor here. Pass on this place for food.
I ve lived in Bloomfield a while and never made the trek over here since it s kind of at an odd location and there s no parking. I got a free coupon for it from the Entertainment book and gave it a go. Looking into this place they have no website. It s 2015. You can create a website free at blogger. There is no excuse. That s low rent. They do have a facebook and they do have a pic of the menu in the photos but you have to LOOK for it. I should not have to look for something it should obviously be there. I read online that it opened at 11am wrong. It opens at 12. I arrive at 12 03. They ask me to wait and still have the door locked. Not a good first impression. I saw they had a soft pretzel on their menu so I ask for one. They said we do not have it anymore . They sell little but still ca not keep their menu up to date. Not good. I get my ice cream and get lip about using the entertainment book coupon with them saying waffle cones do not really count towards it . Thankfully they give it to me without further lip. Total for one waffle cone with sprinkles 4.70. It s actually cheaper at Dairy Queen plus you get more. The ice cream was nothing special. It was melted within 10 minutes and the cone was from the previous night as they pulled it off the holder. I used to work at Brusters and we would make cones ahead of time so they would be fresh. Not here. It s also likely the next person to come in would not be able to get one since I think I took the last two. WOULD I GO AGAIN? If I really wanted soft serve ice cream and did not care sure. But there s nothing special about this place. Dairy Queen and Sweet Licks in North Hills are superior. ADVICE TO TWISTERS Get a website. Get up to date menus. Make sure your opening and closing time is listed correctly. RATING 2 out of 5.
Okay I got sucked in by the TV commercial that said how Dominos had changed ingredients to change customer opinion. That along with a friend telling me that it was good pizza made me try it. I will not stray from Romeo s again. Dominos had a cool app that worked and a price of 7.99 for a large three toping pizza but the pizza not so good. The only part of it that was enjoyable was the crust because it tasted like it had been coated with garlic butter. The sauce and pepperoni was lacking in flavor. Not sure what I will do with the leftovers maybe cut the crust off and throw away the rest! Is that worth 7.99? NO. I will say that the app was really very good. I order through it and it showed me when the pizza was made when it was in the oven and when it was ready for pick up. Too bad the pizza was not as good as the app.
When I initially scheduled with them it went well till I bought their retainer was over 200 then when trying to reschedule later they would act like avoiding me especially being a military veteran. They told me to call for Sonya twice now but this time she never returned my call. I said I will be putting a review on them. Is real sad once you see them they go above and beyond but then when making next followup they have no desire to continue their customer service for you only get an attitude from front desk.
Not good. Been here twice. I forgot I had been here once and agreed to meet a friend for a late lunch. Ringing endorsement right? Both times no one greeted us. Several minutes hanging out with employees wandering around. Annoying. And some of the food was overcooked some wasjust painfully bland and flavor less. Do not bother.
I ate here yesterday based on the strong reviews. Service was slow but I attributed that to a late lunch. Went back today because Harumi Sushi managed their wait so poorly no engagement or instruction for the line. Today I was seated semi promptly but then sat for 10 minutes with no waiter no water and no drinks. When a waiter delivered the drink order to the group next to me that came in after me I walked out. As for food from yesterday Shoyu ramen was okay the broth was rather chicken soup like. I should add that I hate the idea of doing reviews on service but seriously watching multiple restaurant staff walking around with zero customer touches is poor.
Call ahead before you go for dinner. They do not adhere to the posted hours. They close at will especially when there is an event at the PPG Arena. They will close when the event starts. Attempted to go 3 nights in a row and each night they closed early. Frequented Buford s often but will not return. There are enough great restaurants downtown to choose from so do not have to put up with the discourteous management.
Devour Culinary Classic has cut back the general admission so much it is not great anymore. General admission used to start with a reception room that used to be really awesome a few years back....but they slowly cut it back and NOW was replaced with a one man band. For many years I used to enjoy with my general admission Merry Edwards Wine. This wine was quality well made wine. 38 over 60. Even the lower end Merry Edwards was awesome. Here at Devour this year I saw not all but mostly unknown wines. I saw Marietta around 10.00 . I know some years that wine is drinkable....but some years it s awful. They did not even have Pillsbury here this year. The wine selection had really dropped by leaps and bounds for general admission. The cost has skyrocketed for general admission. Back in 2012 I got discounts for attending both days. Back in 2012 Devoured only cost me 45.00 a day and I got the really great reception room with more food than I can eat Great Wines to drink like Merry Edwards and others just as good and lots of great food by the best at show. NOW in 2018 general admission was 105. and I did not get a reception room I did not get any great wine and MOST OF THE BETTER FOOD WAS ONLY FOR VIPS this year...so IT SUCKED. This year they cut back on the food for general admission. Devour Culinary Classic is something I wo not do anymore. They ve became very expensive and CUT BACK TOO MUCH on general admission.
take my mother in law there every week. The cashiers and Justin CSM are good....but last week I had a very bad experience. During check out something on my mother in laws purchase scanned wrong. Went directly to customer service and after Justin figured out why a motorcycle battery rang up on her receipt he called assistant manager Beki to get her approval to refund 78 Beki decided she did not want to take her CSM s judgement and wanted to research it further. We waited for almost an HOUR!!!! finally got her credit card refunded the 78 but the assistant manager never came to even talk to us... this was of no fault of our own....yet we were made to wait an hour and we were not even worth a word in person. terrible customer service from a manager. then I called in a complaint and talked to a co manager. he apologized and said he d talk to her. when I said I thought she owed me the apology he acted like she really did not have to apologize. I m older and was taught if you are wrong you apologize apparently not at this Walmart. there are a lot of places to shop in this valley.....managers should treat their customers like they matter or they ll shop somewhere else. I suggest calling 1 800 walmart if you are treated badly. i m calling and going to talk to the market team. they are the store manager s boss
I wanted to share how extremely dissatisfied I was with their service tonight. I have a large family and my husband usually goes in and orders for us. The girls gave him attitude the last two times and said why dont you order online for large orders? . Well tonight we decided to order online. I was a little frustrated as you cannot order quesadillas online. I scheduled my pick up to be 6pm. I got to the store about 5 minutes early. I saw the staff working on the order. I went to the cashier and asked is this the order for she said yes. I said ok I wanted to order 4 cheese quesadillas but there was no where to order online. She looked at the gentleman standing next to her and he said oh we are super busy you need to go to the line.. Mind you the line was long and going very slow. Also the thing they used to make the quesadillas was sitting behind the gentleman. Well 20 minutes in line and i was finally able to order the quesadillas. I got back up to the cashier and the gentleman put my bags from the online order on the counter. I reached in the bags and all the items were COLD. I said to him all this food is cold! He said well we made it to be ready for you on time. I said I understand that but you said I had to go in line. He could care less that the food was cold and brushed me off. No discount or nothing was offered. At this point I was furious as I just spent over 80 on cold food. When I got the food home and my family unwrapped their food the tacos were soggy and fell apart the burritos were soggy and fell apart.. it was a mess and I only live across the street.. I will never go to this Chipotle again as the staff is extremely rude. Like I said this was not the 1st encounter my family has had with the rude staff there. We did not eat the food and ended up having to go pick up 5 pizzas from little cesars. Well worth it to drive a little further to the Chipotle on Sahara or at Arroyo Crossing.
This place is only busy bc it s right off the strip but do not be fooled the drinks are way overpriced and taste like shit. I was here last week and ordered the cucumber drink only to get this watered down drink that tastes like cheap liquor with an old shriveled up cucumber in it. My friend s drink was undescribably worse. We did not even bother to stay for another round and asked for the check before we even finished them. Now for the cherry on top I left a decent tip despite not feeling like it was warranted .... Checked my bank account today to find THEY ADDED MORE TO THE TIP I LEFT! Everyone should really steer clear of this scam of a bar but if you ve already been misfortuned with spending money here just keep a close eye on your bank account transactions.
We waited thirty minutes for four meals and they never came. When asked for our money back the manager pretended she did not see us and continued filling orders for the drive thru. We never got our money and we ll be filing a dispute with our card company. Avoid this dump.
Why is it restaurant policy to deep fry home frys. It distorts the flavor of the ingredients. I asked waitress to tell cook to saut home frys like they are meant to be cooked. Cook told her her could not do it because they were frozen. Which makes no sense at all. This seems to be policy at all Dennys. This is a quality issue. Also there were 4 people in my party. 2 of my friend were served their meal 15 to 20 min before my other friend and I. My toast came out 10 min before meal. There were about 4 tables being served. Being busy is no excuse for poor service. I am a former cook at a very high volume Denny s and never took sub quality short cuts. I do not understand why this is being allowed. Dennys use to stand for quality at a good price
I came to this nail salon based on all of the positive reviews the outcome of nails were a lot different than what most other reviewers posted. I should had LOOKED at the reviews more carefully because MOST have written a FEW reviews like 1 2 reviews and have NO Yelp friends. Hmmm? Just saying! Anyhow I saw Halo and she was pleasant. I was the only customer in the place around 4pm. No one else came in while I was there. The place was big and clean. After the gel mani she used her nails to tuck the gel into my cuticles! I ve NEVER seen any nail technician ever do this before. Plus it hurt when she did this! WTH? My gel nails started to peel right off after a week. Usually mine have always lasted at least 2 weeks never just peeling right off. Crummy gel manicure. Why bother going back? Not worth the trouble. I like to support small business but honestly I would not go back to this nail salon.
Had dinner at dessert plus in woodbridge. Accessibility to parking was great. When entering the facility it took 20 mins for a waiter to place us in a seat. It took an additional 30 mins to get an order in. The restaurant was mildly busy and you can see the waiters posting up by the wall of the dining room having a conversation than working. Received my food without utensils and waited 10 mins to get a waiter to give us cutlery. The food was very satisfying but the service was below anyone s standards. I would suggest anyone who is willing to this place a try to order the food to go because staying in a place like this for dinner you will leave infuriated. I give this restaurant 3 10 do not eat the candy
Have to change my review....service got sloppy as did hair proccesses...glad I moved on.
I made reservations awhile back specifically requesting a patio seat and realizing we probably would not get it I was spot on. Instead we were crammed in the front of the restaurant. The restaurant itself was quite dim but the view out into the shopping area was distractingly bright. It was awful. Our table was very oddly configured for 5 people and we physically had to move it in order not to be sharing space with another group. The hostess was rude. Onto the food...we had the three course special. The butternut squash ravioli was amazing. The sauce complemented it perfectly. The server had rec d the steak and I should have heeded his advice even though I am not a huge steak fan. The paella was horrible. Completely dreadful. The mussel shells shattered when you touched them and the meat inside was inedible. Blech all around. The chocolate cake was your standard molten chocolate cake that they serve at Chilis.
Terrible service and meat that all sort of tasted the same will be the main reason I do not go back. Pros Salad bar was very good Items were high quality prosciutto moz olives veggies Xingu on the menu try it if you have not The steaks were the best tasting juicy and tender Desserts were delicious key lime pie and flan. After complaining about the service the manager did make it right. Cons Terrible service if seated in the bar seriously the waiter could not be found for drink refills plate removal or the check had to finally ask a manager for the check after looking for our waiter for 15 mins. Meat tasted the same and some was badly overcooked bacon wrapped chicken sausage ribs. There was little to no seasoning on anything. Waiter misled about dessert costs never provided a menu or dessert or indicated it was extra. Add another 8.00 per dessert to your bill. It was deceitful but see point one about terrible service. No doggie bag policy is BS! The idea is to sample the 14 meats but not all are liked or fully consumed. Our table had gathered a pile of left overs that we wanted to take as treats to the dogs. Waiter refused and pulled attitude. I PAID for that food and should be able to take it away. Some people might abuse that but most would not. Throwing it away is wasteful. Get me a d mn box! The food is not very kid friendly so charging half price for food more geared to adults is not a good value. What 8 year old eats 24 worth of meat? The ambiance of this place is left over Elephant Bar. I felt like I was eating in a repurposed restaurant. Parking is terrible on a weekend night but that s this whole area. Recommendations Given the cost of 45 person at night plus drinks and dessert I d skip and go to an upscale steak restaurant with a good view and pristine service. If you do want to go hit the place up for lunch when it s cheaper and the tired interior does not feel as used. I d be surprised if this place survives 2 years.
Ate at the bar today. Was very looking forward to it but was not very impressed. 8oz soda cold fries spent 60 for 2 and not happy. Thought it would be better. For how much they get on the chefs on the show somebody was asleep in this kitchen. The romane on my sliders was garbage.
Because of the amazing reviews here I tried having a pair of pants hemmed. Came back too long. It was well executed... but for someone a little taller. Luckily I can have them fixed. The problem is the seamstress took absolutely no time measuring they should have slowed down and payed closer attention to detail. Such a disappointment but not a disaster that someone ca not fix. Luckily. Dry cleaning is just fine though. Good job there.
Update The maintenance guy to my apartment complex brought me my package this morning. Apparently it was left at the wrong door. My apartment number is B and oddly on the third floor. So whoever delivered it failed to read the lettered apartments. Needless to say my Halloween costume is not needed so i will be returning it. Horrible!!! Ordered a Halloween costume and was guaranteed delivery in 2 days. Though it was delivered in 2 days I never received the package even though they claimed it was left at the door step. I live on the third floor and you ca not see my door from the sidewalk or street so it s unlikely anyone stole it and my neighbors are not like that. Sadly this is the second time this has happened. The first time my fianc ordered work out stuff and had it delivered to his job however they claimed it was delivered and signed by someone that does not even work there. Makes no sense! The worst company! I REFUSE to have anything shipped through by them!
Not only is the pizza simply mediocre at best... the customer service or lack there of is absolutely disgusting. I was verbally harassed by the woman who took my order and then received a threatening voicemail. After I never received my pizza i was charged for my food and have not heard from anyone in my attempt to receive my credit or resolve this situation. I am absolutely appalled by this experience and fully intend to receive a refund somehow. Do not order from this wretched establishment unless you want to take the chance of being treated like garbage by a piece of garbage for a piece of garbage.
Came here for our date night.. we gave been wanting to check this place out for a while. We really the decor inside but the sushi bar did not really blend in with the flow of the restaurant...the lighting was really bright and did not set the mood. We did not do the ayce and I am really glad we didnt. We wanted a light snack before we had a night out in the town. We had the 1 and the pork belly also the gyoza California roll spicy tuna roll and the beef tongue skewer. The 1 item was totally gross. It was almost like a thick tortilla with bacon that was not cooked right and lots of ketchup and mayo. Please avoid this item. We did not eat it but did not send it back because we had already sent back 1 item and did not want to be rude. The beef tongue skewer was bland. No flavor no salt no anything and was too chewy and fatty. My husband had the pork belly and said it tasted like it was microwaved and not cooked. It looked gross and I am glad I did not taste it. The gyoza was okay I really did not like the sauce it came with it was sticky too thick and sweet. I prefer Ponzu sauces with my gyoza. The California roll was consistent but the seaweed was too chewy and I almost could not swallow it.. The item we send back was the spicy tuna roll. I love spicy tuna rolls but this was just awful. It was overly fishy and was all chunky and pieces of the tuna were stuck together..yuck. I am not a negative Nancy but I work at a sushi bar restaurant on the strip and I know what good quality sushi and tastes are. And Doh simply did not hold that standard. I was really disappointed because I had been looking forward to dining here. We left unsatisfied.. Our favorite part was the chardonnay we had and the green tea tempura ice cream. Sadly we wo not be a part of your business unless menu changes are made.
I was at MGM Las Vegars after a convention and saw Brad Garretts Comedy Club advertisements all over the place. I proceeded to buy the show ticket and got in the line and also read the reviews while waiting in line. Unfortunately noticed a pattern of some reviews about arrogance and racist remarks in the comedy. One review said he or she was thown out when responded to the joke. Thats not funny. Will not tolerate that and that is the end of that !
Horrible customer service. Activated my fathers first smartphone today but did not bother to restart or give any instruction on how to use the phone. I did not go with him on this trip and because he s older and does not know to ask those questions they did not bother to help him in understanding anything. They did manage to try to sell him on a bunch of over priced unnecessary items. If there was a way to give less stars I would.
This place was terrible! First the restaurant smelled like moldy wet dog. It was early on a Friday night and they ran out of slider buns. They tried to compensate with other bread to hide the tiny burnt to the crisp meat. The salad bar was a wreck. The person that was attempting to take care of it had their head under the canopy with no hair net on. All in all it was a terrible dining experience.
Worst place i ve ever ordered from. Came in around 5 50 ordered a large pepperoni pizza and half barbecue half buffalo wings. Wings were done in minutes sat on the counter. They were busy so we waited patiently however after 30 mins went and asked if they forgot our order because they d made around 6 pepperonis for people who came in after us. They told us we were wrong and had only been there for ten minutes and to wait. Another 20 minutes passes and we ask again Guy couldnt remember our order and just gave us the pizza out on the tray and then our now cold all HOT wings which was not what we had order. Horribly horribly rude mean awful service. Hour long wait for cold wings and mediocre pizza. Just save yourself and go to little ceasars or ANYWHERE else. Cant get over how nasty they were to us.
Updating my review after a few more visits! We have really tried to give this place more tries because it s in our town and there are SO few dining choices here in Harrisburg. We have received horrible service by a specific server a few times. I wish I knew her name but she only left a poor impression. Both times this happened we had a group of about 8 people. As a former server of many years big groups are where the money is made but you also have to work harder which she obviously does not care to do. On the specific night I m referring to both my husband and another diner in our group wanted lasagna. The lasagna had apparently ran out for the evening. Instead of telling us in a professional way or maybe suggesting an alternative she responded with you should have came earlier if you wanted that. We all looked around at each other pretty shocked that the server would say that. It was a very rude response. The food then took a very long time not sure if this was the kitchen or her not being prompt sending our order in. The food was OK when it got there but the service we received was so sub par the night was tainted. Unfortunately this made an entire table of Harrisburg living friends to not return.
I used to love Piada but this particular location is abysmal. On two separate occasions now I ve not been greeted when I entered. Now even if you are busy anyone with half an ounce of experience with food service etiquette should know to at least greet the customer and if necessary let them know you will be right with them. My food the last two visits has also been cold. The lines get long. BOTH of my last two visits there was some issue with the cash registers as well. I will NOT be coming back to this location.
I bought my new cmax from this dealership. Love the car but did not feel they bargained fairly with me. They stuck an additional 1000 charge In after we had agreed on the price which I did not catch until after the fact. They refuse to do anything about it.
They need to learn how to take orders faster. Some people do not get a hour lunch. I went here on my lunch break and it was ridiculous! Cashier was super slow. I was in line for like 10 15mins. That s half of my lunch break so I walked out. Your chicken may be good but your cashiering order taking sucks !
I m only rating a 1 star for this establishment to solely reflect their lack of hygienic practises. This was my go to salon for waxing for quite a while until they were closed on a Monday and I happened to try another salon on a whim. To my total surprise my new found salon taught me the real way of the trade! I thought it was virtually unheard of for a salon not to double dip with their wax pots which I felt was just universally accepted. No salon should be cutting corners to save money and jeopardize their clients health in the process. It also feels that their management is biting off way more than they can chew since they provide way more services than they can handle quality wise renting salon chairs various types of massage rushing my services etc . I just feel that every visit that I ve returned for has declined significantly time and time again over the span of 6 years . Wo not lie it s also scary to think that when you receive a wax you may contract something awful and possibly irreversible. Ladies please be respectful of your health. I m glad I did since some of the horror stories out there are absolutely terrifying!! And do not let location deter you from trying another salon since this place is right around the corner from me.
First off let me say worst customer service ever!!! The little girl in the front named BRENDA was not very professional at all and she had a big mouth with arguing and was telling us NO NO NO NO!!! She did not want to give my mother a refund on her order The burrito she got was for her grandchild and it was all bad the carne was cold. There is no management onsite ALL. I wish I would have read the reviews before waisting my time and Money. The cook wanted to give us a refund but the little girl did not want too. You can tell the cook Pedro did not want no problems. I ve always gone here and never once did I have a problem at ALL!!
After stopping over at Big O Tires and my car dealership to get a nail out of my tire they all turned me down because they were either closing or it was something they could NOT fix. Pep Boys was on my way home so I had hope that they could remove the nail which they could not . I would need a new tire. So they gave me hope that my tire would not be completely flat by the morning. So the guy decides to ADD AIR!!!! to my tire. I start to drive and my tire makes a hissing sound. I m thinking to myself why would he add air and what the hell did he do to my car. Well thank the car gods that my house was less than 5 minutes away I get out of my car and my tire was completely flat . Can you imagine if I had gotten on the free way?! My tire would have made it through the night had he not added air to my car. Never again! I ll stick to Big O Tires. Thanks.
You win or you lose with this place. Half of the menu is great the other half will make you sick to your stomach. And 100 of it is cheap. Wings served with feathers still on them and hot sauce is a 50 50 mix with water.
The food here was pretty standard bar food. The service was not good. Our waitress never came to check on us after we got our food. We had to come up to the bar for boxes. The cheese curds were good and cheap. It was the best thing we had.
I have lived here for 9 months and in that time have seen many trees fall on this property. When a tree fell on my car management did nothing to help!!
The pizza is absoutly terrible...In fact i find it offensive that they are even legally allowed to call it pizza . The staff is rude at best. The interior is somewhat halfassed and dirty looking without any sort decor at all. They have had old ovens and other used kitchen equipment sitting in the dining area for months now just collecting dust and who knows what else. Here is the ginos recipe cheapiest cheese food product available Tomato paste as a sauce Cardardboard crust that is also still somehow uncooked in the middle. Add canned topings as needed. I ve tried them multiple times and each experience is worse than the last. Normally diarrhea ensues shortly after. Do yourself a favor and go to the nearest gas station they will have better pizza there...
Where do I start. I check in late on Monday afternoon 4 13 2015 . The reason I decided to stay here was the Cosmopolitan is a Marriott affiliated hotel and I have a little status with Marriott Rewards. So I was expecting a good experience. But sadly that was not the case. 1. The front desk and a few of the girls in Autograph lounge were not very friendly I requested wake up calls and never got them. There was a guy named Devin who was helpful. 2. My biggest complaint and it s a big one and I would hope that the health department comes and inspects all the rooms that the shower had a lot of black mold. Eventually they cleaned it See picture attached. Housekeeping left a box of chocolates but I ca not eat the chocolate. 3. I m disputing this but was charged an additional 286 and still trying to figure out why. Generally I did not have a very good experience and for the amount of money I spent that s a shame. I could have stayed at one the other hotels and had a better experience and I m sure that the showers would not have any mold . The room itself is okay and I was on the 54th floor so I had a semi decent view. I know my review wo not mean much because people will continue to stay there. If someone does read this I hope that the very least if you do stay there you get a clean room and do not have any mold and that your room is well kept and clean. Also the 30 a day resort fee is the biggest scam is Las Vegas.
Disgusting. I was there eating a meal of a burger and french fries and it was not until I was half done when I realized there were tiny flies all over my fries and burger. I was throwing up in their washroom for a good 10 minutes. I was so upset and furious.
So even though their coffee 16 oz black is outrageously priced we returned for this breakfast brunch that Madisonians think is tha shiznit. So not that the breakfast was horrible it s not like they screwed up the bacon and eggs but they were pretty bland and disappointing. I ca not put a finger on it but there was really nothing quite special about the basic stuff. So the next time I tried the adobo rubbed pork loin sandwich. It was good but certainly nothing special. Service has been adequate as well. The cupcakes are really disappointing... The few times we ve had them they ve been on the dryer side. Do not care too much for the mouth feel and honestly they re nothing spectacular in the taste arena. They re not particularly creative or original and at 2.50 pc they re certainly not worth the money.
If I could I would give this daycare negative 100 starts. I took my son here last year for a week and he screamed and banged on the door for me to come back. After the third day I stayed around to watch and caught all the teachers on their phones while kids did whatever they wants. The last day I pulled my son out and they seemed very upset. Not to mention they have been caught multiply times abusing their kids. Also my son would freak if a certain teacher came by so I brought that to their attention but nothing was done I notice the last day. Please do not take your precious children here... it may look all nice from the outside since they wanted to paint the brick wall again and paint the building... also their turn around rates is sky high!!!!
Guys never go there honestly! The shittiest place I ve ever been. The quality of the mani is very poor but the most annoying thing is that the quality of the product they work with is extremely poor too. I did shellac half moon wich was supposed to be light brown and white. In three days after that the light brown went green!!! They started telling me it was my fault maybe some chemicals used. No chemicals morons!!! I use dishwasher and a vacuum cleaner! And I do shellac because I want it last more than 3 days! Finally they refused to redo the nails. It was my last time there. If you want to have a good manicure and pedicure never go to this shit hole.
I wish I could leave a review on the work that they do. I ca not . I ve been waiting for 2 months now to get my car repaired. I call to see if the part has arrived and make the appointment and EVERY TIME get told that they will have to check and can they call me back. I wanted to have it repaired by a place that has experience with Saab s. Apparently they do not have the time or inclination to want to repair it.
Pros good sushi especially for a rotating sushi bar. Great location. Teriyaki chicken dish was beautiful but tasted just ok... Cons terrible service. Two workers completely ignored us before a third Busser said hello and finally seated us. The sushi chef did not welcome us as typically they do ... Server talked extremely quietly and rarely came to check on us even though we were her only table. We will be back... We live around the corner but not impressed. Maybe they just had a bad day...
Ordered through uber eats food arrived 1.5 hours later. I order a maki set with sashimi combo for me and my guest. We were hungry and staring at the uber eats app as no driver picked up the food until 1 hour later and took 30 minutes to drive 2 km. My food has been sitting there for who knows how long. I do not think anyone wants to eat sashimi raw fish that s sitting on the counter and in the delivery drivers car for 1.5 hours. While I was sitting here hungry and waiting for my order not once I got some type of call notification from restaurant or uber driver regarding the extreme lateness. I do not blame everything on the driver. Restaurant has to be responsible for coordinating their business with uber. The food was very soggy by the time I got it from the uber eats driver. Perhaps it would ve been better if it did not take so long to reach the customer. I m giving 1 stars because the food was still in edible condition. I do not really recommend this place. If you do end up ordering order 1.5 to 2 hours in advance. If you do not want to eat your dinner at 10 30pm at night. Overall spent 40 with tax and delivery charge for soggy food. Messaged and Called uber uber said they do not give a sh t. No refund or apology from Uber or Restaurant. Awful experience. Stay away from ordering from here!
I ve been to this restaurant twice with high expectations. However both times were a disappointment. Now I should have prefaced this review with the fact that I grew up in southern California where one can get extraordinary Mexican food and at reasonable prices too. So I m already a bit biased. Just the same I went to this restaurant with as open a mind as I could muster. the food nicely displayed but bland and somewhat skimpy servings the service poor the tables and chairs surprisingly uncomfortable the ambiance probably the only good thing about the place the prices depending on your point of view between high to exorbitant especially the latter if you should want any alcoholic beverage even as simple as a beer or glass of wine also expensive considering its location
We are familiar with Cafe Hollander in Milwaukee which is a very solid nice place to have a drink lunch or coffee. The management in Madison must be trying to convert this location from a Cafe to a high volume sports bar. The noise level throughout the restaurant was unbelievable! We had a group of friends who wanted to have a conversation and it was impossible. Even with repeated attempts to have the music and TV sports volume lowered it was impossible to hold a conversation. We had no choice but to leave. I will not return any time soon.
I ve been coming here for years and I was highly disappointed on how I was treated when questioning the price and how I received my refund. My nails look great and my pedicure was awesome. When I was soaking the lady asked me if I wanted the deluxe which was 15 more. I told her that was find and that I wanted a gel polish on my hands. I picked 2 colors for my toes regular polish and picked 2 gel polishes for my hands. When I was done with my pedicure she sent me over to a gentleman who did my hands. He asked if I wanted a manicure and I declined and asked just to clean up. I had a polish they consisted of glitter on the samples that they showed. And I chose a plain color for my ring finger. He cleaned up my nails and applied polish. When I was checking out he said 40 and 30... 80. I gave him my card and then said wait.. Did you say 40 and 30? I said because that equals 70. He said oh yes but 5 for the rockstar sparkle color you chose and 5 for a different color. First off do not tell someone it s 70 when you re about to charge 80.. Second I ve never been charged for a sparkle vs regular polish and third I have never been charged for a different color. A design yes but not a separate color. I walked out and gave them a 10 tip in cash. I thought about it and thought the price was still wrong. I went to the website and the price for a gel manicure as 20. I called and told them back they told me that their prices have not been updated and that I got a sparkle color and a separate color on my ring finger... Also a manicure. I told him I did not get a manicure. He argued with me and said I did get a manicure. I asked him if all manicures included a massage with lotion and he said yes and I told him I did not get that. He hung up on me. I called back and spoke to another guy who told me the pice was correct. I told him that I ve been coming there for years and if they wanted to charge more for a different color and a sparkle color than they should let the clients be aware prior to doing services like the lady with the pedicure did. He said it was for a manicure and I told him to ask the guy who did my hands.. Now manicure was done. He only filed my nails! Finally he said oh oh okay we can give you a 10 credit. After all that BS I do not want to go back. I asked to refund my card. He asked my card number and when I gave it to him he said oh sorry I ca not do it. You need to come in. So I come in and when I walk in and tell them I was there for my refund. The guy who did my nails stop what he s doing opens up his drawer and pulls out a ten dollar bill and hands it to me and continues what he was doing. Completely in an unprofessional manner. The tip I left in cash was to be split between both him and the lady and I hope that still happens. I felt like I was ripped off and my concerns were disregarded. It s sad because I really liked that salon.
We come here often and normally love it .... but the place was nasty today dirty chairs dirty tables and the poor girl behind the counter was according to own words very sick ..... not what I expect when an ice cream is a minimum of 10 !!! I hope they clean up their act !!
Very slow service for a fast food place. Inadequate food supply. Bibingka was done before 8 30 and they wo not cook anymore. Barbecue grill was too charred and they are not cleaning as often to have the barbecue cook properly. Needs better kitchen management.
I have to preface this review by saying that this place was recommended to me by my sis who does not cook and probably stopped by to have a drink and left. She raved about the place and now I see why. The service was awesome and very accommodating. But that was where the good parts stoppeded. The food was not good at all. My date and I ordered the following pork ribs mac n cheese cabbage roasted chicken rice and collard greens. The ribs were tough the mac and cheese tasted like it was fresh out of a box and the cabbage was soft and not even fit to eat with a fork more like cabbage soup. She sent all of that back and ordered the jerk wings and curry rice instead....ummm and it was no better the curry rice was over cooked and mushy the jerk wings had no semblance of jerk seasoning. The roasted chicken was over cooked and dry the rice was decent thankfully! and the collards were over cooked and soft as pudding. Needless to say I was not happy with the food. The staff was very nice and I could not have asked for a better experience otherwise. Maybe Delta s chef needs to come over to Na Na s and they can make a wonderful restaurant experience. The only way I will be back here is for a drink and the music since the band was good. Nice place great staff VERY sub par food.
WORST MOVING COMPANY IN VEGAS. The owner was very rude to me and kept saying he would hang up and just leave my stuff on the curb outside of the gate of my new condominiums if I did not pay the 150 BS distance fee . This is after my initial quote going from 130 to 350 to 500. STAY AWAY FROM THIS MONEY HUNGRY PATHETIC EXCUSE OF A MOVING COMPANY
I ve ordered pizza from this place plenty of times. The first 3 5 times were excellent. Crispy crust with perfectly cooked cheese and toppings. The last 3 times though not so much. If we got what we actually ordered the crust was not crispy and the cheese and toppings was barely hot. It s like they cooked the crust first then waited until they got an order and then applied the toppings and heated it enough to melt the cheese. The result was bottom of the barrel..... even for pizza. There s plenty of pizza places in the area do yourself a favor and try them first.
It s nice to sit outside and enjoy the view. Staff members just walk by look at you and ignore you. What s up that music? Do not they have anything better than Saturday ride to the club douchebag FM playlists?
Poor service. We ordered two waters and a glass of wine. Less than half the tables were full. Fifteen minutes later our waiter works diligently preparing cocktails for people who arrived after us and we still have no beverages. We left and did not eat.
Was excited to try this place. Many neighbors recommended it. I did order it delivery but was so disappointed. The burger which I ordered rare knowing it would continue to cook in transit was not good. It came in well done.... the avocado on it was not even near ripe. I also ordered wings char grilled. My wings were not char grilled. They actually look like another review where they ordered normal wings. I m sorry but I m not paying extra to not have them char grilled. Fries were ok but nothing special. Mine were actually not even crunchy. They were undercooked. Ultimately a total disappointment. Especially since the delivery took under 5 min from order completion to my door. Definitely not the drivers fault there
I played Dynasty Baccarat last night at the Palms. Dynasty is the game with a live dealer but the players all place their bets on an individual computer display. I bet 250 on Player. Player was dealt a 6 and 2 which is a natural winner. Banker had 2 other lower cards. But the terminal would not pay me. I called up to the dealer and he got a supervisor. I then requested the casino manager come over before they cleared the screen. The manager said there was a malfunction on all of the 15 or so terminals and Player did not win because some how there were 6 total cards dealt in a completely different order and Banker won. . . I ca not figure out how that could happen unless the computer system is RIGGED!!!!!!!!! I called The Gaming Commission and their representative came out. He said it says right at the top of the machine in VERY TINY PRINT All malfunctions void play and pay. Therefore they were not going to pay my winning Player bet but instead they would just steal 500 from me. I would point out that it says malfunctions void play therefore they should have at least given me back my 250 bet. . . but of course they did not !!!!!!!! Besides the Palms having an incompetent shift manager named Todd McSimov Station Casinos CHEATS THEIR PLAYERS AND DOES NOT PAY OFF YOUR WINNING BETS!!!!!!!!!!!! REPEAT THEY DO NOT PAY OFF THEIR BETS!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Service From the door man valet gentlemen the front desk the waiter to even the food runners FANTASTIC STAFF. Quick courteous polite and accommodating. The SERVICE is top notch but the FOOD... Food We are not steak connoisseurs we unfortunately had very high expectations for specifically the steaks we have had our fair share of steaks. Regretfully the steak is what tainted our rating. Creme brulee Was on the house for our anniversary! Delicious and the cream was VERY fresh! Spinach salad Made at the table which was nice. Great flavour. Twice baked potatoes onion rings french onion soup Ordinary. Porterhouse steak ordered medium rare but received medium charred burnt we had high expectations for the steak.
I took my car here to have a high pressure power steering hose replaced. They did that just fine but what they also did was to loosen the bolts on my differential and all around the engine so I was blowing oil out. Went in with a power steering leak and came out with a HUGE I mean HUGE oil leak. I guess they under estimated this female customer. Sad thing is I was so pleased with their work and price on their power steering hose I recommended them to a friend. She took her car in and came out with major engine issues. I would NOT go to this place of business if you are female or even if you are a male if you know very little about cars you will have more problems than you started with. If I could give them negative stars I would but since I have to give them a star it is only a begrudging one star.
I really wouldnt have given this place a start but i had to in order to post my review. over priced. we got in for free but i sure in hell wouldnt pay to get into that club over crowded. way too many stairs. the attendents that work there are all clueless to anything thats going on. music is ok and they say this is 1 in vegas? i say go somewhere else. you arent missing much.
Over priced bad food bad service in Yorkville. We were a group of 6 from work who went on a hot summer night. The wine list is respectable not amazing. The food was just average to bad. I had salmon which was dry and tasteless. The 2 people in my party who had risotto were both ILL that night. Our waiter was full of attitude but funny so we can forgive him for his typical Toronto jaded waiter snobbery. VERY disappointing and especially in Yorkville where you might expect at least a very nice meal. Do not waste your money here.
Well these people have made an art out of taking advantage of unsuspecting and unknowledgeable consumers. Having called their Peoria location my first clue something was amiss was that they refused to give me any kind of quote before coming out. This is ridiculous. In this day and age they know what kind of car what kind of key etc. all before coming out. I should have said no thanks and moved on. But my inherent trust of humans and resistance to believe that unscrupulous companies prey on consumers won out. Not only did they reschedule the appointment twice but when they got here their estimate almost DOUBLE the hard quote given me by my manufacturers dealer. Locksmiths are typically considerably LESS than the dealer but not these people. A quote of almost 600 from a locksmith compared to 325 from the dealer plus towing should I decide to use the dealer ...no thanks. I paid their 29 trip charge and sent them on their way. I feel sorry for anybody who actually pays this extortive fee from these people but then again maybe their bread and butter are their trip charges. Sad. Very sad indeed.
BLAND and pricey. 10 for a combo. The fries had no flavor. Ordered the avocado bacon burger. Bacon was not crispy. No crunch in the burger all mush. The potato bun was good though I suggest they UP their flavor profiles for the price the price they charge.
I went into this store yesterday buying all supplies needed to make jewelry. The clerk was nice made suggestions I bought what she advised. Was a disaster I ruined several pieces later learning she had sold me way to heavy of silver I could not do anything with it. I called said no returns but someone else came on and said come in he would of given me credit for part of slab of silver. I was willing to buy more of appropriate gauge when this very snotty sales lady comes over and says no returns. Left a very bad taste in my mouth I will not be returning there. Im sute there are other business owners who would value costomers
Took over two hours to deliver and the food was cold and terrible. Do not get delivery from these guys. Terrible Terrible Terrible.
Went to Cream and felt like I was in a mental hospital? Why does everything have to be white even white padded walls?!?! I hate that it is one of the only places in Scottsdale besides PCL that you need to buy bottle service vip just to sit down! It is really small as well we stayed here a total of about twenty minutes before we headed to myst. Probly wo not be coming here again.
I was scheduled to be on the worst flight they had on September 1 2018 Flight F9 1263. This was one of the most saddening days of my life with Frontier. I went to Chicago to say good bye to my 4 month old nephew who passed way unexpectedly. After the funeral I arrive to the airport at about 7 p.m. in order to head back home to Las Vegas. I was exhaling thinking the worst has passed because I made it through the heart breaking funeral. Unbeknownst to me my day was about to get even worse. I was traveling with my infant daughter when we were told that the 9 15 p.m. We were told to go to customer service to find out our options. I ended up waiting in the customer service line for 2 hours with my daughter attached to me in her carrier on my front and her baby bag on my back. Thus my back was in extreme pain by the time I reached the front. At no time did any agent come through the line and ask if anyone needed assistance. The agent at the counter Samuel Sanchez tells me there is nothing Frontier can do. I explain that my infant daughter has no additional milk and we have nowhere to sleep hoping that Frontier would at the minimum provide a food and hotel voucher like all other major airlines. To my surprise NO they basically stated that it s not their problem if my daughter starves and we sleep outside in the cold airport. I had no choice but to purchase the next flight out at 8 a.m. on United Airlines for 575 because Frontier claimed that they had no more flights to Las Vegas until Tuesday 3 days later . Clearly being afraid for my daughter s health I could not stay in Chicago without any living necessities for that long. Now I m further in debt after experiencing the highest level of anxiety in my life. I am afraid to ever fly with this airline and have nightmares about what could have happened to my child and I if I was unable to get on that United flight. United definitely took care of me and my daughter. They allowed us to utilize their VIP lounge which provided food including milk and blankets for us. Thus we were well fed and rested while waiting 5 hours after being in the airport for 7 hours already for the flight to take off. If it were not for United I do not know what kind of damages we would have suffered. How is it possible that a major airline that makes billions of dollars a year does not anticipate the needs of families traveling with young children when they have cancelled flights in the middle of the night? This is a clear disregard for their passengers well being and safety. They have no reason to be in business if they are going to operate in this manner. Most of their passengers are low income due to their low prices. Therefore Frontier knows or should know that the majority of the passengers do not have 2 000 or more to go rent a car get a hotel and a new flight within the next hour due to Frontier s intentional disregard for anyone other than themselves. All I ask is that Frontier reimburse me for the purchase of my United Flight. I truly have no need for the 200 travel voucher offered as I am scared out of this world to ever fly with Frontier again especially with my child knowing that we could be stranded with no food water or shelter at anytime. Also Frontier should consider updating their policies regarding similar situations so that future parents in this situation are put at ease and do not suffer anxiety attacks wondering how they are going to care for their child when Frontier puts them in this situation in the first place.
Cashier stacked the plants sideways and even said I do not get paid enough for this shit at one point cause I had questions. Wo not be going back to this place anymore.
The course was really not that great compared to other courses in the Las Vegas area. I do not know why it s rated so high. My biggest complaint are the bunkers. The greenside bunkers are like concrete. They even have small pebbles and rocks in them. I seriously thought that they had taken all the sand out because what was in there was like damp heavy concrete. Also there are a lot of dry brown patches in the fairways and greens.
I rented from Payless at the Las Vegas Airport on Oct. 17 2015. The car that I reserved was not available. The agent at the counter did not want to accept my Diners Club as primary insurance. She insisted that I provide my personal insurance which has not been my experience with other agencies. Then she included roadside assistance in my contract without informing me. When I complained she gave me double talk trying not to reveal why the price on the contract was different from the one I was quoted. She tried to tell me it was taxes. Finally I told her that I had AAA Motor Club. Then she said that if AAA damaged their car I would be responsible for the charges. I asked repeatedly to speak to a manager and was ignored. When I finally got my car it was so dirty that there was no way you could detect damages on it. All in all it took me almost an hour to get out of the airport with my rental car. I emailed Payless.com about my experience and still have not heard back from them. They are scam artists. Please stay away. They had one lady crying about the extra charges.
Strange so many stars. Food was almost average. Tea cups had left over food on them. Had to ask for a spoon and a spice tray. No fish sauce on spice tray. Only 2 tables seated. The manager and or owner went for smoke in front of the restaurant twice. Our waiter had some sort of black ink or grease on his hands. P. S. I have been to Thailand more than 20 times... We will stay home and make our own Thai food. Let me know if you want some real Thai food. You can make a reservation at our house. No Drama! I approve this message J K KUHL..
Right now shitty yelp review...When I come to see comedy I do not need to deal with political views and people calling me names because I walked out to the foyer to get away from the classless people...even though I did not say a word! I just want to just laugh and fun. If your agenda is different then just go to another venue that is not COMEDY.
My wife had her birthday there I ordered flowers which were delivered to the restaurant but the staff put them away and never gave them to us when I called the owner he said they forgot lol They were supposed to serve us oysters but they never did which was another disappointment. The owner said he did not charge us for them which was true but the issue was everybody was expecting oysters and they were a little disappointed and again the owner said they forgot or it was a staff error. What s crazy is that the owner never took responsibility for anything he blamed his staff every time!!!! The restaurant looks nice but the service was lousy and disappointing it seems that the staff is not well trained.
I had a sales rep come to give me an estimate for 4 rooms and a landing. I was interested in LVT for the kitchen and a bathroom and laminate for the 2 bedrooms. Since this was the 50 50 50 sale it seemed like we would get a good price. The estimate was for 6400. So when the sale is not going on I assume that the regular price of getting 4 rooms done is about 13 000. Are you kidding me??????
At one time Sushi Rock was the place to go to for sushi in the Yonge Eglinton area. However it s not that way any longer. Three of us went for dinner and paid more than 80 for two bento boxes some soup sushi roll and two drinks. The food was good but not great. The service was good but a bit slow. If I were back in the area I d definitely explore other options. I ve been to quite a few other sushi places throughout the city and there are better options out there.
Ate here yesterday for a quick after work late lunch. My coworker had a 20 percent off coupon. I ordered a gyro sandwich and instead of rice or fries I wanted a salad . I was charged 7 for a side salad substitution. Annoying! Along with a bottle of water my bill with the coupon was 13! A bit pricey for lunch. Food was too salty. Did not finish most of it. I asked for a sprite on way out. As I was driving my sprite leaked. Cheap cups my beverage seeped through. Go to mad Greek on Sahara and durango if u wanna go to a mad Greek. They have happy hour from 11 to 7 and their patio is great !
Waited in line for 30 minutes just to go inside even though we had already purchased our tickets. The samples were really tiny and it was super crowded! You could not tell which line was for what booth. The people that purchased tickets that day entered the Mac N cheese festival before the people that had pre purchased them. All and all who ever set it up needs to have better organizational skills!
There is a reason there are not too many new reviews on this place. I do not know what this place was like in the past but as of April 2017 this is one of the worst bars I have ever been to. I get inside smells only about 12 people so not crowded by any means. I sit down and make eye contact with the bartender she glosses over me and strikes conversation with the regulars 6 minutes later she barks at me THIS ISN T A HANGOUT ARE YOU DRINKING SOMETHING? What a heck of a greeting finally..............way to set the tone. I got a beer reluctantly and I will never be back Neither should you. There is just too many GOOD bars to go to. You know ones where the staff actually wants your patronage. Final Score 2 Toothless Call girls. Yelper Beware.
Disappointed ! The chicken kabob was super dry . The koobideh did not Taste like koobideh at all no seasoning what do ever. Rice was overcooked . Very bad experience . And the side salad was pity . They should never serve that to any customer .
Went here today and was greeted by an off smell when I walked through the door. It made me wonder how clean and hygienic the kitchen is.
Wow. Why do they have this restaurant at the Mirage? I ate here for breakfast with my fiancee and we highly regret it. We waited in line for about 30 minutes and the service was even slower. Once we got seated it took us about 15 minutes to get our drink orders. Once we got our drinks it took another 15 minutes to get our food orders. We both ordered the complete breakfasts and it tasted horrible. The eggs were soggy the potatoes were mushy and the ham steak was disgusting. Do not get me started on the prices. It cost 6.50 for a glass of orange juice! Horrible...just plain horrible. We ended up paying for food that was similar to what we paid for in room service. By all means do not eat here. The service is slow and the waiters are very very rude. This is unacceptable especially at the Mirage. Do yourself a favor and walk across the street to McDonald s. Trust me.
The worst food I have ever eaten. The corn beef was dry the vegatables were cooked in a rancid tasting oil and the flatbread was stale. After I ate here I just went to McDonalds to get the oily taste out of my mouth. I wo not be back here again.
I had a 2pm scheduled appointment today to have allergy testing done with Dr. Gillespie. At 2 20 I was finally brought back to the exam room and asked a series of questions by the assistant nurse who was very sweet. She told me she would inform the doctor I was ready and he d be in shortly. At 2 30 I popped my head out of the room to ask her how much longer she anticipated the doctor would be as I had to be somewhere by 3 30 and had already waited 30 minutes past my appointment. She told me he was in with a patient and that he had ANOTHER patient after that one to see before he d be able to see me. This meant I d be waiting at least 45 minutes to an hour to be seen. I had no choice but to leave and cancel my appointment because there would not be enough time at that point. I live 45 minutes away and drove an hour and a half for nothing. I typically do not post negative reviews that are this specific however this was extremely unprofessional and a even bigger waste of my time.
I have made several visits to this location and this last visit finally made me post this. I love the food but this location hires the worst employees I ve ever seen... they have ZERO urgency or customer service skills. Wait times are beyond acceptable. I agree with previous posts about lack of management involvement and I will never visit location again.
Service is garbage. First time I came I requested that they cook my bean sprouts because I really do not like them uncooked and they did it for me. When I visited again after all the waitresses gave bullshit excuses of why it ca not be cooked. The staff are just unwilling to change my order based on my taste cuhs it s too much work for them and apparently it s not suppose to be eaten that way ... which is absolutely ridiculous. They literally just had to boil the beansprouts or dip them in hot water real quick. Such unacceptable service. Definitely will not be coming here again when I know for a fact that other Vietnamese restaurants will be accommodating to my taste.
The Massage is very enjoyable however beware when booking and appointment!!! The receptionist ERICA is a incompetent RUDE has no phone manners whatsoever and basically sucks at her job. Other then that the massage was good.
Not really my thing. My wife and i were in Vegas and got tickets to this show thank God we got them at the 1 2 ticket vendor We had high hopes for this show as we have seen similar adult shows on the strip but we were not impressed with this show. My wife was very excited to see this as she likes strange art style shows. So i figured they are topless it should be okay. Well we were both wrong the show was not interesting to either of us and we only stayed because we paid for the show. If you are looking for a Topless show see one of the other shows Vegas has to offer this was not worth it.
HORRIBLE service. Both the seemingly teen aged hostess and the cocky smart mouthed waiter. I ca not believe they hire such idiots. Food was so so typical for Scottsdale. No reason to go back.
I walked in to buy a cigar and there was a guy inside that had a baby and a kid with them inside the shop with all the smoke taking to someone that worked there like it was a friend. Damn irresponsible if the Dad and management...
If I could give 0 stars I would. The service we received was horrible. We were checked on twice the almost hour we were there. Food took awhile to be served. Our sushi was warm. Just overall not a good experience. Highly doubt we will go back.
My boyfriend and I were excited to check out Wahlburgers hoping to find another great burger joint near home. We ordered the bbq bacon burger and the double decker w bacon along with 2 sides tater tots and onion rings for take out. We anticipated the wait took 30 minutes and was hopefull it would have been worth it. When we brought the food home we were disappointed to find out our order was wrong....no bacon on the double decker. The burgers were decent but definately had better but the sides were good. I m not sure if i would go back to wait 30 minutes and to have them screw up my order. Btw do not drive there....took 25 min to find parking.
Stay away from this place. These people are rude unprofessional and do not know how to do nails. If you voice any concerns to them they will just stare back at you with a blank clueless face pretending they have no idea what you re talking about. Try it and see for yourself and then when you do please do me a favor and spit on their nasty face. The person who did my nails was a nosy ass fuck who started slamming doors and brooms because I would not tell her my age. She claimed to have gotten her training from New York but let me tell you a five year old could paint nails better than her. The employees are people the owner knows so you can tell that none of them enjoy or know what the hell they re doing. They re pathetically out of place working in a salon environment and have no business being there whatsoever. If you want exceptional service in the same price range I highly recommend Spring Nails at 644 Bloor Street. 30 mani and pedi on Tuesdays and Wednesdays no having to deal with harassment for tips and people who actually know what the hell they re doing. No robot faces to deal with either which is a major plus.
This place sucked. The chef was standing around in the middle of the dining room coughing into his hands scratching his nose and wearing a dirty apron. Gross. All this while watching his wait staff run arounds without a thought of running some food or helping them get out of the weeds. He was just texting on his phone or drinking a beer at the bar. Really unprofessional and disrespectful towards his staff. Now for the ambiance the place was cute but for some reason the lights were placed behind the fans making a strobe light effect on all the tables. If this does not give you an epileptic seizure it will definitely give you a minor headache. All this could have been overlooked if the food was good. But it was not . Quite the opposite actually. The bread sent to the table was stale and frankly would not have been good even if it was fresh. 40 for some dinky frozen shrimp with soggy breadcrumbs and an undressed salad with dry chicken was unimpressive. I ve been in the business a long time we go out to eat very often and I am definitely never coming back here again.
The food is really amazing but there is a catch. The servicr is really slow. Once I waited 45 min in the restaurant for a to go order. Another time it took almost an hour and probably bc the order was lost. When we wanted some to go boxes I had to stand there waiting for them to ask me fir I kid you not 5 min. I ended up just finding them myself. Also do tour own math on the bill.
These places have gone so far south since Danny s it s unbelievable. Danny s may have been using illegals to work but at least they did a quality car washes. Now you re paying 15 for a basic wash that is absolutely terrible. There was still dirt left on the truck the windows were not wiped down at all and there were still bugs on the front of my truck. Aside from that the staff was very unprofessional. I was misguided to where I needed to pay for the wash and once I found the right counter I waited 10 minutes for someone to come and ask if I needed help. During my wait for my truck I witnessed another customers car being pulled out and it literally sat there for 5 10 minutes before anyone even bothered to dry it and mind you there was 4 employees there talking to each other and not one other vehicle in sight. I d never come back to this place for ANYTHING! Absolutely terrible
Ok... So if things come out one at a time...with the intention of sharing... Then let us know... 1 plate of tacos... 3 minutes... 2nd... 15 minutes.... then the price...Lets talk for a moment about value... Tacos... nothing else just tacos...salsa extra....chips extra..... 2 doors down at yard house 40 less costly for more and better food. sat us in a table the size of elementary project table.... Not a fan. Seriously with Yard House right next door and the price and value.... Maybe they just opened and this experience was a flook but it would take some convincing to go back. Dissapoining
Dr. Borlongan is a amazing doctor that being said his staff is horrible. The girls up front never smile and it s almost like you are bothering them when you come in. His nurse is just as bad NO PEOPLE SKILLS. The nurse giving my very young son shots was so rough and does not care about your concerns. I tried to stay with this office because we loved the doctor so much but in the end it was not worth having to deal with his staff. I had a appointment for my son today for shots and could not bring myself to bring him in I could not see him getting shots from someone who could careless about how he feels. I hope the doctor sees soon that he needs to do a complete staff change. It makes or breaks a office. I called a new office and the girl on the phone was a breath of fresh air so kind and made sure to explain everything. I am sad to leave such a good doctor but this is my child and want him to grow with his pediatric office and this was not happening.
I do not know how we would up in Nobu since I booked through Caesars. But here we are. The room was small but clean except the windows were filthy and spotted. Upon entering the room was freezing. We called maintenance. It took several hours to get the room to a reasonable temperature. The water in the shower never really got hot. Certainly does not live up to the hype.
This place is an absolute RIP OFF! We were served a crown and coke in a 4oz glass where the one shot of crown literally took up half the space. The cost for such a drink is 8.50. I asked the bartender about it in a polite manner thinking it was a mistake. She replied our drink prices are high but our beer prices are better . The food was pretty good but the drink prices are like robbery. I feel violated. We will not return because of ECW left us feeling taken for a ride.
